(lp0
Vbeing a mayor fan of headphones I try and get my hands on as much headphones as I can, I had previously tried the Beats Solo, which happened to be quite awful, and owned the Beats Solo HD's, which I found to be an improvement over the originals but still it was not a great headphone, I decided to give these new solo's a shot (blue color) since I was impressed with the jump in build quality/sound with the new studio line that was recently released.This new solo's are even more impressive then the difference between the old studios and the new version. The build quality is far better, no more visible screws and the headband is quite flexible, it is quite a great looking small portable headset, but it doesn't stop with just the build quality, the sound quality on these is night and day compared to the old solo line, I can honestly say these happen to sound quite good, the lower end is still very present but not overpowering so you can also clearly hear the mid and the high range with detail and clarity.The only negatives I could find with these new Solo's is that they are quite a tight fit out of the box, but I'm sure that they will start to loosen up with a few weeks with a decent amount of wear time, and the other one is that they still come with the same carry case that the old solo's also came packaged with which don't really offer much protection since it's not a hard shell case, they do however have very nice padding on the inside so to not to scratch the headset, the other negative is that they don't offer a matte finish version which I would very much prefer over the glossy finish which makes the headset a finger print magnet.Would I recommend these? yes I would, they are a great looking/sounding small portable headset, I never thought that I would find myself writing this since I absolutely hated the previous solo's.
p1
aVI actually purchased these at Best Buy due to having giftcards but either way this is the BEST $200 I've spent in a long, long time! They aren't 100% soundproof but do an awesome job, especially at the gym hearing all the gross grunts and pants from others! Only thing is I wish they were wireless, but do have a good length cord.
p2
aVJust a note for the customers having trouble with the right ear not working. The straight plug has to go into the headphone and the right angle plug into the audio source. Simple thing I know but it makes the things work correctly. Bought two from another source for two grandchildren and learn from mistakes. They love these headphones.
p3
aVBrilliant product, good sound, takes out great deal of environmental sound.I listened to all my fav songs again because they sounded so much better than with my previous headset......might feel little tight after long use.
p4
aVThese headphones were great for the two times I used them and then the next time I took them out of their case, they were cracked!  I have no idea how this could have happened and am returning them.  I hope to exchange them, but I might go with a different brand of Beats are susceptible to cracking so easily.  If this is just a fluke on a lemon pair, and I get to exchange them, I'm happy to update rating to a better score.
p5
aVCan't recommend these headphones. My daughter got a pair for Christmas. She liked them until the left ear speaker stopped working after about three months. I took them apart, but didn't see any obvious problems, like a broken wire. I took them to the Apple store (Apple now owns Beats) to see if the input cable was the problem. They checked the cable for free, and said it worked fine. To get the headphones repaired by Apple, they charge a minimum fee of $99 (not sure if parts are extra) and send them out. So, I would have to spend about $100 to fix a three month old pair of $200 headphones. Doesn't sound like a good deal to me.  I went online to try to buy a replacement speaker, but I didn't find any available. I did find lots of complaints about one speaker dieing, and some videos on taking the headphones apart. Beware, if you should decide to take them apart, Beats Solos and Beats Solo 2's come apart in a completely different way.
p6
aVThese are absolutely amazing I was so surprised by the amazing sound quality of these headphones. I have always wanted a pair of these but I was a little scared of spending a lot of money on a pair of headphones but now I know it was totally worth it the headphones are incredible! Color is gorgeous!
p7
aVMajor improvement over the 1st gen solos (I once had the solo 1.0 and executive line but returned due to subpar sound quality). Since aesthetics are a matter of preference, my review will be based solely on sound quality. These blow the sennheiser momentums out by a landslide. The lows, highs, and mids are well balanced and the lows don't distort even at full volume. Needless to say, I'm very happy that beats FINALLY made some headphones that weren't complete trash.
p8
aVSound Quality - good, but not great by any means especially for the price. These are targeted toward casual listeners so the lows and highs are boosted which isn't necessarily a bad thing for casual listening but there are much better options in this price range. The Sennheiser HD280 Pro's have better sound quality and are $99. The HD 558's are better yet and are the same price. The Byerdynamic DT 770's run about $230, so they're a lil more expensive but are 10x better in every aspect (I've owned these for about 6 years and they are absolutely amazing). So if you're willing to spend this amount on headphones you should look elsewhere.Build Quality - Decent at best. The folding hinges are cheap and I'd imagine will break over time. I've had mine for a month and they're already feeling worn. The adjusting slide is also cheap. It locked my setting into place pretty solid for about a week, now it also feels worn and slides out of place often.Comfort - No bueno. I personally think these are the most uncomfortable headphones I've ever used. After a month they have loosened up a bit but these are still terrible to wear for extended time periods, especially if you're wearing glasses. They squeeze the head a bit which make them feel more secure but after awhile (like an hour at the gym) my ears hurt pretty bad.Value - As stated above there are MUCH better headphones in this price range so the value is pretty low.Conclusion - If you're looking for some slapper headphones these may work for you but in this price range I would still look elsewhere. If you're a gym goer and want some headphones for that I would look at Powerbeats 1 Wired headphones. I had those for 3 years and absolutely loved them. If you're an audio junkie and want something to use for engineering/production then definitely look elsewhere. If you want some "do everything headphones" (gaming, casual/critical listening, movies, etc.) look elsewhere, they're lack of comfort will make any of those tasks unenjoyable. All in all I would just not recommend buying these.
p9
aVAmazing headphones. Such a huge improvement on the sound. The only reason I gave these four stars is because the on-ear headphones can become slightly uncomfortable if you wear them too long.
p10
aVDo not get this, seriously don't. I am an audiophile and I've tried a lot of head phones during my time, take my word for it. Perhaps its just "one" review that has a bad rating you might think but man, Amazon reviews aren't as reliable as you think. Do yourself a favor and look this headphone up aside from Amazon. Ill tell you 3 things I liked and 3 things I HATEDLiked1. The sound was decent for pop, and mainstream music altogether but there is a lack of bass. For an 200 dollar headphone the quality is 6/102.Very durable? sturdy headphones i had for a year and didn't get any scratches aside from international traveling.3. Stylish headphones. its sleek and used mostly by youngsters nowadays to show off I guess..Hated (Dis gon b gud)1.The comfort on these are so bad, worst I've tried out of the tens of headphones I've worn. Holy crap man it might feel "alright" at first, but you get fatigued and bruised within 2-3 hours of use and don't give me that "you'll get used to them" crap because ears don't adapt to things. This is by far the worst part of the headphones in my opinion. (at least its good for travel as it bends)2. The price/quality ratio. I know I said it was alright for 200 dollars, I lied. I'm not writing this review off of envy or wrath, i'm being honest when I say this. If you payed 200 dollars for a headphone TWO HUNDRED it should be amazing and nothing wrong with it as it is for "solo" not producing or what not. But i'm not joking when my 30 dollar Sennheiser CX 300 earphones sound twice, if not much better than these. Beats does deserve credibility for the good cups provided and noise isolation.3.Ultimately, the last thing that I hate about these headphones is the cord. I know you might be looking at this review like (dafuk) but s*** man the port for the Beats are terrible, if you don't put the right end of the cable in the right side, one side of the headphone will not work, its especially annoying if it falls off every damn 15 minutes, not to mention the end broke for me within days of purchase.If you read through the entire review, ill give you credit. If you are not convinced, than it is your loss. I'm just trying to help. Here is what I recommend:Sennheiser HD598 (600-650 if you have money)Beyerdynamic DT 900 (For Dubstep-Trance (Bass)) 700 (For Everything)Audio-Technica (Anything within your price range)Yamaha (Sometimes)
p11
aVAMAZING PAIR OF HEADPHONES. Beats really made an improvement of how they designed this product and the sound quality is also amazing. But the reason why I gave four stars is because the case is bit small. You have to shove them in with the cables and they don't fold exactly like the picture is showing. Other then that AMAZING HEADPHONES
p12
aVI recently made the purchase of a new Macbook Pro at an Apple store and was given a pair of these Beats By Dre headphones for free as part of a current promotion. I never planned on buying a pair personally, but that doesn't mean l wasn't interested in trying them out. They always seemed like an unnecessary luxury item. Nice, but something l could probably live without. I always wondered about the Beats and constantly questioned their quality whenever l passed someone who wore them. This was my chance to finally check out what l had been missing, to test them and see what the hype was all about for myself.First off the packaging. You can tell that they really put a lot of care into making the unwrapping of the product an experience. Simple but sleek. The way it opens up reveals this little pouch which contains the headphones are in is sublime. Presentation is impressive l must say. I was asked to select a colour of my choice and so l chose the red ones as they made a visual impression. The wide range of colours are very attention-grabbing, there's one for all styles and taste. I put them on and was surprised at how comfortable they were. I wouldn't say they're amazing, but better than l expected them to be in terms of comfort. They don't feel too heavy nor too light which is a plus in my book. I like to feel that l'm wearing headphones without having them being too heavy or crushing my ears. These go on the ear, so if you like an over the ear headphone you might want to look at something else instead.The cord is another story. It's not very long and isn't adjustable but that was to be expected. It does comes with a mic and buttons for volume adjustment. The real gripe l have with the cord is it won't go into auxiliary inputs easily. You have to push it very hard to go in. Design is to blame on this. Even the end of the cord that goes into the headphones can cause problems such as loss of sound in one ear. You always have to check on both ends to make sure the headphones are not broken. The first time l tried them on they worked just fine. When l came home later that night they only had sound out of the left ear all of a sudden, l thought maybe they were broken. After multiple tries and fussing with the cord l got them to work but not without trial and error and switching the ends. It's difficult to explain and perhaps sounds exaggerated, but it's a rather common complaint.I've owned quite a few lair of headphones in my life, ranging from old-school to earbuds to gaming and studio headphones. One common complain when buying headphones is the bass sound, or lack thereof. The Beats have a great low-end bass sound and do not suffer from this problem. From the first listen it was clear to me that these headphones have a better than average bass sound. I tried them with different styles of music (Rock, Pop, Jazz etc) and the bass stood out to me as l was able to pick up on things that l hadn't previously heard. I also tried the Beats for gaming, watching television and playing bass guitar and they work really well for all mediums and everyday use. I don't think the highs are anything to write home about, but altogether they have a solid sound and the bass is great.They're very stylish and elegant, but they still retain that certain quality that makes them appealing to everyone ranging from kids to grown attention. Students have them. People on the bus wear them. They have the "it" factor. They come in all these bright colours that pop and grab your attention. I get a lot of nice comments on my red ones. They fold unlike any headphones l've seen before which is impressive, but may be part of a flawed design. The Beats are quite comfortable, yet very fragile. You hear these horror stories and see the pictures demonstrating just how frail they really are. I believe the way fold into themselves (litterally) may be to blame. If l'm going to pay a steep price for electronic goods, they better last and l don't know that Beats by Dre are reliable and can be depended upon.In the end it's more of a marketing triumph than innovation and quality. Yes, you'll get extremely sleek and stylish headphones. And yes, they are pretty comfortable. The bass and overall sound is decent. However, what you are left with are cool looking headphones that retail far beyond market value. And frail ones at that, they feel like they could break at any moment at the slightest touch. I'll give Beats By Dre this: they may be the best-looking pair of headphones ever made available to the general public. If anything, Beats can be taken as a valid lesson in marketing. Consumers buy them because of how they look and how they feel wearing them, largely as a result of clever advertising.If you're expecting more than cool looking headphones wrapped in beautiful packaging with an incredible sales pitch and presentation, you may be disappointed. If you want to look cool, fit in and spend 229$ on headphones that should probably retail for less than half of that then these are the ones for you. They're not bad 'phones by any means, maybe even slightly better than your average pair, but l found them to be ultimately overhyped and overpriced. I suggest you do some more browsing and look at what else you can get for your hard earned dollars. 3 stars.
p13
aVBeats Solo 2\u2019s enhanced performance, appearance, comfort, and convenience is perfect for someone who loves music and want to stay in fashion. Their portability makes them easy to use while running, riding the bus or walking the dog. As a professional golfer I travel all around the world and my best travel buddy is my Beats Solo 2 headphone.Beats Solo 2 offer a great music experience with its bass and sound-canceling effect. The bass in the headphones is clear, which enables you to listen to music genres with high bass, like house without distorting the beat. The sound-canceling feature allows you to listen at a high volume without people around you hearing the music. That sound-canceling feature is both beneficial for you and the people around you.While people do not hear your music, they will see you wearing them. Beats Solo 2 is probably the only headphones that actually make you look better with them on. They come in different trendy colors like purple, green and gray so you can match your personality and style. The headphone has a minimalistic, smooth and clean design, which make them less bulky compared to other headphones. Its shape makes them timeless and therefor something you can use for many years.After wearing the headphones for around five hours they start to feel tight on my head. However, most people use them for a shorter amount of time like during workout or walking to class. During that time they are comfortable and its curved frame that makes them stay where they sit. The earcups are made in a soft material and fit the ear ergonomically as well.When you finally are done with your workout, or have arrived at your destination the Beats Solo 2 is easily foldable. This feature makes them convenient and easy to take with you.If you are looking for qualitative, fashionable and portable headphones then Beats Solo 2 is my recommendation. They will make you look good at the same time as you can enjoy your favorite music while running, traveling or studying.
p14
aVI've never expected i will drop US$200 on a pair of headphones and i always find the beats is so hipster-like and overhyped.But after I tried it at my local store, I'm sold! Came online immediately to amazon.com to purchase my first and most expensive headphones!!I have in fact owned a few headphones, Sony, Urbanears etc and they hurt my ears so badly after 1 hour. Urbanears caused the most pain and even had a headache. Tried to loosen it but still no use, I supposed its the poor design of the cushioning.I will say if you have extra cash on hand, go for it! I hope this will last a long time for me.No regrets so far!A little problem could be the "leaks", i realised people beside me are able to hear some of my music although i've already lowered the volume! Not sure if its due to my headset positioning or my hair?
p15
aVI finally received these headphones today after ordering them on Black Friday (from Target, &shipping; took forever!). I was very pleased with the product as I unboxed it. The color was beautiful (I ordered pink), the weight was nice & light, and the design was very cute & sleek. I eagerly plugged it into my phone to test out the sound quality. The sound came out great and I was still very pleased.UNTIL... I took off my headphones and could very loudly hear my music blaring through them. I know they aren't noise canceling or whatever, but daaang I was not expecting the sound to leak that bad! I felt like had I bought a mini speaker set instead. I had to put my volume to very low for the sound not to leak through.Im very disappointed about this because I was planning to use them on an upcoming trip, but I don't want the whole airplane to be listening to my music and I don't want to have to turn it super low for others either. Idk if this is normal? I don't remember reading about this problem in other reviews? Unless no one else noticed or is unbothered by the sound leakage? Idk?? I'm probably returning them..
p16
aVThe beats solo 2 are by far the worse set of over the ear headphones and the most expensive I've ever owned. After only four months one side of the headphones stopped playing. I ended up contacting Apple support. They sent out a replacement pair. I've had the replacement pair now for about 5 months and the headphones are falling apart. This will be my second time having to contact apple about this product. I've had cheaper better sounding headphones that i had for years and have never had any issues, i just don't understand all the hype over these headphones.....never again!
p17
aVThe Beats came in brand new wrapped in the plastic and everything, these are probably the best headphones I've ever owned. The beats logo on the cord will fall off but a bit of superglue can fix that easily, I get many compliments on my Beats and people love how they sound, I love how they sound 100% should buy!
p18
aVAwesome! A lot nicer and comfortable than the previous solo HD. They don't leak sound as bad. Great sound and they feel like quality. Definitely recommend. I have the red pair.
p19
aVThey were a birthday present and they work beautifully. They look exactly as advertised and have a firm grip on your head so you don't have to worry about them sliding off.
p20
aVThe new solo definitely looks and feel much more solid compared to the previous version.  This time it covers your entire ear unless you have very large ears.The sound is definitely much more polished and improved compared to the previous.  It sounds less punchier, more richer, warmer, and the mid-range is much more pronounced.  It is still tuned more for electronic beats and less than ideal for rock.  I like headphones that offer clarity and this one is much clearer than the previous Beats Solo but still a bit muddy but good job.The sound stage is close and doesn't have much depth so for those who listens to live recordings this is where you will find some disappointment.Overall, it's a pretty good headphone for the masses.  For audiophiles $200 is not that much you get a stylish headphone and works reasonably well.
p21
aVI got my headphones 1 week ago and I am very impressed of the sound quality and noice isolation. I recommend getting them used because $200 is a lot to pay. I got mine used and saved a lot of money and the headphones are in great shape and sound just as a new one would
p22
aVThese are much better than the 1st Solo Beats.  They fit a little snug depending on your head, but placing them right over my ear helped a lot.  They sound great and I got decent response with Hip Hop genre , Pop, and some soft rock.  How they performed with soft rock and alternative is what sold me on these.  We all know they do great with hip hop and RnB.  Solid purchase.
p23
aVWhen I put these headphones on I was totally not expecting the amazing sound I heard. They also have some bass to them depending on the song. If you are thinking about buying these I would definitely push you to get these.
p24
aVThese where a Christmas present for my sister and she loved them. She registered them with beat with no issue.  I also bought the smart guard warranty just in case.
p25
aVI won a pair of these at an arcade game. They are amazing and only took me $7. If you can get these for cheap than buy it. It not worth more than $150
p26
aVI have had mt beats for more than 3 week by now and at first they were working really well but then out of no where the right ear stoped working, then one of the ear muffin came off . i tried to go in and fix it it was a shortage in the cord so if you move it a certain way it work and when you move it back it dont work and then after like a week or so it just stopped working at all
p27
aVWith nearly 880 reviews posted already, I am not sure that I can add anything new or exciting to the mix. I can, however, lend my online voice to those who have found the Beats Solo 2 Headphones fantastic. Before purchasing the Beats, I was using two grades of black Sony headphones--one the cheaper head-wrap over ear type with the thin material over the sound pads and the other a scale or two up, an over the head type model with softer ear cups. Both of these products were /  still are good devices, and I intend to keep them. However, when I unboxed the Beats Solo 2, figured out the correct way to plug in the chord (it DOES matter, folks!), and put the headphones on my ears, I was completely amazed, enchanted. As cliché as it sounds, the experience was like I'd never heard my music before. I couldn't believe how full, deep, and rich the sound was. One of the first songs I tried was Sarah Brightman's "Winter in July," which begins with an orchestra warming up before the concert. In the Sony headphones, this beginning sounds well enough--the higher sounds more obvious with strong hints of percussion and subtle bass. The experience feels distant. Yet, in the Beats Solo 2, I am sitting in the first row behind the orchestra and feeling, not only in the ears, but the whole body, the depths of the bass and the percussion reverberating in a hall. When Brightman begins the lyrics, her angelic voice soars above the soul-stirring accompaniment. Music becomes magic for me at that point, no joke. I chose several other songs of different genres to work these headphones and to find out how they handled my moody, eclectic musical tastes: Steve Perry's "I Stand Alone"; Owl City's "When Can I See You Again"; Norman's "Vandaren"; Harry Potter films' "Hedwig's Theme--Lumos"; The Lion King's "He Lives in You"; Sylvia's "The Matador"; Michael Ball's cover of "This is the Moment"; From Ice Age, Queen Latifah's "Walk the Dinosaur"; William So "Xing Fu Li Wo Men Hen Jin"; The Mexicali Brass' "Spanish Flea"; and Jonn Serrie's Christmas Prayers Album. This Beats Solo 2 handle everything perfectly. In my opinion and experience, the headphones are wonderful, well worth the price. These headphones DO distinguish themselves in an audio collection that contains the Sony products I mentioned early. :)Product Observations & Usage:I chose white/silver because the product looks sleek and classy. The Beats Solo 2 headphones are well-designed, and they are adjustable for personalized fitting. While new, they do feel a little snug as others have mentioned here. You have to work with them to find your preferences--the sweet spots. For me, I start out with them rather snug and later loosen them during my listening sessions. / These are powerful headphones. Users should heed ALL health and safety information included so that they can protect their hearing. It is the users' responsibility to ensure safe and appropriate listening habits and care for the device. Children and teens should be guided on how to set volume levels, take listening breaks, and do other relevant tasks. I adjusted my volume levels on all my devices so that I can safely use the Beats whenever I want them. / The sides are marked--L for Left and R for Right.  / The ear cups are butter soft and comfortable, but I do find that I need to take them off for a break after around 45 minutes or so. This isn't so surprising because I do that with my upscale Sony headphones. My Beats came with a black, padded storage case that has a hanging clip on it. I also received an offer to try BEATSBYDRE.COM/MUSIC and limited-time access code. / I have successfully used my Beats with an iPhone 5s, an iPad third generation, and a Macbook Air. No problems! Same fantastic sound quality! I don't know how they would perform on Androids or PC computers.There are many types of Beat headphones--including wired and wireless, so I suggest that people do a bit of research for buying. Also, people should watch out for products that have been discontinued by the manufacturer. There are differences between Beats Solo and Beats Solo 2.  // Regarding the Beats Solo 2, I would recommend these headphones for anyone who loves relaxing in soundscapes. I am thinking of buying one for my nephew on his next birthday.
p28
aVMaybe that mine are damaged but main sound is all in the left side. Very disappointed. Static comes an goes too.  Updated: got replacement works well so far but sent two cords one with audio control one with strange thing is last time gave me one. Not to mention the audio one is obviously crimped.
p29
aVI love the rich sound, comfortable fit, and the quality construction. I own another pair of Beats Solo 2 that my teenage son took over so I needed another pair for myself because I like them so much. I will never be able to go back to cheaper brands after experiencing how superior these are.
p30
aVsent back and bought elsewhere because on day 2 my oldest granddaughter called me and told me she could not hear out of one ear unless she held the cord, NO Way so I returned them.
p31
aVWorst experience with a product in my lifetime!  Don't order unless you enjoy hearing through one side only within 3 days of owning!  Such an extreme fail, $20.00 Sony's work better!  The cheap flimsy audio remote control touch cord in one word "sucks"!  So cheaply made, I can't understand a product that was bought by "Apple" would allow to be sold.  I received a replacement for the Two I initially ordered but decided to send them back.  Fool me once shame on you, fool me twice shame on me.  Don't be fooled by all the hype they are very cheaply made.  You can spend less and get a far greater product.
p32
aVThese headphones are a complete joke. Haven't had them a year and one of the speakers has gone out. Beats is a very overrated headphone and really not worth the $160.00 that I paid for them. Heck the SMS Street by Fifty Cent are far and away better.  Amazon should allow me to return these solos. Not even a years usage. Just some junk.
p33
aVI would NEVER order from this company again. My Beats came in the mail today and I was so excited! Needless to say they don't work! They only have sound on the left side and when I touch the beat cord it turns static and low. I do not believe theres beats are brand new. I will definitely be returning these.
p34
aVBought this for my sons bday and just opened these headphones don't work. there is a lot of static and sound comes through only one side on the left.  We had tried EVERYTHING including setting on iPhone it doesn't work and it passed the time to return it.  Now I have to go through manufacturer
p35
aVHad the headphones under 5 months and the right ear cup just went out.  Music works fine out of the left, but not the right.  Tried to reach out to the seller for a replacement and was told the transaction is complete and cannot be replaced or returned.  Quite pissed.
p36
aVI am very dissappointed in this purchase.  I recieved this package on Saturday but am just now getting to opening it to test them out.  I put them on and the left ear sounds great but no sound out of the right ear.  I played some with the cord and the button you push to mute worked a few times but allowed me to hear both speakers.  It stopped after a few times.  This is an expensive purchase for them not to work.
p37
aVI was lucky enough to win a pair of these in a sweepstakes a few weeks ago and have since been using them extensively. I wouldn't normally purchase a pair of on ear headphones because I've always found them to be uncomfortable and painful after extended use. I'm very pleased to report that these are some of the most comfortable headphones I've used whether on or over the ear. The padding is extremely soft.I'm not an audiophile by any measure so I'll just give very basic comments on the audio quality. The headphones sound excellent and have excellent bass. I listen to mostly Alternative Rock, Folk, and Electronic and these are very well suited to all of those. The included cable features a mic, button, and volume controls. I have used them to place voice calls with Google Voice on a number of occasions and the callers have reported they could hear me loud and clear.The thing I've found most impressive is the size and portability. They can be folded up and put into the included soft pouch for easy travel. I would normally take a pair of earbuds for long car rides and traveling but I've found myself using these almost exclusively either home or away. The design an build quality is absolutely top quality. It's what you would expect from an Apple product(which they now are)including the unboxing experience. They are heavy enough to not feel cheap yet light enough for portability. While they look great and modern the high glass finish gets smudges and fingerprints as soon as you touch them. I almost wish they were matte finished instead. The high gloss surface would be my single complaint.Overall, the sound quality is excellent and after getting them for free I would definitely purchase them at full price and wouldn't hesitate to recommend that others do the same.
p38
aVSound is fantastic. After all of the talk of the other models being too bass heavy and muddied the music, they have finally perfected the level between the sound ranges. Bass is still there very much so. But the mid and high ranges are very crisp. The design is very high quality and extremely durable. In the box you get a month of free Beats Music which is pretty cool!
p39
aVI have purchase THREE of these in the past 6 months and every one of them fails. There is something up with the wiring that prevents one side from working after about 2 months of use.  SO FRUSTRATED.
p40
aVMy eleven year old son saved his money to buy these. Wire became disconnected internally. We went to return them but product had been discontinued so it was not eligible for a refund. WRONG.
p41
aVthey are great headphones.....i never had the others so i cant compare to them but they really are better then any other headphones ive owned before and i looked into them a lot compared to the others and from what ive read its really worth spending the extra 20-30 dollars for these ones over the solo hd's ....they really have a great sound the only thing is they hurt my ears a little but i have big ears for sure plus its not bad enough that i dont want to use them in fact i hated headphone before these but i have a feeling ill be using these a lot!!oh and one more thing ...they do seem very well made like they raent just going to fall apart or break on you ...they are heavy-ish and not just some cheap plastic (the joints that make it bend are metal) and the rubber padding on them seem like it will last a very long time if at least somewhat taken care ofbut all in all they are very nice once again so you remember the only problem i have with them are they make my ears hurt but i think i will get used to it soon (im also not used to wearing headphones much)
p42
aVWear them at the gym, while walking/hiking, doing yard-work or just knocking around. Definitely getting my money's worth.Update. In my case the headset worked great for three months, then the right side quit. Just quit. Tried a new cord. Nope, it's the headset. Great while it lasted, but call me crazy, for this price I expected it might last a little longer. Sorry Charlie, no returns after 30 days.
p43
aVWhat an utter piece of garbage. I didn't buy these myself, but luckily one of my friends was dumb enough to get these and I got to try them out. These are cheap $50 headphones with $100 added on for for the Beats name, so Dr Dre can get richer. Sound quality is poor, especially compared to other high end headphones. Construction is super cheap - pretty much all glued together plastic. I guess a few metal screws would have been too expensive. Of course, the real reason for the glued together construction is so that they can't be repaired. Once they break (my friends set lasted 4 months before one side of the headset stopped working), you have to pitch them since there is no way to take them apart, repair them, and put them back together unless you want to crazy glue or tape it.
p44
aVDISSATISFIED!!!  I purchased these headphones for my 17 year old son for Christmas.  They arrived in a timely manner. He loved them and has cared for them very well.  We even bought a sturdier case for them.  He has had them for 4 months and now and the right side no longer works.  There is a bad connection internally within the headphone portion.  I am very frustrated.  Now that it is outside of the 30 days of purchase with Amazon, I have no option of return or replacement.  I paid a large amount of money for these to work properly for a mere 4 months.
p45
aVThis is a little weird for me. I have always considered Beats headphones junk. The McDonald's of the headphone world. So imagine my surprise when I was in my local electronics establishment and put these on for a listen and it was like WOW I actually like these! Nowhere as good as my Beyer Dynamic T51i which is in a class by itself but every bit as good as all the other on ears I've tried and I've tried them all. The build quality is cheap plastic and the clamping force is excessive. But still a solid 4 stars.
p46
aVI received these for a gift in December of 2014 and was in love for about 6 months. When suddenly to my huge dismay, the left side of the headphones just stopped working. I am 43, I don't abuse my equipment, they were not dropped, mostly just used while relaxing and enjoying music. The person who gave them to me didn't purchase an extended warranty, and I can't believe that these are not covered for even a year as a courtesy at this price point. So disappointed. Such a huge waste of money.
p47
aVI usually don't get over priced gadgets like these but I did on an impulsive buy. They sounded pretty good for the first 4 months and then I came back from vacation and the left ear wasn't working. Good thing that I got the 20 dollar warranty at PC Richards. I ended up exchanging for the wireless ones and paying the difference. The only issue was that the warranty was $30 instead of $20. It's overpriced and only lasted me 4 months, so just get the warranty if you dare buy it.
p48
aV"Tremendously Disappointed" doesn't even begin to describe how I feel about this product.  Have had it just over 3 months and already one of the earphones is not working.  And every time we are done using the headphones we pack it back up and put it in the case it came with.  What shoddy workmanship, especially for something this expensive.  I have 3 Sony headphones similar to this one that I bought nearly 2 years ago that ALL still work just fine.  I will be sticking to Sony or Bose from "hear" on out!!!  Do yourself a favor and read the negative reviews before deciding to purchase this piece of garbage.
p49
aVLike most of the other one star reviews, I am very disappointed by this product.  Within 90 days one ear quit working.  There are no returns online past 30 days so you are sort of stuck with the product.  I would definitely not spend this much money on this product or I would buy it at a retail store that would take it back for you.  Magically the consumer is stuck trying to sort out the details.
p50
aVI was so excited to receive these in the mail but as soon as I tried them on, I noticed that one ear wasn't working. I tried it out on other devices to make sure and it was definitely a defective product. Heard there is a common issue with the cord - Bad quality for such a high priced and popular brand :( This really turned me off on all beats products. My husband has Bose headphones and they are amazing and so much more comfortable. Get your moneys worth and look into other headphone brands!
p51
aVCurrently listening to these headphones right now as I write this review.  As a person who has own the beats studio wired. beats studio wireless. and beats bluetooth wireless, I have to say these are a home run.The beats studio I had to return to best buy due to it's size, it excessed over my ears and unfortunately, made me break me out.  I decided to go with something smaller; the beats bluetooth wireless, however it did not have the "umph" and bass that the studios had. Returned them to best buy and never looked back.Until today, I was in best buy again, and saw that beats had released a new improved solo II.  The solo I's never crossed my mind due to its minimal build quality, but I tried these on at the sample station and immediately fell in LOVE!The sound textures, the hi's, the bass, the loudness, all packed into these smaller and cheaper (sort of) head phones.  I would definitely recommend these to anyone who is new to the market of audiophiles.  I know a lot of people get hate on these because it's stylish and trendy, but who doesn't like to be?  Everyone likes to feel cool and in the spot light with what they wear.  Why not get a pair of headphones that are stylish AND sound extremely well.Purchase these headphones, you will not be disappointed. I personally recommend purchasing them at best buy with the warranty.  So if they snap (and they tend to), you can immediately replace them headache free.5/5 stars.
p52
aVVERY DISAPPOINTED.  I purchased the headphones in August.  By October, the right speaker stopped working.  I brought the headphones to an Apple Store for repair, but Apple indicated that -- although I would have thought that the item should have been traceable by its serial number -- without a receipt (which I had misplaced) they would not be able to honor the warranty.
p53
aVThese are the worst . First pair only one ear worked. Returned got a new one , they worked but when I went to the gym and started walking around the music kept going in and out . You would think after 200 bucks for headphones these would be incredible . I wouldn't pay more then 10 bucks for these . They almost make your ears sweat like crazy at the gym . What a joke .
p54
aVThis headphone is truly a visual master piece. Though it is not as rugged as my SOL Republic headphone, my Beats is much more beautiful to look at. But then, the SOL has a much better sound reproduction (bass)than the Beats Solo 2 and much cheaper. The Beats is oil magnet. But then, I have no complain at all cause I bought it for a discounted price.
p55
aVThis was a gift, but I had the pleasure of using it!  I really enjoyed the sound quality I highly recommend this product.  I was annoyed that I found it cheaper towards the end of the Christmas season lol, but the product is fantastic, the color is awesome and the quality exceeds my expectations.  I will probably purchase a pair for myself.
p56
aVI have bought my son two pairs of Beats headphone, solo version, and both have had mechanical errors that have caused them to quit working without any dramatic damage.  Both pairs have had the right headphone quit producing sound.  Neither pair were used very often and suffered very minimal damage - just a little wear and tear over time.
p57
aVOne word, REDEMPTION. Being an audiophile I love getting my hands on every pair of phones I can to try out. This pair is indubitably the best of the Beats line thus far and a HUGE improvement from the Solo 1. Do you want to have a great sounding slick packaged set of headphones? Look no further, Beats Solo 2 is back and better than ever.
p58
aVSo I've had the headphones for about 8 hours and I'll list the pros and cons from my short (yet personal) experience with these Beats:Pros:- Sleek design: it's just as the pics show- Bass enhanced: you can feel it just bumping in your ears- Noise cancellation: you really can't hear when people talk to you or even hear anything around you- Portable: comes with a case and you can fold your Beats in case you don't want to carry them around your neck.- Comfy: really comfy cushioned ear piecesCons:- Glossy coated: can get filled with fingerprints/marks once you touch your Beats- Overpriced: need I say more about how much it costs?- Audio: Really no different from normal headphones if you listen- Beware glasses wearers: You can get uncomfy after a while wearing the Beats with your glasses onOverall, the Beats Solo 2 are great since the design and bass make the headphones but honestly the price doesn't match what you hear. Every other review you've read probably say the same but I can vouch they're correct. I gave it 4 stars just because I'm disappointed that the Beats are focused on the bass. Anyways that's what I have to say about my first Beats.
p59
aVBeats Solo HD were too high on the bass.This is a significant improvement over the last version.If you love the Beats brand and you also want studio quality headphones this is your best bet.Its also sounds really good plus the fact that they are a fashion statement, makes this a must buy if you are the right person.
p60
aVPurchased these for my husband, suffering with great pain due to 2 months of radiation for head/neck cancer.  These are lightweight enough for him to wear without causing him discomfort or (additional) pain.  Also, he's pleased with the sound produced, and would recommend these to anyone suffering with head/neck cancer treatment.
p61
aVAwesome Headphones! I purchased the first generation solo's and the craftmanship and sound quality was sub-standard for $200. These were a 100% improvement and both my son and daughter want a pair. I did'nt get this type of response from them with the other Solo's! I will be purchasing these in the Hunter Green!
p62
aVGreat headphones and the sound quality is great, but poor workmanship. I've had these a year and a month and they have already shorted. I take care of my headphones, but this is the second pair that has shorted on me. Google this on Youtube and you'll tons of a fixes for it. Apple will charge you half the price of the headphones and seven dollars to get them fixed. Wasted money on this and can't get them fixed.
p63
aVYOU guys like that A+ 5 * FROM eeeeeebayyyy ... hahhaa  ebay sucksWhoa  holy  cow no wonder these cost so muchThe packaging is greatThe product is greatBest headphones  I  ever  triedGave them to  my kid as  a BDAY  gift  for music  and gaming  and he  LOVES em
p64
aVIf you can get a good deal, these headphones are more than ok. They fit nice, look nice and the sound quality is awesome. If you use it while jogging or doing any sport activity your ears will eventually start heating up and it's annoying. Other than that these are definitely 5 stars
p65
aVI Appreciate them and For my first time ordering from Amazon I was nervous but after I got my beats and they came out perfectly and especially when I started listening to music I fell in love with them Thank You so much Amazon I will definitely be ordering more from you guys \U0001f60d\U0001f60d\U0001f60d
p66
aVThe sound is great, however the switch on the wire did not work. Amazon offered to replace the entire set or to give me an additional discount that would allow me to get the wire fixed or replaced. Amazon is the best and most reliable, plus I definitely recommend these Headphones.
p67
aVI bought these headphones for my son for Christmas last year and as of weeks ago, they no longer work.  I think we spent about 100 dollars on this.  Its too late to return, but what a bummer it was for us that we paid good money for these and they no longer work.  My son only used these to listen to music from our computer, never really taking these out of our house.
p68
aVI have to be honest: I like Beats because they are popular within my Age Group (I'm in college). Do they seem to have as good as sound as they did at the store? Certainly not. Is it worth paying $100? That's really up to you. I felt comfortable doing so only because of the vast number of reviews and because Apple recently bought Beats, and I trust Apple products (call me biased).Cons:*Remember the PS3 Original? These black beats are made out of that same fingerprint grubbing plastic. Not super noticeable, but definitely not a matte.*The included case is a little too soft, and its definitely tight for my Beats. I have to scrunch them to make them fit.*I have a little bit larger ear tips, and so the Beats hurt either the tip of my head or the tips of my ears after awhile of wearing them. But, I have had this problem with most headphones, so it isn't exclusively limited to these.*For some, the price can be a huge dilemma. It definitely was for me.*The wireless version costs a $100 extra! While these are the best non-wireless headphones, I wish prefer wireless.*I listen to Justin Timberlake, Westlife, and Adam Lambert. None of these singers have heavy bass tones, so the Beats sound pretty average. I tested it with bass tones on YouTube, and that's when they definitely start to rumble.Pros:*It folds quite nicely, making it easy to toss into my backpack.*Single cord that can be detached from the headphones for easy storage. The cord is made out of tough material, bends easily but doesn't tangle and definitely is able to withstand damage.*Comes with a mic and remote control on the cord. You have all the music controls possible in the remote (skip, pause, stop, backward, volume, Siri). Better than Apple's earpods.*I made a call while wearing my Beats, and my Mother, who is finnicky, said she could hear me just fine. I felt like I could hear her better, but that depends on your phone (I have the iPhone 6).  The remote also allows you to answer, decline, and hang up.*Honestly, another huge factor for me was the fact nobody looked like a dork while wearing Beats. The tip of the headphones fit snugly across my head and the cups aren't too big. Love the size.*I was using LG Bluetooth earbuds before my Beats, and the volume was way too loud at the lowest setting--I'm pretty sure my cochlea's were starting to stiffen. I would say the Beats have an opposite problem, but I could deaf. However, I prefer less volume than more.I hope this helped, I definitely tried to be as objective as possible. I think Bose has better sound quality than Beats, but they are pretty expensive in price...I would almost say moreso than Beats. However, Bose tends to lose the travel size factor that Beats has, which is why I chose Beats over Bose. Amazon has a ton of highly rated headphones for under $50 if the Beats are too much. I included them in a link. Best Wishes!Sentey Bluetooth Headphones with Microphone B-trek H9 Ls-4560, Listening to Music and Talk Over the Phone or Tablet, Travel Headphones, Up to 8 Hours of Battery Life, Audiophile High End Wireless Headphones, Hard Carrying Case IncludedBluedio HTCAW001 H-Turbine Shooting Brake Wireless Bluetooth 4.1 Stereo On Ear Headphones, Black
p69
aVFitness readyBeat Solo 2, the headphones for any type of exercise!What type of fitness do you enjoy? Running? Lifting? What about boxing? If you\u2019re like me you may enjoy to listen to music while doing your favorite type of exercise. One of the biggest problems that the fitness community has is finding a proper type of headphones to match the type of exercise they participate in. Either the headphones fall out of their ears or they break around the third time using them; then you spend another twenty dollars to have it happen again! Solo 2\u2019s our built to last, meaning they won\u2019t break on you; nor will they fall out mid-exercise.Benefits:\u2022 Light weight\u2022 Durable\u2022 Comfortable\u2022 Sound qualityOverviewThe dynamic engineering makes these pair of headphones flexible, but most importantly comfortable. The bass and clarity of sound might literally blow you away as these Beat headphones are noise cancelling headphones. You no longer have to listen to others talk when at the gym! These upscale headphones aren\u2019t cheap, but are worth it for your next workout.Improving Your Next WorkoutThese headphones will help finish many vigorous workouts. The Solo 2\u2019s are built to last with the customer for a long time. The flexible headband will fit over your neck comfortably and is tight enough to stay on your head during intense exercise. The intense sound quality will help focus and finish your hardest workouts.No More Cheap HeadphonesBefore I got the Solo 2\u2019s I was buying twenty dollar headphones at least once every month. The headphones I bought weren\u2019t durable at all and I would be afraid they would break in a middle of a workout. Only setback these headphones bring is the price tag. I never worry about how much longer my headphones have last as I have used the Solo 2 for over a year now. As two hundred dollars is a lot of money it will be the last dollar you spend on a pair of headphones.My TestamentThe Beats Solo 2\u2019s succeed when it comes to durability and sound quality. These headphones will last you a long time unlike headphones before it. I recommend you start exercising with durable, comfortable headphones for once and choose the Beat Solo 2\u2019s for your next workout.
p70
aVI tend to go through headphones like I eat pizza. The pizza is gone in under 5 minutes and my headphones are broken in just about that same amount of time. I previously had a pair of in-ear buds, the beats tour. I had a lot of issues with these headphones, which included durability and sound clarity. If you go through headphones like I do, the Beats Solo 2 might be the perfect pair for you. I find them to be one of the best pairs I have had thus far.These headphones are perfect for anyone who enjoys hearing every little beat, tap, and drum, in their songs. The sound is so clear when you listen to music with the Beats Solo 2, that when I was listening to the new Drake album I really felt like I was at his concert. The engineering of the product has been dramatically upgraded to make these headphones more durable. I have worn them a lot in the rain and so far they have worked perfectly. I love the flexible headband making it easy to fit these headphones anywhere! There are no longer any visible bolts like previous models, giving the headphones a sleeker look. In this case, I purchased the white Beats Solo 2, which I love because I think it has a sophisticated look. I think giving the consumer multiple color choices to reflect their own personality is one of my favorite features. They come in pink, blue, grey, black and many more exciting color choices.The only negative about the white headphones is that they tend to get dirty very quickly. I am a girl so I wear makeup and my makeup rubs onto the ear cups, which can honestly be quite a pain. I also find the headphones to fit a bit tight on my head but they are relatively new and not broken in yet. Other than that I would recommend these headphones to anyone who enjoys high quality sound, just make sure that you\u2019ve taken out the third mortgage on your house first. These headphones are a little bit pricy but I promise they are worth every cent.
p71
aVI rated this product five stars. I use these headphones primarily for walking to class, working out and drowning out sound. I purchased the color white.Some qualities of these headphones are that they come with a case and fold up really nicely for travel purposes. They stay on my head, which works well with going to the gym. I found the attached auxiliary cord to be a plus. It was easy to take the song I was listening to straight from my headphones to my car stereo. They look great, and weren't too bulky for my ears considering I am a young female. I found them to be extremely durable as well.There were only a few things I wasn't impressed by. One being the price of the item. I felt that the item was pricey; granted, I did find the quality to be pristine. One other problem I noticed was the color I choose (white) was fairly hard to keep clean.  They also tend to make my ears sore if I wear them too long because they cover my entire ear. I would not suggest if you have a lot of ear piercings to get this item.The color is something that can be modified easily and I would recommend this product to a friend. Specifically, college students for studying, athletes working out or for focusing before a game. This product is also for music lovers who are looking to listen to their music at high quality without disturbing others. Some other things I used these headphones are for mowing the lawn, laying at the pool, or in the library. They not only drown out sound to me but they also are great for drowning out the sound I am listening to. Everyone hates those kids in class who play their music too loud and you can hear their headphones from across the room. They are also nice in the winter when I don't have a stocking cap, because they cover my ears. They are basically singing ear muffs.All together I am very pleased with my beat headphones. If you are looking for headphones over ear buds this is the way to go.
p72
aVIf your looking to invest in some good headphones i would always go for these. The sound quality is amazing and its comfortable to have on your ears.  listening to music in the headphones make me feel like I'm in a different world. I can't even express how great these are.
p73
aVAfter a couple of years of my daughter asking for these for Christmas and/or birthday we decided to get them for her this year. She absolutely loved them. Unfortunately, she only enjoyed them for nine days before the dog chewed them up. We had one guilty looking Labrador.
p74
aVFinally, I own a Beats headphone. It wasn't easy. I don't like to wear what most people are wearing. For more than 4 years, I was tempted to buy one; I didn't bite, mostly because of no so good reviews for well regarded audiophiles. When the Beat solo 2 came out, I heard those same audiophiles saying words like "excellent", "Outstanding" and "thank you Dr. Dre for giving us the sound as the artist intended". So I went to the Apple store to try one and listened to them for 45 minutes...then I said to myself, I have to get me one of these! The thing that impress me the most was...the bass!  A great bass, for me, is the foundation of any headphone, and in the solo 2 case, the bass is strong, pure, and tight. But the bass does not cover the mids or the highs. The voices are clear. I would say the sound is warm and sometimes thick,but enjoyable. Also, the beat solo 2 is one the most good looking headphones on the market. The material is stronger than the previous solo HD. The hinges on the headband on the solo 2 are made out metal; not plastic like the solo hd. Therefore is more durable. The earpads are comfortable. There is a clamping force though, but not too much, and I think the more one wears them the less one may feel the pressure on the ear. One thing I would have liked  for Dr. Dre to include was a strap to hold the cable together, especially at this price. It comes with a carrying bag, too. So, in conclusion, I would definitely recommend the Beats solo 2 to anyone from children to adults of any gender in the world. Now I can say:I love my Beats solo 2!; not because of celebrity endorsement, but because they sound GREAT.
p75
aVExcellent product! Beats headphones usually gave a great hearing experience including this solo 2. I'm still \u201cburning\u201d it. So far so good! But just 3 days after I placed the order, beats announced its release of solo 2 wireless edition. If you really concern about the wireless one, that maybe a better choice for you. But I prefer this cable one.
p76
aVokay so I mainly bought these to use at the gym and on my days off from work while riding the train which as any commuter would know can get really loud. These are my first pair of dre headphones and I am very please. the noise cancellation is great, the sound is perfect and the overlook definitely turns heads. I got the pink ones very girly.
p77
aVWhen I first received these headphones, I was really pleased with the quality. I'd read a lot of Beats reviews from audiophiles that had discussed how "low quality" the sound on Beats headphones was. Although I'm admittedly no audiophile, I would say it has fantastic sound and definitely enhanced my listening experiences!However, I had these headphones for four months when suddenly, without warning, they broke on me. I hadn't damaged them in any way so I was very confused as to why they'd broken. Upon investigation, I'd discovered that the "jack" where you put the wired headphones in is simply "very sensitive" and that its finicky behavior means that the headphones can easily malfunction. Obviously, this didn't please me as I'd spent $150 for a pair of headphones that only lasted 4 months. I was also further upset that many other people had experienced the same issue.Luckily for me, because I have been a loyal Amazon Prime customer for a year, Amazon offered and gave me a "one time" refund if I sent the headphones back. However, they stressed that this was unusual -- and once I did send the headphones back, I didn't receive a full refund ($120 instead of $150) because Amazon needed to deduct $30 for "Restocking Fee Refund Deduction".All in all, this hasn't been a great experience -- not only with the poor longterm quality of Beats headphones but also the complex Amazon customer service. I'm currently deciding whether or not to re-purchase a different pair of Beats headphones -- but this experience has certainly soured my impression.
p78
aVThe headphones get unbearable after 2 minutes of wearing them. And 3 months later the right side of the headphones stopped working. The sound is alright. Not worth the price though. But I kept them safe and sound every day. And 3 months later they stopped working for no reason. A lot of other people have this problem but one min it works and the other it doesn't. If you know how to fix this problem please let me know.
p79
aVI have always wanted beats but always heard bad things about them but I take every bad thing I said about the big B these are comfy and have great quality sound! If u are thinking of buying headphones buy these.Solo 2.0 are truly the best.
p80
aVNot only are they a pretty pink, the sound quality is awesome! I listened to these while traveling home from my deployment, and I got lost in my music. I received so many compliments on the color. I highly recommend these, especially if you enjoy music as much as I do!!!
p81
aVOver the years, I never really cared for headphones by Beats mainly because they were too bass heavy and frankly, the overall audio quality was on par with other headphones whose prices were in the 25-50 dollar range. I've tried several Beats headphones in the past and in my opinion, the hype surrounding these headphones did not match it's performance and there was nothing that screamed "I'm a super high quality headphone with a price tag to match".Well, lately, it is obvious that beats has Been stepping up their game and is finally producing headphones that are starting to match their price tags.  I am first time owner of a pair of the new Beats Solo 2 that I just purchased after trying on a pair that belonged to a friend.  And frankly I was stunned that I was listening to a pair of Beats headphones (which never impressed me before) with a sound quality that I found amazing.The bass, while punchy, was no longer overpowering and overall, produced an astonishing sound quality that suited my tastes well.  A track that I liked listening to on this set of headphones was Lindsey Stirling's 'Beyond the Veil' to give you an idea of my musical tastes. The headphone build quality gave me the impression of sturdiness although it will be a fingerprint magnet considering it's glossy plastic exterior.  The Solo 2's fit snugly and I was afraid that they may get uncomfortable after an hour or so.  Anyway, I did end up wearing these for close to three hours straight and I felt no discomfort.  These are on-ear headphones, and I've found that they block out outside noise quite well.  One thing that I would have liked is a hard case instead of the flimsy soft case that came with these headphones.Are these the perfect set of headphones?  Obviously not.  Preference is a truly personal thing and some may like these headphones and others may not for whatever reason.  As for me, I love these comfortable awesome sounding headphones and am glad Beats has finally improved their products.  And it definitely shows!
p82
aVI have had these for less than three months and only one side works.  Of course, its past the time to return them.  I'm so disappointed. If I would have known this, I could have bought some imitation ones.
p83
aVBest gift I ever got myself... Nothing better then going for a long run with these! You feel like the artist is singing just for you. Even if you are in a packed gym or crowed all you hear is your music!
p84
aVNext day shipping is the bomb thanks! On time amazom prime worth every penny! Ok back to the new solo 2.0 I got the red ones wow They are HoT! Super glossy flashy... Much nicer that the first Solo s and sound way better. I would definitely  buy this Solo 2.0 again! Nice fix around my face and ears too! Just saying ;)
p85
aVI just received these today. I ordered the blush rose color. They are very beautiful. Nice matte texture and matching cord. The carrying case is really small and kind of hard to get the headphones into. Not entirely sure what the included clip was for.Getting down to function. These are tight. I have an average size female head, I can wear my toddler son's lil rockerz headphones. But these. are. tight. They press hard on my ears - perhaps to keep external sounds at bay. The cups are nicely padded but after several minutes of use, I find myself moving them around to relieve pressure. Maybe this will ease with use over time.The sound is really good for music. I tested them out while watching Netflix, and while the sound is naturally better than the iPads speakers, I don't think these are IDEAL for movies. They're kinda too base-y for dialog. However, that's sort of the selling point for beats headphones.I haven't had a chance to try them out with a phone call yet.All and all, I'm a little disappointed, mostly because of the fit. I'm hanging onto the box for a few days before I decide to keep them or not. If you have a large head i Ike suggest trying these on in store first.
p86
aVThese headphones are truly amazing. They have a good high quality feel throughout. The leather feels very comfortable and doesn't make your ears hot. Other people have complained about them feeling tight but they for perfect on me. I bought the previous Solo HDs for my girlfriend and they were OK but I don't feel as if the price was justified. The Solo 2 model definitely justifies the price. Everything that you wanted to be improved has been done. I listen to a lot of metal so being able to hear every single cymbal hit on a drum set is great. I am a very satisfied customer. Don't get the Studios, these are cheaper, more light weight, and have better audio quality.
p87
aVGot a pair for $102 .....well worth it!! Don't think I'd pay more than that for them though....they do sound good as hell!! Used with my Xbox 360 for COD and they rock!!  They are very good sounding headphones for all music...sound great with my hard rock!!UPDATE!! I used these the first day with my Galaxy S5 with no problems at all except the volume controls don't work with my phone. That's no problem but now 2 and 3 days later my music plays and pauses at random times and the volume randomly shoots to maximum which is very loud and hurts my ears!! This has become VERY annoying as sometimes a single song will pause 7-8 times throughout the song. The box says "limited functionality" with Android devices, but there is a HUGE difference between limited functionality and haywire!! Rather than send the headphones back because they sound awesome, I decided to spend another $30 on a Remotetalk cable for Android that is supposed to work. We shall see......you should be a little more clear for Android users that these will give you a F'n headache from all the trouble
p88
aVMy husband bought these for me for my birthday a few weeks ago. I mostly use them with my iPhone 6 Plus that has a pretty bulky case. I have no trouble plugging them into my phone. I'm in nursing school and listen to a lot of classical music because it drowns out the noise of my classmates and doesn't distract me from homework. However, even without the music playing, they cancel out a lot of noise. They fit really snug and the cushion around the ears is very nice. There is also cushion along the headband. One of my most favorite features about these is the microphone/buttons on the cord. It works just like Apple's earbuds; you can change the song, pause, turn the volume up/down, and make phone calls. As far as the music, it sounds great! Just what you'd expect from a pair of Beats. My favorite thing to hear is the first few seconds of Dido's White Flag. Close your eyes and it feels like the sounds of the instruments pass from one ear through your head to the other ear. I'm a nerd, I know, but you should listen to it!
p89
aVI've had the Solo 1's and the Solo 2 and while these 2's are better (slimmer, more durable, and better sounding) than the 1st version, they still are not worth the price in my opinion. After going through 3 different Solo 2's which were all warrantied through Beats due to durability issues, I ended up just giving them to my 4 year old son and buying the powerbeats 2 wireless for myself. The only reason I continue to purchase Beats headphones despite the poor construction on the Solo's are because of their excellent customer service which has gotten A LOT better since they were acquired by Apple.Bottom line is if you plan on using these headphones daily, and not babying them, expect to send them in for warranty replacement within your first year. They are just too fragile for something that costs around $200. If you don't want to deal with parts ripping, wires losing connectivity, or rubber sections peeling off the headband, then just get yourself the powerbeats 2 wireless.
p90
aVI was hesitant at first to get these since Beats have historically been of poor sound quality with overwhelming bass. But I tried these on at BestBuy and was surprised at how much better their sound quality is! If you like bass and want something good under $200, these on-ear headphones are likely the best you'll find.I personally love my ATH-M50x headphones, but these beats put up a good fight with a warm, clear audio quality that's complimented nicely with an extra kick of bass that doesn't take over. These are FUN headphones that are very enjoyable to listen to.The pads are very soft and larger than typical on-ear headphones. And the band is exceptionally soft as well. Put together, although I prefer over-ear, I could listen to these for hours without much discomfort. I bought this pair from Walmart since they still give extended warranties for it, while BestBuy stopped giving any extended warranty option in early 2015.
p91
aVI bought these headphones primarily for the sound. I listen to a lot of hip hop and metal, and the full, deep low-end presence of these headphones is an excellent complement to those genres. Mids and highs are not as prominent but remain present and are not overpowered by the bass. The material on the ear pads is very soft and pleasant to the touch, and the headphones clamp firmly to my head and do not feel like they will be easily dislodged. The removable cable fits tightly into the jack on the headphones and cannot be unplugged accidentally. The only thing I don't like about these headphones is that my ears get sore after wearing them for more than a couple of hours, due to the ear cups pressing my ears against the plastic arms of my glasses. These are the only on-ear headphones I have ever used (as opposed to over-ear) so I am not sure whether this is specific to this model or an inherent characteristic of all on-hear headphones.
p92
aVFirst of all, when these first came in the mail, I was surprised about the size being smaller than I expected. When you put them over your head, it feels as though the headband will Crack in half because it's made of plastic. It's very small, so be careful.Second, they only lasted for 7 months. Now I take very good care of my stuff. I've had headphones in the past that lasted for more than 3 years. Why these broke in a matter of 7 is beyond me. One of the ears just stopped working. I thought it was the audio cable at first, so I went to best buy and spent an extra $20 on a new cable. That didn't work. So I was forced to hear music in only one ear until I saved enough money to replace these headphones. I just want to say do not waste your money. There's better options out there that are less than $100 and actually sound better.
p93
aVI am currently an owner of these headphones and an owner of Beats Mixr. May I say beats has done it again for me. These beat have proven to be a major upgrade for me, and in many ways more than 1.Pros: Sound is richer, Ranges are more defined, Mids and Trebles are more present in this version of Beats, significantly more comfortable than previous version, The durability is a significant improvement with a flexible headphone, great fashion statement, BASS IS KICKING!!!! (Personal Favorite Pro)Cons: Bass may be too kicking, but is an easy fix, You only have about 3 hours before you start to fidget and adjust the headphones on your ears, especially if you ears are bigger (I don't have this problem since my ears are smaller), IT IS HARD TO DECIDE WHICH COLOR YOU WANT!!!!This is basically my overview. These headphones, even though I feel should be at least 25 dollars less, are still amazing and worth having. They are a major upgrade from my previous Mixr and I am a very happy customer.
p94
aVSincerely Suprised on these good reviews. I got these for free from the Apple Store when I bought my laptop. Part of their student promotion. They hurt my head SOOO bad. They are super super tight on my ears and the sides of my head. I have to take my glasses or sunglasses off if I want to wear them which means I can't wear them and walk cause I wear glasses. The sound is alright but I don't think they are anything super special. Honestly they are more hassle then they are worth because of the severe fit issues if you have glasses. And they take up so much space in my bag. I'm probably going to go back to the apple ear buds and try to sell these. Shame, I really expected more from such a popular brand of headphones
p95
aVGreat headphones with excellent sound!- I recently wore them for 99% of our 8-hour plane ride from Germany, and they were comfortable the entire time with only 2-3 minor adjustments back/forward on my ears...pretty awesome!- The sound is fantastic, a little heavy on bass, but not too bad.  When combined with noise-canceling design, the sound is really nice.- I've had no problems at all, as some people report, with either side or sound.  I'm not super gentle with them, either.- Sounds unbelievable with my iPod and iPhone 6.I'm a 40-year old dad, a regular guy, and I give them two big thumbs up!
p96
aVI researched these headphones prior to purchasing and was shocked to not only find all the apparent knock off versions but negative reviews. I know that l will probably never spend this much on headphones again. But wanted to see what all the buzz was about. Usually not one to play follow the leader, I love my music, hence the purchase of overpriced headphones. And really I have to sum it up to they are nice, semicomfortable, very durable, pricey, trendy. I would prefer a wireless version, I mean after all why am I paying so much? Needs more perks for the bucks. But thank you Amazon because atleast my purchase got me authentic Beats by Dre.
p97
aVIf you are an audio file or audio geek you probably hate beats because they sound like crap. And the truth is, your half right. The bass is very clear and deep and that is good enough for some people but the mids aren't perfect and not much clarity on the highs. They are very comfortable but over about 2 hours they get hard on the ears. This particular color(red) is very vibrant and stands out. The ultimate fashion accessory. But that's the purpose of it anyways right?(haha) but in all seriousness if you want major street cred, GET THESE!
p98
aVAmazing headphones a wonderful purchase for any teenager in your family they also come with a two year extended warranty he on spills and drops for a small extra added fee which is well worth it  Also the added convenience of being able to plug into your iPhones Some people have complained that after only few months that one set of headphones in my case I have not seen that happen with two teenagers in my home constantly using them for past 8month there still in good working order.same as they were when  originally purchased
p99
aVBought this for the girlfriend, but from a professional insight, it is a great set of headphones. The ear cups are plush, and the quality is ten folds better than the last edition. I didn't buy the first gen of the solo for the quality build, but this set takes the cake. If you are looking for style, the purple and green are my favorite for it is a different hue and more different than any pair in the market.So overall, great fit, solid sound, and fantastic style! Totally recommend it!
p100
aVThese headphones are well worth the money.The packaging is pretty, and when you open them you get that new car smell, odd, but true.The fit and finish is smooth.  Slip them on, and the sound quality is well balanced, not over based as the previous models.The cable feel quality, and the control pad feels expensive in your fingers.I received the grey/silver color, but I'd say it was more like grey.  Pretty.The only drawback, is these are heavier than the competition.  I don\u2019t find this unpleasant, but some might.Really nice.
p101
aVI wanted to treat myself this Christmas, so I decided to get myself some Beats. I bought them in "Imperial Violet" and they look great! I get a lot of compliments on them. The sound is impressive... definitely a step up from my old headphones. I was concerned that it would give too much bass to the music I listen to, but it's just the right amount. They are pretty comfortable even after wearing them for a few hours. Even though these are a little pricey, I think my purchase was worth it
p102
aVNice, nice, nice..........I couldn't hear my granddaughter telling me to stop singing so loud.......I thought I sound pretty good actually. I'm looking forward to my 4 hour airplane ride; although I thought they were going to wireless, guess I got too excited and didn't read the description clearly, but that's ok, I'm satisfied.P.S. I didn't purchase the extra carrying case either, this product does come with a pretty nice case one that you can latch on to your carryon luggage.
p103
aVI had the first pair of solo's and unfortunately those got stolen, but I am glad to have replaced them with these headphones. Theres a great sound to the headphones, and they are very comfortable. The only thing I'm not as happy about is that they come with one wire rather than two (My first gen solo's game with two). Other than that there is not much to complain about. Great HD sound to the headphones and I would definitely recommend them to anyone looking to buy good quality headphones.
p104
aVThe headphones have a more balanced sound than the Beats Mixrs and original Studios. But they do have enough bass without muddying the sound. Clamping pressure seems a drop less than the Mixr model and the Solo 2's seem quite light as well. The only negative is that one of the pairs had a hard pimple like blemish on the left earcup. You could feel it and it looked like it would probably tear. It is being replaced. Will not dock any stars since the defective headphone is being exchanged.
p105
aVI received these headphones for free, with a price tag of 200.  I was excited to hear them, I have a pair of 30$ Sony that sounded great until my dog ate them. First I would never pay more than 30$ for these headphones. They are way over rated there are a number of headphones that sound the same if not better. My wife's Bose that cost about half sound a million times better and the bass hits harder. If you're into image than maybe they're worth it, other than that save your money.
p106
aVWe are 8 days past the anniversary date of the purchase of Beats Solo2 as a gift to my daughter for Christmas 2014.  As of today, only one side plays; there is a short in the headphones.  Press on the back just so, and you can hear sound in that one too, until, oops, you stop pressing against that side, and then only one side works.  Is this why they call these Solo? Or is it because they only work one year?  Either way, one star for one ear for one year.  Not worth the price.
p107
aVReceived my package and immediately took the headphones out. Came in the original box with most of what came in the box, pretty generous for buying it refurbished right? Went to use them and the right earphone didn't work/didn't play the music, however you want to say it, I got half of what I paid for. I would recommend if you purchase these headsets to buy them new from amazon or just go to your nearest best buy to ensure no problems occur, otherwise you're tempting fate.
p108
aV1) These headphones are good for rap and hip-hop, but not for many other styles of music such as rock. The bass is very apparent, but the mid range and treble doesn't hold up at all. 2) They're very uncomfortable. I can't wear these headphones for more than thirty minutes before my ears start to hurt. 3) They're WAY to expensive. You can buy three pairs of good, versatile, and comfortable headphones for a third of the price as these headphones.
p109
aVRespected Seller,I am extremely disappointed to see the beats which i just received right now. i was shocked to see that the beats which i received were broken from one side and its not even working. this is not right. It seems as if you have cheated with me. i always use amazon to order several products but this time i am really disappointed. its not even worth it now and why opened the box i was so shocked to see it. i need my money back!
p110
aVThey are amazing! Love the sound of them, super loud, great base and treble. The reason I did not give 5 starts is because the aux cable that came with the beats don't work properly. I talked to the sellers they did not replace the cable but put me to do the work to search for an aux cable myself on amazon and paid me back the amount of the aux cable I bought. Had to buy black ones cause there were no original blue aux beats for sell.
p111
aVThis is a amazing pair of headphones. The are sexy, bass heavy, and well balanced. I picked these up at verizon.(The lady almost sold me the solo hd,s xc).But there are a little tight at first. Only a little for me because I have really tiny ears. These fit right on me perfectly. They are over priced but hey ....there beats! What did you expect. Over all these goodphones are nice buy them if you are a beats fan.
p112
aVThe sound is phenomenal. Noise cancelling is great. The color is cool. It doesn't look like a gray but a steel blue/gray.Anyway, the main problem I have is the fit is TOO tight on my head. If you have  larger sized head, don't even try it. I have a normal head and it's squeezing me. Extended wear is definitely not in my future but they're great for about half an hour at a time due to that reason.
p113
aVExcited to get my "BEATS"! But unfortunately the headphones are unable to receive incoming and outgoing calls when hooked up to my phone. The "b" on the cord came off 2 weeks after using. The sound is good (skull candies is cheaper and sounds just as good). So in conclusion,  I bought the "brand" not the quality. Keep that in mind when you invest approximately $150 dollars.
p114
aVI bought these for a birthday gift for my 10 year old grand daughter and within 3 weeks there must be a short in the wire since you can only hear from one earphone.  Though if you squeeze the widest section of the wire, you can hear music from both earphones.I tried the suggestion on my review and the one in regards to having the wire plugged in wrong - was the problem.  Thank you so much!!
p115
aVSound is great and also cancels out outside noise very well. I listen to many kinds of music and all sound good. I do have small small ears and a small head and the headphones fit quite snug and totally cover my ears. Im not sure how comfortable they would be on a larger person. I suggest trying them on somewhere before buying if that's possible. I got the blue and they are really nice.
p116
aVOnly have used these Beats four times since December and still in original box, love them but the right ear speaker quit working! Very disappointed!!!! Amazon told me they would refund the full amount of 199.95 that I payed but that was a lie!!! Only got 159.00, they charged a " restocking" fee. Hope they aren't restocking to sell to someone else, seems to be a popular problem with beats!! So frustrating!!
p117
aVIn all honesty I purchased these because they looked great but after using them i'm blown away at the sound quality. Beyond the amazing sound quality they are the most comfortable headphones I've ever owned. I had concern that they would not fit over my ears (normal size) but i'm happy to say that they fit snug and completely cover my ears. As for sound leakage there does not seem to be a problem at all with this.
p118
aVI love the quality on these headphones! The cushioning on the ear is super comfortable. I really like how it is easy and convenient to carry around, especially in the pouch that they provide. However, I did wish that they had a zipper of some sort to store the wire. The sound quality is great and cancels out a lot of the outside noises. I really do feel immersed in my music!
p119
aVI'm slightly disappointed. I love how they look and feel, but wanted more bass. Maybe I just got a crappy set. They're not horrible, I like them but not for the price! I honestly wish I had bought a different brand :( I just know how popular beats are and assumed they would be better. I won't return them because they aren't broken, but I'll do better research next time.
p120
aVI've never been a big fan of Beats but my daughter wanted these so I got them for her.  I listened to them and I have to say that I was impressed!  Great sound, very comfortable, good quality build!  It definitely exceeded my expectations!  Just remember that sound reproduction whether headphones, buds, or speakers is similar to beauty -- in the ear of the listener!
p121
aVThese are by far the best headphones I have ever owned I was a little bit nervious on slending This Mutch money on headphones but am totally glad I did and have no regrets what so ever. I bought them at the Apple Store in the Mall Of America and the customer assistance was excellint and the sales representatives where very kind and didn't try to push anything.
p122
aVPROS:-Improved sound-Very good sound isolation-Reliable grip good for exerciseCONS:-Sound relatively unbalanced-Comfort issues for glasses-wearersIf you\u2019re going to listen to your headphones in quieter environments rather than just running around noisy streets, take a look at this: http://amzn.to/1GM981G
p123
aVI got these in May 2015 ....These headphones are ok for the few times I used them....i took them to work so i could listen to music.  I took them out of the case and notice the material around the is coming off....ill be returning them. I ll go with a better quaility and different brand of Beats. Great sound poor material quality.
p124
aVThis was a gift for our 15 year old granddaughter.  She loves them.  The sound is really good, the color is great,and it came with a case.  We are very happy with this purchase and I did a lot of research first. Would definitelyrecommend these beats for anyone, but the teenagers love them.
p125
aVits a good pair of headpnoes i like the sound quality and its the first time im usuing a headphone i loved the overall look and everythng except the earpad its uncomfortable after using the headphones for 15 to 30 min your ears will get hurt and will annoy you and it will get heated!
p126
aVHeadphones sound great. However quality control not as good. Connector to earpiece broke first day. Item returned to Amazon who took them back and returned my money with no problems. I later decided to try another pair because the sound was so good. So far these have held up (about a month).
p127
aVI was not blown away by the sound quality :/ . Maybe my expectations were too high. I had the sony oversized headphones for about 4 years, until they recently broke, so I got these which are about 2/3 times the price of the Sony ones, in an effort to upgrade. But ultimately mehh
p128
aVGreat set of headphones. They are noise-cancelling, I did panic when I first opened it because the sound wasn't playing in one ear, but what solved my problem was making sure you plug the chord all the way into the headphones, otherwise, the right ear doesn't have sound.
p129
aVOrdering and shipping went excellent - received the product before Xmas as expectedUnfortunately 6 months later I'm experiencing defects with the product - can only hear sound in only one side!For a product that expensive, it is very disappointing
p130
aVThe sounds is incredible but they hurt my ears after 15 minutes.  The head band uses way too much clamping force. Had to return these because of how painful they were to wear. My head is a not big either. The sound is great though and the design is wonderful.
p131
aVBeats by Dr. Dre Solo2 version are an ideal product for anyone that is looking for higher quality music listening. They are a great option for individuals that want a step of from basic headphones, but are not looking to spend a large amount of money.  These headphones produce a great music listening experience and I give them 4 out of 5 stars. What I used to evaluate this product was music quality, comfort, color and design, and portability.The music quality these headphones provide have an accent on the bass, unlike many other headphone sets. However, the sound doesn\u2019t lose the quality one might assume from an increase in bass. The acoustics all around are balanced well and can implement any changes a user makes with the equalizer.The comfort of the Solo2 Beats is a step up from the Solo1 version of the headphones. It provides added cushion for the ears. Also, the part of the headphones that rest atop your head can easily be adjusted to create a longer frame.The color and design of the Beats headphones models are a popular aspect that attracts many buyers, especially teenagers and young adults. This particular version of Beats holds new color options, one of which I purchased. In addition to the color I chose, grey, there are other new colors to pick from including blush rose, stone grey, and hunter green. Along with this, the design looks sleek and does not have too large of a structure.In addition to these qualities, the Solo2 headphones fit nicely into a small, cushioned case that can be easily carried anywhere while maintaining protection. The weight of the headphones is very light and provides an optimal headphone weight to travel with.A small negative many people associate with Beats Solo headphones is the minimal noise reduction. Most noise reduction headphones are significantly more expensive then Beats Solos are. For the price you pay, the amount of noise reduction you get is above what you would expect. It has never presented a problem for me with my headphones.Largely, Beats Solo2 headphones offer a great opportunity for listeners who are seeking a better music listening experience. They provide a relatively cheap option for upper-class headphones, while still maintaining a high caliber of music. Any one would appreciate the quality of the Beats Solo2 headphones.
p132
aVHi everyone-I read through all the reviews and realized that although many people had good product experiences, there were many that had issues with one of the ears being faulty/had defects. This experience was noticeable through reviews on the Beats, Apple and Amazon store. Therefore I wanted to do my own research to determine the following:A. If could purchase an authentic product at the lower $149 price (white)B. If was purchasing a legitimate product via the Amazon by Beats store.C. The 1-year warranty by Apple would be coveredD. If could get a good extended warranty for 2-yearsSo I wanted to share my results:To solve the problem with the limited 30-day return policy through this seller/Amazon, I contacted Apple directly and spoke to a lovely lady about my dilemma. She verified that if I was unsure that the Amazon seller was authentic, that when the product arrived that I could call with the purchase/item number and they would confirm or deny if the product was authentic and covered under the 1-year warranty. Therefore if anyone does have any problems, they can return the product in that 30-days for their refund, or be 100% positive that the manufacturer warranty is covered. (So this is definitely an option that you can take) And I purchase through Amazon a lot for many other items.But I was still hesitant about wanting more coverage and 100% assurance. After reviewing the Amazon "Canopy" extended coverage, I wasn't trilled. Mixed reviews and uncertain/lack of information (not sure how other people feel), but I wasn't sold. So as a result I looked outside Amazon for the product and found that Walmart was offering the same product at the same price, AND they ARE an Authorized Reseller for Beats. In addition, they offered free shipping or free store pick-up. And after to speaking with a representative and reviewing, they do offer a 2-year (or more) protection plan for the headphones ($14) that covers manufacturer issues on year two, and general wear/tear, electrical, etc for both year.So I ended up making this purchase through Walmart. They "as of today's date" offer the same pricing shown here, with free shipping or store pick up. I am not a huge fan of Walmart, but I was actually pleasantly surprised. I will follow-up in a couple months to share the status of my product and if I've had an issues/defects. But I hope this is some help to others out there review this product.PS. 4 stars for now. Will change accordingly to outcomes.Good luck! And hopefully all goes well. :)Note: I purchase through Amazon a lot for many other items, and haven't had any issues. But with expensive electronics like this, and the unknown credibility of the particular seller and the extended warranty, I personally decided to go another route. Still love my Amazon Prime though. :)
p133
aVI bought these to use to watch videos on my iPad and talk on the phone. I love them. I can't hear well in one ear and these are perfect. My three kids actually all used them at some point over our Christmas vacation and they fit all of them (2,4,7)
p134
aVUPDATED: Wow, so I use these ONE TIME and now have encountered the dreaded right ear cup not functioning. I should say it's not *totally* stopped working. But the sound out of the right ear cup is about 10% of the level on the left ear cup so it's in effect useless and unnoticeable until you start playing around to figure out if there's sound there at all. I'd be more upset if I had paid a single cent towards these, but seeing as how I received them as a free promotion I can't be terribly upset.No way I'd ever pay money for these though.Original review below______________________________________________________________________Just received these as an educational promo direct from Apple. (I wasn't even aware of the promo, but it was a nice bonus.)The sound seems fairly decent, a little heavy on the base, but not enough to be troublesome. Other reviewers talk about that these headphones aren't comfortable. I can definitely feel pressure causing them to hug my head more than a ten to twenty dollar pair of headphones would, though you *can* adjust these things and it helps with any downward pressure from the head piece. Even after adjusting the head piece the ear cups still manage to hang pretty tight. Considering that the cord is multifunctional (answers phone calls/etc) and that the paperwork warns against driving with headphones on I can only conclude that these headphones are meant to be used by people who'll be wearing them while moving around. That being the case, you'll want a snug fit to prevent slipping. I don't wear glasses regularly, but I'm currently writing this while wearing my sunglasses and I don't feel any undue pressure from the headphones on the sun glasses. Then again I'm wearing the headphones with the ear cups properly positioned. For people who experience discomfortable pressure from the headphones across the sides of their glasses I suggest reevaluating how the cups are positioned on your ears. I wouldn't say that I have anything but an average sized head (7 1/4) so I might see how there could be some discomfort if your head was slightly larger than mine. Hopefully I won't experience the cord issues that many people are describing as happening about 3-4 months in. I'll come back and update at that time either way.I do want to point out that when I first plugged the headphones in I thought maybe I'd had a bum cord right out the gate because when I plugged into my phone I could only hear out of the left ear. After twisting the L-shaped end of the cord a bit in the jack on the phone I was intermittently getting sound out of both ears. I was able to figure out that there just wasn't a great connection in the jack. Maybe if you have a reliable extender to plug into you can get away with not removing any cases, not sure as I haven't had the need to have an extender prior to now. (I myself might try this extender: MobilePal FlexFit Headset Audio Jack Extender for iPhone or Android Battery Cases with Gold Plated 4-Pole 3.5mm Connectors [Lifetime Warranty] (Black))Which leads me to why this doesn't get 5 stars: You can't use these headphones if your smart device (phone/tablet/etc) has on a protective case. As soon as I pop the phone out of the case on the edge where the headphone jack is the cord I was able to get a great connection and deliver the quality of output one would expect from a set of higher end headphones.My dad is a recording engineer so I've grown up with around sound equipment. These headphones are definitely not extreme high quality or comparable to other retail priced headphones in the same price point. These are reminiscent of headphones in the forty to fifty dollar price range. The price break Amazon lists versus retail is a pretty decent discount, I suppose. But had I had to pay for these instead of getting them on promo I wouldn't have entertained paying more than about eighty. These just don't compare name brand sound company headphones (and no I'm not referencing .B.uy .O.ther .S.ound .E.quipment lol).These are definitely worth it if you can get them on promotion though and would be worth it outside promotion if the price point weren't so darn high.As a side: packaging on these things is unreal, but I suppose that's par for the course for Apple owned products. Lots of hidden pocket-y things that just add bulk to the package. I really wish that the packaging was more stream-lined as I wondered the heck kind of headphones these were  based on the size of the box. Turns out their not any bigger than other headphones, and do in fact, fold up for transporting.You do get included in the box a soft-sided carrying case (with carabiner engraved with the word "beats"), the phone compatible cord, instructables and a the "promote-the-products-you-own" sticker for affixing to a car bumper/computer/binder/etc.
p135
aVOkay, I am leaving my original review below so in case if you happen to be interested in reading you know what kind of issues I faced.I will say I changed my review from one star to almost 5 star, because as both sides of the headphone worked, it truly sounded amazing. I think it is worth the price and does provide solid experience. And for bonus it looks good too ;)Now for the problem that faced here is the solution and a reason for calling it almost 5 stars and not full 5 stars. It is a design flaw in the way the cable has been designed or say the instruction manual are provided. The audio/microphone cable supplied with the headphone is a unidirectional cable, or for better clarity only partially works if connected in a certain direction. The cable pin (on the side of the microphone) needs to go in the headphone and otherwise in the audio player. If you do otherwise then you end up hearing sound in only one side, unless you press the volume control button in the middle. It's possible that many people at first may not notice this little thing and may end up getting the same issue as I got, like many online forums prove and some Amazon reviewers too. I suggest that Beats update their manual instructions about this requirement so they don't end up having their customers return their product due to this limitation. Else enjoy the music as it is supposed to be.You off course don't need to read but my original and now not so relevant review is below --The worst product I have ever purchased. First of all when you spend $200 you expect the product to work, with a solid quality. For my headphone, only one side worked and other side just did not. Then I realized that other side works only when I press the control button in the cable, but had to keep it pressed constantly. For once I really thought that may be it is named solo for a reason that only one side of headphone supposed to work ;) anyways, then I thought that it could be one off issue but I read reviews and forums and looks like it is a very common issue with these headphones. I can also say that sound quality was pathetic, no where close to what you would expect with such expensive product. Save money and spend it some place else. I am returning it back with a hope that I can find a better replacement.
p136
aVI may have gotten a defected product. My left side earphone didn't sound as loud as it should be. After troubleshooting no fix. Also some genres didn't sound good at all. Returned product and got the Monster DNA. I'm pleased with my exchange.
p137
aVThe sound is not as good as my old headphones that cost half as much money. They also are too tight on my head and push my ears into the sides of my glasses--ouch. Also if you have any cartilage ear piercings they will irritate those too.
p138
aVClean, compact design is great for travel. While not noise-canceling they more than adequately block out ambient noise on a flight, allowing you to enjoy music or movies without pressing earbuds in your ears. Great sound quality too.
p139
aVFound this at a "discounted" price on Amazon one day. Luckily it was the color my son wanted. They work great and sound quality is awesome. Very comfortable on the head and seem to stay on during even basketball warm ups.
p140
aVBought this product for my daughters birthday and three months later the sound already gone in one side of headphones. I did not expect the life expectancy to be this horrible for such high quality headphones. Very disappointed!
p141
aVBumping! They sound even better than my solo HDs and my older beats studios! They fit right and cancel out background noise very well! The mids and highs are just as good as the base, trust me. They remade this so so sooo good!
p142
aVRecieved a defective headset. Still in the box sealed and doesn't even work. So irritating. Don't sell a product unless u know it works. Never buying through this company again and I will assure u I will warn other about this
p143
aVReceived as a gift in September, couldn't believe the full retail price, thought that they would be higher quality than most. The sound is okay I have heard better from cheaper sets. Being my first wireless was pretty cool. Then a week ago when I pressed power button and the row of lights underneath that shows the amount of charge failed to come on so I connected them for charging and the lights still failed to come on. How would a person know when done charging? Anyway the wireless has failed also. They work when wired in but I liked the wireless capabilities.The manual offers no troubleshooting guide so went to the website and couldn't find a real answer there either. Since these were a gift I couldn't register them on website without knowing where purchased and how much so I could put them under warranty. Being so expensive there should've lasted a lot longer, makes me wonder after reading other reviews that the brand was overhyped and overmarketed selling quantity rather than quality. Now I am looking for a different headset I have owned Bose and Able Planet, both were better by far than these now I am choosing between Samsung Gear Circle or the Sol Republics Shadow.Seeing this brand on sale or at clearance prices I am staying away from, the owner of this product I had believed his integrity now I think differently. Wouldn't recommend. To get them repaired too costly, is a rip. Most manufacturer's would provide a replacement or refund.Maybe I got a dud pair but at that price there shouldn't be any duds at all.If anyone can suggest a different brand to buy I am all ears.
p144
aVI am Very disappointed! I received The Headphones with the right side of the of the headphone broken, it didn't play sound! only the left side worked. i tried it with several devices but no use the headphone doesn't work:(
p145
aVI gave these as a gift to my wife.  She really likes them.  They are comfortable for her and she says they sound wonderful.They really do look good.  The plug/cord has plugs on both ends and I absolutely love that.
p146
aVHorrible. If I could give it 0 stars, I would. Had them for 3 months, took fantastic care of them, and the right stopped working out of the blue. Absolutely terrible. Sounded fine, looked great, but horribly designed.
p147
aVThis is a very good pair of headphones if all you listen to is pop, rap, rock, and electronic music. It does these genres amazingly and make these my go to phones for most of my library. The bass is tight and solid and the vocals and main instruments are incredibly clear. However, when you start getting into the other genres like punk, indie, and classical the sound just isn't that impressive. It's not bad by and stretch of the imagination, its just that some of the instruments and sounds get muddled together and its tough to distinguish some of the music in the midtone level.I really love the design of these headphones too. Seems sturdy but I've only had then for a week now so I can't be too sure how well they hold up in the long run. They feel like they are well put together, but Im going off of past Beats products that had some quality issues. Overall thought it looks like they've addressed these issues.These are fairly comfortable. The pads are very soft and rest nice on the ears, but they are a little tight. This can cause discomfort after an hour or 2. I have a feeling though these will loosen up as I use them and won't be an issue for long. Nowhere near as painful as my old Bose on ear headphones used to get.Overall I really like these headphones for most of my music, but I wish there was just a bit more in the mid tone region so that all my music would sound as good as the rock and electronic music I listen too. I would recommend these to others
p148
aVThese head phones have a crisp and loud sound. They are noise cancelling- which is perfect- because I love to dance! These are such an upgrade from cheap earbuds. The price is a little much, but it is so worth it!
p149
aVPure crap! Purchased on April 4, and by June 1, one side completely quit working! They did not even work for 2 months! DO NOT BUY BEATS! They used to be a quality product, but they have obviously gone downhill!
p150
aVIncredible sound!  Wish I would have waited for the lightening deal. I have the wireless version and wireless is worth the extra cost.  Overall though, these headphones are WONDERFUL!  But get the wireless.
p151
aVGreat headphones! For the people who are saying that one ear doesn't work you have the wrong end of the cord plugged into the headphones and the item you are listening to flip it around and it will work.
p152
aVThey sound terrible.  You can get a quality pair of Sennheisers that sound so much better for less than $50.  If you wanna waste $200 because you're in love with Dr. Dre then by all means buy these.
p153
aVI purchased these for my daughter as a Christmas present in December and one side of the earphone stopped working about 2 months after. I was very disappointed considering the amount I paid for them.
p154
aVThese are awesome. The Beats Solo 2 will not disappoint you. Blocks out surrounding noise and you will think your in a high dollar theater. Very clear and crisp. Best money spent on headphones!!!
p155
aVI love them, the bass is so great. They seem pretty sturdy so far, I am a gym rat and they stay on even when I'm on the treadmill or in spin class. Very comfortable I highly recommend these!
p156
aVBecause I can't find it. I literally just got these, opened them, put them on, and am testing them on the computer and my iPhone with some hip-hop and rock, but I can't enjoy it because the bass is lacking/absent. I've had $10 Sony earbuds that had more bass in them! Otherwise, the sound is clear; I've only had them on my head for a few minutes, so I can't say that they hurt yet. I haven't had any trouble with sound not coming from the headphones because I took other people's advice and plugged the straight end of the cord into the headset and the angled one into my computer/iPhone.I'll be honest and say that I did want these in part because of the way they look, because I'm someone who listens to music all day as I'm walking outside, in stores, at work, etc., and having headphones that compliment my fashion and don't look like I ran out of a AV club meeting does matter. I looked at other brands that are purported to be better, but I didn't like how they looked. But make no mistake: Quality is also a significant factor. So they can't just look good and not sound good.Major side-eye at the brand that's supposed to specifically compliment bass. I'm about to go abroad (I bought these to have on my trip), so I don't have time to do a return, but I might when I get back. I'll have to test them some more.
p157
aVI really want to like the Beats Solo 2 headphones.  First of all, I got them here on Amazon for $148.  Apparently it was a special sale.  So when I read reviews from "experts", I note that many simply say something like "good headphones but overpriced."  I bought them mostly to use in the gym.  I workout religiously.  For me, going to the gym is not a social occasion.  When I'm on the treadmill, for instance, I'm totally focused.  That's where having a good set of headphones come in.  I want something that blocks out the conversations around me.  These are the people who are half-heartedly working out but more focused on using the gym as a social occasion.  Truth is, my new Beats Solo 2 can become uncomfortable after about an hour.  When I first put them on I could only go 45 minutes, so I guess I'm breaking them in (either that or just getting used to them).  But they do the job - great sound, not noise canceling but certainly noise reducing, and comfortable for the time I'm actually working out.  If you're looking for a set of cans to use on an airplane for a long flight, look elsewhere.  But if you're goal is similar to mine, I'd recommend the Beats Solo 2 - especially if you can get them on sale!
p158
aVThis is my fourth experience with on-ear headphones, and the first with the Beats brand.  My prior headphones were Sennheiser HD280 pro, which I got at Amazon some 7 years ago.  They were over-ear headphones, and they have a full sound, but are uncomfortable for long use.  I wanted something lighter that sounded good, so I decided to consider Beats Solo 2.0.Beat had a reputation for being bass heavy in prior incarnations.  After a day of listening to the Solo 2.0's, I am hearing a full range of sound with no heavy emphasis on bass or treble.The fit on my head is good.  I was expecting them to be a little tight but that's not the case.  The noise isolation is actually pretty good.  When I took a call on my iPhone using the mic cable (included) my voice was disembodied because I couldn't hear it over the cover of the ear pads.The only complaint I had was that right side and left side were not marked clearly on the headphones, but one of the comments pointed out where it was.  Can you find it without reading the comments?Oh, and the color, dark blue, is lovely.
p159
aVMy granddaughter received these headphones for Xmas. She put them on right away and wore them all day long. She is very happy with these headphones. They are her favorite Xmas gift.
p160
aVThe Beats have a nice sound to them.  There is the right balance between treble, mid and bass.  You can wear these cans for a long time without getting tired.  Highly recommended.
p161
aVGreat sound. We had to send it back as I brought the wrong one (corded not cordless) I am sure the cordless will sound just as good. We tried Bose and found this to sound better.
p162
aVLike so many other reviewers have said, these have a better, richer sound than the HD headphones. They also are tighter, like others have said. After I spoke with Beats, I'm not confident they will get anymore comfortable with use. I wear glasses and these push the glasses arms into my head immediately upon wearing. Also, they came with a soft case, not the hard case that the amazon site says they will come in. So, better sound, glossy finish vs the HD that look great but show fingerprints really easily. Unfortunately these positives do not outweigh the negative uncomfortable fit.UPDATE. I gave them a bit more time and now I'm really happy with these!  They loosened up and the fit is snug, but even with glasses not uncomfortably so. Here's something weird. The sound is much richer with my iPhone than my iPod. I have a recent version of each (most recent nano, and iPhone 5s). The plug is in the whole way with both. So why is the sound so much better with the phone? I asked Beats and they had no answer other than to make sure it's plugged in all the way. Which it is.  ,so, for using them with my iPhone, awesome. With my iPod, meh just ok. If that sound were the same as with the phone, I'd give it 5 stars.
p163
aVDO NOT BUY THESE!!!! I got them and a couple weeks later a wire in them broke, now only one ear piece works. I looked it up and it's a common problem with these and the HD
p164
aVBought these for my son's birthday.  They are a big hit.  I rate these on my son's "satisfaction factor".He wasn't sure about the color at first, but once he pulled them out of the box he liked it a lot. For him, they are a status symbol.  He's not too picky about his sound (but I'm working on that) but on the whole, these aren't bad sounding cans.I have listened to them for a very short period of time.  They are typical Beats with bottom-heavy sound.  The Solo 2's do manage to make the midrange and highs clearer than their predecessors so the rest of the music isn't completely lost amid the bass.If you are a basshead, give 'em a shot -- especially if you can find them for $50+ less than the $199 List Price (I paid $139 right here on Amazon at the time).Can you find better sounding cans for the money?  Yes.  If sound is more important than status to you, look elsewhere starting with the Sennheiser Momentum On-Ears (first generation are <$100 now and an excellent value) and their over-ear cousins, Sony MDR-7506, Audio Technica ATH-M50 and its variants, Grado SR60 and SR80...  There are many more alternatives in this price range.
p165
aVNot worth the price, all hype, I bought 4 and all of them failed within 3 months, the left side of the headphone fails, I'll go back to Bose which never failed on me.
p166
aVThe Beats Solo 2 could produce better sound quality than its previous Solo and Solo HD. I love its style and design. Beats just made a huge favor for its consumers.
p167
aVThese headphones are like heaven, i'm in my own world when i put these headphones to my ears..  Whew who knew headphones can do such things...  Thanks Dre \U0001f64c\U0001f64c\U0001f64c
p168
aVOVERALL:  I would say this is a fairly decent headphone but not for its price. Gets a C rating. If you don't care for isolation the Creative Aurvana Live offers better sound for 1/3 of the current price.DESIGN: I was fairly impressed with the design of the Solo2. It is foldable with a detachable cable and even comes with a small case (Sometimes I find it hard to fit the headphones into the case though). It looks very sleek and simple. My only problem is that the inline controls don't work even though it clearly says it works with android devices. I give it an A here.ISOLATION: The Solo2 does isolate but its not impressive or anything. C rating.SOUND: I feel like the Solo2 needs more clarity for its price. I received it as a gift, but it was over $200 at the time. You would find more clarity in the Creative Aurvana Live (CALs) which I got at amazon for $45. C ratingCOMFORT: I am not picky with comfort so I usually get along with things fine. Keep in mind, this is an on-ear headphones so the earpads go directly on your ears, not over or around. I think this does well for comfort. B
p169
aVI am by no means an audiophile so lets get this out of the way first. I actually received these as a Xmas gift from my wife and was a little on the skeptical side. I've read mixed reviews from actual audiophiles who tend to bash the Beats products as being over-hyped and mediocre so I was surprised by how much I've enjoyed these. Simply put, they're just a damn good product.Sound is for sure a little on the bass heavy side but not to the point that it overwhelms the overall sound. In terms of clarity, tone and general richness of sound, they're quite good. They're also incredibly comfortable which is a big deal for me. They feel really nice on my ears and don't feel too bulky when I'm moving around. They're built quite solid as well and I've found the case to be good for travel too. And of course, they look sleek and inviting but that doesn't factor in too heavily on my overall perception.In summary, they're very good headphones. A little pricey but not regrettably so. If you're in the market for good headphones that will allow you to escape for a little bit, I recommend these without hesitation.
p170
aVI love these.  They are the perfect size and they snug on to your ear and are very comfortable.  Just enough bass and not too much at all.  I would recommend.
p171
aVWe only use this when we travel and it broke after using 3x. Cant return it because it is no longer elidgable for return. Sound only comes out of one side.
p172
aVThese are soooo much better than the last version. Of course, they're still really expensive and bassy, but the design is even nicer, with better color schemes. They feel more sturdy as well. The fake leather ear cups are pretty comfortable, and they fit tight (may be a concern for people with larger heads) and can get a little hot. Of course, that is a part of many on-ear headphones.The sound has been improved drastically. The Beats Solo HDs suffered from a tinny-sounding mid-range frequency; guitars sounded downright bad. Bass liked to creep around and muffle everything else. Now, its more balanced and my rock/metal music sounds a lot better. The bass is still prominent, and is clearly the calling card still, but its tighter, less boomy, and isn't as interfering. I like that.Apple's new acquisition is more versatile a street headphone that Beats were previously: more Sol Republic than Monster or Dr. Dre. I like them much more this way.
p173
aVHappy so far! Bought a pair for my husband. Sound is very crisp and feels like you're in the studio and for what they are, I think they're great. We did a lot of research ahead of time as we were considering Solo 2, Executive, and Studio.Pros (vs Studio and Executive)- Do not require batteries (both Studio and Executive do) or need to be charged. Works like normal headphones you just plug in.- Audio quality is superior to Executive for a musician who needs to hear everything clearly and crisp (studio quality)- Price is way lower than StudioCons (vs Studio and Executive)- Less cool features like skipping back and pausing- On-Ear. This means that after time the pressure of the headphones on your ears may begin to get uncomfortable or sore. Fortunately for my husband's needs / touring etc, this isn't a problem because he will have frequent breaks. I wouldn't recommend if you're spending hours on end in the studio, in that case I'd spring the extra cash for over ear.
p174
aVAll I can say is awsome so worth the money I use them every day of the week and don't ever get tiered of using them all day awsome smooth sound
p175
aVI had the Solo HD and when the solo 2.0 came out I was extremely impressed with the difference.  The ear pads are so much more comfortable then the previous ones and the sound quality is much better.  I am actually shocked at how much better these headphones are then the solo hd.  They are lighter then the solo hd and honestly make the solo hd feel like cheap plastic compared to the solo 2.0.  I love how well these feel and how comfortable they feel on and I loved my solo hd ones!  I love how you can tilt the ear phones once you get them on and they stay.  The issues I had with the previous version was I would get them into a position I liked and one ear would pop out of position and would just drive me nuts.As much as I loved the beats solo hd I am more in love with my beats solo 2.0!  The improvements are impressive and the comfort is amazing!
p176
aVHello I'm a ten year old kid! If you are looking for a gift for your kid -- this is a Great buy! I was looking for a late Christmas gift, and I tried my friends Beats and I loved them! I studied up on beats, and decided on the Beats Solo 2. I looked around a bit, and decided to order them on amazon. Two days later, when I came home at 3 pm, I saw a box outside my door. I was so excited, I rushed to the beats, grabbed the box and went into my house. I opened the box and saw my beats. At first I couldn't find the audio cable, but it was at the bottom of the box. I plugged it in to my iPad mini. I played a song and the quality was great. It really let's you feel the music. My dad was talking and I couldn't hear him speaking because of the noise canceling headphones! Over all this was a great buy!
p177
aVAfter doing hours of research I ended up purchasing these headphones for a trip to Europe. Instead of buying them on Amazon I got them at best buy for a cheaper price! (Plus many reviews said when the beats arrived they were already broken) They are not necessarily "noise canceling" headphones, but when someone is yelling for me, I can't hear anything they say! The way it projects music is amazing and the bass is the best part about these. They have very good sound quality. Since they fold up, it is easy to pack into the carrying case and very portable for wherever you go. In the store I was debating to get these or the wireless, but the 100$ difference is definitely not worth it. I'm happy with the decision I made and if I could buy it all over again I would. I highly recommend these especially for teenagers and pre teens. (The only down side is you need smaller ears for better experience with them)
p178
aVI bought these for my daughter for her birthday last year. These were fine and worked well for one year and one month... Yeah, just one month after the warranty. I ran into the same issue that others are complaining about. The right ear stopped working. I understand that it is because there is a short in the wire.  She is very careful with them and they did not last. I have a pair of $89 sony that I have had for over 5 years and I have dropped them, stepped on them, shoved them in my backpack without the case .  I Really neglected them since they are old, however, they are still working fine out of both ears. Those are the ones that she is using now.  I called apple and they said it would cost $99 to fix. I could just buy a new pair for that price...  My older beats.... solo  hd have not had a problem. I think there is a flaw with this design and apple should recall them or just fix them for free.
p179
aVThese Beats headphone have great sound quality. I own these and the original Solo's and I think the best things about these are the new design and better color options. If you are undecided about these for about $200 give or take or the last generation, you can go the cheaper ($140-160) route with the last style and the only thing you'll really be missing is the new design and colors. The last version came in all matte colors in which I own a black pair and their still sick looking (cool). The one thing I did notice about the Solo 2.0's is that the headphone band is sturdier but it seems very tight, I hope it loosens up after more wear. Right now I'm wearing the older ones listening to music on my MacBook Pro in which all of the Beats are compatable with Apple iPad's, Mac's, iPhone & iPod's. Both styles are cool but the Solo 2.0's look way better than the original Solo's, it's your decision.
p180
aVThese are great headphones, I love the sound quality it's nice and clear, I can really only speak for rock music but I'm sure it would sound great for any music I can listen to my music louder without others hearing it, (louder than I thought) when you first get them they may hurt after about an hour when it comes to comfort but after time using them I can now wear them for about six hours until it hurts enough to take them off, I like being able to answer my calls without taking out my phone and being able to pause my music without taking out my phone, I can really get into my music in loud areas, plus you can get a nice color for your own dressing style, I like wearing black more and I got black and red headphones and they look great, and the carrying case I can fold up the cord and keep the headphones and cord in at the same time, I highly recommend them for music lovers
p181
aVOkay -- great sound, but what a hunk of junk.  Very cheaply constructed and unable to stand-up to even gentle use.  Total waste of $159.00.  Lasted 40-days and plastic broke while sliding set on.  Fractured at an obvious stress point.  I bought two pairs of Beats, one for each teenage child.  They don't get much for Christmas, so every gift, especially one like this, gets treated very well.  Both pairs broke in less than 60-days.  Both pairs broke in the same location.  Apple Service attributed the break to abuse and refused to cover it, even though you can literally grab any pair, pull them open to slide them on, and SEE that there is an obvious stress point and that is exactly where they broke.Spend the money -- go with Bose.  You'll be much happier.This whole line of product is a bunch of marketing hype -- very, very cheaply constructed.
p182
aVVery good headphones. I haven't had a problem with them yet. It sounds great. Very good bass. This on ear headphones are more for Hiphop, r&B; and EDM music. Sometimes the bass overshadow the lyrics. I like songs with bass in it so I actually like it. The carrying bag that comes with the beats is okay.  The only small issue that I had with these headphones is over a short period of time of wearing it on my ears, my ears starts to hurt. I feel like these headphones are way too tight on my head. And another thing that the bass is so loud that I can't even hear the lyrics some songs. If you want headphones with good bass then get these. If you like to hear the song lyrics , then I suggest Bose.  These headphones are also good at noise canceling. Even when I play a song with no bass, I still can't hear people talking around me.
p183
aVI Absolutely love these Headphones, They have An ok sound for the price,  They look really nice and Makes everybody jealous. But, they have some notable cons.I ordered the All red edition Solo 2s (if it makes a difference )1st on my list is No android Compatibility. Coming from a Samsung Galaxy s6 Edge User, the volume buttons do Not Work, but the pause and play do.2nd con is That they are Extremely uncomfortable.  I cant have them on My ears for More than 30 mins at a time cause they feel as if their Squishing my ears. And i have an average sized head. 3rd con is (and just might be my problem) the carrying case. Its A bit on the small size, its pretty hard Fitting it inside it.Other than that these are great headphones for Small headed, Iphone Users, and Those who Dont use carrying cases.
p184
aVGot these as a Christmas present. No sound from right side, so I called Beats customer service and they were extremely helpful in getting me a replacement pair. They did what they call a "capture" because their engineers want to look into the one-side-not-working issue. Clearly it's a known issue. The replacement pair work perfectly--very nice, rich sound. The only problem is, they're very heavy. I intended to wear them at work to help cover the noise of an open office environment, but after just 15 minutes of wear, I had a headache due to the pressure on the top of my head. My hubs tried them out and didn't have the same issue, but the sound quality isn't much better than his Sony headphones, which were less than half the price of these, so back they go. I'd keep them if it weren't for the headaches.
p185
aVFirst off, let me just say the sound is incredible. It somewhat lacks treble, but I don't mind considering I'm a bass head. Personal preference to the user. I heard this song named "dimmakmmunication" by The Bloody Beetroots. Jesus I could not stop my self from head nodding. The headphones them self look very nice with a beautiful gloss finish, but are vunerable to finger prints. The only complaint I have with these is that it had a very clamp feel to it. They actually began to bother me after a hour or so of use, which surprised me considering the description boasted about their comfort. I decided to leave them on the box over night to help it stretch out a bit, which kind of helped but it still hurts my ears after continuous use. Regardless, I would recommend these earphones to any music lover.
p186
aVThese came as a shock to me, for about 5 years I have only used skull candy products but these where my first ever beats and I have to say they are by far one of the best over the ear headphones I have used. The bass on these is over the top, you can actually feel it in your ears as apose to just hearing it. They are very comfertable, easy to store, and very light weight. Sure they may be a little bit pricey but it is definitely worth the money. All in all great product, it has definitely changed my view of beats.
p187
aVWhen I first got these I was very pleased with how good they sound for how much they cost. One day recently I picked them up and one side just stopped working. After researching I discovered that the wire that travels from the left headphone to the right is glued in place using a poor adhesive that breaks down over time, and the wire just disconnects. The recommended fix for this situation is to rip apart the headphone and fix the wire with a soldering iron. My fix is to never buy Beats again.I bought some Bose QC 25s and they're wonderful. The sound quality has been remarkably improved such that I don't miss these headphones much, and the noise cancellation brings a life and intimacy to listening to music and speech that isn't possible with other headphones.
p188
aVI commute to Chicago daily and was sick of buying in-ear headphones. I saw these for 115$ through the spartanattacks seller so I bought them. I play and record music and these are amazing headphones. I think people that say they dont sound good are just being pretentious, yes at the steep price I can say they are a bit over priced and more of a fashion statement that a practical headphone but they sound amazing and have been really comfortable for me. The seller forgot to send me the cable so I was pretty upset but I did order the 2 pack of replacement cables for 5$ http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B00HFTKKUY/ref=oh_aui_detailpage_o00_s00?ie=UTF8&psc;=1 and they work. Other than opening the box and not having the cable the day I expected to use these I have no complaints.
p189
aVThe product would be great if it worked passed 2 months after purchase. I bought one as a gift and one for my self and both headphones began to breakdown after a two month worth of use. The right ear on both headphones went quiet and never worked. Apple tested the product at their store and concluded that it was not the wire, but the headphone it self. I am not sure if Amazon recieved a bad batch or if all of them are like this, but i was very disapointed with the quality of these headphones. I returned one of the headphones to amazon ( Amazon was kind enough to accept my return even after the 30day cutoff) and the other is gonna be repaired/replaced by Apple. For the cost of these headphones I shouldn't have to return or serivce these headphones.
p190
aVSanta is bringing these yo my daughter. Pink is her 'thing'. If it's offered in pink, she loves it. I paid forty dollars less for them than what they are marked now. I tried getting these on super special at Best Buy, Walmart, and Radio Shack, but everywhere was sold out of pink. I found them at one other place online, and cheaper, but I didn't feel the other website was as reliable as Amazon Prime. Anyway, her older brother got a pair of black/red ones last year and as soon as she saw jus she said 'Next year im asking Santa for beats, too!" I thought she'd forget, but, sure enough, they were at the top of the list this year. My son's beats have held up exceedingly well, and he's not the easiest on things. Hopefully this pair will be the same.
p191
aVThese headphones are just perfect for any kind of listening. I never tried the originals which were said to be poor but these are great. I also have a pair of vmoda m80 and audio technica mx50. These blow both of them out of the water in clarity and mids. I have two pairs now, one for my computer and one for travel / gym. They can be found in nfm stores for 159 brand new. No where online seems to be matching this. They have also been very durable so far, I personally like the plastic for the lighter weight. As another note, these are tight at first even on a small head but they break in eventually.
p192
aVBoth of my daughters (young twenties) got these headphones for Christmas and they are extremely happy with them for comfort, sound quality, and of course that all important "looks" component.  They were interested only in on ear and not over ear style.  I comparison shopped for these and, while I am generally a BOSE fan for headphones, these are quite nice.  Perhaps a very slight decrease in sound quality from the Bose but you will forget about the small difference as soon as you are not comparing side by side.  They are well made and sturdy and come in a nice non-bulky case for travel.  Please note that while not noise canceling, they are pretty effective at sound muffling (which can be both good and bad).  Overall-recommend!
p193
aVJust received mine today...I am amazed at how much they improved the quality. I got them on sale for $170 and i must say it's worth it. The only issue i had was the right headphone not working! Seems common enough, before complaining on here i tried swapping out cables with my old pair of Beats and it did the trick. I think the common issue a lot of people are experiencing with right headphone not working is due to cables not the actual headset itself. It would be great if I could receive a replacement cable so that I could sell of my old pair... 5 Stars either way as the sound quality is amazing not only for Hip-Hop but Rock and acoustic songs as well.
p194
aVThe sound is great if you're an average music listener; the price is fair for what you get, as well. If you're looking to buy a pair that's not too pricey this will do. If you're looking for more out of headphones there's other products, of course. The quality of the sound is clear and decent despite what others say. However, the only reason why I'm not giving it 5 stars is because it's true on what they say about the Solos hurting your ears after a while of using them (3 hours or so). So, the comfort was a bit of a problem for me, personally. Other than that, GREAT design and sound. Loving them so far, aside, from the comfort issue. Got them on sale too, so why not get a pair when they are on sale! :-)
p195
aVMy son is on his 3rd pair of these headphones.  The first pair broke in just over a year and we got a full refund under the retailer's replacement warranty.  We thought it was a fluke and bought another pair.  The 2nd pair stopped getting sound on the right side after less than a year and was replaced under Apple's warranty.  Now that pair (the 3rd one) has quit working (no sound on left side) after just two months and we will get another full refund through the retailer's warranty.  If you decide to buy these headphones, buy a replacement warranty with them as you will need it.  We will switch to a different brand.
p196
aVgot em last Christmas the headphones are great but after 3 months they have a continuous problem, the right side went out so I was upset and looked online and i found if the right side speaker goes out which happened to me means the wire is bad so i went to the apple store and they replaced them and worked great for 3 months then same thing happened seeking answers again i found a youtube video showing a guy who is familiar with this and he repairs for 50$ and parts vary prices but the wire i needed was $40 and he showed a tutorial on how to replace this wire so i will replace the wire after the one year warranty runs out. here is the link to the site http://fixthebeat.com/
p197
aVI got three sets of these headphones for my kids.  They fit well and the sound is good.  However all three set are having a problem with the headphones.  It seems the wire wiggles loose and one or both of the headphones go dead.  If you wiggle the jack you can get them working again but for this much money I feel the product should be working with no problems.  I spent the last few hours trying to find a way to contact the seller directley so we could fix this and was unable to do so.  So I guess this is the only recorse I have.  I would love for the seller to contact me at amepp@newcitycleaqners.com.  Hopfully we can work something out.Amanda
p198
aVi just bought a MacBook Pro 15" retina from the Apple Store with student discount. It included the Beats Solo 2 for free as well as $200.00 off the laptop. I had no risk which was nice for this headphones. I read a lot of bad reviews on the build quality. I don't think I would have bought one after reading those. Maybe they were older models. Anyways the build quality seems fine to hold up to normal use and the sound is definitely amazing. I plan to just keep it at my desk for my computer. Not wearing it to the gym like other fools. That's why they probably break lol. I'll revise this down the road regardless to see how it holds up after a few months
p199
aVThis is the third pair of Beats that I bought and all 3 have had one side go out in a matter of months. The first one went out in an=bout 8 months. The second went out in 2 months and the third went out in less than a month. The quality of sound is good if you can keep them working long enough to enjoy them. The beats 1 year warranty is awesome though!! I bought 2 from amazon and one from best buy and they were all 3 different beats models so it's not just a flaw in one model. We are sad that the beats didn't work out for us but we won't be buying another pair!! I'll be doing research to find the best quality headphones instead of the most popular!!!
p200
aVI like them. I bought mine from best buy for, I want to say, 180. I also have a pair of Bose sound trues. I like them both for different  reasons. I am not an audiophile, so I may very well have no idea what I'm talking about. I'm your average consumer. And I was tired of having junk 20 dollar headphones that broke after a couple weeks. These sound great IMO... Granted I'm used to junk... But it has to stand for something, right? They do start to hurt my ears if I wear them too long. But I think that's the case with any on-ear headphone.
p201
aVI love these headphones....i used to have the previous version of the Solo's and these have a far superior design and look. They are contructed better, look nicer, and fit on your head better. The previous Solo HD's sort of went out on the bottom when you wore them....these are more rounded and fit nice on your head....They are thicker and the cups are definitely bigger...they are basically a mini studio headphone and have the same exact look for cheaper and more compact....i absolutely love these....they are perfect for me.
p202
aVMy son got these for an Easter present for a long flight.  He used them less than a month.  This weekend while traveling I asked to borrow them-I said only one ear worked. My 10yr old son said they are called 'Beats Solo' mom, because only one ear works.  Now since its been over 30 days, the seller will not let me return them.  I bought them early and surprised him in his Easter basket, so he did even know about them a month ago.  I am very frustrated!  What happened to customer service?  Do Visas still double a warranty?  Ugh.  So expensive and all you can hear is from one ear.  Ridiculous!!!
p203
aVI've owned Beats Solo HD to Bose QC15's and I can honestly say these headphones are pretty damn good. I fell in love with these when I first tried them at Best Buy. The sound quality is excellent not too much bass unless you want to bump up the bass booster on the equalizer. Beats have always been known for too much bass. My only con to these headphones is they start to get uncomfortable after 30 mins or so. So be advised to take breaks from them. They're definitely worth the $200 price tag. Good going Beats by Apple!
p204
aVLove these! They deliver great sound quality. Have not used them on a plane yet (which was my main reason for getting these) so I will update on how well they work on the plane (drowning out noise). When used in the house, it was hard to hear others talking or the tv.The color is grey, yet they appear to be more of a light blue. They fit very well, snug but not tight.  I had purchased the noise cancelling JVC headphones but returned those as they did not produce what they promised. After a couple of my friends recommended these I thought I would give them a try, glad I did.
p205
aVI received these headphones today and they are very good quality and work fine, however, the connecting cable will not initiate the stereo (both sides engaged) until you hold down the button on the cable the entire time. Still trying to find out if there is a glitch but it is a disappointment that the cable is not working properly. I have tried everything for the stereo sound to engage on its own without having to hold the button down. All works fine with my other headphone cable. I guess I will have to locate another cable unless amazon will send me a replacement.
p206
aVThese headphones are easy to use and make music sound so much better.  Seriously, there is a significant difference between standard headphones and these Beats.  I prefer the less technical, plug and play design which these have.  Having an economical lean, I tried to get by with other, cheaper headphones (what's the difference anyway, I thought?) - but once you try these with your own favorite music, there's no going back.  They are really that good, and bring new depth and connection to the music than you may have thought possible.  It's worth the splurge
p207
aVI purchased these and after 2 months of responsible use the right ear stopped receiving sound. I was miffed but I thought it was the cable so I purchased another. That didn't help. I was more miffed and threw them in a drawer for several  months. Well, they still don't work and I cant find anyplace to take them to be repaired. I found a video on you tube but I have no skill in this area. There were many others with the same problem looking for a solution. So, I'm not happy with Beats right now. Oh, and their website is terrible. It was of no use whatsoever.
p208
aV13yr old got these for Christmas. I tried them and the sound is great. Overall response is clear and crisp with good response in the bass all the way through the screaming guitars. Daughter loves them for the style and that they break down and come with their own case. The audio cable controls do not work with the Android phone so no volume controls. The cable plugs into the head set as well as the phone, so if the cord is tripped on they pull out without doing damage. The built in microphone works great when you get a call while listening to music.
p209
aVWarnings and reviews are legit regarding one side being faulty. I bought these for my daughter for Christmas and the first time she used them, sure enough, only one side worked.  We returned them to the Apple Store at the mall instead of shipping them back and the service was excellent.  Now she loves them- but not fun going to the mall on December 26.  With so many complaints about similar faults, I'm not sure why it's so hard to get it right the first time.All is well now, and she is silently listening to her music all the time :)
p210
aVI bought these Beats for my son for Christmas. Not only do they look good but the sound is incredible. You can literally feel the music while listening to your favorite artists. These headphones are lightweight as well as durable, and are very comfortable to wear.  These headphones are easily foldable and with the color-matched remote talk cable, you can change songs, adjust the volume and even take calls, without having to reach for your device. Although these headphones were purchased for my son, I can't seem to get enough of them !!!
p211
aVI must say, after disliking this brand for so many years due to there just terrible sound quality and performance to price ratio, I'm very satisfied. Of course you can still get much better for the price, I love the sound of these. They surely favor the bass side of the EQ but it no longer drowns out everything else like it did with the old solo's, or all of them for that matter. The midrange and high range are all clearly audible but there's still a great amount of well defined bass. Good job Beats by Dre, my ears are hard to impress.
p212
aVI got these with apple's macbook pro promo so they were free. Had I actually bought these and paid full price I would have been disappointed. They are nice, but the base response is weak compared to the Jabra headphones I usually use, even when I use those with bluetooth. If you're looking for style and the brand name more than the actual sound quality, these will be fine. However, if you're spending over $100 on headphones and are interested in the best possible sound and build quality, I think there are a lot of better options.
p213
aVI've needed a new Headphone for awhile, and this brand was oft mentioned as popular choice. More than few of my friends and customers, as well as many bystanders have it. So I took the plunge, and lived to be...meh.I cannot say in terms of either sound, design or comfort, whether this Headphone is truly all that superior to lesser brands. I've no great complaints to it, but not can I say I love this to buy it again.One recommendation would be to buy black or grey... the White is difficult to to keep clean.
p214
aVVery good hearphones. Beats by Dr. Dre are truly great and they offer a very good sound.It's true that they might be a bit expenseive, however you can have a good deal if you wait for a special occasion.The only thing I'd like to put an amend on is that, despite the fact that they're really comfortable, after using them for around 25/30 minutes or more,  because they're very tight, you start feeling a bit of pain on your ears.
p215
aVLove... great sound quality and folds down to compact size when not in use.  Been holding off for a little while on splurging for these... I have some wireless headphones but am getting concerned with recent studies on wireless items and electronics connected to tumors etc... Like that this is wired.  Easy to use button as well. I don't know a lot about technical sounds but I do tend to be picky on speakers and sound quality.  These are definitely up to par for someone who enjoys a very clear, clean sound with some base.
p216
aVI received my beats and they seemed in good condition but during my first use I discovered there is a short in the connector cord only allowing my music and sound to come out of one side of my headphones.  I am annoyed by this because while I like my headphones, I cannot properly use them until I get a replacement cord. There is a big sticker on my box stating that this product has been amazon inspected, but clearly this is not true because my headphones are defective until I spend the money for a replacement cord.
p217
aVI got these for my daughter. She loves them. She says they help stop outside noise and they make her iPad volume louder. They feel good and durable also. I can't attest to the long term usage factor yet but at the price point of $200 they better last forever. The enormouse price of the beats solo 2 is the one draw back I mean they are nice but still there corded headphones. The inflated price is the only thing that drops them from 5 stars to 4. At $89 or anything under $100 I would have Givin a 5 star review.
p218
aVGreat headphones that look even better in person. The material is very high quality. I'm no audiophile, but to me the sound is fantastic. Like many others have mentioned, the only negative is that the case that comes with it is black only and is soft. It takes a little extra effort to make the headphones fit. I like that the wire is detachable so you can interchange with different lengths or replace if damaged. I hate having to throw out a perfectly good pair of headphones because the wires have been damaged.
p219
aVBought as a gift for a teen cousin. Right headphone has a short after just one month of use. It developed after the 30 day return window so I couldn't return them to Amazo ( literally developed on Day 32)....Luckily Apple offers a 1 year limited warranty and I am getting them repaired or replaced for free. Owned and gave away the first Beat Solos before upgrading and those are still going strong. My advice if they are for you (an adult) buy Sennheiser or Grado. If they are for teens buy the insurance.
p220
aVBought these for my son for Christmas. Not indicated in the description, these headphones come with a case but no wires.I bought a case separately only now to have 2 cases. The case that came with the headphones are made of neoprene material and the zipper smoothly glides. The extra case I bought is made of a stiffer faux leather but the zipper is crap.  Just warning others before they spend money they don't need to!
p221
aVBought these to use at the gym i would not recommend these, not comfortable over the ear you feel 20 mins in your workout the sweat and the heat and you need to take them of to relax your ear. also sound reduction is not good you can still here what is happening around you. sound and bass are not that hight I've tried on different kinds of music and i still feel the need to increase the volume and the bassother than than connectivity is good look is good but i wouldn't recommend them
p222
aVI have this headphones for less than a year. At the beginning I really loved them. They were great, noise canceling and comfortable. However, now they suddenly stopped working properly. I don't hear anything in the right and I need to play with the cable which is very annoying and doesn't always work. The headphones didn't fall at any time or the cable wasn't pull to hard. They just broke and it should not happen after less than a year especially since they cost (at that time) 200 dollars!
p223
aVThe build quality on these is still pathetic. If they were aluminem they would have less problems. The cord is also junk, do yourself a favor and pick up a better cable.Sound:Definitely an improvement, but the bass is still a little overbearing. These sound like cheap in ear monitors with bass thrown in. It's a sound i wouldn't expect. Nothing has detail and for the price...Pick up some ath m50x's and get a fiio e11 amp and use the bass boost. Much better.
p224
aVFor a little over a $100 bucks I can't complain too much. The sound quality of the headphones are really good. They have a nice bass to it, and they cancel out noise pretty well. It has a detachable cord which is convenient, and they fold up. The carry case they come with is a soft pouch and it fits pretty snug I would invest in a better beat case. Other than that great headphones for the price really stylish and overal high quality sound and a high quality design build.
p225
aVI love these headphone!  They are quite good at cancelling out noise.  The base is nice, but not overpowering  (maybe this is because I don't listen to music with a super heavy base, though).  The color is a bit brighter than the picture-- it is a VERY bright pink.  I like that, but it might be a turn-off for some people. I have a smaller head, so these fit perfectly.  However, if you have a bigger head, I would not suggest these headphones as they fit snugly.
p226
aVLousy quality control and useless warranty.  Cover on one ear fell off coming out of the case for the first time.  Beats (now owned by Apple) would NOT fix this out of the box defect under warranty.  They wanted more than they originally cost to repair them.  Had a third party company do it.  Then a few weeks later, the hinge on the other ear broke.  These have been carefully handled and packed.  They are just poorly made.Avoid them at all costs.
p227
aVWe got these for my sister and the headphone cord didn't work. The back panel of the volume control on the cord is lose so it'll only play music out of one side unless you're holding it down. In the picture the lose portion is on the right side on the bottom. I'd like Amazon to send me a new cord free of charge so that my sister can actually use her gift, but I doubt they'll comply.
p228
aVJust paying for the style!I returned these Beats the same day they arrived.I was expecting more of beats. Lots good reviews, but the product is Horrible!Clarity is good, but they don't have ANY bass.If you want BASS, DON'T get these!- My ears would turn red and hurt because they were TOO tight and Unconfortable.Never Buying Beats again!For the price, you are just paying for the looks, not the sound.
p229
aVVery dissappointed. After using this for less than 2 months and not heavy usage primarily at nights the jack that goes into the headphones is of such a bad quality that I need to move the cable in different directions in order to get sound in both speakers otherwise I only get sound from the left one and as soon as I move my head or the cable I need to restart again, it's becoming so frustrating that I have stopped using these and sending these back.
p230
aVWith reading reviews and a some research, I decided to buy these Beats for my sons 18th birthday.  He Loves them!!!  Gives great sound, he uses them all the time, listens to music, cell phone conversations, watching movies, and more.  Delivery "Prime" is always on time.  I order regularly and receive my orders quick. Style and comfort excellent.  I would have bought the wireless ones, but I decided on this wired set to be more economical.
p231
aVThese are a great buy at $139 instead of paying $200 in the stores.  They are comfortable and the sound quality is amazing!  I'm sure we'll be using these for years.  I'm not sure why people gave a poor rating and said they were cheaply made.  We ordered two sets and they are just fine; I think some people are rougher on their things than others.  Like anything electronic or for electronics, treat it with respect and it will last a long time.
p232
aVI have had the headphones for about a year now, and they're still holding up nicely. Sound quality is still up there, and they seem pretty sturdy still. I will say that when I first got them, they were a little bit on the painful side because when wearing them for an extended period of time, they applied a little too puch pressure so I would start to get headaches from them. However after a while, they seem to wear and they squeeze lightens
p233
aVI love these headphones! They are very sturdy and will not break like other brands. The sound is very clear. The headphones are adjustable to fit your head and are very comfortable. The beats work better on newer electronics devices and the sound is clearer. They are very easy to clean and are great quality. This is an investment and well worth the money. Cheaper brands of headphones break and they cost money regardless. Beats last forever!
p234
aVLove the sound quality of these headphones.HOWEVER, after only 2 weeks of use, the button on the cord no longer works. I am past the amazon return window (given as a gift to my son) and have $200 headphones that do not work. I have to put a clip on the button to hear anything. Gravely disappointed. I had researched thoroughly and did not expect this to happen.
p235
aVThese are great. I love the sound quality and they are well made. They fold easily and store perfectly in the carry case provided when not in use. I do have one small complaint. They are a little snug when I'm wearing my glasses because they tend to press against the temples of my glasses over my ears causing me to adjust or even remove them at times. I wish there was a way to adjust the fit better but overall I'm happy with this purchase.
p236
aVReceived as gift and found these headphones too heavy and uncomfortable.  I was constantly reminded that they are on my head/ears because I can tell that they are there at all times, taking away from the enjoyment.  The sound is great but again, the comfort is not to my liking.  Tried a nice pair of Bose and granted the sound was quite as good (but still very good) but the comfort by far and away is way better then the Beats Solo 2.0.
p237
aVI purchased these Beats in January as a present for my boyfriend.  He LOVED them, but even after taking VERY good care and using the protective case, they still ended up breaking, after only having them for a short 5 months.  Is there any way I can get a replacement cord for the headphones?  5 months a pretty disappointing for them to already have broken.  Especially with how much I paid for them and how good of care he took of them.
p238
aVI just ordered them the week of 1/17/2015.  I will say that they are worth the money thus far.  Great sound, and I find them very comfortable on the ears.  When watching movies, you can LITERALLY hear everything.  reminds me of a IMAX sound, but smaller.  I think they are definitely worth it.  Also, you can even use them to talk on the phone, and so far I've had no issues in that area.  The only thing I would say is a negative would be that they don't appear to handle bass and treble well at loud volume. The bass and treble become not as clear and can even distort the music.
p239
aVFirst the good: these headphones sound awesome, and I love them tremendously. I bought three pairs, one for myself, one for my boyfriend, and one for my daughter. The bad: the outer covering on one of the speakers is coming apart on my boyfriend's set, and I bought them in August 2015. I didn't purchase the protection plan...and now I wish I had. If you do buy these, buy the protection plan so you can return them if need be.
p240
aVI listened to the entire Blu Ray Phantom of the Opera last nite on these,...It sounded so heavenly, I was literally transported on waves of sheer beauty for almost 2 hours.  Just as important, these Beats are so comfortable, unlike my $45 dollar Skull Candies,..which I can only stand for maybe 40 minutes at the most.  I plan on re-listening to my entire collection of musicals, starting this weekend with Evita, I can't wait!
p241
aVThese headphones are really good you can instantly heard the base when you play any song. The sound quality is great and i know it's alot of rumors about the sound leak but i am telling you guys that it a lie. You can't really hear nothing if your listening to music with these headphones well aleast me because i have my music loud. Overally best headphones ever and i wouldn't trade the for the world. Maybe  i would idk \U0001f602
p242
aVSounds great.  Not as bass heavy as some reviews has led me to believe.  Music becomes an experience, not just an activity.Tight at first.  This is good because it will stay on my narrow head.  But it does hurt my ears after a few hours.  I am hoping it will be more comfortable after a few weeks.  The ear pad are soft enough.Color is matte green, nicely understated, not shiny or attention grabbing.
p243
aVThese started off as a fantastic set of headphones. Excellent sound quality and noise cancelling; calls are very clearly audible. I mostly use them while at school/work. I'm suddenly quite disappointed, however. It's been less than a year, and the right ear stopped working :(I'd like to owe it to some type of physical damage, but the headphones haven't gone through any trauma by sitting on my desk...
p244
aVI've only had them for one day but listened to them for about 3 hours straight. I listened to several different types of music. I have a HTC DNA that has Beats audio for my phone. Great sound clear all the way through, bass sound great, covers ears comfortably and does cancel  a lot of out side noise; that was really nice. All around a great pair of head phones will update once I use them while working  out.
p245
aVI bought these for my grandson (he's 14yrs old) and they didn't even last 2 months before they broke.  Of course I can't return them because Amazon only has 30 day warranty.  These were bought as a Chrismas Gift - something he really wanted - I didn't mind spending the money since he is a very responsible child and takes care of his things.  I would never buy them again just simply due to the warranty.
p246
aVI love listening to music, so I went about looking for the perfect pair of headphones....than I gave these beats a try. Are they perfect no, but I don't have the money for perfect. However these are a blast listening to music, you can tell they were created and tuned by two people who know how the masses enjoy listening to music.
p247
aVFirst and foremost, the sound quality is just stunning! It is not designed nor built for *all* kinds of music you are listening to but it will certainly impress you with deepness and clarity of sound.The only downside is the jack connector. It appears to get loosy as sometimes there is no contact as if the cord was disconnected. Perhaps this only my copy but this gets annoying sometimes.
p248
aVI love them! They're very comfortable, crystal clear sound.  The pause/play button works great.  But the volume buttons don't work for my galaxy s5 but the volume works for my ipod 5Some pros:clear soundcomfortablelight Cons:carry case doesn't have the strap or pouch insidevolume buttons don't work with my galaxy s5 but they do with my ipod 5
p249
aVThis headset is the best I ever got sound wise. The only issue with it, which is not a big deal, that it is a sportive one and will make me feel heated around my ears after wearing it for more than 1 hour. I gave it to my wife as I'm a businessman so I got the wireless PowerBeat which is bose as well I love the brand. If you are a young man or you want a better quality just go for it..
p250
aVWorth the money (but I got these for $75, from a third party seller - with an unopened box..I know I lucked out), but don't plan on using all day/ long periods of time, as they tend to hurt the outside of my ears. Not good, if you are wearing glasses as they will definitely hurt a lot sooner (which I do), unless you push the ear parts of your glasses upwards, and away from the backs.
p251
aVI have wanted Dr. Dre beats for a very long time. My roommate promised me some fr Christmas last year but Christmas was a very hard time for us. When he did get the money, the Christmas SPECIALS were no longer available, and they are quite pricey! Thank you for having them at a price we could afford! I very much enjoy listening to music and using them to talk on my cell phone with!
p252
aVI'm not at all impressed with these. They are cheaply constructed chinese headphones with poor to mediocre sound quality depending on the type of music you are listening to. They are actully best IMO with rock, poorest with anything with bass. They rattle and any serious bass is too much for the micky mouse speakers. Definately NOT worth $200, I actually prefer my old $25 Sonys
p253
aVI was an anti beats by dre kind of person but after seeing the reviews I thought I'd go for it. I'm so glad I did, the bass in these things are just perfect. The sound quality is amazing and the comfort level is ok, I wouldn't be able to use them for hours and hours on end but it just takes getting use to.
p254
aVIve had many beats and they sound good, they feel great but i wouldnt want to risk dropping them.  I feel they are mostly a cosmetic trend than anything else about them.  Again they sound good but I have a $20 pair of sony headphones that fold up, sound just as good if not a little better, and could probably take a beating.  Save hella money and try those $20 Sony headphones.
p255
aVi dont know how the hell anyone has any problems, ive had my pair (5th pair since beats came out, love the brand) and i have never had any problems with any pair ive ever owned. these new beat are a huge improvment and ive been using these the longest, more than a year, i go to the gym about 4 times a week and use them for almost 2-3 hours a day, best headphones ive ever had.
p256
aVThese headphones squeeze my ears badly and hurt the top of my head after an hour of use or less. The sound is decent, but not so much better than my little JVC headphones. These were a gift, and so I'm grateful, but would recommend testing these for 30 minutes or more prior to buying to be sure they fit your head properly. Full disclosure, I have a giant head (cap size 7.5).
p257
aVI recently got these for my birthday, as I have been wanting these for quite some time now. As soon as I pulled them out of the box, I tryed them out, and they sound amazing! These make me love songs that I had grown tired of long ago. I also think the color is beautiful, (I bought the plain blue ones). I don't think ill ever be able to use another brand again. Love these!!
p258
aVDon't by these!! Luckily I received mine for free when buying a macbook from apple.  These are cheap pieces of junk! So far self and four other people I know of personally have all had an issue with the right earphone going out after roughly three months of having them!! For headphones that cost as much as these do, this shouldn't be an issue and apple has been no help.
p259
aVLess than one year later, right side stopped working. The Beats Solo 2 headphones have a limited one year warranty, I tried for over an hour to contact someone to fix them, website does not work properly and there is no clear phone number for contacting anyone. For the amount of money paid, I am incredibly disappointed with this product. Don't waste your money or time.
p260
aVI ordered these for my son's 14 year old birthday. They worked great for two days and then one speaker went out. We returned them for another pair and now 3 months later a speaker went out of the replacement pair. My son takes really good care of them and keeps them in the carrying case. Now it's been too long for us to return them so we are our $200. Such a bummer!
p261
aVI got my first set of beats solo's a few years back for free, and since then I have been hooked. I love the on the ear design, and it's surprisingly hard to find a good pair of on-ear headphones that still allow you to comfortably wear glasses while using them. Sound quality is great, but I'm no audiophile. They also happen to look great, so that's a definite plus.
p262
aVI got these from my aunt who got them as a gift for one of her many business deals. She doesn't use headphones so easy xmas gift. I love the sound quality and the ease of traveling with them.  I hate how they squeeze the absolute piss out of my head.  the pressure feels like when you hit cruising altitude. If someone knows how to remedy this feel free to tell me.
p263
aVLove the headphones.I bought a pair for my daughter and after hearing how well hers sounds, I had to buy one for my self.It is difficult to get the sound right using iPhones, or android phones, but with these the base and acoustics are outstanding.No need to mess around with all the equalizer settings on a phone that just don't work well.
p264
aVI recently bought this and I have to say I am quite impressed ! I being a owner of the first solo beats, this is a major improvement ! It's much lighter, more sleek and fits my head perfectly, the sound quality is top of the line ! The color is amazing and looks like the actual picture. This is the best 200 bucks I've ever spent on a pair of headphones !
p265
aVI enjoyed the new solos and think they are amazing in both sound and build quality. One thing that is making hesitant about Beats is that after 2 weeks of normal use, the aux cord fails starts to malfunction. I notice the aux cord came malfunctioning out of the box, when I tried increasing the volume using the remote on them after a hour of opening them.
p266
aVThese feels and are great also so light! Worth every penny you spend. Don't listen to the meaningless comments about the brand and how overpriced are. They're the real deal: i can hear all the instruments in a song like never before. on the other hand, Amazon warehouse deals description of the productos were on point, definely great offer and team!
p267
aVThese are a replacement for my son's broken pair that we purchased on Black Friday. Needless to say these are of higher quality than his first pair and he seems to be very pleased with them.
p268
aVThese are good headphones.  Can you buy better?  Yes.  But the compact design and sound are of really good value.  I took off a star because if your head a little bit bigger then most, wearing them for over half an hour becomes a little uncomfortable.  But once you most them they feel fine again.  Just wish there was more give for wider heads.
p269
aVSound quality is really good (not like studio, my previous one, but it is a different comparison). The big problem was the comfort. The pressure of the arc is to strong, and after 1 hour using that, start to be uncomfortable. I really like Beats products (I have many!), but this one I am selling, because I can not use that for a long period.
p270
aVI have now 4 months with my headphones, taking good care without letting them fall, punching them and washing them...And now, i have the rightside ear that is failing, sometimes the sound dies if i move my head, until i twist gently to backup the sound but it's still annoying. I have to send it to a store to see if they can solve the problem.
p271
aVThese hurt really badly after about an hour - the top bears down on my head with a ton of pressure, and the ear pods squeeze my ears. Also, the sound really leaks out if you have them on medium volume, and they aren't that sound isolating. I wish I hand't bought them, but they're so expensive I feel like I have to wear them all the time. :(
p272
aVBought from best buy (new). Anyways, i received these as a gift. Didn't care much for $100+ headphones but these are acceptable for studying/home usage. They are not the ideal headphones for someone who wears glasses since they do have bit of a modestly tight grip. As for the sound, it's alright nothing spectacular ( for classical music ).
p273
aVI love beats. This is my second pair and I'm really happy with them. However, when I took them out of the box to listen, the cord seems to be damaged and will play one ear louder than the other and occasionally won't play the other ear at all.Still, I love the quality of sound you get with these. Not much beats them for this price.
p274
aVI just got these and these are my first beats I've had. Right out of the box they were amazing. The carrying pouch is pretty protective but you could buy a different one for 5-10 dollars and have better protection. The sound is great and they cancel noise almost perfectly. Overall great product and I highly recommend these headphones.
p275
aVThese headphones are great. They feel very sturdy and the sound is crips and clear. Although the price is a bit steep, it is totally worth it for me. After a few hours of having them on my ears to ache a little from the cups pressing on them, but that was expected. Overall I am very please with my purchase and I would buy them again.
p276
aVLove these headphones, at first I was hesitanted when i looked at the price but after i decided to get them i was impressed. it was definitely worth it. The Only reason I gave 4 stars is because delivery was terrible. Ups delivered my package to the wrong address and the resident of that address had to give the package to me herself.
p277
aVI'm not sure I would have ever paid this much for headphones, basically I think you pay for the name. However, my son says they work great and he likes them, he does say there are other headphones that work just a swell for the money. I gave these 4 stars because they do work, they are well made, just nothing distinctive about them.
p278
aVI just took these out of the box TODAY and there is NO SOUND coming form the RIGHT EAR. I am sooo disappointed! I was eagerly waiting for my new beats Solo2. I opted for a COMPLETE REFUND even though I bought and extended warranty. It just left a bad taste in my mouth. I would not recommend these, what you might get is a toss up!
p279
aVI bought these Beats for my daughter's 13th birthday. They came in lots of colors, so she got to pick a flavor that was a bit different from her friends' Beats. I think she cares more about the look and status than the actual sound, but regardless, they make her very happy. They're at school, so I haven't listened to them myself!
p280
aVThese solo beats 2 are way better than the 1st generation they are not as stiff & the sound quality is amazing I use them with my iPhone & it's like I'm at the club. I don't use them for a long while at a time but I used them for like 1 hour strait and still was ok ' unlike the original one hurt because they where so hard & tight
p281
aVI purchased 2 sets of these for my daughters for Christmas. They absolutely love them! I did manage to get to hear 1/3 of a song on one of them and it was amazing sound quality!! I would buy some for myself but I'm not headphones kinda girl. My daughters are on public transportation a lot and they don't leave home without them!
p282
aVBought these for my 23 year old daughter for Christmas.  I had them shipped directly to her in SC.  She received them at least a week before expected and was very excited, she loved the red color and said the sound is amazing.  The other plus was that they were smaller then she anticipated and are very comfortable on her ears.
p283
aVI'm about to make a second return for the same problem. One side does not work unless the The cord is plugged into the headset just right. And if you turn your head or move at all you lose that sweet spot and you also lose the sound again. I would have expected better quality since headphones are so popular and so expensive.
p284
aVThe headphones clamp too tightly and become uncomfortable. Sound quality is much worse than expected and my expectations were fairly low. Although the Beats solo2 are an improvement, they still underperform for the price point. Fashion-wise, these headphones are decent but there are better options that are just as stylish.
p285
aVDidn't come with the cord to actually use the headphones. Since I had a cord to try until I could buy another, better one (which I shouldn't have to do because the description said it comes with the cord) the left side doesn't even work. Extremely dissapointed especially considering this was the dissapointment of Christmas
p286
aVI like how the headphone padding feels. Coming from a pair of earbuds these do the trick. I feel that I could have saved my money and gotten some nice Bose Noise canceling headphones, but I liked the color and figured I'd stick with these. Happy with the purchase, but not overly in love with them or impressed with them.
p287
aVBought these headphones as a gift for my sister this Christmas. She loved it. The sound quality is amazing. I have to say its designed quite nicely. They're also quite light for cup-style headphones, and they feel comfortable on the ears and head, even when worn for prolonged periods. Helps with noise isolation as well. The seller (Zorro Sounds) was very helpful as well when I called to inquire if my package could be delivered before the estimated time.
p288
aVAudiophile here. These are a Joke. A plastic, overpriced, hyped up joke. Jokes on you if you buy them, though.Same overall quality as Skullcandy, or Jensen...Beneath Bose or Sennheiser.If you have self-respect, you will avoid this over-marketed garbage. No wonder Apple bought it out.
p289
aVWe were so disappointed with the online purchase we made.  We got the Beats for our son for Christmas and when he went to try them on the one ear had no sound coming out of it.  For $200 I expected them to work and be satisfied.  We had to return them and now we will go right to the website for BEATS and purchase them.
p290
aVGood Headphones.. Sound Amazing, but only if you listen to rap, electric, dubstep, dance ect. If you are planning to get these for rock and roll, take your business elsewhere. If you want a pair of great sounding bassy headphones, these are the ones for you. They are overpriced, but they are stylish and sound good.
p291
aVThe Beats Solo 2.0 is AMAZING. When I purchased this item the cost was $159.99 and now the price is higher.  The order came fast (2 day shipping) and I enjoy listening to music on the beats. Beats is the best headphones you have ever tried. Do not regret buying this because these headphones worth every penny spent.
p292
aVI wore these for about 5 minutes and my ears hurt from the pressure of them. I tried adjusting them several times but it didn't help. Just wearing them 5 minutes made my ears hurt for several hours, and I'm not talking about the volume being too loud. I would go with different headphones that cover your entire ear
p293
aVI love these headphones they are comfortable and easy to carry around with the pouch that comes with it. The only thing is when I first got them I had to play with the wire only olthe right ear was working and not the left.  I'm still having that issue. For expensive pair of headphones it shouldn't be doing that.
p294
aVGreat sound. Just like the other reviews. Only reason why I didn't put 5 starts was because after 15-20 minutes of use, they're excruciating on you ears. Beats never fixed that common issue with the solos. I was told I can stretch them by settling it over the box but they're $150 headphones. I wouldn't risk it.
p295
aVThey're okay. Out the box- noticed that only one side was working.  Disappointed since I purchased for my hubby. He had to wiggle the wire and play around with how far he inserted the jack before it started to work properly.  Every now and then it stil acts up. Shouldn't be the case with such pricey headphones.
p296
aVThe cover on the ear cushions has already started to come off after only six months of use. I have never used the headphones outside of my home and I've made sure to take good care of them as they were given to me as a gift and they're quite expensive. For the price, the construction quality seems quite poor.
p297
aVWife's Christmas present.  When first connecting the wire (plugs into both head set and phone) I had them reversed.  Sound only came out one ear.  Contact Tech support (very good support by the way) who easily knew the problem.  Reversed the wire and worked perfectly.  I feel foolish for not realizing this.
p298
aVI bought these for my son for his 17th birthday. First set of headphones arrived with a aux cord that did not work! He was really disappointed as Beats were all he really wanted. Amazon replaced them without question, which I appreciate. But I hate that they delivered to my son defective on his birthday.
p299
aVDefinitely heading in the right direction. Sounds are improving. A little too tight on my ears but I got big ears lol. I like hip hop but don't like over powering bass. These are a very good balanced pair of headphones. Good job Beats, keep it coming. P.S. hope the next Solo are a bit more comfortable.
p300
aVBought for my son for his birthday in June and by August they weren't working properly! The right speaker isn't working so I only have sound from one side! Impressive packaging and comfortable on head but disappointed with the sound!
p301
aVReally great. I love music and these are the best for it. Just an example but I was listening to the song November Rain by Guns N Roses and I never knew this, but you can hear rain pattering in the background. I thought this was really cool and never would've known this if I hadn't bought these.
p302
aVDefinitely worth while. Glad I purchased this product. Especially on Spotify. I can bass it as loud as I want and they don't blow and I have to buy a new pair. Plus the bass rocks! Especially on bass music like Basscube. No distortion either. I would recommend it. If you got the cash flow.
p303
aVBought these for Christmas presents. BIG hit! The parents joked that the kids wouldn't get to use them. My nephew (age 10) had everyone sample his Beats and then didn't want to take them off. They are comfortable and have excellent sound. And, thanks to Amazon for offering the best price!
p304
aVBought these for my 17-year old niece who was DYING for a pair.  I thought she was insane for spending this kind of money on headphones, but once I heard the sound quality, I was convinced.  The ear muffs are super comfortable, would be great on an airplane.  And who doesn't like PINK?!
p305
aVI bought these for a friend for Christmas, soon after she told me that the sound only comes out of one ear!!! I am so furious because if I had known sooner I would have returned them. SO basically I spent $200 on headphones that only work on one ear? Come on Beats, you should do better.
p306
aVI was looking for good headphones from long time but didn't want to spend a lot of money. I ended up buying so many low quality headphones and i think i spent more $$ on those combined :) as compared to price of this one.So finally decided to try Beats and i am just loving these.
p307
aVLooks pretty, but its too tight. I really wanted to like these headphones, but I was only able to keep it on my ears for about 10 mins and my ears started feeling so hot. Unfortunately I had to return these headphones...
p308
aVThe Beats Solo first generation was way better.. These don't have half the bass of the older ones, and have hissing in the music that hurts your ears, I have to use an EQ setting just to have them sound "ok".. My Apple EarPods sounds better than these, very disappointed..
p309
aVI love these products.  However, within 4 or 5 months, one of the ear pieces was not working properly; almost like there was a short in the wire.  Can't say that it is soley from the company or my teens wear and tear.I just thought it would last longer for the price.
p310
aVI love these headphone and the color get so many compliments. They go everywhere I go and I love the control talk feature as well.  I tried to register them on the beats website and it said the product was already registered, so I don't know if Amazon registers them for you.
p311
aVI cannot think of anybody that would be really pleased by these headphones.They seem comfortable over the ears, but i've only tried them for short periods of time.They seem well constructed, which is to be expected since these cans cost around 200usd.They are foldable, which, together with the good seal they provide, means they are targeted at the mobile crowd.They cost 200USD. Or 120, or zero (i got mine as a gift after purchasing a macbook pro).Let's stick with 200usd which is the msrp.They sound awful. Really. I expected a nice sound out of these headphones, after reading some reviews by famous audiophiles on the internet.And then it struck me: how come these audiophiles are well over 50 years old? you cannot hear highs at that age, what do they know about hi fi if they cannot hear it?So, these headphones sound like something a 70 year old would approve: the bass is there, muddying things, the mids are recessed, and the highs are... somewhere else. How bad is it? bad enough to change the songs so you miss things that you know are there because you could hear them with your cheap earbuds. If you cannot hear highs for a start, i pity you and your miserable life, but you will not have a problem with these headphones (so not all is lost). If you can, and you expect to, look somewhere else. My shures se215 cost half what these headphones cost, and sound 1000 times better. The sennheisers px200 i used to have sound 2000 times better, and I imagine almost any other half decent headphone out there.Avoid these if you care for the music you listen to.
p312
aVSo I love this, and I've been using it, but for some reason the chord won't come out of the headphones and this is a problem because my baby sister chewed on the chord and I need to replace it... but it's not coming out. I mean really man? This issue needs to be fixed asap.
p313
aVDaughter's Christmas present.  They sound awesome, but make sure you have the right end of the cord plugged into the headphones and into your phone.  If you dont only one side works.  The L shaped side goes into the listening device.  I was swearing until I found this out.
p314
aVThe Beats Solo 2 was exceptional but however the beats logo on the headphone wire broke off and fell the glue was not strong enough. The bass was there but it isn't as powerful as the studios by Dr Dre. It's very good for working out because the headphones do not fall off.
p315
aVDon't buy this crap. Mine fell apart and sounds average for the price their asking. I bought the z60 gaming headset for 70 bucks. The z60 is a lot better than these beats even though it is meant for video games. It is also more comfortable because they go over your ears.
p316
aVThe right speaker just DIED!!! Never dropped, abused, etc. While they worked, they were GREAT. But $180.00 for an "iffy" set of "hi-end" headphones will no doubt send the next buyer elsewhere.
p317
aVI have had these head phones for less than 6 months and one of the earphones has stopped working.  They do not give any contact information about the seller to contact regarding warranty.  I loved these headphones until they only lasted a few months.  Very disappointed.
p318
aVThe cord to the head phones stopped working the day after my son got them. We got a replacement cord which was red, the one that quit working was blue and matched his head phones. The only color replacement cords are blue. My son was really disappointed it didn't match.
p319
aVHi,Personally my music is all about beats so this product was perfect for me. Plus it looks great too :)I would have given 5 but the ears ache after 15 min itself its a bummer!! Hopefully beats can do some changes where we don't face this issue.
p320
aVThey sound fantastic, really. -1 star for being a little tight. They are comfortable at first but if you use them for a long listening session (which of course you want to do), then after a while I need to move them around a little cause they squeeze a little too hard.
p321
aVWhen you first use it feels extremely tight on the eats and will need to take breaks during using them. Feel flimsy but are actually really durable unlike their counter part solo hd. But sound great and after a while feels great also. Great buy for people of all ages.
p322
aVI bought beats wireless over the ear headphones for my husband for xmas and he hated them because he could hear outside noise at the gym.  I bought him these wired ones in January for his bday and he absolutely loves them!  No outside noise at all and great quality!!!
p323
aVI didnt buy these from amazon, but i really, really dont like these headsets. I loved the original beats solos, but the ear cushions are the worst. They are very unconformable and hurt after like 5 minutes of usage. definitely returning and getting a better product
p324
aVReally impressed with the quality of sound with these headphones. I'm hearing parts of songs that I didn't even know existed prior to the use of these headphones.  The color is better then what I had imagined.  All in all I would recommend this product for anyone.
p325
aVIt was after six months that one of the headphones died. I was using it one day and the right head just went quiet. This will be my second pair of beats after the firsts audio became disconnected. Would not recommend to first time buyers. look into something else
p326
aVPurchased both for daughters. The originals were very poor sound quality but all she cared about was the pink!  :)Purchased these for daughter 2. What a difference. There are better but these will satisfy all but the most discriminating (me) listener.
p327
aVThese were given as a Christmas gift and now  only one side works. I have tried with a new cable and different devices. The last day to return was Jan 31. What a major disappointment. I now have a broken pair of Beats and a broken-hearted teenage daughter.
p328
aVI really love the color I actually bought him because I have the red pair the only thing that I wished if that they were a little bit louder and overtime F they're on your ears too long they will get a little irritated but besides that they're good to go
p329
aVI wear these to the gym exclusively. They stay put and are comfortable for the 90 minutes there. They fold nicely into Beats soft case. The sound is very good, especially songs with a lot of beat. They are what I was looking for and would buy them again.
p330
aVI bought these as a gift for my husband. He was super surprised and loves them!! They are great!! They're really loud, like surround sound and perfectly toned if that makes sense. They only con is that the ears get pretty sweaty during gym workouts.
p331
aVIt was good but it never said it came in a good case and i did not need to purchase item below.  The Bluecell protection case was a waste as it came in one.  I don,t know where to return it  Please give me credit for it as i don't want or need it.
p332
aVHad them for four months. The case on the remoteTalk accessory fell off; the beats logo on the end of the cord fell off as well. To top it off, today I had them resting around my neck, and when I took them off, the right ear just snapped off.
p333
aVFrom the packaging to the headphones themselves, Beats delivers impeccable quality. Many may be persuaded by the price to opt for a more inexpensive option but they are definitely worth every dime. The sound quality is undeniably amazing.
p334
aVMy daughter uses her beats daily to listen to her music because my taste in music is very different from hers and basically I don't like listening to her music :)..The quality of the materials seems great and the speakers sound AWESOME!!
p335
aVNot for audiophiles. Sound is way too thick and mushy. For less money the Sony MDR7506 have much better dynamic range and sound quality. Construction also seems cheap and not durable. Ear pads are much too small for comfortable wearing.
p336
aVExperienced  common defect with 1st pair having no sound right cup, had to return for replacement. After reading so many reviews with same problem, I expected better quality assurance before shipping.  Gift for daughter she enjoys them.
p337
aVThese headphones are way too tight for an adult head, and I have a smallish head. After 60 mins at the gym my ears were red and throbbing from the pressure. They were very cute, but no way I can keep $200 headphones that hurt that bad.
p338
aVReally techie-looking. I was quite reluctant at first on getting this color because well, I'm not careful with things like this but then I'd better step up my plate and take care of this one. Nice sounds and real-time quality. Awesome!
p339
aVItem received way before when needed.Xmas family get-together is scheduled in early January. Gift is for granddaughter in another state.Haven't given to her yet. Was on her Xmas gift list. I'm sure she will love the item.
p340
aVPoor quality. Worked for only three weeks, then one side went dead.My grandson wanted them for Christmas because they are "cool". Cool factor aside, better performance and reliability can be had for twenty bucks.
p341
aVAllow me to preface by saying that I have always had difficulty exhibiting a style that is my own. That being said, I absolutely LOVE these headphones. I get so many compliments from people telling me how original I am sitting at Starbucks listening to Justin Bieber on my Macbook, sporting a geographically relevant flat-brim hat (turned 30 degrees to the left because society can't tell me what to do) while pretending to simultaneously text friends that I don't have on the latest iPhone and putting the final touches on some Garage Band beat I've created that now qualifies me to refer to myself as a fledgling hip-hop artist... a diamond in the rough, if you will. I don't know where I'd be or, truthfully, who I'd be if I didn't have others to tell me what to eat, think, feel, wear and listen to. I can't thank the good people at Beats enough for making an insecure, unoriginal sheep like myself force me to turn my pockets inside out in order to make me feel like I finally fit in. Five stars, hands down, unless of course you happen to disagree... in which case I recant that statement and find them to be just as awful as you do. If you have no mind of your own and happen to be a chronic and pathological people pleaser (alliteration is so original, like totes everyone is doing it), then these are most certainly the headphones for you!
p342
aVMy son has had his Beats for less than a year and they literally snapped in half when he was placing them on his head, unfortunately we are well beyond the return window\u2026..this product should have lasted much longer than 11 months.
p343
aVThe Beats headphones are very good.  Why our son has gone through (now) three sets of these is beyond me but ... he has.He uses these while travelling with his college baseball team.  Apparently that is the thing to do.
p344
aVI ordered this in October for my daughters Christmas. She was so excited....but to our dismay, when she attempted to use them they didn't work!! Now I have a crying teenager and no return/replace options!! DO NOT BUY!!! RIPOFF!!!
p345
aVThese are cheaply made and over priced. My daughters fell apart. Just a fad product for teenagers. They don't hold up. Expensive piece of junk. Beats does not stand behind them and I had to fight to get hers repaired. Stay away.
p346
aVAwesome the beats by Dee were alright and I compared them with my beats by Dre studio ones which was 500 since Dre sold the company to Apple I got new beats solos 2 for 139 and they sound way better you could hear the difference
p347
aVBought it as a gift for my daughter and her iPod (4th generation).  Works great adn sounds awsome.  I tried it on my iPhone 4s and one side did not work - dead.  Not sure why - but as long as it worked on the iPod we were happy.
p348
aVBought these for my teenage son for Christmas.  He wears them nonstop and they're pretty soundproof.  The sound is crisp and the bass is kickin'!  May have to buy the girly pink pair for myself.  Only complaint is the price.
p349
aVThe sound is phenomenal.  Lightweight and works great.  The fold fairly small and into a nice case.  I got them for my wife (hence the color) but I use them more!  You can get the wireless version but was happy with wired.
p350
aVSound was messed up within a month .... where only the sound comes from 1 side when plugged into the Mac Book Pro .... and doesn't work at all with the portable DVD player.  Too expensive to have things like this happen.
p351
aVI've had a problem getting quality first time BEATs purchases of late.  2 times in a row they didn't work out of the box.  After a few returns we now have a good working pair and they are great.  Very good sound quality.
p352
aVAlthough I sport a different pair of cans, I always admire and envy Beats users. The sound quality of their headphones is unmatched. It also doesn't hurt if the company and brand carrying the headphone is a renowned one.
p353
aVWould've been nice to know headphones did not come with the cord to head phones to the audio device. Had an extra cord laying around, so I was able to use the headphones. Def would of gave this a 5 if properly informed.
p354
aVDefinitely not worth the money.... I expected these to have exceptional bass... But they don't sound any better than the ear buds that came with my iPhone... They also suck for working out cuz they make your ears sweat
p355
aVWhen the headphones were working the sound was great. I bought these on Jan 7th 2015 and for the last two weeks the right side no longer works. I paid $179 and you would expect this to be flawless but nope it's junk.
p356
aVI was disappointed in this product. I purchased these less then a year ago and 4 months after we got them " seriously only used maybe 7 times lightly and the rubber seem started to split. I feel so ripped up!!!!
p357
aVMy son loves these but one of the speakers stopped working after just 6 weeks.  Luckily the company, Beats not Amazon, is going to replace them. I wish they offered an extended warranty.  I wouldn't buy these again.
p358
aVI'm a previous owner of the Beats Solo HD, I had those for two years until somehow my sister ended up with them. I bought these because I caught them at a lower price for $150 and I had a amazon gift card. I wasn't a major fan of my previous beats because they had an awesome sound level but the sound leaked too much. I'm a person that likes to listen to music when I study but I had to have my volume at the lowest because the person next to me could hear the song as if they were listening to it.With these headphones, no problem at all, the sound leak is a lot better, I had my volume level on at about mid range and it could not be heard by anyone around me. These headphones are also a lot more comfortable, it's a tight fit but its comfortable because they aren't too loose. The look is more polished and shiner compared to the solo HD and they feel more sturdier. If you're a person that likes to blast their music at an all time high, these are for you. The sound level is a lot more balanced, the bass doesn't overpower the lyrics and there is a lot more clarity.Overall, I'm much more happier with these headphones then I was with my previous pair, my sister defiantly won't be getting her hands on these!
p359
aVMy son hasn't taken these off since he got them for Christmas except to go to school. We talk to him using hand signals now. Don't tell him I sometimes sneak and use them while he's at school. Now Mom wants a set!
p360
aVBought this for my son.  It only works on the computer or Ipad.  To use this to listen music on the phone you have to keep the button depressed.  My son loves listening to music on the phone.  WHat's up with that?
p361
aVI had mine for two months and i was in love with them, excellent sound quality. 100x better than the original solos. Last week my right speaker stopped working for some reason. Ive only had them two months though.
p362
aVI love itVery new this is not look like usedThis is very new with everything cameI recommended this to my brother and he said that this is a great and he only said that he going to buy it too...
p363
aVEverything about these headphones is quality including the box they come in!  I primarily listen to rock, blues, and jazz and these sound amazing from rich bass to clear sizzling highs.  I'm a long time headphone listener, wish they made these back in the 70's!  I have nothing in their class to compare them to, but have been using AKG and Sony on-ears for a long time.  They fit snug but comfortable even after listening/wearing for over an hour.  They look wonderful and are very sleek and stylish.  I won't repeat all of the features cited in other reviews, but I am overjoyed with this purchase.  I can't imagine why anyone would be dissatisfied with Beats Solo 2.0!
p364
aVThese are terrible and do not work!!! This is the second time within a week we have made an order for headphones due to them not working, almost $250 later and we will never ever ever order ANY electronic again.
p365
aVMy son loves the Beats Solo 2 Wired On-Ear Headphones.They are great at the noise canceling, and he can clearly hear what he is listening to without interruption.Excellent purchase, at a great price.
p366
aVAfter less than a month the left speaker has quit working so they're pretty much junk now. These replaced a six month old set that also quit working. Forget beats stick with Bose or any other reputable company.
p367
aVI purchased beats solo2 online from Target during Thanksgiving sale for just 96 USD and this is amazing headphone , build quality is superb and YES! SOUND IS ROCKING !! You can't go wrong with this headphone...
p368
aVThe beats solo 2 are very good and the sound quality is excellent. Bring someone who is used to listening to regular apple headphones these are a great upgrade and should be a pickup for anyone who loves music.
p369
aVGave this to my 24 year old for Christmas, and she loves it!  The sound is rich, the product seems sturdy enough.  I hope it has a good life, as the several years ago the Beats product received poor reviews.
p370
aVBought these for our teenage son for Xmas and he loves them. Some of the best music sound I've ever heard from headphones. He loves the sleek design and the durability in how they're made. Highly recommend!
p371
aVI bought this product for christmas and didn't work. Something is wrong with the cable connection, only works one of the headphones. According to the return policy of Amazon, I can not return the product.
p372
aVBought twice had to return only 1 side worked same thing happened never heard back for 2nd return contacted beats going through them now hopefully to get a working pair very un happy because not cheap :(
p373
aVbut they are beautiful and also, it didn't work on the right side for me I just spun the wire a tiny bit and ever since then it worked perfectly. I love the shade of bluish grey they have its perfect. \U0001f60d
p374
aVPerfect for my teenager, exactly what they wanted and using them daily. Great price too, much cheaper than direct from box store. The sound quality is really great, thinking of getting a pair for travel.
p375
aVThey exceeded my expectations. The sound quality is lacking, but I bought them for the name and looks. Also, they get kind of uncomfortable after long periods of use. Overall, decent pair of headphones.
p376
aVThese headphones are really nice as they block out noise extremely well and replicates studio-like sound. Solo 1 was epic but this just blows its predecessor out of the water. Value for your money, too.
p377
aVDon't purchase if you wear glasses! These headphones are a little on the heavy side and they press my glasses into my ears which gives me a terrible headache after a few minutes. I ended up returning them and getting "Bose over the ear headphones.
p378
aVAlthough they hurt my ears leaving them in after a couple hours, the sound quality is amazing! After upgrading from the urbeats, I wasn't expecting such great sound quality but I was wrong! Love these!
p379
aVJust snagged a pair of the Solo2's to replace my old Solos. A big step up beats. Well played. The sound on these is crazy good. Super light weight and comfortable. Definitely recommend picked up a pair
p380
aVDefinitely better than the solo 1. Love them. Great sound quality. I've heard there are better headphones out there for that price, but I haven't found them yet so until them im sticking with my beats.
p381
aV2 pair of these and still only hearing sound out of the left side :( Tried reconnecting both plug in's- no difference. Disappointed to say the least in what is supposed to be such a well known brand.
p382
aVPurchased these for my daughter as a Christmas gift.  She really loves them, very comfortable and good sound quality.  Been a few months now with heavy use and they appear to be holding up very well.
p383
aVThe beats are great I rate it a five just the mic didn't work. But I emailed them about that.Hopefully I can just change the wire cause my daughter put her decals on it you know how teenagers are.\U0001f60a
p384
aVThe headphones do not come in well in the right earlobe. Left earlobe is fine, but it's missing that full sound you would expect. Either it's a just w faulty headphone or they just aren't that good.
p385
aVWhen i received this item i was more than happy To find out it arrived a day early, when i plugged them in my phone only one side played and was really disapointed. Wasted time and shipping money.
p386
aVBought these for my wife for birthday gift 09-15 she used maybe 6 times they are still like brand new and only one speaker works. Spent all that money very disappointed. return policy out of date!
p387
aVThe quality is good, but one side of the headphones is not working and the cover of the ear muff is coming off. This is after six months of use. If you still decide to buy it, purchase a warranty.
p388
aVTerrible  earphone came broken link ask for a second one to be send to me and the second one was also broken  . Very bad product . At the end amazon return my money back  . Don't buy this product
p389
aVI got these for my boyfriend as a birthday present and they are better than expected. They play well are very comfortable and this color was cheaper than the rest by like $60 and looks very good.
p390
aVGreat sound quality, however they feel very tight when you put on. Also the gray color is more like a light blue. I really wanted more of a gray shade. If I was to go back I would get stone gray.
p391
aVThis is one of the best pair of headphones that I've owned! Their sound quality is good, but their feel and the way they fit is the best part of these things!! Will never regret this purchase!!
p392
aVI love my Beats Solo 2's. They're great when you want to get into the music, but don't want to have to crank the volume up that high. Only thing is that they could be a little more comfortable.
p393
aVA very lightweight and smooth headphone model from the people that revived the headphone genre. It's a great listening tool that carries both quality sound and construction wherever you may go.
p394
aVThe headphones were a birthday gift for my 13 year old granddaughter and she is absolutely thrilled with them.  She said the quality in both the product and the sound exceeded her expections.
p395
aVGreat but i don't care for the beats after hearing the quality, it's really good but not worth more than $50 I believe. Won't be buying Dre products any longer, nothing to do with this seller
p396
aVReturned, diappointed for the price. MAybe I just got a bad pair but to me not worth the money. Not as clear as I hoped speaker went in and out, and continuously had to play with the wires.
p397
aVWill never buy beats again ,bought two of them one lasted 3 months and the other one lasted 5 months and of course cannot return or fix it, will not waste 400.00 on pieces of craps again!!
p398
aVbought these for my wife. She loves them. Great sound, very high quality headphones. Ultra fast shipping thru Amazon Prime. delivered on a Federal holiday. That is five stars in it's self.
p399
aVSound quality and finishing are amazing. Although it doesn't offer some features such as noise canceling and wireless, some in my opinion are important to a headphone at this price range.
p400
aVReceived the product for my son for Christmas, when he opened it, it was broken.  Called, returned it and got a new one.  Would have given 5 stars if not for the initial broken purchase.
p401
aVThese are nice and all but they are really tight. I don't even have a big head and I've had other people try them on and they say the same thing. Hurts my ears after awhile wearing them.
p402
aVBought these in october and gave them to my boyfriend for christmas and just now found out that one side is broken and no sound comes out. The return window is closed. :/ waste of money
p403
aVThis item is as great as the reviews state. The sound is crisp and clear. The seller got my package to me 2 days ahead of schedule! These fold and come with a carry case for protection.
p404
aVMy son received the headphones for Christmas.  Only one headphone worked properly.  The other headphone would sporadically play.  Very disappointed in the quality for the price you pay.
p405
aVTerrible. Waste of money. Bought this product for my son. After the return date (30 days) the right earphone didn't work after (35 day). I can't return so we are out of $150. Bad deal.
p406
aVI bought it on November 15. Right now are broken. Are too expensive for that quality. Sound isn`t as deep as with another brands. Really unconfortable in my head. Such a disappointment
p407
aVI ordered this for my husband for Christmas and they got a shortage in one ear in may and now the other ear stopped working I am very disappointed in this product for the money I paid.
p408
aVThe product was everything I had expected the headphones were real not fakes the sound is really good, I'm very happy with the overall quality of the item and the shipping of the item.
p409
aVcame new but when i open it you can tell it was used, also the left ear does not work, it was a gift for someone and now i look so dumb, ended up going to best buy and buying it there
p410
aVI was debating buying these for a while. I;m glad I did! The quality is actually great and I think they look so nice. A bit overpriced but that's what happens when you go name brand.
p411
aVMy grandsone, age 15, received these for his birthday.  He is in band and has a good ear for good sound.  He has been enjoying these emensely.  Says the sound has excellent quality.
p412
aVPurchased for my son who uses  them incessantly with  his IPod.  He states that the sound quality is "awesome" as they deafen any exterior noise.  Loves them for gaming too.
p413
aVBought them for my girlfriend. I think i wear them more than her. And she loves them. Glad i purchased them on here. Much cheaper. Great quality headphones and not cheap plastic.
p414
aVi got this for my girlfriend for valentines day and she love these pair of cans, she don't care about sound quality but these blew her mind compared to the earbuds she is use to,
p415
aVCame in the mail very fast, had everything packaged brand new. The color is super unique, so my 18 year old brother felt even "cooler" to have these. Definitely worth it!
p416
aVthe price for these is crazy but I love these. I like to be able to put on headphones and not hear anything around me and this is the first pair that actually lets that happen.
p417
aVI do not like this product. I got 2 pairs both had the same problem right ear stops playing Beats have a really good support center got my 2nd pair 3 days after 1st pair broke
p418
aVI've only had them for seven months and for about four or five months they were working wonderful and then one side just stopped working. I feel like it was a waste of money.
p419
aVMy 13 year old daughter loves these.  I borrow them when I walk or in the car on a trip.  I will eventually purchase some for myself.  These are expensive but they work well.
p420
aVThese beats are so pretty. The color blue looks really good. My 9 yr old daughter loves them. We received them very fast and in new condition. Would order from seller again.
p421
aVI'm sure people will crap all over these because they're Beats...it is what it is. I'm no self-professed audiophile. I'm just a regular guy that loves music and these headphones sound great to me. It's my first pair of Beats, so I can't compare them to earlier models. I don't personally feel the bass is overpowering, overbearing, over-anything at all. Unless you troll internet forums knocking everything that's trendy, these will sound great to you too. There's a litany of headphone choices out there and it's difficult to identify every single option, let alone try them and make a determination as to what's best for you. Beats is an easily recognizable, albeit expensive brand to choose. Sound is important, as are looks. While both are very subjective areas, I believe the Solo 2's are solid in each department. Are there less expensive alternatives that sound just as good? Sure. We got it, internet: Message received.For me personally, my only complaint is that they're relatively tight. I'd recommend trying them out in person if at all possible. I plan on keeping them for a bit to see if I (or they) adjust. 4 stars, when I'd prefer to give 4.5.
p422
aVAs anyone buying beats should know they do not have the best sound. You are paying for a brand and an attractive pair of headphones. I got what I expected and am satisfied.
p423
aVpurchased headphones for christmas as a gift, did not work right out of the box..... very dissappointed that i had to pay for return postage on an item that did not work.
p424
aVOnly one side works. I have to send them back and get replaced tomorrow! My son is very upset about it. A lot of money spent on something that isn't working all the way.Updated review - second pair had the same issue so we're sending them back AGAIN!! We tried various devices thinking it must be his phone since this was a second pair, but they still didn't work. They DID work if we taped town the switch on the cord, but I shouldn't have to tape it down when I've paid that much money for a pair of headphones.I should note, Amazon has been awesome with the returns. They are amazing and I love shopping with them.
p425
aVI bought these for my son's birthday and he loves them.  The sound quality is good and they seem durable.  He has had them for two months and there have been no issues.
p426
aVMy Friend's kid is in love with them!! She never stops wearing them and it has really made her father happy not having to hear the same song played over and over. lol
p427
aVI think these headphones are really good quality! I love how they sound. :) I love the fit and love  that u can adjust the headphones so they can fit comfortably. \U0001f604
p428
aVI got these at best buy and they failed with light use after 3 months. Now I found out via YouTube  how poorly constructed they are.  Invest in something that lasts.
p429
aVI would rate 0 if I could they broke in the right  ear n ok sound will play apple refuses to fix them for me even though there is no physical damage or water damage.
p430
aVI bought these items as a gift.  My cousin absolutely loves them!  She says they are super comfortable and have great sound quality.  Item was shipped very quickly.
p431
aVI have had this item for several months now. Thus far, they have great sound quality. I find that the cord is a nuisance but not enough to discontinue using them.
p432
aVLoved the way the music sounded until 3 months later; the audio went out in the right ear.  Apple does offer a year warranty and is currently resolving the issue.
p433
aVMy workouts have gone to a whole nother level since I got these. Just get a pair. If you love to listen to music, you'll like them, believe me. They are worth it.
p434
aVGot these for my son 8 months ago. Never has a pair lasted more than a month for him. They are still going and almost never come off his head! 100% recommended.
p435
aVGreat gift for my 10 year old daughter .., they loom better than in the picture .. My daughter is loving them, she was so happy when she got them in the mail.,
p436
aVNice feel on your head, the covience to lower volume and answer phone is great. Sound quality great but I have to say I Bose head phones is still my #1 choice.
p437
aVGreat for the gym they stay on and are way more comfortable thann those ones you insert or hang on your ears. Sounds is awesome.  the mic wells very well also.
p438
aVGood sound but too tight on my ears, so after few minutes of usage I feel my ears are hurting, so I can't give a 5. But the sound, the base are excellent.
p439
aVIt is amazing. When you open the packing You know you get something good! I was really happy with the price also. It comes with a case. Got A+ from me :)
p440
aVThe sound neat but the cir is pretty flimsy it broke on one of the ends the same week we received itI give 2 stars to sound and 1 to material
p441
aVBuyer Beware!!!!!!!!The Headband is very poorly designed and  breaks easily.  Replacement parts are not sold by manufacturer and there are no otherupper headband parts for the Beats Solo2 model available on amazon or ebay.My 7th grader purchased these with his X-mas money only to have them break right at the left hinge the first day he wore them to school.For $200 headphones you would expect better durability.  The rigidity of the plastic used in the headband combined with the poor mechanical design of these is truly disgusting.I strongly recommend you look at other vendors such as SOL Republic or SMS by Fifty for similar bass heavy urban headphones.The SOL Republic headbands are virtually indestructible and are readily available from manufacturer.
p442
aVAll I can say is there are amazing you must just at least go try some on in a store to hear what perfection sounds like even if you don't buy
p443
aVPurchased as a gift for my son and he loves them.  I can no longer hear his music as I could when he used earbuds so I love them too.
p444
aVThe title says it all. It is an on-ear version of the Beats Studio with better sound quality. The cushions are amazing as well. These are by far the most comfortable on-ear headphones I have ever worn. Very solid and do not feel like they will be breaking anytime soon. I am very happy that I held out on Beats until these came out. I have tested out my friend's solo HD. They are nice but not nearly as high quality as these. Not too bass-heavy but still pack a punch when bass is needed. Love them and would totally recommend them. Way to bounce back and recover Beats
p445
aVThese headphones are hands down the best I have ever had, and honestly the music sounds so good with a perfect balance of bass, mids, and highs that I could not possibly imagine anyone creating anything that sounds better.  Completely worth the $200 without thinking twice!  I am not a believe the hype guy, but I am so happy I bought these.  I love hip hop and rap, and these headphones are perfect for that kind of music.  Oh, and I was listening to some Dubstep and these headphones blew my mind.  Don't settle for a good pair of headphones when you can buy the best at just a little bit higher of a price.  Trust me on this one.
p446
aVSUPER SUPER GREAT! I love it.....fantastic sound. it would be nice to have two cords just in case one gets damaged. I've purchased 2, pink and purple and they are absolutely AWESOME!
p447
aVI bought this for my friend as a birthday gift. I was being attracted by the colors at first. There are many different color you can choose in this headphones. Since I plant to send this gift to a girl, so I picked pink. It looks the exactly the same like the picture shows. obviously, it is smaller than the other style of beats headphones, like beats pro and beats studio. Beats solo is much better for a girl. no doubt, the quality of beats' headphone is really excellent. I just love it, I may purchase one more for myself.
p448
aVJust purchased this pink pair of Beats Solo 2.0. I was nervous to spend so much on a pair of headphones, but the sound quality is great. Clear and crisp sound, comfortable ear cuffs, and a wonderful discounted price. I'm impressed with these headphones. I have tried the original beats before and they seem flimsy, but these are sturdy. The only issue I could find is the color is not as bright pink as the picture. They area darker pink, but the color is beautiful. Overall, great purchase!
p449
aVSennheiser Momentums sound better and are made of high quality materials. This is very cheap plasticy garbage. The Momentums have better clarity, bass control, and soundstage. These are cheaply made with no real leather or metal headband like the Momentums. This advertising is brainwashing, stay away from Beats.
p450
aVI'm no audio junkie but I found these headphones to be great. The headphones were smaller than I expected but I'm glad they are since the normal beats size headphones look too large on me. The sound is great and it does have some amount of noise cancellation because I can't a word people are saying unless they're screaming at me! I'm using this with my Itouch as it says they are made for iOS products in mind but I'm sure you can use Android on these since it's just AUX cord.
p451
aVMy older son purchased a pair of these.  The sound quality is amazing.  A nice mix of bass and treble let's you kick back and simply enjoy.  It's also a nice change for earbuds.  Very comfortable and don't make your head hurt even if you where them for a few hours.  They fit a variety of head sized as well and have not become stretched out or too lose.
p452
aVThese were definitely my favorite style/model of headphone by SkullCandy. Sad to see that they have been discontinued :( I had my last pair for a good 4 years before my son snapped an earpiece. The one thing I might upgrade in regards to this product is wireless capability. I would still purchase this pair over a newer wireless pair though. Thanks for such high quality products, SkullCandy!
p453
aVI ordered these as a gift for my brother because he produces music and is a huge miami heat fan. I figured what a great way to combine both of the things that he loves sports and music. He used them when producing beats. My brother indicated that he loved thie sound quality of them, however he didn't use them that often as he obtained so better quality studio headphones. Overall I would say due to my brother liking them I will give them four stars. They are a decent set of headphones, not high quality though. I would recommend them to anyone looking for headphones on a budget or just something temporarily.
p454
aVI purchased this as a gift for Christmas. My cousin loved it! Great price for a great product. We tested it out and it worked great. It is cushiony and comfortable to wear. He uses it all the time! I also like the color compared to the others (easy to match with outfits). It doesn't look or feel cheap. Great for the price. I would definitely recommend!
p455
aVI bought these as a gift but they looked pretty well built and substantial. The item felt fairly heavy in the packaging so I'm not sure how comfortable it would be to wear it for longer periods of time.
p456
aVMy teen son likes these headphones.  Sound is good and the discontinued price was great.  Good for a child or someone on a budget.  Padded headband was comfortable.
p457
aVI remember when I use to have a pair like this five years ago, but I don't remember them shattering within a week. The extensions for the headphones broke after 1 week of usage.
p458
aVThese amare knicks headphones have a quality build and feel but for actual use disappointed me quite a bit. For one the sound was ok not amazing and I found my self having ear pain in just 10-15 minutes of use. I am a 6 foot 3 230 pound male with a large head the headphones barely cut it for my head size and large ear size.
p459
aVThese headphones are great.  The cuff over the ear blocks out the noise and keeps the music in nicely.  The color and style are as pictured.  These work great and the cord is sturdy when taking it in and out.  Great product.  I gave it a 4 of 5 because there was an older rasta style I was looking for that they no longer carry.
p460
aVgreat for the price! bought under used item saved some $. the only thing is it does not have a volume control. But otherwise pleased with my headsets by Jay-Z. Great on the bass very cushioned on the ears really comfy love it. I am from New York and we all know the knicks is nothing to brag about but New York City sure is!!!
p461
aVThe sound that the skullcandy's produce is fine, but the production quality is very poor. Between myself and 3 boys we have owned several pair of skullcandy headphones and they have all broken. Stick with sennheiser the quality is much better.
p462
aVThis product lasted for about a year before the sound went out in one side. Im keeping 5 stars because skullcandy willingly replaced these headphones with another set. Great sound quality. Would purchase again.
p463
aVLove them they sound really great, and I have them since 2012 and they still sound as good as the first day, this is one of the best purchases I have ever done :)
p464
aVThese are decent quality headphones that are affordable. They are not noise cancelling. The plastic head adjustment broke after a 18 months, and the ear pads are pealing near the outer crimp.
p465
aVThese headphones lasted me such a long time! it was sad when the wire messed up one of the speakers in the ear and one side was out. It has been 3 years since ive had these and nothing happened! the sound is loud and covers the full ear. play option on the line itself also.
p466
aVi liked these a lot when i first got them. then a little on down the road, they started breaking around the extension piece from putting them on my head. theyre cheap and flimsy feeling, and not durable at all, like most of candy's stuff, but they do look cool. theyre not comfortable to wear from an extensive amount of time. (after 15 minutes, your ears start to get sore) they came in perfect condition from the seller, so its not their fault that these broke like they did.
p467
aVI have owned these headphones for nearly a year now and thought I could finally put my opinion on them for the public. My initial impression of these headphones was "these headphones have way less bass response than say, my pair of beats" - which I no longer own. They do, and if subwoofer range bass is your cup of tea, then a pair of overpriced beats may be the headphones for you. These headphones are very balanced in their approach. Discerning ears may be able to hear or notice that they may have too much treble response, which can sometimes be slightly shrill, but in this price range - there is some legitimate give and take as to what you get. These headphones are extremely durable - my dog got ahold of them one day and pulled the ear piece off the headphone itself and it slipped right back on a lot easier than I expected. I travel with them quite often and they are in my suitcase and they have held up to the test of time. I took a full star off due to the treble being slightly shrill at times and the fact that if you are a warm blooded person they can heat up your ears and cause some uncomfortable experiences. As I said, I sold my beats headphones after finding these. I am sure there are better headphones out there (Sennheisers, etc) - but as far as performance, stylish design and everyday wear and tear - these are practically unbeatable in this price range.
p468
aVPlease save your money. The sound quality is good on the headphones,however they are poorly made. This is the second pair of Skullcandy Hesh Headphones I had purchased that cracked. The adjustable headset is poorly made. I promise you will only get 6 months out of these headphones, which is a bad investment.
p469
aVReally recommend these headphones. Durable, noise cancelling and straight out badass.The only problem I have with it is after a while the small ear muffs hurt your ears, and also that is has a non-removoble cord so if its shot, the headphones are done.
p470
aVGreat headphones, fantastic sound and they cover your entire ear so they block out most other sounds (i use them when i mow the lawn.) Plus they're comfortable and stylish, i would go with these as opposed to the ridiculously overpriced beats.
p471
aVThis is probably the best head phones for the money that u can get, stylish, durable and with an incredible sound and bass, I had these since 2012 and they have been through a lot, countless 8 mile runs, a 9 month deployment in Afghanistan,I throw them every where, I sit on them some times n they r still  sounding like new. Although they don't look like new anymore but that is because I basically beat them up. If u r a looking for a great pare of headphones that are durable, good looking, sound amazing at a reasonable price well these are it.
p472
aVi bout this item new first time i used dint work only one side work  to bad that the police for exchanged to short i wish there were i consideration for the seller n exchang the item i dont want the money just one that work.
p473
aVI had these for about a year now. They broke not that long ago. Maybe like 3 months ago. I was really sad that they broke. My dog kinda broke them. Nut they were really great. They were just really good headphones and I really loved them. The price is worth it. If I had the money, I would have bought it right now. I unfortunately wasted all my money at the strip club and I'm broke. But you should buy it! Aye buy me one while ur at it bro
p474
aVSo I've had these for a little over a year and they are great, next best thing to actually buying noise canceling. One word of advice though... Check out some place like Ross or Marshalls first, as I got this exact pair for $12 in a discount bin. They are great headphone, just do a little looking and don't spend $150 on them.
p475
aVThe sound quality, The microphone, The comfortable fit. & The design. It's a great buy for the price it is. The value in the qaulity out weighs the price you spend.
p476
aVIt just hurts your ears like anything. The sound quality is decent to well below average. Poor noise cancellation. When I'm riding the bus, the whole of bus listens to what I'm hearing to. The material is sturdy, though.
p477
aVI love Dwayne Wade, but this is just degrading regardless of the representation as a headphone. What it says isnt all true about the thing, bit it does at least transfer the song
p478
aVI bought these mostly based on price and the microphone and somewhat on reviews.  They seem to work OK, but I find the round over-the-ear design doesn't fit my ears very well (they're more oval ;) and the clamping force is pretty high, although not terribly so.  I only gave them 2 stars because from the very first they sounded "muddy" to me.  They play plenty loud and have plenty of bass, but the sound is just muffled, or something.  I have other inexpensive headphones that sound better to me, so I wouldn't go with these again.  I should note that I have mostly used them with an adapter cable to plug them into my computer(s), so it's possible that the adapter could be causing the bad sound, but I did plug them directly into an Android tablet with similar results, so I don't think it is the adapter.
p479
aVgreat quality headphone's.  my 6 and 8 year grandson's loved them.  easy to adjust.  they used them on the computer, and there tablets.  he loves monkey and he's a bit devilish.  i loved how the headphones state on top "be good tomorrow"  the only thing i would change is make the cable on the headphones 2 foot longer.
p480
aVWas a pretty good purchase. Although, it didn't have much bass. Part of this is my phone, but not all of it. In other words not the best bass but sounds great otherwise.
p481
aVOur son is a huge NBA fan and he loves these headphones!  He uses them all the time in the car to listen to movies he likes on the DVD players we purchased as well.
p482
aVHead phones look just like the picture, but they do not last. I used them frequently while traveling and it slowly started coming apart. the foam over the ears and where they connect with the plastic comes out easily. Was okay while they lasted.
p483
aVI bought these for my teen and he hasn't complained yet. They do not have the wireless effect that other do so the cord does not detach. I wish I would have known since the others have a detachable cord with a mic for your phone.
p484
aVI went through two pairs of these in one year because they both got shorts in the cord. they also both broke right above the earpad, but I could still use them after duct taping them. (they both broke within a month of owning them, not because I stepped on them or anything. I had to adjust them so they wouldn't hurt my head, and they broke from that, which is kind of ridiculous. they really shouldn't have been that easy to break.) Basically, they're really painful to wear for more than half an hour.the sound quality is decent, but it doesn't make up for everything else.I think the only positive thing I can say about them is that they're pretty, and the name is amusing.
p485
aVI bought these for my son after seeing a lot of guidance about hearing impairment with ear buds. From the sixteen-year-old: "Awesome sound quality, cool design, a thousand times better than earbuds."
p486
aVThe headphone is made for small ears or small heads.  It sits on part of the ear and hurts after 30 minutes to one hour.  However, it does produce a decent sound.
p487
aVHaven't heard this rich full sound in over 20 years on huge headphones!  Truly incredible.  We paid under $30 for a pair without a box, but worth so much more.  Just incredible.
p488
aVI got this in March. I didn't like it at first because it wasn't very comfortable and it rested on my jaw hinges, but I kind of got used to it. The sound quality is good, but nothing to boast about. After a road trip, I fond the right ear of the headphone detached and now pretty much unusable. I'm not sure how this happened, but I'm sure not buying this again.
p489
aVthey are nice headphones but however the more u adjust the size for you head the side of the headphones start to crack my son had thease less then a year and they broke off the head band
p490
aVAfter three weeks my Skull headphones broke off in my IPOD. Best Buy refuses to do anything about it and they are so stuck the Apple Store could not do anything about it. So a pair of $40 headphones is now costing me a brand new 250 iPod. Never again will I purchase!!!!!!
p491
aVMy son keeps saying how great his tunes sound with these headphones, and he loves the fit and thinks they are comfortable.  And of course the Thunder theme makes them awesome!
p492
aVThe third set I've bought, but only because my son stole my first pair and my second pair got torn apart in a move.  I am allergic to Latex and cannot use ear buds and I also have a hearing problem, so my needs are different than most people.  Depending on my work schedule, I have been known to wear these for 8hrs while entering data and experience little to no discomfort.  I also do not have to turn up the volume very loud anymore, saving my already damaged hearing. I can also hear for the first time minute details in movies (ghost noises in my paranormal shows!) and the sweetest notes of Vivaldi's concertos. Pure bliss! And let's not forget how AWESOME they look!!  Everybody giggles and comments on the devil monkey and "Be Good Tomorrow" stitched along the top.  Totally me!!If you are looking at more expensive headphones, I would seriously consider these or any other Skullcandy cans first.  The quality and customer service (Lifetime replacement) cannot be beat!
p493
aVFound these when just browsing for headphones. They are a great buy and love them.  I love the sound quality and cancellation of background noise. Plus the price was excellent for what these headphones actually retail normally.
p494
aVIf you have gauges, these will hurt your ears. If your ears stick out even a little bit, these will hurt your ears :'( i have 16mm gauges and cannot use these for long periods of time otherwise my ears start throbbing. It feels like they're squishing my ears into my skull. At this point, I prefer Apple's crappy earbuds and if I cant find those, I'll wear these around my neck but it's not comfortable so it doesn't last long. I've had them for a year and continue to try to use them but it always fails so they just sit in a box for the most part :( sucks because i love these so much and really dont want to buy a new pair of headphones.
p495
aVBroke after a few months.  We sent them back to skull candy following their online return policy about 18 months ago and have heard nothing from them.  They claim they will replace the headphones if a speaker quits working but they haven't.  My son now has Beats headphones - they are awesome.
p496
aVI bought a pair of these headphones, a different design, but the same headphones. I bought them through Hastings about 2 years ago, and I'm still using them today. Best headphones I've ever had.
p497
aVFirst of all, these are Skullcandy and they do sound good. The bass sound is excellent , but the overall sound isn't loud enough. They make me want to increase the gain on every Mp3 I own. Now, just hold on a second, because these are fairly loud. My ears aren't ringing after listening to music through theses headphones. I bought these used and I always expect some problems, but I had to completely rewire these headphones. The headphones started making fluttering sounds and I know they were shorting out. They now work just as good as new. These headphones are just okay and don't regret buying them, I just wish they were about 3 notches louder.
p498
aVAfter 1 week of use, it already broke.  Both ear pieces disconnected from the head band.  I paid more for this thinking that it would be more durable.  I bought a $38 one of the same brand which lasted longer.
p499
aVI love these headphones. I've had a little extra money lately and I thought I would treat myself. Since I had recently broken my old in-ear headphones I wanted something nice. These were a good price for what I got. The sound quality is fantastic and they are very sturdy. I've May have tossed them around a bit and there is nothing wrong with them. I normally like skull candy so this definitely lives up to my expectations.
p500
aVBought these for a 14 year old for gaming.  He really liked them when they arrived - said they had good sound.  Unfortunately they started falling apart after two months of use  (one ear piece fell off) and after three months stopped working period.  Definitely not for heavy use.
p501
aVGood for closing on the job. they cancel out well if you turn them up loud. But I have six holes in my ears and these headphones are pretty tight right out of the box. Uncomfortable. And if you're over six foot tall or have a bigger than average head size, you're probably not going to like these. Carrying bag you get with these is a nice touch, keeps them safe inside a bookbag or duffle bag.But all in all: They are too tight, especially if you have earrings. The cord is braided, but is very short. The sound is good, but not fifty dollars good.
p502
aVThe adjustment on these headphones is the weakpoint... The ladders (or whatever you want to call them) are extremely thin - and the way that they headphones are designed - the heavier piece (that it comes out of with the logo) acts as a fulcrum to weaken these rather thin plastic parts. My left headphone adjuster is cracked clean through - enough to expose the wire - so I have a very ridiculous frakenstein tape job holding them together. The right side is also clearly weak and is beginning to crack as well.
p503
aVI bought for my birthday nephew and he love it.!!!The quality is incredible ,very  soft when you put on...and the most important we havegood product from our basketball team....I really recommended to everyone  that want  to get amazing product.We are very satisfied.....Thanks.....
p504
aVThese are mediocre headphones to put it best. Would probably be great for younger children or those not really serious about sound quality.The sound quality on these headphones is below average. My music constantly sounds distorted/fuzzy when listening with these.The build quality is less than stellar. If you enjoy 'creaking' sounds with every twist and turn then these by far are the king of creakiness. It's almost unbearable just to adjust them on your ears after extended periods of use without having to cringe at the sound of cheaply made plastic.The Skullcandy brand is all hype! I've even tried the ti headphones which are supposed to be an upgrade from these... sounds the same to me. If you are more worried about fashion than sound quality, then Skullcandy has you covered. You can find just about every color to match your outfit of the day. They even have headphones from all your favorite sports teams! Jack up the price by slapping logos of your favorite team on them, but pay no attention to sound quality.I'm writing this review not even an hour after selling these on Craigslist. Comparing these headphones to my Audio Technica WS-55 and M50 is like night and day. If you are serious about sound, steer clear from this brand altogether.2 stars since they have a pretty decent warranty. Not many companies will get you a replacement for 50% off if you accidentally break them.
p505
aVfor the price i paid, i expected them to last longer. They lasted for 7 months before one of the headphones broke off of the headpiece. I was NOT mishandling it or being rough, throwing it around, crushing it under stuff, especially because of the price. They are cute and pretty comfortable until the 5th month when the ear cushions get a bit harder and less giving.I would not recommend these if you are looking for something to last a long time. I could have bought 5 pairs of headphones for this price and still had three or four leftover by now.
p506
aVThese headphones are great for sitting at your computer and listening to music. They have a great sound that doesn't produce to much treble or bass; very well balanced. There are two issues with these headphones that comes down to personal preference. First, whatever you are listening to is going to be heard by the world. These headphones do not muffle the sound of your music at all, so others will always be able to hear you unless you turn your volume literally all the way down. This isn't an issue for me because I listen to them primary at home. Second, if you move around at all while listening to these bad boys you are going to sweat. This is an issue for me because I often clean and dance around when I'm jammin. They are similar to ear muffs and will heat your ears pretty quickly. Keep those two things in mind, but also know that this is a nice pair of headphones depending on your preferences.
p507
aVFor starters, let me just say that these phones actually handle DJ TECHNORCH, noizenecio and t+pazolite very well! Most stereo systems and headphones simply cannot output his music all that well, but these headphones can! These headphones can handle powerful beats up to 800 beats per minute. Just go on youtube and play NECROPOTENCE from t+pazolite. That was the song I used to test out how fast of music these can handle. As far as heavy hitting bass, anything done by RoughSketch, noizenicio, and DJ TECHNORCH was good enough to test these headphones out. They can literally handle anything you throw at them.These headphones cost me about $50 and were the perfect replacement for my Sony headphones. The bass is definitely there without the need for extra subwoofer power from the higher end headphones. The headphones cover your ears perfectly to keep outside noise out, even when the volume is low, so I can use them near loud vacuum cleaners or machines or something.Bottom-line, for the price, these headphones are golden! It is like you are getting something far better than beats audio headphones (usually go for around $200) for 1/4 the price!
p508
aVPros: Its size and sound is better then my old Sony's and much more cheaper then other headphones of this quality. The cord is a great length, and very durable. They are also really comfy to wear.Cons: They lose their adjustment position sometimes, but this is a minor gripe.
p509
aVI bought these headphones for my Grandson (11 yr. old) because he doesn't like the feel of earbuds.  He loves them because they are comfortable and make it enjoyable to listen to his music.
p510
aVi enjoy listening to music with my new headphones because the sound quality is great, it blocks out almost all other sound, and they are mostly comfortable, but they could be a little less tight against my head, which i unfortunately cannot adjust
p511
aVMy son likes these but they feel cheap for $60. In short not worth it in my opinion. Why spend good money for soothing that takes more space, weighs more and feels cheap?
p512
aVThey are too tight on my head.  After 6 months, they finally snapped. The sound quality is fine, but these are cheap headphones overall. You get what you pay for.
p513
aVLoud and clear sounds. Headphones have good bass and treble, easy to adjust, and comfortable. I am pleased with them and hope to buy other skull candy products in the future.
p514
aVI've had a couple pairs of these now, and both pairs broke within a year of purchase. They are good quality sound for their price, but aren't durable enough to be worth it.
p515
aVI bought these for my daughter and although she was not over the moon about them, they were the upgrade she was looking for and when she told me what she thought they were worth, it was the price exactly.  They are exactly as pictured and have decent sound quality.
p516
aVI'm not buying another pair of these.  I was very excited when I first saw the headphones, thinking they were stylish, good quality sound, and economical (mine cost $30).  Unfortunately, they only delivered as I had expected in style.  They looked exactly the same in real life as they did in the pictures online.  For the first few months, I really loved them.  However, after I took them on a trip and wore them for more than an hour and a half, they started to hurt my head.  I felt like my ears were being crushed.  The headband pulls the cans together way too hard.  Granted, my head is larger than average, and as far as adjust-ability goes they fit _around_ my head very nicely, but for extended listening these headphones hurt.  Now I'm no expert on sound quality, but these didn't seem too magical, and from what others have said Skullcandy is primarily about style.If you have a small head, care about style over quality, and can't afford Beats or some more fashionable but comparably low-quality pair of headphones, by all means buy these.  Otherwise, go for a pair of cheap Sonys, JVCs, Koss or some other brand that puts sound quality and comfort first.  You'll thank me later.
p517
aVThis is exactly what my son wanted. It would have gotten 5 stars but i had ordered this separate from some of the things for my son and this was suppose to be a gift for him. They put it in the same package and he opened it and got it. That really sucked because I ordered it on a different day and these cost enough all alone to have super saver shipping.  Very disappointed in amazon for that. I made a point to order it like i did. My son is happy with it though.
p518
aVFor the amount of money I paid for this product, it is very good. I cannot compare it to Bose or other companies like that, but again, I did go for the cheaper option. It is comfortable to wear, and gives very good sound quality. Definitely worthy of all five stars!
p519
aVPoor craftsmanship. They look good, but the headband is constructed with a metal strap that attaches to the earphone with plastic. Over time the plastic cracks and breaks leaving the earphone detached. I contacted the seller about this problem but got no reply. If you do decide to purchase a pair of these headphones you must remove them carefully otherwise they'll break in time. Since I got no reply from the seller I have reattached the earphone using zip ties which will only last until I find another suitable pair. This time I'll be more careful. Buyer beware.
p520
aVYou get exactly what you buy. They're good headphones with regular sound quality. They're tight around the ears and hurt after long periods of use. I feel like they're very sturdy. Overall I'm pretty happy with the headphones I recommend them.
p521
aVI bought these for my son for a Christmas gift.  He used them only at home, not hauling them back and forth to school.  He enjoyed using them until about June 1st at which time they snapped where the earpieces adjust to fit over your head.  He's currently still using them but the've lost their appeal with the shiny silver duct tape holding them together.
p522
aVI heard about these new "beats" headphones, and looked them up online and discovered that they were very stylish, and I also discovered the price, unfortunately. I am a huge OKC thunder fan, and play basketball a lot.I sampled the beats from one of my friends while we were shooting hoops. i realized why the beats have horrible reviews. The sound quality is very poor. I decided these Skullcandy headphones were going to be the best choice for me. I have had them for 6 months, and i these six months i have discovered thse things.  1. The sound quality is absolutely insane. I have never heard headphones that project the sound so clear. I am more of a pop- rap guy, and these headphones are amazing.  2.  these headphones NEVER fall off. I have taken these headphones to their limits, and they have never let me down. I have done every workout  I know of, and they have never fell off. ever.  THE VERY FEW COMPLAINTS... I would really have liked the parts where you can adjust the size to be metal.  2. After 4+ hours they start really hugging your ears and they start geting uncomfortable. But if you take them off for 5 mins, and then put them back on, they'll feal good as new.  overall great headphones.
p523
aVFor ~$50, you will get a decent product. Although many people will only buy it because of the brand name/looks, you won't get a bad pair of headphones. The large 50mm drivers make for loud sound. Whether that's good sound or not is a whole different story. From the ears of an audiophile, you will immediately hear imperfections. However if you've just come from cheap iPhone headphones, you'll hear heaven. There definitely is a burn-in time. When you first get it, the bass will be a little overpowering, bleeding into the mids. The highs won't really be noticeable either. However once you've got a few hours into them, they start to even out. I tested these with dubstep, electro, rap, and rock in FLAC format. If you're listening to mp3, you're not going to hear what these headphones can actually produce. The Hesh don't actually have a ton of bass compared to others, but the bass is smooth. If you're looking for head-thumping bass, you're not going to get it from these. What you will get is a smoother, more refined bass. The mids are harder to detect. They're not as prevalent in these but a trained ear can hear solid mids. The songs I was playing didn't really push the highs too hard so I can't vouch for certain the quality of the highs.I liked the different color varieties so you can personalize your headphones. They're not at all bland. The headphones are sleek and aesthetically pleasing. I only have one complaint in that the cups are a little too thick. You'll look kind of like Mickey Mouse walking out in these. It doesn't really matter to me since I'm only going to use these for office/travel use.The construction is where the Hesh falls apart for me. It's made entirely of cheap plastic. I can see they did it to cut down costs but in the end, these headphones will not last. The adjuster band killed the headphones. After a few months of use, they snapped one-by-one. I ended supergluing it together but now it will no longer be able to adjust the size.The comfort is also not a huge win for me. The headstrap does not have a lot of padding. It also doesn't create a lot of friction. It can be good or bad depending on how you wear it but for me the headphones just kept slipping off my head. The cup pads are very stiff. They're made of a fake leather material. It's very hard and uncomfortable compared to other headphones. Depending on the size of your ears, the cup may be over-ear or on-ear. It's just small enough and just big enough to be both. The cups will end up hurting your ears after a while of wear.These come with a gold-plated 3.5mm jack so you can use it for your iPhone or PC. I've had no connection problems or power problems. I've accidentally run over the cord/jack with my chair and no damage has been done. The cord is made of nice braided fabric so it will last longer than other rubber/plastic cords. The mic is of decent quality. Phone/Skype calls will work pretty well. However since it is an inline mic, they tend to pick up a lot more things than you want. For example, my friends could hear my mom in another room or my dogs barking outside.In the end, I wouldn't exactly recommend these to anyone but it's not exactly a bad choice if you're set on getting one.
p524
aVI would recommend buying skull candy products if you like Useless Customer Service departments. I been waiting 4 months to get a part for my headphones and now they wont even respond. You know what I hear every time I put my headphones on????? yup you guessed it. NOTHING. Notta, Zilch, Zippo, zero, ........
p525
aVThe construction of the headset if cheap. These broke after a few months and I used duct tape to do a cheapo fix. Spend you money on better quality headphones like Bose or Beats.
p526
aVMine finally broke after a fall to the grould out of my book bag of a height of maybe 5 ft.. they snaped in half... but they sound just as good, if not better than Dr. Dre Beats... amazing bass!
p527
aVI bought it because my son is a big Heat and Dwayne Wade fan. The sound quality was not as good as other headphones in this price range. However my son (10 years old) was happy with them so I would recommend them to heat fans that are not looking for high quality sound.
p528
aVThis was an amazing order. The headphones work and the description said there was a big scratch on one side but when I got it the scratch was barely visible which made me feel ten times better. They are pretty much like new!
p529
aVthese head phones sound great, but you have to have your ipod or whatever turned way up to hear them well. but the sound quality is amazing for the price you pay. they look well as well and are comfortable.
p530
aVLike I said, good sound and good volume capabilities, but the round shape covering the ears doesn't match not round ears, therefore, after a while it starts pressing against your ears a little too much and they will begin to get agitated and maybe sore for younger people out there.
p531
aVI bought these as a gift for my niece because of the monkey and come to find out, these were headphones that she wanted and they were a hit with her classmates and she said that she loved them because they're clear and you can't hear outside noise. I asked her to let me try them and I have to say that I now want a pair of my own but different design. Most of all the price was right. :)
p532
aVThese headphones have great quality.But could these headphones be better than beats???  Well, i think they are because the price costs less and again,these headphones have great quality. so,i think tthey are better than beats.
p533
aVI like these a lot, so far really no problems out of them. I've always liked Skull Candy stuff, they usually last a while, and not as expensive as a lot of headphones.
p534
aVI love my new over the ear headphone. D Wade is my favorite player on my squad  The Miami Heat. I get alot of looks whenever I where wear them.....They really block out the sounds around you.....Great buy you'll love them
p535
aVThese were a replacement of the ones that broke where the part that fits over the ear connects to the head piece.  We bought the original ones at Radio Shack.  They lasted about 2 years and then that piece broke.  So my daughter loved these headphones so much, she wanted the same kind.  So I bought these as a replacement and was thankful I could find the same headphones online.  The process was easy and arrived quickly and she loves them!
p536
aVHeadphones looked great in the package.  My teenager was thrilled. On the third day of owning her new skull candy headphones we noticed the cord coming apart.  The part that plugs into the phone has a complete separated from the cord and wires are exposed - I expected a little for for the money I spent.
p537
aVThis product replaced a similiar pair.  Skull Candy has an excellent warrantly and replaced a pair with a tear.  No problem. Got a replacement pair in less than a week.
p538
aVOne of the best sets of headphones I've ever owned. Very sturdy, amazing bass and sound. I've grown a lot of hate for Dr. Dre because of how overpriced they are. All you need is a great sounding pair of headphones - and these are it. They sound absolutely beautiful on newer songs such as Imagine Dragons - Radioactive, however they sound great on all songs.Instead of wasting a ton of money on a pair of Dr. Dre's headphones, buy these.*EDIT*After an honorable use of two-three years, I've gotten new headphones. I got the Skullcandy Crushers, and they're very nice. I decided to come back to these headphones as a spare but they sound like rubbish now. Was surprised at first, but these things are dirt old.
p539
aVThese are the most uncomfortable headphones I have ever had the displeasure of owning.  They place a constant pressure pincering onto my skull, and my ears dont fit within the cushioned hollows so I have to fold them in or adjust constantly to get sort of a smooshed ear fit.  Im an average sized adult male, these should fit much better.Sound is adequate, single sided cord is nice.  Rest of headphones feel too large and plasticy, but also fragile.  Hoping to return them tomorrow after just a few houes of ear torturing ownership.
p540
aVThe skullcandy hesh are pretty awesome. I just bought my second pair and they are great. of course the build isn't the best, but they are the best headphones under 50$ that you can get. If you are on the budget, the highs, mids, and bass are the best on these headphones than any other. just be careful because they aren't the sturdiest pair around. i would refer these to a friend.
p541
aVMy son wanted these because a friend of his had some and he loved everything about them.After looking locally at all of the stores we found them on Amazon for $20.00 less and that made him very happy since he was spending his own money.  He thinks the design is awesome and has them around his neck as much as possible whether he is using them or not. He couldn't be happier with his purchase.
p542
aVI took a chance on purchasing them while shopping at another retailer. I was looking here at another brand,(which I'll still purchase cause I want them), but at this moment I was in need of a pair for my HTC One with Beats Audio. The moment I plugged them in, I was thinking to myself, "They'll probably sound OK" That was an understatement. The enhanced sound quality from the Beats Audio of this phone gave these headphones some serious knock. The bass response isn't overpowering, but it's more than adequate. The highs and mids aren't piercing either, so you won't get that scratchy sound I hate. The only genre I've listened to with them so far is Dubstep and Hip-Hop, and I've been more than impressed by the sound quality. For the price, you can't beat them. If your looking for some serious sound on the go without breaking your wallet, then Skullcandy Hesh gets 2 thumbs up from me.
p543
aVI bought these phones at Sam's Club for 40 bucks. I was looking for something that was sweat resistant, durable and decent sounding. These are not audiophile headphones, but they sound much better than most for the price...and I consider them quite sturdy...at least compared to my Grado headphones. Overall, highly recommended.
p544
aVThese headphones came in Record time: 2 days. The sound quality is great for just $40! They do not fit too tight and came in the original packaging. The material is very sturdy and nothing is flimsy. The only thing is that the blue is much darker than what is shown in the picture. But other than that these headphones are great. A very good buy.
p545
aVonly pet peeve is the right side (away from the wired ear piece) sometimes the connection fails and you have to wiggle it a bit before the right ear makes contact and plays in stereo. maybe I should have designed it's contact points : P other than that I'm in love! for under 30 clams I can't complain much...
p546
aVI would give the seller a 5 star as the customer service wasn't so great, though, the item arrived very quickly, over 3 weeks before the estimated delivery date and the item was in great condition. With this being said, I have only had the item for two days so I can't say for sure but I think that it is of high quality. A 4.5 star review if possible (iAccessory Shop - seller)
p547
aVI bought this for my son as a gift and he loves them. The sound is adequate, but you shouldn't be looking for high quality sound in this price range. He's mentioned they are very comfortable, although I will say he has a small head, so larger nuggets may get different miliage.
p548
aVI was really attracted to these because of the Boston Celtic team colors and KG as the featured player.  It is top notch Skullcandy performance as over ear headphones and sounded great.  Only problem I had was that the head band is made of plastic and didn't adjust too much. I wear a size 8 cap and these headphones were on the tight end when I put them on.
p549
aVI bought these for my 10 year old son to use with his mp3. They fit great and are so comfortable that I borrow them when I'm doing work on my computer and need a bit of peace and quiet!
p550
aVI have to laugh at people who say the packaging was hard to get into- I ripped it right open with my hands and I am a pregnant female. Besides it has nothing to do with the product.I amusing these right now. Optically I love them. They sound just fine as well. I don't have them turned up loud and they tune out the outer noises. They are pretty snug and tight on my head though but maybe I just have to wear them in a bit, they are stiff straight out of the box and I do have a big head. Good sound though!!!
p551
aVBought this for my son, he was happy. Sound and noise isolation  is good for this price point. Styling is great for a kid or big Knick fan, but I can't picture myself walking down the street with these.Comes with a carrying/storage soft case when not in use.Overall I would recommend these as a great entry level headphone with superior styling and comfort and good sound.
p552
aVMy son is truly enjoying these headphones.  The quality of the product is good.  The sound that comes from the headphones are remarkable.  For the money, they are worth the price.
p553
aVI ordered the Black Julius Skullcandy headphone for my son's birthday. My son opened his gift and was very disappointed. The music/sound came from the right ear only. I sent the item back and received my refund. However the cost of shipping the defective headphone back was not refunded to me.
p554
aVI purchased these headphones for my 13yr old grandson. He absolutely loves them. The only problem that he has with them is that his mother keeps taking them to use herself. He said I should have bought her a pair also so that she would leave his alone.They are of great quality. I wanted to keep them for myself but I'm sure he would not have liked that too much either.
p555
aVI got these for my son for his 7th birthday!!! He was thrilled!!! We used them on our trip to disney and it kept him entertained on the plane for hours!!!
p556
aVThese headphones are great for blocking out background noise and the mic is crystal clear.  Single click and it toggles between play and pause, two clicks and it skips to the next track.
p557
aVFirst off, I would like to point out these pair of headphones are horribly made. The bad shape hurts your ears, unlike most other headphones.Second, this piece of crap literally FELL APART after 4 months. BOTH hinges SNAPPED off one day when i put them on. WTF?Sound is pretty decent and loud. But that's probably i have a beats computer...
p558
aVI Bought these for my boyfriend for his Birthday and he loved them, Great sound there loud and i like the string instead of wire to connect to a device and they come with a cool bag ! :)
p559
aVThese headphones are a complete steal for 50 bucks, I use them all the time. The bass sound is amazing on them, and I love a lot of bass. Although if you don't like the bass sound in your ears, I would personally not recommend buying these. But, overall they're sound quality and price make them a steal for a buyer.
p560
aVMy boyfriend prefers headphones over earbuds, so I decided to splurge and buy him some of these. He listens to music every day, so I was hoping they would last, coming in at $60. Unfortunately they fell apart in about three months, even though he took great care of them; there was absolutely no durability in the pair we received. Won't purchase again.
p561
aVMy original review appears to have been based on faulty data and I apologize to the Skullcandy people.  This set has decent power, clarity, and a good range of sound.  It does not have AC-DC concert volume, but at this price, I really didn't expect that.I had written that there was a good deal of distortion at higher volume levels and this remains true, but I am speaking about what most people would consider an insane decibel load for the human ear.  After 45 years of playing like Tommy Chong, my ears are shot anyway, but others might like to preserve their hearing.The cord is a bit short, but I own many extensions, so if you need a longer cord, pick one up.  I really like the fabric feel of the cord.  It should help it last longer than a traditional one........time will tell.In short, I recommend these phones both for the average listener and for the Rockers out there who are tired of wimpy low end headphones and on't want to drop a few hundred dollars for the big boys just now.
p562
aVI just got these headphones today. They're amazing! Very nice, very stylish, very padded. :) The sound is AMAZING, literally like no other headphones that I have ever tried before. The bass is AWESOME and I love them. HOWEVER, there is one big down side. (Which is why I didn't give it a 5.) After about twenty minutes these headphones hurt your ears. /: Maybe it's just because I just got them today and they haven't "stretched out" or because I was just sitting down in one position, but they were really tight. I think that if you were doing something at the same time, such as moving around or reading a book, you might be able to ignore it. But just sitting down and listening to music, they really hurt. I'm not sure if this will go away with time or not though, so I'll update in about a month. I would definitely buy them. :)
p563
aVI got this in Ross for only $30. Of course not the nice color, Only ugliest color was available (gray/black). Anyway this is a great Headphone as I expected, although it's a little heavy and too tight to hang on my neck
p564
aVThese look great and the colors are rich, not like the faded ones in the picture. I use these at work and sometimes when I fly for 4hours or less. It's not something i really like using for longer duration as the ear buds tend to hurt after a bit. But it is great and the sound quality is also pretty good. For the price, i'd say this is a great product
p565
aVI purchased these for my son's 14th birthday and he loves them.  He says they are comfortable, provide good sound and looked just like the sample pic.  He would recommend them.
p566
aVThey are great. These are a great pair I've had no problems with them at all. No signs of breaking anytime soon, so I don't see what people keep complaining about.
p567
aVLove Skullcandy Best Headphones ever. I have owned a lot of headphones in my days and skull candy seems to have the best sounds when it comes to listening to music and canceling out the surrounding noise.
p568
aVBought them for my boyfriend for his birthday and he loves them! It arrived on the exact day I was told and he's been using them and he said the sound is perfect and they block out the sound around him! highly recommend
p569
aVFor the price you pay the quality of the sound is amazing. The clarity of the music is amazing and good for the price the only thing lacking is the plastic that makes up the headphones. It is cheap and when used everyday on a normal basis the plastic tends to give up and can form cracks which eventually can break. The last problem is the cups, they hurt the ear when used for more then 30 to 40 minutes.
p570
aVhalf of peoples reviews are complaining about hot ears and broken pieces and stuff, truth is yall cant take care of headphones.. these headphones are good, nothing wrong with them, and for a price like this, i think its better than beats. no complaints please, I RECCOMMEND THESE HEADPHONES (:
p571
aVThese headphones sound very nice, the clarity and tone are great.  Additionally they are pretty comfortable on the head and not too heavy. I also like the looks, kinda funky but fun.  Almost all headphones sound better than simple ear buds but I was not able to actually compare them to high-dollar brands.Overall I am happy with the purchase and would recommend them for someone wanting a nice sound with worring about them getting stolen or misplaced.
p572
aVI have had these headphones for about a year now. They are great and are very durable. I have mistreated these headphones so many times and they never broke! Sound is pretty good.Would recommend.
p573
aVBought them today, OMG they are awesome. very comfortable built nice and the sound is incredible. i listen to old school rap and my music came alive. they need power so your ipod may not have enough, but if you have a good sound card like i have with a headphone amp and a DAC the sound is awesome. the more i crank it up the beter it sounds. the highs are awesome and the bass is not over powering or muddy. and they can be found for a reasonable price.
p574
aVThese Hesh headphones are decent for the price, but they are uncomfortable. They squeeze your head a lot and the padding is hard and irritating. Makes long listening sessions almost unbearable. The construction is cheap plastic, and the sound gets distorted as the volume increases. But for the price, they are pretty good. I suggest lower volume listening, so that you get better overall sound. They look stylish, but for $60 I bet you can find better. Look for brands like audio technica, sennheiser, and grado. If you aren't an audiophile, then these are great. If you are, go for something else.
p575
aVI bought a pair of these from the local Entertainment store and have had them for about 2 years now and I can say that this headset is awesome! Sound is great and they're really loud for what they are. I was never expecting this much volume from a headset that doesn't require batteries. The sound is great, I can wear them for a long time before they bother me but like any headsets they will start hurting eventually but thats just the ears' way of saying they need a break. I see a lot of bad reviews saying these are cheap and break easy but I have dropped mine a fair share and they are still intact and work perfect. It is most likely user error to people who claimed theirs broke so soon. These are $50 dollars, so quit expecting them to work like $300 cans! These are just perfect for anyone who wants high volume and great sound at a decent price but know that you are getting what you pay for, Skull Candy, NOT DRE BEATS!!!
p576
aVI know i get what i pay for but i kinda feel i got the raw end of the deal on this one.. I expected alot better quality from skullcandy then this. Poor sound that i prob could have gotten for some 10$ noname brand..
p577
aVDecent quality. i especially liked the design of the logo. cord is sturdy. however i would recommend you just skip these and grab the skull candy aviators instead. the quality for those are amazing and you can get a pair for $90. i bought a brand new pair of hesh for $30 and for the price, they were good. i was mostly paying for the design and brand and besides they ARE NOT worth $60 when the aviators are out there for $90. those gave me a musicgasm. make sure you pick up the 2012 MODEL! they are so much better than the 2011 aviators.
p578
aVI remember reading the posts about how they break easily and I figured that most of the posters must be negligent, but I've been proven wrong.I bought the headphones for myself as a X-Mas gift just to have one side crack while I was placing them over my head. LITERALLY. Not even a month and they broke up going over my head.A week later and that side has snapped off completely. Now... it's not like these were even my daily wear headphones, I only wore them when working from home and the sad truth is my dollar store headphones, and $13 Skype headphones have lasted over a year.Why the bass was great and the noise cancellation was unbeatable what's the point if you pay $50 for a month? Unless Beats by Dre are actually durable and worth the money not only have these headphones turned me off from Skull Candy forever, but perhaps all premium headphones.Good riddance...
p579
aVThe sound quality was great with these headphones. I got them for a gift for my gamer boyfriend and he loves them. Skullcandy's headphones always look great but these seemed even more vibrant than usual.
p580
aVMy son loves these (and frankly, I've used them a few times too to tune out the noise!) to listen to music and play games on his iPad. He can't hear me when I talk to him from the next room, so they must be doing their job!
p581
aVI bought these headphones for my 8 yr old son  and he absolutely loves them. He says they are a liittle more firm on the pads compares to other brands. I think the quality is perfect. I was gonna buy  these at Best Buy for much higher, so you can't beat the price.
p582
aVThese are the coolest headphones on the market, from the NBA store, they cost over $60. One thing that I would like for them to do next time is maybe put instructions because you have to do something to make both ears work, because it came with only one ear working. I would recommend this to Knicks fans everywhere. Best $35 headphones ever.
p583
aVGot these for my 11 year old son.  He loves them.  We don't need to spend hundreds for the fancier ones.  I tried these too.  They block out most sounds and sound great.
p584
aVA gift for my son, and he loves them. Excellent sound quality for the price. Maybe not quite as high in style points as the beats but still acceptable to a 15 year old boy.
p585
aVBought these for my son.  He says that they work great!  I liked the price.  Don't pay loads of money for headphones when these will do the job.
p586
aVI purchased these for christmas for my 8 year old son, who actually requested beats by dre........... i saw these and when i saw they were miami heat decor, which is me and my sons favorite basketball team. they became an absolute must have. the quality of these headphones are above my expectations. my son loves them! in fact my husband does too! excellent product and so glad i got them at a great price!
p587
aVSaw other reviews talking about vibrations.  I haven't noticed anything.  Been using high quality headphones for years and these are a really nice set.  A much less expensive set than Dre's but great quality for the price.
p588
aVAfter having a server ear infection resulting in a tube being put in my ear I was told by my doctor to switch from earbuds back to headphones. I have heard very good things about skull candy so I looked into getting a set of headphones made by Skullcandy. While browsing I ran across this pair and fell in in love with them! They are very good. Perfect noise cancellation, fits my ears extreamly well. My only complaint is that they are kinda bulky and don't fit around my neck as well as I had hoped. These head phones come with a drawstring bag to carry them around and protect them as they ride around in my backpack when not in use. If a friend asked me to suggest a pair of headphones i'd tell them to go right for these.
p589
aVThe headphones have great sound quality and I love how they look.  The only thing is that they are a little tight on my head, so after about an hour I can't wear them anymore.
p590
aVThese headphones are very nice looking and the sound quality is good for the price. The fit is nice over the ears, sound (especially base) is solid, but anything passed 75%-80% volume the sound gets muddled & sound bleeds out so others can hear music. If you're looking for high-end sound then these are not the headphones for you, but if you want an affordable, good (not great) set of headphones, these will do just fine.
p591
aVGreat gift! Great quality of product and great price. It was easy to find and because it was for my son, he wanted 'HEAT' ones and they were easy to find. Very happy I got this for my son for CHRISTmas.
p592
aVI purchased the headphones for my son for Christmas. He wanted the Beatz by Dre. But after reading the reviews on the poor quality; how quickly they break, etc. After reading the reviews I selected this model of SkullCandy headphones. My son loves them said they are better than the Dr Dre headphones. He now wants another pair in a different style. Awesome buy!
p593
aVThese Skullcandy headphone are a fabulous affordable option to the Beats by Dre.  They provide great sound quality and are "cool".....my son loves his and I bought myself earbuds as a result of his experience with the headphones.
p594
aVMy son loves these. They sound great and are durable, for the price they are hard to beat. My older son had a pair Sony headphones that have been returned, he will be getting a pair.
p595
aVAfter two weeks of steady use, my brother noticed cracks developing in the adjustable plastic part of his headphones. He doesn't have a large head, and he always treats his electronics with care, yet the cracks have deepened almost enough to snap the headphones right off. I can only conclude that the Hesh headphones are made with subpar materials.On the plus side, they do have a nice sound, good bass and noise-canceling ability. And they look cool, lol.
p596
aVI had to for about a week and i had to call up Skullcandy to get a new headphone. The problem is that they themselves don't sell this version, so i had to get a low rider headphone which is not as good as this one. I really wish i didn't have to replace it because it was wonderful.
p597
aVmy Grandmother got me these for christmas and ive never had a headset as good as these, they drowned out all surrounding sounds and the instumentals are perfect. i love these headphones.  ( This headset was a Christmas gift for my grandson and he wrote the review.  I will tell you he was very excited and told me it was just what he wanted. He loved the headset. By the way he is 16 yrs. old.)
p598
aVHaven't used them yet, they are for my son for Christmas! The came packaged nice, but looked very dusty, like they had been sitting.. When we try them, I will give an update!
p599
aVOn my third pair but I'm die hard Knicks fan. Skullcandy  upgraded to a more metal base headphone with the Hesh 2.0.  That's my next buy in about 4 months when these break...and they sadly will
p600
aVThese ended up being perfect for my 10 year old son.  They fit great.  Other models wouldn't stay on his head very well, the cup design works well for him.
p601
aVExcellent sound - comparable to the quality of my Bose AE2's with a very high efficiency (volume produced for the input given - as loud as I have ever seen any headphone produce). They are heavy and they bother my ears after about 40 mins. I have a large head but tiny ears and the design of the cups just does not work for me. The cups are not large enough to go all the way around my ears so they apply pressure to either the pinna or the lobes. The padding on them is not soft enough to compensate for the pressure they apply on my ears and the discomfort gets to me after a while. The headband is somewhat bendable and you can reduce the pressure they apply to your ears to some extent but it is still not enough. I like the sound enough that I have been wearing them several times a week for the last 3 months and unfortunately they have not gotten any more comfortable with breaking in.
p602
aVI find this headphones so good. Its quality is perfect. There is only one thing that I don't like which is that they are kinda tight especially if you have a big head.
p603
aVI found this pear of headphones elsewhere, and decided to write a review here for the community. Highs are very good, lows are enjoyable and the overall build quality is good. This is the first generation, so they do feel a bit plastic-y, but not so much that you feel like they will break at any moment. They isolate outside noise very well only when the music is high, but that is usually not a problem for me. The leather cushions add for an extra luxurious feel and are very comfortable to wear, partly because the top of the headphones is also padded. The leather has its downside as well: your ears will warm up after about 30 minutes of constant use. The cord is of appropriate length and doesn't limit your mobility. If you're on a budget, this pair of headphones is still a very good buy, even if they are a bit outdated.
p604
aVI've owned all the different scull candy earbuds.. I've had many break do to faulty product. They always gave me a credit which is sick. But now they have their act together. They have great products for any price range.
p605
aVLove the design. Love the carrying pouch that comes with it. Sound is pretty good, but I'm not an audiophile The headphones feel a little too tight to wear, which isn't too uncommon for me when using over-the-ear headphones.
p606
aVOverall, the sound of these headphones is top-notch for the price range, although the highs are a bit muddied VS the lows. Nonetheless, sonically, I'm impressed for what I paid.However, these headphones HURT. I'm a skinny guy, 25 years old, normal sized head and ears, and these things make me feel like I'm wearing a vice on my face. If you wear glasses, don't get these at all unless you've been dying to discover new pressure points behind your ears. They squeeze really hard all things considered, and the earcups are deceptively small so you have to actually wrap the cushions around your ears in several steps to actually make them fit on your head.Overall, great sound, really really uncomfortable for someone who has an adult-sized head.
p607
aVBought them at the airport and since then, love these set of headphones. The sound is pristine and the bass is pretty neat, too. Sadly, broke 'em as I sat down on my chair, but hell, just bought another pair. Highly recommended; besides sounding great and at a great price, they look awesome on you.
p608
aVI got these headphones to replace a pair of $7 Vibe headphones that were starting to have audio problems, which i got to replace a broken pair of Skullcrushers. The sound quality is very good, with all of the genres I listen to, Metal, Classic Rock, Electronica, House, dubstep and SID. All of them sound amazing! the only problem I have with them is that the foam parts of the earcups are too small, and after about 2 hours of skateboarding and listening to music, my ears started hurting. Other than that Great buy(i got mine used for $28 bucks, they were treated pretty badly, but i bet that brand new, they would be worth the $40-$50 you have to pay) the cord never tangles, I never have any problems with the minijack not fitting in my mp3 player or reaching it(i'm very short for my age though)Pros: Great sound quality with most genres of music.Cons:Earcups are too small, plastic feels brittle.Decision: BUY THESE! THEY ARE AMAZING!
p609
aVAnd I need to as the moment I left them unattended at my local YMCA, they got stolen.I hope whoever has them now is enjoying the amazing bass and crystal clear sounds coming from those ear muffs.
p610
aVOkay, these headphones are O.K. they have good low end beats and the sound isn't distorted when the volume on the ipod nano is on full. I'll give u a quick pros and cons chart.  Pros:-great low end beats-compact-extremely comfortable if you have a small head-handles high volume  Cons:-cheap plastic-this probably doesn't go for most people, but i have a hearing loss so I cant listen to loud music, so i have the volume low. But when the volume is low, the beat cancels out the other noise such as synth, if you listen to house or dubstep like i do. Sure, if the volumes loud it's still crisp.-uncomfortable around the neck.
p611
aVI bought these as a gift for my fifteen year old brother, and he loves them. They block out all outside noises, which my mom does not appreciate! He says he can hear sounds in the music he is listening to that he did not even notice when listening to on regular speakers. They are also stylish and fairly priced.
p612
aVGood sound quality for the price. However, the construction of it is insanely cheap. After a few months of light use at a desk, the side began to crack and a few months later, it broke off conpletely. The only thing holding the side on is the speaker cable. Too cheap to recommend to anyone.
p613
aVThese headphones are a great alternative option for people not willing to spend $200 or more for products like: Beats by Dre and Streets by 50.  The sound quality is superb, the design is great, and they fit and form very comfortably to size.  Only drawback is that they are easily breakable because of the plastic design.  I highly recommend it to any music lover.
p614
aVHaving read all of the review to these headphones i thought these were gonna be great. Turned out they weren't very comfortable at all, and to me, a pair of headphones arn't anything without comfort. The music quiality of the headphones were alright but they didn't block to much noise out. The worst part of these headphones are their durability, the area were you can ajust the size of the headphones was made of cheap plastic and snaped after a couple weaks of use. Not recommended headphones.
p615
aVThey do sound good for the price but they are made from cheap plastic. Mine broke just taking them off my head. Mine seem to exhibit the same weakness that others have complained about: The adjusting slides are made of thin, brittle plastic and break very easily. I would not buy again.
p616
aVGREAT BUY! The mike however doesn't work with my Nokia Lumia 710, and I do wish that the cable was removable but for the price I paid ($34) I can't complain. The bass is there but it's not over powering the rest of the important parts of the song (Cough cough beats). They aren't that comfy, infact after 20-30 minutes they started to hurt my ears. But remember they are around the ear. Overall I recommend these headphones for regular listeners or anyone on a tight budget. Keep in mind that these retail for $60 elsewhere!
p617
aVAll in all the only things these headphones have going for them are the desing and brand name. The earcups are too tight and trust me when I tekk you in a matter of 5 to 10 minutes you will have to take them off ang gett some air. Don't buy these.
p618
aVI got these a little over a year ago and they work PERFECT! I use them every day and they still produce amazing sound ! A must get in my book!
p619
aVThe sound quality and clarity is actually pretty good for headphones in this price range. They are a bit bulky, and if you think your going to be wearing them around your neck while they're not in use then you might want to look at some different headphones for in my experience they are simply too bulky for that. The bass also leaves something to be desired but for quality on a budget they're pretty great.
p620
aVBought these headphones for my son and didn't even have them an hour and plug was disconnected from wire.  We filed warranty, but never received anything from warranty or refund.
p621
aVthey are really good overall but the 3rd day i had them my dumb friend tried getting my attention and tried to pull them off my head and they snaped in half
p622
aVI put these on my wish list because my old Sony earphones had the fake leather peeling off all the time and leaving little black bits in my hair/ear. I ended up getting these as a present for my birthday.These Skullcandy Hesh headphones sound pretty good but the build quality is poor. Less than a week of having them the fake leather is peeling away from the headphone cup. At least its not leaving bits of stuff on me but it wont be long before the other side starts to do this I imagine. Has it hindered my ability to listen to music? No, not yet, but if the thing starts coming undone within a week or owning then I dont recommend it to others.
p623
aVThese are great headphones, The over-the-head strap is comfortable (there's some kind of padding in it). I like how the cable only comes out of one of the sides.The cable itself is covered in some sort of fabric, so it is tough, and also flexible. The cable will never retain its shape, which is good. You should never have to worry about this cord getting tangled. The cable is only 3ft long, so you're a little limited there, but I have never had an issue with the length (except when I try to get up from my desk forgetting that I'm still wearing the headphones).The ear pieces are a good fit. There is sufficient padding around the ears so you shouldn't have to worry about them being painful. They are sufficient large enough to completely go around my ears and make a good seal.Sound. The sound quality is good. They are quite loud, and I have never noticed any issues with the sound. However, the domes on the outside tend to pick up external noise. So for example, wind is easily picked up by these phones. So if I'm wearing these outside on a windy day, the wind will be amplified in my ears by these domes. This is one of my annoyances with this product.The other annoyance is the fabric. I feel like the fabric that covers the ear padding as well as the over-the-head padding seems like it might be the kind of fabric that will deteriorate over time, or that it will crack.Overall: Good headphones, good sound, good fit, not the best for cancelling external noise, fabric doesn't seem reliable.Recommendation: Go for it, I love these!
p624
aVThese are great noise cancelling headphones for the price. My son has sensory integration issues and the headphones help with the surrounding noise and he is able to listen to what he wants with out the distraction of the people around him.
p625
aVThe headphones are really good in the overall... but sometimes, with some songs, they do not sound that good... I look rock and they seem to be perect for that kind of sound, but if you listen to pop or electronic they do not sound that well...Its worthy the price....
p626
aVI am so hyped with my Wade Skull Candies. I rock them with a white wade shirt and goes perfect.The construction is perfect, designed so the cord does the easily get a shortage.The music and sound quality is amazing, not as good as Beats By Dr Dre, If you are buying ear phones for studio quality, Skull Candy is not designed for such.The frabic on the top loop becomes discolored to a white-yellow colour after a few months of use. It does come with a nice clothed bag, but I didn't use it too much.The ear cushion began to acquire slight ware and tear after a year of slow-moderate use.Recommendation: Buy if you a HUGE Wade fan, because there is nothing like it on the market right now.
p627
aVI bought these and a pair of Beats tour, let's just say the beats one....these are very loud but little bass :/I wanted something to look good in and sound great ill give it a 3/3 style...and 2/3 sound its decent
p628
aVThese headphones are great. I got them last year for christmas, and they're awesome. The sound is amazing, there's little to no leak, and I love the pause/unpause/skip button on the cord. There are a few problems though, and they are enough of an issue that I decided to share my experience. If you wear these for too long, they tend to hurt your ears a little. Also if it's hot, they get sweaty. The worst problem, however, is that they break. I don't know if it's just me, but a week or so ago they started to break. When I had them hooked up to my computer, they would sometimes randomly do short bursts of static, or a loud popping noise would occur. Also, the part of the headphone on the left ear right above the speaker and below the size adjustment thing broke. It just came loose, and now whenever I wear the headphones, the left ear sticks up and won't fit over my ear anymore. This sucks because these headphones have great quality and I love them, except they haven't even lasted a year. This is pretty disappointing because now I actually have to buy some. I've tried my best to preserve these, but alas, duct tape has failed me. All in all, these are amazing headphones. I'm no audio nerd, but I think this sound is great. It's clear and loud and everything is just perfectly blended. If you're thinking about getting these headphones, I recommend that you do, but maybe get them used or for cheap because they will, inevitably, break. So, if you get these, treat them as nicely as possible and prepare yourself for when they break, because they will, and it is rather heart-breaking. These were some great headphones while they lasted. If you get them, maybe you'll get more than 9 months of use out of them.
p629
aVSkullcandy Headphones are some of the best headphones you can buy.But on the down side of the subject, they are pretty expensive to.  You know how they say, "this is music to my ears.", these headphones bring that metaphor to life.  They are very high quality, it feels like you're actually at the band whose concert you're listening to. like I said earlier, they are a great pair of headphones, and there just a great product to listen to music with.The first time I listened to a pair of Skullcandy headphones was after school at my friend's house.  He had a pair of them on his bed so i asked him if I could listen to them and he said yes so I picked them up and I pressed play on his IPod.  They sounded great!These are perfect headphones for kids and adults any age.  Someone who would really like them would be someone who enjoys music, also, I wouldn't recommend putting these were a baby could get a hold of them because they are expensive, other than that, they are great headphones.
p630
aVI may not have bought my headphones from amazon but they are the same headphones none the less. I got them for Christmas. They lasted my 8 months before the left ear part snapped but stayed on. I managed to fix them with super glue and ductape but I will not be buying these again.
p631
aVI see alot of you guys talking about how great the bass is... you obviously haven't heard a good headphone.  The Bass and overall sound in these is VERY hollow ,  If some of you 5 star folk's listen to some better headphones like some good sennheiser or something you will be very disappointed the next time you listen to these
p632
aVThe moment I pulled these headphones out of the packaging and plugged them in, they were ALREADY broken! The sound only comes out of the left side of the headphones and it is a terrible quality sound as well. I am incredibly disappointed as my boyfriend has a wonderful pair of Hesh Skullcandies and I really wanted a pair of my own. I guess I never will at this point, because I'll never be buying from Skullcandy again.
p633
aVOk so i have had my pair for about a year or 2 now and there still going strong, I love them... I dont really like the bass on them but other than that the sound is crisp, clear, and overall just good.they are hard to wear for a long period of time(like 6 hours or so)The only thing that I really saw as a reason to mark off one star was that they broke on me(plastic broke)So one day i was using my headphones and they fell off my head onto the ground and the pastic part that makes the earpiece swivel broke so the right ear just hanged down by the wire. I really got aggrevated and tapped it but nothing sticked. So finally after a week or two went to the store spent 5 dollars on crazy glue glued it completely(used half the bottle) and now they work perfectly!Overall I recommend this to anyone who can not afford the new version.My reasons for recommending1)Good sound quality(not enough bass but not by much)2)blocks a lot of the sound from the outside3)Is comfortable as long as you dont wear it for more than 6 hours5)VERY load... this thing gets very load so when your testing sound quality put your computer volume on 35-40 because it is insane :DHope this review helped you make your purchase! :D
p634
aVI rated four stars for some reasons:First lets see the PROs:  +4 starsPros: - Very good sound quality,  - Best sound in R&B; and Pop Music  - very nice design and fit in your ear.  -  the wire cord is made like "shoe lace" so it won't twisted.  -  And most of all the price is very reasonable not like ( "BEATS by DRE" it's very overpriced ).On the other hand, I noticed some CONs: -1 starCons: - made in cheap plastic.  - bass are not too impressive, I preferred "BEATS BY DRE" if you want a super excellent bass.  - wire are not detachable But, as I heard Skull Candy have already released a new heads check it out in Google.So overall,I am satisfied for my purchased. Definitely, I will recommend this product to all who don't want to pay big $$$ for a headphone, and if you want a good sound quality with average bass, this is the right choice.
p635
aVThe plug is very fragile.the headphones worked a single day, the connector is very fragile. I bought two headphones and in both cases the fault is the same.The version the NY and LA are very bad in the connector or plug. I am disappointed of the skullcandy
p636
aVThese headphones are sooo comfertable! i never want to take them off! And they sound awesome! I take them everywhere i go now.i dont see how anyone could dislike them, and they look freakin awesome!
p637
aVAt first, they were great. The sound quality was great and everything, but after a while, only one side of the headphones worked. I found out it was because the wires on the inside were very small and kept breaking. I got it fixed, but 2-3 days later it broke again. I don't really abuse my headphones, so I was pretty mad. I don't reccomend buying these headphones unless you really like the look, cuz that's what you're paying for.
p638
aVWhen I first bought these headphones, I was excited they had really good sound. But months later, the notches on the sides were starting to wear badly. It did not even last a year and one of sides broke with ease. They were not even used everyday. I would like to purchase from this brand again but I want assurance that the sides are more sturdy and not brittle like candy.
p639
aVI ordered the Skullcandy Hesh headphones for my 12 year old son.  They are sound cancelling which is a nice feature.  Also, the volume is quite loud.  He is pleased and I loved the price!
p640
aVThese headphones are a great product to buy, they're lightweight and drown out a good amount of outside noise and that's before you turn on your music. Great product for recording
p641
aVBought a pair at a local FYE store, got to the car and they sounded awful! everything was crunchy and distorted. i realized the driver or something was busted. Went  back and traded them, the new ones sounded better. pretty decent sound, good price, and looked really good. i also liked that the headphone jack could be removed from the headphones just like you can with the beats. but these leaked really bad, and didnt have very good sound cancelation. but my goodness they are very uncomfortable. ive had uncomfortable headphones, but after like an hour or 2. with these. i had a headache in 10-15minutes. they squeeze way too tightly. I took them back, i got the skullcrushers, they are SOOO much better. and the sound is way better too. they dont leak much at all unless you crank them and are standing right beside them, and they do a great good job of canceling surrounding sounds. plus they have dual drivers, and a subwoofer! id get skullcrushers. or atleast not the hesh, unless you have a very tiny head!
p642
aVI use these at the office when I need to drown out the rest of the noise and people.  Either fire up Spotify or start into my own collection.On the plus side when you fire these up you discover a whole new side to your music colection that you've never heard(if you've only used the cheap plugs that came with your mp3 player) for not much more than the bottom line pairs.These are not fully up to par with the high end sennheisers, beats, etc.  Some people will take that as a negative, but you're also not paying the price for those head phones either.  I've heard people complain about breakages etc, mine have been rolling in the bottom of my backpack for 7 or 8 months with just the little sack they came in for protection.  I've got a fairly fat head(7 3/4 hat size, and they fit comfortably sound great.They are not specifically advertised as isolating, but you put these on and you won't likely hear your coworkers or any workplace noises.
p643
aVI bought these headphones from Bestbuy about a year ago. I put in hours of research trying to find the best bang for my buck. I came across these and i really liked the style and power so i grabbed them. About 8 months into owning them i was putting them on and they snapped... Thankfully Bestbuy let me get a new pair because they were still under warranty. All in all i am very pleased with these and will continue to use Skullcandy. Just remember to be careful putting them on. The way they feel on your head is very nice but takes a bit to get used to. Buy this and you won't be disappointed!
p644
aVGot them 1 year ago for $35 refurbished, and now they are starting to break. If you can get these for $25-$40, they are OK for the price, but you can get better. Definitely DON'T pay $50+ for them though. If you are paying $50, go for the Sony XB500, they sound a lot better, and are more durable (as well as more comfortable). If you are on a budget, and only want to spend around $25, look up the Monoprice 8323, they will have the same durability, but will sound almost twice as good for $25 then these do and they are selling at $50+.
p645
aVI recently picked these up in the store and so far they are almost just like the Turtle Beach X11's (Minus the stupidly long cord X11's have, and it doesn't have a mic). The cord is about 30" (30 inches), but the Turtle Beach X11's is like 14' (14 feet). The braided cable is a nice touch, it is also on most Razer headsets. The surround sound is awesome, I would say it is exactly like the X11's. The bass and treble is great, plus a good bass makes the shots echo in-game (I love that :P) the surround sound is great for spotting enemies. It is a great headset for the price! (I got it for $60 at the store, the 2nd version is $70) Fairly good noise cancellation, would without-a-doubt recommend to anyone looking for a good gaming and music headset!P.S. Has one audio plug, fits every cell phone, laptop, and MP3 player ;)
p646
aVQuite a few months ago, I had bought a set of these. To my satisfaction, they are still as good as new I had brought these to school with me, and I found that the Headphones can take a beating, but don't be expecting you can fling these across the room and they will be fine durability-9/10I had bought the Scout version of these, being an outdoors kind of person, and Hesh fit the bill perfectly, and they turned a few heads as well. in looks-10/10I listen to music as much as possible, mainly rock, or hard rock, or heavy metal. These make the music clear as day. I could here every pluck of a guitar string, every beat the drums threw out, and every voice fluctuating there was. I also tested other styles of music based on what I had figured a lot of people listen to today; First I tried was dubstep, The sound quality is clear and crisp, but the Bass in these aren't as strong as something you would find in Skullcandy's "Skull Crusher" model. If you want as much bass as possible, go for the Skull Crushers. I also tried orchestral music. Every song from the popular music group "Two Steps From Hell" was a new experience. I heard new melodies, and new harmonies. I heard sounds I had never even picked up on with my old set. Another thing, these get LOUD. I mean if you crank up your computer's volume to the max and put the speakers together, they will shake in your have. If you put the volume at the max, and listen to even a relatively calm song, you won't be able to hear very well for a few minutes. All together, I had came to the conclusion that these are well rounded headphones that make great work of many, if not all genres of music. Sound-9/10The microphone on this set, I had found useless, It's plug-in has a triple stacked whatever thing (One of my friends tried to explain it to me) that enables the microphone to connect to the computer using the same plug-in as the headphones themselves. The reason I found this useless was because of the fact that it should mainly be used on a cell phone, which I do not own. But that's just my opinion. The microphone for me gets a 5/10 just because I don't have a need for it, but most might.On of the deciding factors that had me itching to buy this pair of headphones, was the comfort. I would be wearing these for many hours of the day. I am a gamer, so I figured if a get good comfort, then I would get more out of them; being able to wear them longer. I have only slight comfort problems, sometimes I will get a pain right below the back of my ear, from how tight they can be, but once you adjust them to a size that would fit you, you can wear these all day. Comfort- 8/10The next section of my review is the closer, affordability. being $50, they were the most expensive headphones I would have bought to the date. To me, do to all of the factors stated above, I would say these are the choice for you if you are looking for the most efficient way to spend your money on headphones. Although somewhat expensive, they are completely worth it. Affordability- 9/10
p647
aVThese headphones quite simply are ok. They're not great nor are they terrible.{SOUND}I listen to a lot of dubstep and with dubstep there is a lot of jump between deep bass and high highs and everything in between. The highs are pretty good as well as the bass, but the mids aren't very good at all high mids are very prominent while the low mids have trouble coming through. Overall the sound is ok.{FEEL}As a person with a very large head and very large ears it is hard for me to get good headphones, though these fit very well. My fit inside of the cups even though they look very small. There is also plenty of room if you have a big head. I usually have to pull headphones all of the way out to fit my head, but I'm about to notches in on each side and they fit great. They have a thin mesh, nylonish head band with surprisingly feels pretty nice. The general construction feels solid with nice soft, rubberized plastic through out.{LOOK}If you're buying skullcandy headphones this probably matters to you and they look pretty good!
p648
aVMy husband and I both bought a pair of these head phones so that we could listen to music while in the school library.  When the head phones are on you can't hear anything from outsiders and outsiders aren't bothered by your music.  We have had our headphones for over 9 months and these have certainly held up to the test of time and the use and abuse that comes with our daily commute.  They are super comfortable, I can wear my head phones for hours at a time (which is really good when I'm writing a mid term).  Recently my husband has started wearing them outside when he is doing yard care, and they are really good at muting out the sound of the machinery.
p649
aVThese headphones were amazing. With awesome bass boosters and perfect earcups make them the best headphones I have bought yet. If your looking for cheap headphones that are better than dr dre beats.... Here is your pair
p650
aVNever had owned a pair of Skullcandy headphones before, and these were amazing, that was until they broke on the sides. Only got to use them three times before they sides cracked. Don't get me wrong, they're nice headphones.
p651
aVHonestly I can be pretty rough on headphones. But these stayed at the office and were only dropped once or twice. the really skinny piece of plastic that allows the band to be lengthened snapped (not that big of a surprise). I got mine for ~$30. I see them listed for over $100 for some reason.??? I wouldn't speed nearly that much on these even if I didn't think they would just break again.Sound quality was decent for over the ear. Ok bass, that didn't buzz or rumble too much. Decent treble. If you want to give some one a nicer (looking) pair of headphones for a gift and not be upset if they break, these would probably work great.
p652
aVOkay,so I bought these back in March for my 13th birthday as a present for myself.These things are AMAZING.They have been thrown against a 12" thick concrete wall,and other than a small slit in the side of the earphone,they are still in perfect condition.All I have to say is thanks Skullcandy for the amazing product. (:
p653
aVIt's all in the title. So they're not studio headphones. They are cheap for looks and quality. Very nice design with jersey on it. Also, they are supposed to be on ear phones but they pretty much surround my ears. The only knock on this is maybe the bass. But it can be fixed with settings on your MP3. and they cancel noise for the most part. Glad I bought them.
p654
aVThey where ok but the base was FLAT and they were super flimsy and are already after a week the leather is coming off. They were not very comfy and my head would hurt after like a half hour of wearing them. They were super big and not good looking at all.
p655
aVBought these as a birthday gift for my son that turned 15 recently. He loves them !!! We travel for baseball tournaments and they are perfect for the long car rides.  He plugs them in and away we go.  They are sturdy, comfortable and shipped to us relatively quickly.  No complaints here.
p656
aVI ended up throwing this one in the trash because it broke. And I am not a person that's rough with items. I take very good care of my stuff and I don't take them for granted. I pretty much wasted my money however small amount it was.
p657
aVI got these headphones about 1 year ago and a year later one of the speakers are blown out. They're are good headphones at first. If you get them try to take care of them cuz i think it got blown out cuz one of the wires were out. Overall they're are pretty good.
p658
aVThese headphones were, let's just say, adequate. When I first got them I was super excited because they were my first headphones that were over $30 (assuming that more money meant higher quality,) and all of my friends had recommended them to me. When I first put them on, I was sad to say that I was not very impressed. The only difference between the sound of these and some regular $10 ear buds that you could buy in a vending machine was that the bass was brought out a BIT more. Besides that, almost no difference. Even after a 24 hour burn-in period I noticed almost no difference. I must admit, I was a bit disappointed. However, I can admit that the comfort of these were alright, I could wear them for hours with no discomfort. The main problem with these though, is that they break very easily. When I say this, I mean that they break after a period of time. I had these for 5 months with no problem, but then one day I noticed a slight crack, and then it went downhill from there. After that, I counted 7 more breaks in the next 2 weeks (by now, they were pretty much just big duct tape headphones.) My last complaint would be the price. Seriously, $50 for these? I think now they MIGHT be worth $30... maybe. With all of these factors considered, it's safe to say that these were certainly not worth the money that was spent. You can easily find higher quality headphones for $50.
p659
aVOverall, I like the product. They look nice and do ther job. I was skeptical about the quality of the headphones because, other customers who rated them had negative views of the product. Pros: They keep a significant amount of noise in so that no audio bleeds out, they look nice, and have great sound. Cons: Material is a bit flimsy looking, after about an hour and a half of usage and they began to hurt the outer ear.
p660
aVI love these headphones! They are ready to go right out of the box, no burn in time needed. I have had these headphones since January-February 2012 and they are still going strong! I use them everyday and can toss them in my backpack at school and they don't even come close to cracking. the only thing noticeably wrong is the plastic around the plug is splitting, but thats expected, at least from me. Overall, 5 star headphones for the price.
p661
aVI bought the Black Hesh headphones, and I wore them for 7 months. The sound is wonderful, they are super comfortable and the cord never ever tangles. However, near the end the headphone ear cups came loose and the right one broke off with no rough handling. Since they have a lifetime guarantee on Skullcandy.com, I messaged them with my problem and sent in my headphones at their request.They got back to me within the week and emailed me a full refund coupon, and buying a new pair with it was super easy.All in all, WONDERFUL HEADPHONES for the first half year or so, then they will most likely break. However, the lifetime guarantee makes it super easy to exchange them for new ones
p662
aVThese are the greatest headphones ever they were worth every penny. The sound is amazing and clear and i love that you can hear the bass in the songs. The are comforatable and dont slide down or move. This is a great buy.
p663
aVMy son owns these and loves them.  We also own the expensive Bose headphones for traveling.  There is a slight difference between the two.  The Bose does have better sound quality and noise reduction.  The Bose are also lighter and less bulky but cost a whole lot more.  These are great headphones for the money.
p664
aVPros: price, cable is not rubber - harder to entangleCons: unconfortable, very hot, high side pressure, high bass/boomy sound, muffled/low treble.After 3 or 4 hours trying to like it, it's going back to the store.
p665
aVI bought these for occasional use on the test bench as I repair audio equipment for a living. I wanted a pair of affordable headphones that offered full range sound and a comfortable fit at a reasonable price. I didn't need a headphone that is extra durable for daily use that need to take a beating.The Skullcandy Hesh fit the bill perfectly. At an affordable price, the frequency range is nicely balance between the bass and treble - with a bit of a dip in the midrange as I expected. They are comfortable and block outside noise very, very well. The soft storage pouch is a really nice plus too.A couple extra thoughts to pass along. These are not audiophile grade headphones, they lack detail and refinement found in higher-end headphones... however if you are going to listen to MP3 audio, they are just fine. Also they did not sound good at all when I first listened to them! These do need "break-in" to sound good. I connected them to a home receiver, cranked the bass, and let them play for an hour - made a big difference.Lastly, for home listening you will need an adapter for 1/4" jacks (should be included IMHO) and watch for clearance sales on outgoing colors and styles. They are not worth their full price - there are much better headphones available for just a little more (the Sony MDR-V6 comes to mind). But when the price is discounted, these are a good deal.
p666
aVMy boy loves music.  He's only 7 so I did hesitate to buy these for his birthday because everyone else was talking about how they break easy.  I bought them anyway because they're really awesome looking and they were only $50.  I'm impressed so far as my son has not broken them and the cord is actually wrapped in some sort of cloth braid.  They're really much nicer then I thought they would be and have a good heft to them which gives me the impression of strong materials.  These are good headphones hands down.
p667
aVI got these for my 13yo son. He is one of those kids that takes great care of his stuff and we typically pass his old toys/electronics on to relatives when he is done with them because they are in such good shape.  Well we won't be passing these headphones on.  After only weeks of use the adjustable head band cracked.  It will no longer stay on his head and is now headed for the garbage can.  It is a shame as the sound quality was very good.  I would not recommend this item.
p668
aVI loved these headphones for a few months, just given the great sound.I however like wearing my headphones around my neck while i'm not listening to them, but the cups do not have enough swivel to complement the bulkiness. The material connecting the cups to the headband doesn't help either.  They are held together by a thing plastic that starts cracking and eventually breaks. Sure you can tape them up, but then you can't adjust them.Again, I love the sounds, and of course the look, but for the price, even with warranty they are hardly worth the trouble.
p669
aVthe Dwayne Wade headphones were given to me for my birthday because Wade was and is my fav player. the sound quality was amazing and the bass was great because it was loud but did not muffle the sound or cause static. the headphones took a while to get used to as they have to be fitted into. after you get used to it though it is not much of a problem. these headphones are not something you want to wear while you sleep as your ears will be throbbing a little. other than that the headphones are excellent for any genre of music. if at 75%-100% then sound outside your phones are for the most part expelled out. many other people who wrote reviews say the headphones are made of cheap plastic and break easily but that is not completely true. as long as your not yanking it off your head than the headphones will last quite a while. the designs are also amazing and there are a wide range of choices you could pick for the headphones. i would strongly recommend these headphones for music lovers.P.S.: The cord does not get tangled.
p670
aVI bought these head phones thinking that they would be comfortable around my ears...... They are not! After about 20 minutes my ears are hurting and I have to constantly shift them around just so that I can stop the pain that is caused by them. I wear a 7 1/8" hat so i dont think my head is too big. These head phones are just not comfortable.
p671
aVThese headphones were the best until a couple of days ago I was putting them on and they snapped!!!! The headband is made completely out of plastic!!!!If u want "temporary" headphones then I suggest these, if not, then get some aerial7 tank like I just did right now.Good bass, good sound, cheaply made.
p672
aVHi folks,According the price, $30, they are a good headphones. But they will be uncomfortable after some days. They hurt your ears and will lot allow you to wear them for long hours. When I ordered them I thought that they might be having some bass effects, but they really don't. So if you are looking for the music output headphones, they are not the one you should go for.
p673
aVPurchased for my son after the kitten chewed thru the wire of his last pair of skullcandy's.  He loves these, says the sound quality is better than the last pair, purchased over the counter in Aust from an electronics store.  Excellent price from Amazon, at least half of what he paid for his last pair in Aus.  Also, they look really cool.  Delivery was very quick to Aust and exactly as described.  Good communication from Amazon throughout the transaction.  Will definitely purchase from Amazon again, but not all goods they sell are shipped to Australia.
p674
aVthese are great ipod or mp3 or android headphones with no adjustments needed.  but if you own an av amp like sherwood or denon the high powered amps that put out 200 watts a channel i own a sherwood usa hd receiver. you will need two do one thing before plugging them in  if your bass is set at +5 or higher you will haveto turn it down anyware from +2 -1db or the bass will completeley overpower the headphones and you will completely blow the driver so they are great headphones you just haveto adjust the bass setting when plugged in two a receiver. the perfect bass setting for me and they still pump amazingley is -2db.by the way i never blew these they sound great its just common sense that an amp will blow these without adjustments.
p675
aVThe sound is really good. The all around look is pretty awesome too. I have had no problems with them but they are sort of fragile. As long as you take care of them they'll be great.
p676
aVI didn't actually buy these off of amazon, but I looked at the reviews to see what other people thought of them. These headphones are made very well. They work great, and they seem very durable. The cord is made of some type of nylon fabric, not plastic, so it is very unlikely that it wiil get tangled. the sound is great and the headphones fit very comfortably on your head and around your neck when not in use. Lastly, they look great. I think people buy skullcandys partly because of their look, and these look great. overall a great buy.
p677
aVTal vez no son lo mejor de lo mejor si los comparamos con otros audifonos mas costosos, pero por lo que pague por ellos estoy mas que complacido, no solo tienen buen sonido, tambien tienen estilo, si te gustan a la vista te gustaran mas al tener los en tus manos.
p678
aVExcellent headphones, but with a serious design flaw. The plastic extenders are way too fragile, and started to break just from wearing the headphones for a few months. Now my awesome looking headphones are reinforced with duct tape because the plastic cracked. You'd expect better from Skullcandy, especially for the price.
p679
aVI got the Paul Frank Hesh headphones as a gift to myself, thought they would look cool and I was right, the looks are awesome, also the sound is great but I got them four months ago, and they're already dammaged, you see the plastic used adjust the size to your head is a very cheap one, and breaks only by using them (even carefully). So if you're like me and cannot use these without adjusting the size, it will be an awful waste of money. Please reconsider buying quality semi-pro headphones such as Sony and others alike, don't get fooled by looks like I did
p680
aVI have had these headphones for about 6 months, around 2 of which they were not in use. I'll break down their features by section. I paid around 30 dollars for them.Sound: 2/5Honestly, these headphones are nothing special in sound. Upon receiving them, I was immediately disappointed by their quality. The bass is rather weak, the trebles are muddled, and the highs are unfocused. Depending on the price you pay, this may be acceptable, but if you're looking for sound alone, a 15 dollar pair of headphones could beat these. Although they are around-ear, the headphones are not very effective at passive noise cancelling, and leak a great deal of sound.Comfort: 2/5I found that after wearing these headphones for more than an hour, my ears started to hurt. Part of this is due to the fact that the drivers are round, whereas ears are not. What results is that the upper part of my ear gets clamped more than the rest of my ear, and this causes a lot of pain when wearing them. Additionally, the band is not very flexible, which creates quite a bit of pressure on your skull. However, for people with smaller heads and ears, this may not be a problem. The leather on the ear-pads is not bad.Design: 4/5These headphones look quite good when you're wearing them, but it should be noted that you intend to carry headphones on your neck, it will be impossible with these. They clamp around your neck completely, making it difficult to breathe. So if you are not wearing them on your head, you must stow them somewhere else.Durability: 1/5I put these in a backpack on a flight, and the adjuster on the side cracked. The problem is that these headphones are entirely made of plastic. Had the adjuster been aluminum or some type of metal, this would not have happened. Admittedly, this was my own fault, but this was ENTIRELY avoidable. Aluminum is cheap, and even that is found nowhere in this set. The mesh inside the drivers is also easily ripped, although I haven't experienced this. The fabric appears quite low quality.Portability: 3/5The headphones come with a nice bag, and the non-tangle cord is a nice feature (and should be standard on all headphones when possible). On the other hand, the headphones don't fold up, so there is no way to reduce their size.Bottom line: If you can get these headphones for around 20 dollars, it's not a bad deal. However, these are by no means a spectacular set. There are better options out there for the money that you would spend on these.
p681
aVthese things only have a little just a litle bit of bass but other that that they are awesome and i can hear really good with them.the sound is really clear
p682
aVI just got these headphones. they are AMAZING.i was very impressed with bass quality and overall sound sound quality. the bass is thumping but it doesnt distort the rest of the music. My brother got dr dre beats studio and the only big difference i could see in the quality was the bass. it was better on the beats.Pros: very good sound quality for the price, very good bass, look awesome, and they come with a soft carrying pouch which is nice so they dont get scratched up.Cons: they're al little tight on your ear so you cant where them for a really long time.
p683
aVI bought a pair of these and they fill the need I wanted them for: inexpensive, full ear cup headphones to use with an mp3 player. Which is obviously what they were designed for. The cord is too short for anything not within arm's reach, and do not come with a 1/4" adapter. Plugged into a stereo, or recording equipment, or an electronic musical instrument, they don't sound all that good. Very colored sound. Way too much bass, for my taste. But for an mp3 player, they fit the bill. With a little tweek of my Sansa's EQ, they sound pretty decent, and the snug fitting ear cups really block out external noise well. The large drivers make these loud, so I can turn the volume down some and get better battery life out of my mp3 player.
p684
aVThis headphones are great, only problem I found is that the cord is kinda too short if you want to use it in your computer (like really short). But everything else is perfect.
p685
aVI would strongly suggest avoiding these SkullCandy over-the-ear headphones.First, they sound terrible.  Listening to a favorite piece of music, suddenly I'd open my eyes and say "Where is it?"  There would be pieces of music simply missing.  They sound muddy and bass-heavy, and just plain awful.. especially when you have to wonder what pieces of the music you aren't hearing at all.To top the experience off, they broke!  (No great loss!!)  Flimsy construction of earpiece holders.  One just snapped (and it was under no significant pressure.)SkullCandy in general is now on my Do Not Buy list, as I consider them a rip-off.  I replaced these crummy $58 (approx) set with a $20 (approx) pair of Sennheisers Sennheiser HD 202 II Professional Headphones (Black) and all my music is back.  They're *much* cleaner, more accurate, more comfortable, and from past experience with Sennheiser they will be rugged and long-lasting.I can't imagine quite whom the target audience is.  Perhaps those who have never heard even a reasonable set of headphones?Hope this review helps someone else avoid a similar disappointment!
p686
aVMy 10 year old son received these headphones for Christmas and just loves them.  He uses them with his Apple iPhone and iPad and the price was right.  They seem very sturdy and built to last.  So far I really like the value of Skullcandy products.  I would recommend them to anyone looking for a good value in headphones.  Thanks Amazon for a great price and customer experience!
p687
aVThese headphones are amazing.  My son cannot hear a word I'm saying (which is great for him bad for me) and the sound is crystal clear.  Another good thing I noticed is the cord is wrapped with this fabric material instead of the usual rubber or plastic that ends up bending and tearing. My son uses it on an old 3G iphone with no problem.  My husband had trouble getting a good plug in and working properly with his iphone 4 w/ otterbox.  I haven't tested it myself to see if it's the cable plug in what but the quality of the sound is wonderful.  The price is low enough compared to others like this.  I highly recommend!
p688
aVBought these at bestbuy, tried them on and they felt overly tight on the ears. The sound were not as good as my JVC headphones. So I will be taking these back for a refund.
p689
aVIts pretty great. The sound is clear and i always use it when im practicing guitar.The only problem is that the sound leaks when i put it really loud but other than thatIts a great buy.
p690
aVThey have the skull candy feel but they aren't comfortable for long time listeners and there bulky and a bit annoying to lug around. They sound great but they aren't as comfortable as I thought they would be.
p691
aVI bought this for a friend and they look really cool! I haven't opened them or used them but I know SkullCandy products are usually reliable. I'm excited to see how well they work :)
p692
aVI just got these at Target on Clearance and I can't believe how sub-par the sound is on them. I just compared them to 3 other pairs of "left over" headphones I have (including a pair of Altec in-ear buds I purchased for $8 and these Skullcandys SUCK. Some of the people leaving 5 star reveiws really need to do a little research on headphones and they should also realize the great sound they are missing out on by not having a better pair than these Skullcandys.
p693
aVI loved these headphones... Until they broke and it only lasted me 2 and a half weeks! My friend had a very similar pair and they broke the same way. The earpiece with the wire snapped off. I was sitting in class and a kid knocked them on the floor and backed his chair into them. My friend stepped on on his. What i'm getting to is the fact that it wasn't designed well at that part. There is a crease at that point and now that I look at the other side I can see that is a seperate piece. There were only two narrow, hallow tubes holding it on (and the wire).Its a shame because it looks great and the sound is even better. I don't know about you guys, but I don't buy items like this for short periods of time. I wanted this headset to last 2+ years but that won't be the case with this.
p694
aVi love the hesh Heat edition. They have great padding and soft ear holders. They have great bass and have ear-pollution which means that you can't hear the out =side noise. i purchased them on march 12 and got them on march 16 which is really good shipping. they can fit anyones head and they look great on anyone. i went around asking people to try them on and they all looked great. they dave a button on them that controls the music as well they have a mic so you can talk to people through the headphones. i love them and hope you get them
p695
aVI had bought these with the intention of having great sound and pretty good bass (albeit they aren't to the point where they meet how much Beats can withstand bass, but if you're not a major bass head it's ok). When I first got them they were extremely adjustable, but no matter how much you try to keep these adjusting sides with care, they will ALWAYS break. I guess it's because of some cheap design flaw, but I overcame it because i was able to use these headphones one the very last notch, subsequently meaning i had to duct tape both sides of the headphones (the left side broke first then the right side). Ironically, this headphones performance has not diminished because of this. I say that because the wires run though the inside of the headphone extenders and the headband itself connecting both earpieces. You can even use these with your gaming system and hear crystal clear audio, even the own footsteps you and anyone else make. Overall I have to say these are some really nice headphones, design and all. Oh and the little bag it comes with for these things is so nice too.
p696
aVThis pair of headphones was $50 originally, but through discounts and promotional offers, I got them for $12.  I'd say they're definitely worth $12, but far from being $50 quality.  The sound is pretty good for the price, but that's pretty much the end of the pros.Cons: Ear cups will likely crimp the edges of your ears which can be irritating after 20 minutes and very painful after an hour; cord is very short; the headband is connected to the cups in a way that makes the headphones sit extra-wide on your head, looking a bit goofy; no volume control within the headphones themselves, you have to rely on the source; virtually no noise-canceling--certain external sounds actually seem louder when the headphones are on, albeit distorted; small amount of sound leak.Once again, everything above being said, they're worth $12, DEFINITELY not worth more than $25.  Skullcandy's $10 earbuds are a much better value and very similar sound quality.
p697
aVI love these headphones! I am hearing my music like I never have before, with a whole new clarity. Whenever I get the chance I try to get my friends to listen to music through these headphones, these are just to great not to share!
p698
aVSon loves these! He said the sound quality was excellent! He is unable to hear anything else when having them on. He loved the style and color. He said they are very comfortable.Will stay with this brand style in the future.
p699
aVi read all the reviews and my conclusion is people have a grudge against skullcandy for some reason. these headphones are perfect, im wearing them right now. the cable is wrapped in some sort of cloth-like material, i love it. the bass is clear and the highs, mids, and lows are crisp. 45$ is well worth the high quality. but if your a mainstream-loving person who doesnt care about wisely spending money, then go ahead and buy beats by dre for like 300$. i saw those headphones and my instincts instantly told me "not worth it". these however, are worth it.
p700
aVI bought these looking for a medium grade set of headphones for until i could afford a high quality set. They live up to the skullcandy name of being sound quality when compared with the price. These did not blow me away. They are simply an adequate set of headphones.In terms of comfort, I can wear them for an hour or two before getting uncomfortable. The foam does not squeeze but they are firm. It has the feel of a lower grade headphone in this area but no actual complaints.One issue Skullcandy is known for is how you have to go through their headphones like, well, candy. But they have started a life-time warranty that made me comfortable enough to buy a somewhat more expensive pair anyways. The cord is wrapped in a cloth to add strength, and they feel sturdier than i was expecting. I have had them for about five months and they have lasted, which is a pleasure.Sound is kind of an issue. The bass is impressive for a pair of their size. They have a clear treble. However, one thing I noticed is that it seems like the sound is obviously coming from the left and right (I know this sounds obvious but bear with me). Most headphones will have the effect or feel of the sound being centered in your head, but these seem like the sound is coming far from you in either direction, possibly from behind. This effect is strong enough where it irritates me but it could just be the way they fit on my head, or it could just be my imagination. I don't know.Overall they are what Skullcandy usually is: Better quality than their price indicates. The $40 I paid for them was a good price. I wouldn't pay more for them, and anything less would have been a very good bargain. A very adequate set of headphones.
p701
aVI had about 20 dollars in amazon credit, so I decided to order a pair. When I tried them out, the sound was "distant" and muted. Messing around with the EQ on my computer didn't fix the problem. Get Sennheisers instead, you'll be glad you did.Though, these are one of the most comfortable pairs of headphones I've ever used.
p702
aVI've had problems with two different pairs of these headphones.  The headphone on the right side has gone defective both times.  I'm NOT hard on them.  They just don't work.
p703
aVAfter dealing with earbuds for years I made the decision that I needed a pair of actual headphones.  I toyed with the idea of shelling out big bucks for BOSE headphones or even Beats by Dre.  Thankfully my lack of funds forced me to explore less expensive options.  I paid around $30 for these headphones and could not be happier with my purchase.  The sound quality is great and I am thrilled to have bass back in my life.  Some of the reviews mention that these headphones might not last as long as others, I just bought them a few weeks ago so I can't comment on their long term durability but they seem to be constucted just fine.  Also people mentioned them not fitting over big heads.  I have a large head and the headphones fit perfect.  The ear pieces are mad comfortable and work as ear muffs to (it's winter in Boston)!You will not regret buying these headphones!
p704
aVMy son really wanted these headphones.  We saw them at an office supply store and a big electronics store for almost $20  more.  The sound is really good and they seem durable.  Would recommend these for the teen group.
p705
aVDon't buy these unless you can get them for $5. I wouldn't spend more than that on them. I bought these and returned them within 10 minutes for better headphones. They sound distant and lacking, like the sound is coming from another room instead of from headphones. They also do terribly on trebble and are mainly midrange with some bass. They aren'y particularly loud headphones ether, nor are they good enough quality to be worth $50. You can get some great pairs of headphones in the %50-60 range (Sony MDR-XB500 being my personal favorite) and these are not one of those. I am an audio professional and have used several pairs of headphones for various uses. I was planning on getting a pair of these for use while walking for listening to music because I figured they would be loud, but the terribly balanced sound coupled with low power handling make these not only sound bad when they're at low volume levels, but become even more distorted at higher ones. They have worse sound quality than the $3 colby headphones you can get. These I used to wonder why people thought Monster Cable made the best headphones but comparing them to these beats sound phenominal, but Beats also only have the overall quality of about $50-75 worth. Bottom line is I would not suggest these headphones, nor any headphones made by Skullcandy. I also suggest against Monster Cable's audio gear. Go out and get yourself some SOny MDR-XB500's, or save up for the XB1000s or some Sennheisers or Sure or any of the other actual audio companies. Don't get these. Ignore the people saying they're great because they haven't used any other headphones in that price range. Also steer clear of Bose as they are just as terribly overpriced.
p706
aVI purchased these for my daughter, they fit well and the sound is great! My son tried them and he also purchased a pair. I don't necessarily like the graphics. Price was right.
p707
aVThis product is just AWESOME, the price is great, the brand is great, the sound quality is just really great, the bass it has inside hits harder than my Macbook Pro and other famous Headphones brands i have seen... I compared it with a Senheiser that costs over 150 dollars and i can say that they are pretty much the same in sound experience. The cushion is really good, its size is ajdustable, even the cord quality is way superior than others..!!With this headphone i can listen to really noisy/loud music without feeling pain and without hurting my ear.I recomend you buy this product..!!
p708
aVThe hesh headphones cover the entire ear making them more comfortable and blocks out any outside noises.  Since they are so comfortable you can wear them longer and have great sound quality.
p709
aVI managed to get these headphones on sale for $40 and am pretty satisfied with them so far.  The sound quality is great for the price I got it for and further tweaking with an equalizer can further enhance these headphones.  Outside noise is reduced quite a bit and is almost eliminated completely when listening to music at a reasonable volume.  My only complaint is that these headphones aren't quite the most comfortable and the cord for them is a bit short at about 3-4 feet.  They press down on your head a good amount and the pleather headphone coverings get kind of hot after a while.  Overall I think they're a good kind of middle ground headphones.  Comfort may be a bit lacking but their quality is quite a bit above other cheap headphones that I've tried.
p710
aVLow price but high quality sound and construction. I love that the braided cord only comes out of one side of the headphones! Plus awesome looks to boot! What else could you want? Buy these now, you will not be disappointed!!
p711
aVWith less than six months of use, the rod broke left and right earpiece cracked. Unbelievable that a phone that seemed to have as little lasting quality and without daily use.
p712
aVI had listened to my brother inlaw's skullcandy. I was very impressed. It totally blocked out all outside noise. All I could hear was pure music. Each and every note clear as a bell. The bass was unbeilieveable! So for Christmas I bought my brother a set. He is just as impressed as I am. He said everyone should own a set. Here's hoping for my birhtday!
p713
aVokay so i'm going to break this review into parts to make it easier to figure out what im talking about. I am rating them in comfort, style, and sound. each rating i give is one out of 5 starsComfort:****I gave this four stars because despite other peoples comments on this i thought they were coftrable. They fit over my ears perfectly and the headband is the perfect size for my head. I gave this four stars though because i've read from other reviews that the earpieces are too small to fit over most peoples ears, and i do have rather small ears so they might not fit over most peoples ears.Style:**so i gave these headphones two stars for style because they are huge and they will make you look rather dorky. They are also a lot bigger then i expected, but style doesnt matter much to me since i only listen to music with my headphones at home.I would have gave style one star if it wasnt for the cord the cord doesnt tangle and is really cool.Sound:****the sound overall i would give a four because after listening to music with them for awhile i have found they make my ears tired like i dont want to listen to things it might just be my pair though.The sound overall is very nice and smooth. I have found after listening to songs i like i have found new parts i hadnt heard before while using other headphons keep in mind though that i usually use a cheap pair of $15 headphones. Another thing to consider though is that they leak sound. They are also very loud for a pair of heaphones they are about as loud as my old headphones at were when i turn the volume to medium but if you really like loud and turn it up to full volume it has a bit of base which is an interesting thing ive never found while listening to other over the ear headphones.Are they worth the price?:Despite the few problems I found with these headphones I think they are well worth the price. I truly belive that you wont find a better sounding pair of headphones for this price. And if mine do happen to break i will definetly be using my warrenty and getting annother pair. Point of mentioning skullcandy has a lifetime warrenty on these headphones so if its a problem with manufacturing they will give you a full refund and if you break it they give you 50% back on them.so In conclution I think these are worth the price and you should definetly buy them.update:1-2-13 ive had these headphones for quite awhile now and they are still working which is amazing :) none of my headphones have ever lasted this long.
p714
aVthese headphones are insane for the money.  rich super deep bass sound yet clear and powerful.  i dee jay with them ( bedroom DJ here) and they are great and handle the bass with ease...
p715
aVI had two pairs of skullcandy hesh headphones and I'm unsatisfied with them. They look cool when you wear it but for me that was about it. The sound was okay  it wasn't good but it wasn't bad. The thing i dislike about this headphone is they hurt your ears after 10 minutes. Not only that they brake really easily. Both my headphones broke after two months of usage. But, the good thing about this headphone is that it is not expensive for a headphone.
p716
aVAll i can say is wow!! these are a really good pair of headphones, the bass doesn't over power anything. If you like huge bass that will rattle ur brain go with the skullchrushers but, if you want good overall sound quality then get these! The padding on the side are very comfortable and wont hurt ur ears. Also they are adjustable so they can fit a large head or a small head. The cord has a cord type of thing on it to make it tougher. The plug it gold plated witch makes the music sound better and more fresher.
p717
aVMy 16 year old daughter, an "expert in headphones," had been looking in the local stores for this brand. I showed her how much less it was online at Amazon and she picked out the pair she wanted from a much larger selection than we'd seen locally. She's been showing it off to her schoolmates and several have decided to buy the same pair....
p718
aVThey look great, and are really flashy.  Thats about it.I've bought some cheapo Sony headphones for a little less than these that sounded much better.  I also have a pair of akg studio headphones I bought for the same price that sound much better than these.Ironically, I have a pair of skull candy in ears that I bought for $20 that sound much better than these.  That is, in part, why I went for these.  I can't believe all of the possitive reviews.  I'm very disappointed.The sounds were distorting and the bass was weak, even when I messed with EQ levels and moderate volume levels.
p719
aVI received my black and blue pair of SkullCandy Mesh headphones a couple weeks ago and I have to say I love these headphones! I'm a college student who is almost always on his laptop (I use it for music, my tv shows, soccer matches, and sometimes hw) and these headphones seem to excel with whatever I am doing. I was worried that the large amount of bass these headphone promise would take away from the clarity of them, but that is absolutely not the case. These headphones are comfortable also, I only seem to have discomfort with them when I wear them for a couple hours consecutively and am also wearing my glasses, but a simple readjustment should fix that. The thing that stands out to me most is how alive the crowd sounds when I'm watching a soccer match, it's amazing. My roommate often watches hockey on his laptop, and he often borrows my headphones to do so when I'm not using them because it makes the sounds of the ice really come alive! This is an overall great pair of headphones, and I would definitely recommend purchasing them, because like I said before, they aren't just good for music, they're good for any kind of listening.
p720
aVThese are, to be concise, Amazing.I received these as a gift and have had them for a few months, I'm wearing them right now actually, they have performed wonderfully for me.I'm a CG artist, so I spend hours at a time working and listening to music, these headphones are REALLY comfortable and even after wearing them for a few hours (provided I put them on the right way) I don't notice them.I'd recommend these highly to almost anyone.
p721
aVAwesome headsets! For the price you cant go wrong.  They handle the sound well no cracks when the bass gets loud.  They also block noise.  I highly suggest these for anyone who wants a nice pair of headphones and dosnt want to pay out the nose.
p722
aVI got these as a replacement for my beats, but i gotta admit, I'm gonna keep these for a heck of time! Well its true that the sound clarity in the beats is amazing, but the HESH is HELL LOUD! The sound is so loud and yet, so clear ! Amazing headphones! HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!
p723
aVThese headphones give the perfect amount of bass that'll keep you rockin' all day long. It gives comfort, a quality other headphones lack. Your ears will be cushioned in cloud-like ear pillows that comforts your head better than any other headphone money could buy. Mix-Masters cost 7.5 times this much and they have no comfort at all. For just $40 you can get these headphones. They ROCK!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p724
aVLoved this item, especially for this price :) Sound clarity is good. It looks nice too. Delivered on time. Little bit heavy, so might be little difficult in portability, but this thing is really good!!
p725
aVPurpose: Something durable that i can use at work that would block enough of the surrounding sound but still providing deep sounds, at an affordable price.Pro:Deep soundsBlocks off a lot of the surrounding sound. It blocks off enough of the sounds in a office setting. (mildly noisy)AWESOME PRICE (29.99) (better than the BestBuy price of (49.99).Nice lace cord.Quality head cushion.Cons:Even extending the headphone to its maximum size, it was somewhat tight to my head (bigger than average). It is offset by the cushion quality of the earpiece.
p726
aVThis has to be one of the coolest items I have ever bought online.I got it in 5 days and it was in perfect condition. It sounds great and the price is just great.I love them.
p727
aVI really enjoy these headphones. I received them today so I will be sort of loving and bias towards them. My shipping was super fast, they shipped out on Monday and I received them today(Tuesday). They sound good and are somewhat noise cancelling, not completely, but that's OK. I haven't "burned" them in yet so I do not have a good view on the bass, even though I should point out I do want a little bump in my music since I do listen to rap/hip hop mostly, but I don't want it to be too over powered and rattle my ears. You don't need to worry about having them at full volume I only have mine at 40% and they are LOUD. They are not bulky on the head like other headphones and I love that. They were $20 cheaper then on skullcandy's website. They look great, even better in person. Only problem is you can tell from the get go how they are made with plastic. For the price though I'm not complaining I knew what I was getting. They fit comfortably on the head and I enjoy wearing them. Overall I get them a 8/10. Only thing holding back is the plastic and because I haven't gotten to experience them burned in with full sound quality and only having them 1 day. I would recommend these things in a heart beat for people wanting a stylish good pair of cheap headphones. Hopefully skullcandy expands into other sports like football and I would gladly buy another pair of Steelers!!
p728
aVSkullcandy's are awesome headphones, They're not THAT delicate, I'm very rough with my headphones because I only buy headphones that can take a beating! I bought a Celtic's pair in 2009 and it lasted me a year (My ex boyfriends pit puppy chewed them apart) after the quality of the sound and bass and for under $100 I decided to buy another pair of Skullcandy Hesh headphones, I bought the shattered Rasta ones, I was worried about them not lasting too long because the cord was plastic instead of braided (Like the Celtics ones) but they lasted until January 2012, and the pull down part broke, they still work (nothing a little duct tape can't fix) But I'm not wearing duct tapped headphones out in public, I ordered another another pair and again, AWESOME headphones, You cannot find another pair of headphones with great quality sound and bass for the price of skullcandy (between $50-$125) and with HEAVY abuse they last about a year, NOT bad (Before skullcandy I was buying $20-$50 headphones that'd last me a month or two, then I'd have to replace them)
p729
aVThese headphones put out great sound quality and have amazing drown out sound so i don't have to listen to people in the background. HOWEVER, these are incredibly delicate. One day i moved my head forward with these around my neck and barely touched them and one side of the ear snapped. Ridiculous how terribly made these things are. They're made out of plastic and a fake leather arc for the head cushion at the top. Skullcandy did an incredible job making people think that these headphones are worth the price. They fooled me
p730
aVSeriously I wish I could give them a 100 stars. They are freaking amazing. They're loud and block out most other sounds, the music comes out totally clear and awesome! GET THESE HEADPHONES!
p731
aVI bought these for my 13yo, who's very picky, and he absolutely loves them!!! The colors are bright so they don't get lost, I'm not hearing, "Where are my headphones?" I would recommend them for anyone that loses things easy. Also, the sound quality is superb!
p732
aVGreat price and good sound for headphones at this price.  Shipping time for the product was very good.  The product was shipped the day after it was ordered.  Works great with the i-pod my son has.  Recommend these headphones highly.  You can't go wrong for the price and sound.
p733
aVAt first I was a little skeptical about buying them, but it seemed the good reviews outweighed the bad. Plus they have a lifetime warranty:) I am a reckless teenager, and i break things easy. I have had these headphones for almost three weeks, and they seem pretty durable to me. nothing has broken, snapped, tangled, or fallen off yet. These headphones may not be good for the serious audiophile, or a DJ, but for a teenager or young adult with a young budget you can't beat the price. period. I love them. Let's start this off with looks. we all know skullcandy is top ranked with style and fads, so the fact they look awesome is obvious. I love Bob Marley and Rastafari, so these are perfect for me. PLUS they have a super strong cord. It's made of nylon or some kinda fabric, and it's only on one earcup. the cord hardly ever tangles. perfect design on the cord for my uses (listening to music at school to drown out the teacher). Now comfort... they can be a little annoying, but if you adjust them just right, they feel fine. at first i thought the earcups hurt pretty bad, but after a couple days the leather really loosened up. they may not be very practical for some things. try hiding these under a beanie or hood so you don't have to listen to what your teacher's saying. NOt a big problem for me, i just carry some ear buds along. But for traveling these are pretty good also, and they come with a cool little travel bag, a stencil, and a bad-A sticker i put on my phone. These headphones are great overall, and the only downside for me is the noise leakage. if your'e listening to your music at halfway volume level, the people around you can hear it also. My mom doesn't like Dr. Dre at all, so when i use these around her or in a quieter place i have to turn it down pretty low. at lunch when the halls are filled with screaming girls and obnoxious guys they can't hear it at all, so you can listen as loud as you want. I like listening to these around my neck because they're like carrying speakers around. really good sound with an equalizer. if you can customize the sound that comes out of these cans, DO IT! I listen to a lot of rap/hip hop reggae, and rock, so if i can put the equalizer just right they sound really great. Oh, and even when the volume on them's pretty low, you can only hear your music. noise cancelling to you, but not to people around you. overall, i give them a 4.5/5 for my purposes, and considering the good, the bad, and the ugly.. I LOVE MY SKULLCANDY HESH's.
p734
aVWhen I used to listen to music it was like a surface level sort of thing, I got the music in and that was that. I'd been using Skullcandy headphones for as long as I can remember and had never even considered over the ear until recently. When I first got my buds I thought I had never heard music the right way before, it was just so much more immersive as Skullcandy tends to be. When I bought this product it happened again, I rediscovered sounds in my favorite songs that I didn't know were there, minor nuances that just made the sound a much more enjoyable experience. I would definitely recommend this product to my friends and any and all consumers as well. Great quality as always from Skullcandy.
p735
aVI'm pretty picky with audio equipment and I would not have purchased these if I had not owned a pair of Skullcandy before. I purchased my first pair of Skullcandy on clearance, because I needed a basic pair for work (quality didn't matter). After using the 2XLs ( the other set) I was immediately impressed with the quality. The lows weren't over enhanced and the highs were very clear.After I purchased this pair I wasn't expecting to be disappointed and I was right. The quality of audio from these headphones is very high, especially for the price. The lows aren't over emphasized and the highs are crisp. The mids seem to be just lower in volume which is perfect for my taste.I've seen some complaints on this product and I can't imagine them being caused from the headphones themselves. I'd suggest getting a pair and trying them yourself. A few reviewers suggest that the device determines the audio quality and that's not particularly true. The quality of the music depends on the file you place on the device. Most devices that were made any time recently are built with the hardware to handle higher quality audio. If your music is 128Kbps then you can't really judge anything. I'd suggest 256Kbps at minimum and 320+Kbps preferred.The noise cancellation is remarkable. My wife was listening at maximum volume next to me on the couch in a silent room and I couldn't hear anything at all. She never knows if I have the music on or not when I'm wearing them.The mesh wrapping on the wire protects it immensely. The plastic sheathing on typical wires get pulled and tugged very often and the mesh is very strong which prevents damage on the wire.The 3.5mm jack is very small so it's not bulky. It seems sturdy even though it's very small.The wire comes from one side of the headphones keeping the wire from being across your face.Buy these headphones, you won't regret it unless by some chance you get a DOA.
p736
aVThese headphones are good on the whole, and for $30 they are well worth it. That being said, i did not find them too comfortable, as they are squeezing in on my head and causing my right ear to hurt a lot. Its probably not as bad as I made it sound, but a factor that should be considered when buying the product.
p737
aVthe headphones are very good quality construction material of good quality, sound quality is good without being excellent and the price have a very nice style.There are better options, but the brand has skullcandy headphones good enough to enjoy quality music with good sound quality.
p738
aVI will get right to the point, I only have a few things to say about these headphones after I have used them for about 5 hours watching movies, tv shows, listening to music and playing video games on my computer.PRO: soft ear pads, very nice crisp sound undistorted by excessive base, the look is good and they do wonders to keep sound out.CON: there to tight around my head, they compress the cartilage in the back of my ear and it hurts after about 1 to 2 hours or so, but I knew about that before I bought them from other reviews. If it worn't for that one thing; I'd give it 5 of 5 stars.
p739
aVIll flat out say buying this product was a mistake, its only use for me now is backup in case my main headphones die and i need to wait a bit to replace them..  I give it one star Maybe the version i got was messed up or its just me but i noticed that the sound quality for me was sub-par. sounded like playing through cheap speakers my logitech wireless headset had better sound then this did......not only that but i found it had a very small but stil present annoying feedback noise when plugged in that my other headphones did not have . to my computer.Cant believe i wasted 30 bucks (plus 4 bucks overnight shipping) for this product. Too much of a hassle for a return because then youll have to get the box sent to you , repackage it.  get it to be shipped blah blah blah. and thats one of the reasons i shop on amazon.. no hassle. to be fair its not amazons fault. either the headphones i got were defective or its just not the best product and half of the people reviewing it need their hearing checked OR it could just be that it works fine on cd players and the like, but has bad sound when used with a computerwho knows.either way i dont care Im not wasting my money on another skullcandy product again.  Besides honestly the headphones were a bit bulky for my taste anyways should have just got the replacement sony headphones that broke.  didnt have overnight shipping but i could have waited.ugh.  thanks a lot Skull-candy expecally considering i had a pretty bad day today so this didnt help at all.whatever.
p740
aVI was able to get these for 30 bucks, and for the price range, these put out excellent sound. Crisp highs, full lows. Very nice. I highly recommend them. They're comfortable too.
p741
aVThese headphones are awesome! Before i ordered them i had these headphones that really hurt my neck and i listen to a lot of music when i travel places especially when i'm roaming around at the basketball tournaments waiting to play, i don't want to have a stiff neck before the game. I highly recommend these headphones to anyone who likes comfort and style!
p742
aVThese headphones had Very good sound quality, they fit my had nicely and were extremely comfortable on my ears and head. The only reason for the loss of a star is that the sewing on the ear pads was uneven causing the headphones (when not stretched out) to not be flat when touching. Other then that,great. Not really worth 60 dollars but, I bought them on sale and they were defiantly work the 32 dollars I paid!
p743
aVMy son really wanted a pair of headsets and of course he wanted the most expensive ones. Since I couldn't afford the preffered headset we compromised and settle on the Skullcandy hesh. He was able to pick his favorite color and style and the sound is great. Not to mention that his friends at school liked it too.
p744
aVI will start off by saying these headphones arent bad, just not the greatest. Right out of the box you will notice they are rather "creaky" and feel a little cheap, however I am not too worried as they dont really feel delicate, just plasticy. Mine has a cloth cord, which I like a lot, it feels tough and its unique. The packaging was a huge pain to get into, they seal it everywhere possible, so you really have to hack it up to get the headphones out. Upon first putting them on, they feel a bit tight and almost stretched out to fit over my head. They do make your ears very warm (to the point of sweat) and for me they get uncomfortable to wear after only about 20 minutes due to them being very snug. Because of this I wouldnt recommend these for gaming sessions or media editing.Getting to the sound; at first they sound "in your face", deep bass and loud. I have read that headphones need a "burn in" period, which is basically a break in period, and that headphones will sound better after several hours of playtime. I began to notice improvement in overall sound after about 3 hours of use, vocals sounded cleaner and everything was more balanced. Going into specific genres now, we'll start with metal and rock. The vocals sound a little overpowered here and dont really stand out against the music. Also metal can become rather fatiguing to listen to as these headphones make it very boomy/thumpy. For metal and rock, I would rate them a disappointed 2/5. Next some bass heavy dub, which sounds good on these, any vocals come through nicely I dont really have any complaints there as I think these headphones were meant for bass heavy tunes, so a 4/5 on that. Now trance/dance music featuring crisp vocals; the vocals could be better and the again the beat of the music tends to compete with the vocals which are supposed to be the focus, but they do sound pretty good here, I give them a 3/5 almost a 4 but not quite.Bottom line: based on the price (not comparing these to top of the line headphones), sound quality is an overall 4/5, but the comfort and build quality/fit are at a 2/5 so I give these headphones a 3/5 total rating. In my opinion they look very goofy while worn, they do have some cool designs though. The way they are marketed makes them come across as more of a toy or fashion statement than anything else. Understand that these are marketed for teens mainly, so thats why they arent the best for adults, like myself, in terms of fit. For the price of them they are not bad, but I would suggest going with something else as there are so many other brands of headphones for around 50 bucks.
p745
aVThis is amazing and i heard about these headphones having mini-subwoofers in them. It sure sounds like it to me. For the price I would buy these over any name brand. Like Dre Beats iFROGZ or anything else.
p746
aVThese are amazing!  The quality is amazing, the sound is amazing!  I love how they come with their own satin carrying bag, embossed with the 3 tag on one side and the Skullcandy logo on the other.  I am so impressed with their built in mic- the sound quality is amazing (both for myself and the caller on the other end) and they are so comfortable!  The construction is great, the only draw back is the white around the pillowy ear piece-- being a woman, they will probably have makeup residue left over, but I could not be more satisfied with this purchase.  This price is phenomenal and the quality is so well worth it.  I have used many other types of headphones/sound equipment.  I was a little hesitant after reading reviews, but I will be gushing about these headphones to anyone who will listen!  MUST HAVE!
p747
aVin my words these head phones are horrible i got these for child and she says that when she has her iPod on medium the left side goes out and THESE ARE THE WORST HEADPHONES I HAVE EVER GOT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p748
aVThese are great headphones, I got them for my son for Christmas. They got here before christmas so no problems with them getting here late. Great sound and they our easy to use.
p749
aVThese headphones sound the best of all the headphones I've ever owned, good base and quality sound. My only complaint, and something I'd say to watch for is that they are very large and look pretty stupid on your head. Good for wearing around the house, but thats it unless you like looking like a chopper pilot.
p750
aVI bought these for my husband for Christmas and he loves them. He stated the sound quality is great and it blocks out external noise.  He really likes the cloth cord as it does not tangle or knot up like the plastic cords. His favorite part is the 'Rastas' theme as it reminds him of  his trip to the islands.
p751
aVI loved the headphones they are the s**t they are loud and sure it leaks but just a little bit and really i dont mind that at all because it more than makes up for it with the high quality sound over all i really dont see how some people hate on them there comfortable and reliable if you know how to take care of them. over all these headphones are beast..
p752
aVI purchased this as a gift for my 16 yr. old grandson. He loves them! I tried them out and the sound quality is great! I may have to purchase some for myself. They cancel out surrounding noise well. The cord design is fantastic, it does not become tangled. Quality product, well worth the price.Skullcandy S6HEDZ-058 Hesh Over-Ear Headphone (Rasta)
p753
aVI saved like 20 dollars because they cost 55 in stores, and the one day shipping was awesome. I got them just in tim in they work gre. Great buy, great performance, and it comes with an awesome free sticker. BUY THEM!!
p754
aVA great headset but I do feel that for the price of $50 there are way better things out there.Sound quality is worth the $50 and I'm sure you'll be satisfied with that. For me however, the sound is all it's worth. The headset itself feels flimsy and is made of cheap plastic. The parts where it extends tend to break and because of that you need to be very careful about where you put them down and how you wear them. If you have a rather large head like I do, this may not be a good idea.All in all an ok headset. But one you need to be super careful with.
p755
aVThese Rasta Hesh Over-ear Skullcandies are a great product. Here are some pros/cons:Pros:Great soundSturdy/durableSoft cushioningCool colorsAdjustableBlocks out most of the soundCons:Gets uncomfortable after a whileNo DJ articulationNot considered noise cancelingThe headphones come with a spray paint templet, sticker, and a black bag to hold them in.For the price, I would but them again.
p756
aVI'm going to be using these for regular use outdoors and what not. So when I tested them out, the sound quality was AMAZING. Way better than my headphones that I received with my iPhone. You definitely get more than you what you pay for in my opinion. The bass is amazing. However it does not affect the quality of any other sound in my songs. You don't need to listen to these at full volume like I normally do because they are LOUD and amazing.
p757
aVThese headphones sounds really, really good.  The only issue I have is that they are not very comfortable and after about 30 minutes they start to feel really heavy on my head.  I have a pair of SK Low Riders and while these sound better they are much more comfortable. I do plan on buying another pair for my brother because he loves the sound too! I have had really great experience with Skull Candy so far!!
p758
aVI bought these for 9 year old son because my older son had the DreBeats.  These are by far the best and inexpensive headphones that I have ran across.  Not only are they very attractive but the sound is terrific.  Trust me for a long car ride or a long day in the basketball gym these are the way to go...
p759
aVI got these headphones for myself as a Christmas gift.  I've been wanting some "real" headphones because I just got tired of how pathetic earbuds are.First the GOOD:  The sound is good, pretty much what I was expecting from earphones of that size/price.THE BAD:  Despite its padding, and despite breaking them in, these headphones squeeze in AROUND the ears too much (not the actual ears).  I can actually feel the pulse of my heart beat push through the pressure the earphones are creating.  It's very uncomfortable after just 5 minutes or so, which is unacceptable because, I mean, who the hell only wants to listen to 5 minutes of music.  I put a large bottle in between the speakers so as I'm not using them, it will slowly break in the phones so they aren't so stiff.  Even though they are significantly looser now, they still restrict the blood flow around my ears.  I shouldn't be able to feel my heartbeat through my freaking ears/head when I'm trying to listen to music.IN THE END:  Good sound, but too uncomfortable to wear long enough to enjoy anything.  For $50, that's kinda BS.  Unfortunately for me, I can't find the receipt.  If you buy this, SAVE THE RECEIPT.  I wanted to give 1.5, but I guess 2 stars from this reviewer.
p760
aVI love them. Being a DJ I know what songs should sound like and this did the job better than I had expected. They are a quality product with a relatively small price. I own some on ear Bose headphones but they might be replaced. I'll recommend these to anyone. Only reason their getting a 4 is that they tend to be quiet with certain devices, like my phone.
p761
aVThese headphones are great!  They are probably the best headphones for $32.  The bass is great and the sound is definitely comparable to beats by dre.  Just make sure to take care of them or they will snap.  There is one flaw though.  The only problem is that if you are listening to these headphones for about 1 1/2 hours-2 hours then your ears will get sore.  Other than that, best headphones I've listened to for the price:)
p762
aVI love SkullCandy headphones, but was a little disappointed at how stiff the ear covers are on these headphones. It makes wearing them for long periods of time a little uncomfortable, and sometimes painful so that I can't wear them anymore and have to take a break. I am going to see if I can replace the ear covers with a softer more cushioned cover, but if not then I will be purchasing new headphones somewhere down the line.Also when I bought these they were around $50, what a waste of money now that they're cheaper!!Other than that they have great sound, I love that the cord is covered in a cloth lining - it makes it more durable!
p763
aVI don't know why so many people hate these things. They are good cans with comfortable, soft leather ear covers. My only complaint is that THESE THINGS LEAK. I'm not worried about my cans leaking, but if you need private headphones, these aren't for you. But if you're like me, these are good headphones, with nice clean bass especialy for hip-hop/rap. I ordered them late wednesday night and they were here friday morning. Great buy, I deffinately recomend them.
p764
aVMy son plays basketball and is 10 years old. He loves these headsets they are durable and sturdy. The sounds is very clear and because he is a Miami Fan this just adds to the enjoyment. I would recommended this to anyone who loves the team and loves music.
p765
aVI purchased a pair of these Skullcandy Hesh headphones a couple of years ago, so the price was much higher back then. The current price for these headphones is pretty decent for what you're getting sound-wise.Quality-wise, these are poorly built. There is absolutely no padding whatsoever on the speakers. My ears hurt very bad after an hour or two of use. I had to resort to putting a thin piece of cloth on the speakers so my ears wouldn't feel any pain. The fit is also very tight as it felt like my head was being squished.Now onto the durability, which isn't all that great either. Since these headphones have such a tight fit, they also have a tendency to easily crack around the band. Thecord also started having issues (a common theme with most Skullcandy products) and stopped working, so I had to do without the volume-control.Now, finally onto the sound. The sound is actually fairly decent. Very crisp highs, and decent lows. The bass blends in well and doesn't distort.Overall, I wouldn't recommend these headphones to anyone due to the comfort issues alone. It's a real shame, because the sound quality on these headphones isn't bad at all. But, it's simply not worth the damage that will be done to your ear.
p766
aVWhen I was going to to buy this headphones I saw a lots of negative comments from youtube and other places but I still bought them and the funny thing is that they are 10 times better then the panasonic rp htx7 headphones that my brother has and does headphones only have good reviews on youtube. The skullcandy have better sounding,it louder, and the material that the skullcandy is made of is more finer then the rp htx7. So don't let other sites confuse you about buying this product. It is so great I bought another another skulcandy.
p767
aVI bought these headphones because I didn't have enough money to buy a better pair, and was just hoping for the best. When they arrived, I listened to them, and was extremely pleased with the quality of the audio. I would say they are just as good as Beats for a bargain. These headphones are great for a great deal.
p768
aVGood headphones basically especially for the price. Great sound, they are extremely comfortable. Wore them for about 4 hours straight yesterday and had no pain on my ears. Comes with carrying case. They aren't too bulky. Looks just like product picture which is good. Fast shipping even with Super Saver option.
p769
aVAfter looking at noise cancelling headphones @ $150-$200 a pair, my son settled on these for abou $40 on Amazon.  We tried the Dre, and to me, they are a piece of junk.  So, for $150, you are getting a noise cancelling piece of junk that is a status symbol due to the name.  I read reviews on the Dre, and everyone complained about the breakage, and they were right.  I went to Best Buy, and the floor model was broken.If you want good quality and nice sound, these SKULL CANDY headphones are for you.  I used to DJ about 20 years ago, and I fell in love with my Sony headphones and I have them to this day.  They weren't noise reduction, but they worked just fine.  Same with these.  I can hear the highs and lows very nicely and they handle the digital sound perfect.  Why spend all that money on a name, just buy these.Specs:-These fit nicely OVER his ears.-Cord is a nylon covered material that doesn't kink or knot.  It's a great feature.-Color is cool.-My 11 year old son loves them.If you decide that you want noise cancelling headphones, forget the Dre or any of the midline stuff, and buy BOSE quiet comfort headphones.  They are worth the money.  If you want a good entry level headphone, these are very good and won't break the bank at $40.
p770
aVThese headphones are great! The price was amazing and shipping was fast and easy! The sound is pretty good considering my first choice were beats by dre headphones! I recommend a pair to everyone! Very pleased!
p771
aVThis product is wonderful my children love them.  The headphones has great sound and anyone of any age would love them.  My children love the team i chose for them and they have just had a ball with this item, i recommend it to anyone!!!
p772
aVThese are awesome people wrote negative reviews are crazy. I'm 45 been listening to music a long time Dj some in my life.now don't get me wrong they are no beats by dre. But they work very well crisp and clean with plenty of Bass .........I Love. Them ....just got them today and I have had them on for 4 hours ..Great Great Buy.
p773
aVThe red plastic part on my pair is about to snap. I'm very easy on my headphones as they are so bulky, I make sure to carry them separately in my hands instead of my backpack or anything else.I haven't even had these things a year, and they're done for. I also don't use them very often, either. I only usually use them on road trips with my folks.The sound quality is pretty good for the few months you DO have them. I've also read a few other reviews with this exact same issue.
p774
aVFor such a low price, these headphones work extremely well. Unless you are very serious about the kind of headphones you use, these are perfect. I can still hear what people are saying around me when I am using them but it is not a problem for me. Sometimes after wearing them for a long amount of time they need to be adjusted because they hurt my ears. Otherwise no problems.
p775
aVI got these for my teenage son for Christmas, and he absolutely loves them. He says they are the best headphones he's ever had, and he's had a lot of them. I was going to get them directly from Skullcandy, but they were a few dollars less here. So I got a great deal, in a timely manner, and they were exactly what I expected. What more could I ask for
p776
aVI listen to music casually and these are of very good quality for the money! I'm satisfied. There are way more pros than cons when it comes to these headphones. Definitely one of the best gifts I got for Christmas.
p777
aVI just recieved my Hesh Skullcandy Headphones yesterday and I already love them.  They came with a carrying sack and they are very good for noise cancellation.  While it doesn't cancel all outside noise, it is sufficient.  The only bad thing I can say about these headphones is that they aren't quite as loud as I would like, the maximum volume isn't very loud.  The bass also leaves something to be desired, but it is pretty good for the price of these headphones.  I would definitely recommend these to someone else.  Now to see if they're like all other skullcandy headphones and don't stand up to time.
p778
aVI purchased these for my grandson for Christmas.  He was very pleased with them.  Evidently, they are all the rage.  The price was excellent compared to other online prices I found and the item arrived within a few days.  It was great.
p779
aVI bought these for my husband.  He is a huge Blazers fan.  They were $50 at our local store and half that on amazon.  He loves that he can plug them in to his computer to listen to the radio while he is working.  He also loves to use them as a hands free device for his iphone.  He has expressed many times how much he likes this product.  My only complaint (which isn't really much of one) is that he can't hear me very well when he is up in his office with the headphones on and I am downstairs.  Great product, great buy!
p780
aVBought these headphones as a gift for my husband who is loves listening to his iPod while running.  However, when he uses earbuds, he has problems with vertigo. So, I thought these headphones may be worth a try. He loves them. My husband says not only has the vertigo disappeared, but also the sound quality is awesome. These are great headphones especially for use during running.
p781
aVBRU THIZZZ THINGS ARE SO AMAZING ITS UNBELIEVABLE AN FOR A PERFECT PRICE IF U WANT HAED PHONES BUY THESE THERE WORTH THE MONEY DONT WASTE THEM ON ANY OTHER GAREBAGE HEAD PHONES
p782
aVI bought these headphones for my disabled daughter who loves music... These Skullcandy Hesh headphones were the best set of headphones I personally have ever bought. The quality was "out of this world"! They are comfortable for her and stay on her head very well.  If you want a Great set of headphones... I would buy this set!
p783
aVThis product is great! Unlike the highly overrated beats by dre, this product costs on 30 on Amazon and is just as good. At times almost sounds equal to/better than the beats solos. I definitely recommend these style headphones for anyone looking for good quality affordable headphones.
p784
aVthese headphones are very confortable and I am able to wear them for hours while playing guitar. I did compair these to much higher priced headphones such as Sony, Beats, and Bose. there sound very similar and the price is far more resonable.
p785
aVPurchased these for my nef. he loves them. the bass is on point and the look makes his friends green with envy. For the price of 36 bucks you cant beat these headphones. In the store they where 69 bucks.. great buy
p786
aVMy Mom bought these headphones for me for christmas and at first they weren't the ones i wanted at first i wanted the skullcandy skullcrushers, moslty for the bass.  When I got them I didn't know what to think of them because i hadn't look up on them very.  I had actually wanted a pair of good headphones moslty to listen to music and to help out when creating music for mixing I do like bass I'm very into my bass music and I know there are people that say that the sound sucks and that the bass is cheep and that your better off buying a cheep pair of earphones which is stupid because they have amazing bass they aren't over done most headphones can get into bass.  I thought the sound of these headphones were awesome to me the cancel out just enough sound so I can focus on what Im working on.  They are built really good they have very comfortable and i have big ears, and the cups fit really good on my ears I can listen to them for hours on in and my ears won't hurt.  also the built on the top of the headphones has amazing padding.  I also have read that they look extremely cheep, but to me they look really cool, and they also come a nice little bag that is very nice.All in all great pair of heaphones for a person who is in high school and doesn't want to spend a whole lot on headphones because I am know to break stuff very easily so far they are very durable.Beast headphones!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p787
aVI bought two of the skullcandy headsets for my sons for Christmas in late October.  Christmas morning when these gifts were opened one of the headsets only worked in one ear.  Being the the order was made early I guess that Amazon will not replace it, only give a partial refund.  I will begin buying elsewhere in my Christmas shopping plans, where gifts are not opened and tried out immediately.  I guess it does pay to shop local is cases like this for Christmas gifts.  Navigating the Amazon returns process is an endless loop once purchases are two months old: a very aggravating process in trying to contact this retailer.
p788
aVThese are decent headphones.  They are a bit on the small side if you have larger ears.  Sound is so-so, bass gets a little muddy.  For the price they aren't bad I suppose.
p789
aVThis headphones are awesome, cheap in price, and you can buy much more expensive Seinheiser ones that sound a lot less powerful that this ones. They isolate surrounding noise very well, and the bass is powerful yet not intrusive in the quality of the music. They also look great, GREAT HEADPHONES; GREAT GIFT! I use them with my Nexus phone and they sound great.
p790
aVThis headphones are amazing they sound so clear and does not hurt your ear with the music even if you put it on blast. They look really koo and they might be like the BEATS but they sound as good I had BEATS and they sound good and this ones have replaced them I am going to stick with SKULLCANDY :) I highly Recomended.
p791
aVI have had these for about 3 weeks now, and i have nothing bad to say about them. The sizing adjustments lock securely into place. Quality sound comes out at any volume level. There is a little sound leakage at higher volume levels. Ear pieces fit comfortably when they are fitted right, i wear them all day long at work. the cord is wrapped in something that keeps it from getting tangled at all, and it is just long enough to go from my face to my pocket. All in all there is nothing i can complain about in a pair of headphones i paid $30 for.
p792
aVthe shipping was amazing i got them right away. they are VERY noise cancelling and very much worth the purchase. i love having them, the cord is just long enough to sit comfortably in my deep pockets and not yank. very sturdy and very vvery good sound quality
p793
aVI bought these headphones for snowboarding and lounging around the house. I had read that there was issues with them breaking but I figured these people were just being careless. I was wrong. The joint where the extension piece operates is just fragile and cracks after usage. I had these headphones 6 months and in that time glued the piece back together 3 times. Sound is great but considering they are made and sold to be durable, they are far from that.
p794
aV### Updated 2 December 2013 ###There are absolutely better headphones available to enjoy music on, that should be obvious.  But someone with a budget, who can't spend more that a few bucks, isn't going to consider a $300 pair of cans when shopping around.  I'm going to be as objective as I can be and only review the Hesh based on its price range.  (even though reviews like these are very subjective)MY EXPERIENCE:  I've listened to music avidly since I was old enough to walk.  Oldies, soul, RnB, classic rock, funk, alternative, metal, hip-hop, punk, even classical on formats such as vinyl, cassette tape, CD, MP3 and telepathy based music (word).  I'm only 29, but I think I have a fair opinion on how each genre should sound when you hear it reproduced on audio equipment.  Professionally, I've been in a career for 7 years now that involves serious critical listening skills (transcription of foreign languages).  I won't bore you with the details, but almost every day I wear a high-end 2 lb headset for about 12 hours.  I also dabble in amateur home studio music production, and have learned much in the past years about mixing and mastering tracks on reference monitors and headphones (shouldn't mix on headphones though).  I hope that you will trust me with at least the technical aspects of this review.THE BUILD TYPE:  The Hesh is a pair of Closed Back Circumaural (around the ears) 50mm driver headphones.  The two main types of circumaural headphones are closed back and open (or semi-open).  Most likely, you won't be able to find a set of open-back headphones for under $50.  That shouldn't bother you though, since open-back headphones have an airy sound (a drier, tinny sound).  Most people who want to 'enjoy' their music will prefer a closed-back set, this allows for a typically deeper sound, with more natural bass.  The soundstage may become more cramped (because of the physical properties of the headset), but I would say people who are going for the Skullcandy are looking for a more exciting extraction of the music they listen to.  This is to say that the main demographic of Skullcandy consumers is probably those folks who want 'Beats by Dre' type sound but can't afford it.  You want bass, you want it in your face, and no less (whether its good for the music or not).  I get that, and hopefully Skullcandy gets that enough to include some quality in their production.THE BUILD QUALITY (4 out of 10): I've already seen a fair share of negative reviews criticizing the build quality of these cans.  Know one thing, something made of thin plastic is easier to break than something made of metal or wood.  It shouldn't take a genius to realize that its more affordable to build something out of plastic than other nicer materials.  The Hesh is made of cheap plastic, so it can be sold cheap.  Increase the material quality = increase the price, duh.  That being said, there are a few things to be realized.  I am a responsible adult when it comes to taking care of my electronics.  When I buy something that lacks durability, I treat it as such, and am careful with it.  Most Skullcandy users are probably the young crowd, teens or whatever.  A younger person can't be expected to be as responsible with their possessions, especially since their parents probably paid for it.  Parents, if you're complaining this headset falls apart after a short period of normal use, you should probably re-evaluate YOUR definition of 'normal use'.  A kid will probably break this headset before an adult does, this is just the nature of responsibility (in my opinion).  Continuing, here's what I think of the quality.  The worst offense, I'd say, is the ear-cushions.  They are very stiff right out of the box.  The first few hours/days of wear time will be somewhat uncomfortable until the stiffness loosens up.  I hope in time they will soften up, because I'm use to gel-filled pads with my work headphones, and soft leather ones with my studio reference cans.  The earcups are also somewhat on the small side.  I have a larger head, with medium size ears so I was a little surprised how small the earcups were when putting it on for the first time.  The head band is also cheaply made, with minimal cushioning against the head, but not completely awful.  Wear times longer than an hour or 2 could get pretty uncomfortable, and perhaps sweaty.  I don't think these headphones were made for very large heads either (like I was saying, more for teens) as the compression on my head is fairly tight.  The cable is shorter than would like it to be, its about the same length as my earbuds cable.  I would prefer at least 6 feet for circumaural cans, a cable as short as this one just makes the headphones feel more like a toy.  The build quality of the cable is also pretty cheap, and will probably be damaged by accidental crimping, tangles, tie-ups, etc.  To avoid this I just have to treat with care, like I plan to.  To summarize the build quality, I will just say two things you should expect: cheap plastic, stiff cushioning.(((UPDATE: The stiff earcushions are still a bother, and the smaller size of the earcups still lead to quick discomfort after listening for more than 30 minutes.  Nothing has broken or been damaged yet, but the uncomfortable build is still a major issue for me.)))THE LOOK (6 out of 10):  This brand (and market) of headphones is usually more about style than substance anyways.  Quality costs more, but looks cost almost nothing.  These are larger headphones, so wearing them may make you look goofy; but only as much as any pair of larger headphones you put on.  They look okay, and there are several flashy styles/colors to choose from.  If looks is more your thing, get Skullcandy.SOUND QUALITY (2 categories)1.  BURN IN-  10 minutes (5 out of 10): Right out of the box they sound like expected.  Unrefined across the  entire spectrum (w/IPOD).  But know that almost all headphones need a break in period (called the burn-in).  The burn-in period could be 24 hours of play-time or it could be 200 hours of play time.  It really depends.  At the  time of only 10-30 minutes of play time, I find it to be too strong in the low-mids and also  high-mids.  The bass at first seems to be attractive, but I realized after a few minutes that it was  actually the pumped up low-mids that sound like bass frequencies (they are just above the bass frequencies).  The chief problem with boosted low mids (or any part of the mid frequencies) is the problem of listening  fatigue.  Some headphones are so well balanced in sound that you could listen all day and your ears won't  be tired or worn out.  I already listen to headphones all day professionally, so listening fatigue is extra  irritating to me.  The last thing I want while listening to my music is a headache from boosted dB in any  part of the frequency spectrum.  It just shouldn't be there, but at $50 or this kind of deficiency should  be anticipated.  You should also know that at this point I've only tried these on an IPOD, which I'll go  over soon.  My opinion at 10 minutes of burn-in: Almost poor.  It needs more time to break in, then I'll  re-evaluate it.  24 hours (combined playtime): Not much difference...  3 months : Unless the source of music is EQ'd before reaching the headphones, the sound is going to be less than satisfying.  Plugging them into a non-EQ'd source (even a high end one), you hear the sound flaws of the headphones.  I don't think these headphones have aged very well after break in.2.  FORMATS:  IPOD (6 out of 10)- Most customers of the Hesh will probably use it primarily for the IPOD.  EVERYONE should realize the problem with listening to an IPOD with any kind of headphones: The audio source  quality is just as important as the headphones thru which you listen to it.  If you plug a set of $300  headphones into an IPOD, do NOT be surprised if it sounds just as crappy as a $20 pair of headphones.  The IPOD, while it is a great readily available media for playing music on the go, is not made for the  HI-FI and audiophiles market.  You MUST expect a lower quality of audio when plugged into it, and should NOT  be surprised when your music sounds like junk listening to it thru any set of cans.  This problem is  exacerbated when you listen to a lossy compressed audio file (usually an issue only with MP3).  To truly  evaluate the headphones, without unfocused or unknowledgable bias, I have to check the IPOD against other  formats.  As a tip, if you're going to listen to music on the IPOD with these, select R & B or Classical as  the EQ setting.  I find either one of those settings covers most music genres nicely, and makes them more  pleasant to listen to.  Bottom line, the IPOD is far from the most ideal listening source, when it comes to  audio fidelity.  (((UPDATE: While I don't think the IPOD is a Hi-Fi level source, listening to music with the EQ setting on R&B;  seems to sound pretty good.  I switched out between listening to a un-EQ'd vinyl record thru a Marantz receiver  and the IPOD, and the IPOD sounded better.  I think it was because of the EQ setting.))  Laptop (6 out of 10) - Not much better than the IPOD, with one exception: I can control a 10  band eq with most audio programs I use.  The key to using the EQ is you want to subtract the right  frequencies rather than boost anything.  This will help to avoid listening fatigue, which if you don't  know by now I HATE.  If in any program (such as ITUNES) try these settings: Boost 32hz and 64hz 3 dB,  cut 125hz and 1khz by 3 dB, boost 250hz and 500hz by 1 and 2 dB, respectively.  Boost 2khz and  4khz by 1-2 dB.  Boost 8khz by 2-3 decibels and leave 16khz alone.  This might help bring better  sound out of the headphones even if only marginally.  DAC - ((updated)) My recording interface is a USB Roland Octacapture.  Essentially it is a digital to  analogue converter.  I only listened to a few things thru this with the Hesh, so I can't properly evaluate  it.  But it seems like it would sound okay thru this, but just for listening to music or playing video  games.  It'd be horrible for doing any audio work (like mastering a track).  Headphone Amp - ((updated)) I didn't end up getting one, but I still highly recommend it, especially a  tube headphone amp.  It helps balance out impedance problems in the signal chain.  I'm sure the impedance  is low on these though, I haven't checked in a while.  Low impedance headphones are easier for amps to  drive.  Stereo system - ((updated)) I have a Marantz SR7005 surround sound A/V reciever system at home.  When I  tried the headphone output while listening to a vinyl record player thru a high-end preamp, it sounded  pretty terrible.  It lacked clarity, the bass sounded really muddy, and I couldn't believe the mess being  made in the mids.Thanks for reading folks, this is the final draft of this review.  I sold the Hesh at a garage sale late last year.  I'm very happy to be rid of it, but that's ONLY because I can afford better headphones.  I've owned Denon AH-D5000 headphones this whole time as well, so consider my bias for expensive gear into this review.  I know the Skullcandy Hesh is a cheap piece of plastic to most, especially me.  But its not made for HI-FI snobs, its made for the affordable crowd who want a flashy pair of cans with pumped up bass, even if the listening spectrum is badly unfocused.  If $50 or less is your budget, I say go ahead and try them out.  But be prepared to give them time to adjust to being played, treat them with care, and plug them into a good audio source ((or use R&B; eq setting on IPOD)).  But I would look at other brands/models first before getting these.  And stay FAR away from Beats By Dre or any other similar knockoffs (Ludacris makes some).  They are truly the epitome of overcharging for garbage quality.  There is too much snake oil in the audio equipment world, don't be the one to buy in to it.
p795
aVMy son bought these for himself for his Ipod. A great product. Eliminates outside noise completely. Well made and a good value. Skullcandy products have been long lasting in our home of teenagers.
p796
aVIf you like listening to music these are the headphones you need! the sound is great, as well as have microphone, you can use them in the computer to talk on skype ... Excellent product!
p797
aVPros:These are great headphones.  they are extremely loud and give out great sound.  on my laptop i would normally have my volume at 100% and have problems hearing it (using on the ear headphones), but with these i need my laptop around 25% and i cannot hear anything outside of the music playing.Cons:These headphones are over the ear and if they would be just a little bit farther from the ear they wouldn't start to press against my ears.  after about 6 hours it start to hurt the edges of my ears (but it may be just me, because i have some big ears).  but this usually goes away after 5 min of having them off and them i am ready for another hour.hope i helped.
p798
aVI have to say, they're just okay. They don't fit over my ears quite the way I'd like, and they were a tiny bit small for my head. So for those people who have large heads, it's not probably the best product for you.Plus, they're just so bulky. I didn't think they'd be quite as bulky as they were =/But one good thing is the wire. As with all Skullcandy headphones I've ever bought, the wire is covered in fabric instead of rubber. It's therefore more naturally durable, though if you're not careful it can actually break more easily.
p799
aVThis was my first time ordering from Amazon and I am so pleased with my purchase they are exactly what I saw online.  They are a gift for my son for Christmas.  Way to go Amazon!!!
p800
aVThese headphones I would consider average. They have good sound and also hug the ears. They problems is the wire is thin and weak and can be easily torn. They are also very fragile. Don't expect to bring these headphones everywhere they aren't durable.Pros:Good soundComfortableHug ears won't fall offCons:Wire are thin and weakNot durableCan't fix all head sizesNot very portable (even carrying around neck)
p801
aVThese head  phones are most definitely funky in appearance but I'd have to say that the sound quality isn't all that great. It's perfect for me when I need an escape but if you're walking down the street with passing cars? Forget about it. Even if you turn your ipod up all the way to hear the music you're not going to want to because the distortion of the speakers makes you want to cry. But like I said, they're perfect for around the house use and I use them all the time.
p802
aVSo Iv had these headphones a lil over a month and Iv put them threw a bit of abuse and there still intact even tho they do feel like they might break any second but they havnt and the sound quality is amazing...I love um
p803
aVBought these as a xmas present for my 16yr old sister and I'm sure she will be very happy with them - great price, arrived to me (in NZ) really fast too which is awesome thanks amazon :)
p804
aVlove my headphones sound is clear and love that i can answer my phone through headphones and warranty is awesome when my headphones stop working informed skullcandy and they replaced them with no problem plan on buying same type for my brother for christmas
p805
aVWith so many great reviews I was really looking forward to receiving a really solid pair of headphones. But I didn't think these Skullcandy headphones were as good as people said they'd be. Personally I thought it was too heavy on the bass, which I found ok for hip hop and r&b; but not really suitable for other genres. However, for the price I can't really complain though because really really good headphones run hundreds upon hundreds of dollars. So overall I'm pleased with what I got based on the low price I paid through Amazon, but otherwise if you pay retail price then I don't think it's worth it.
p806
aVFor the two weeks than I had these BUMPIN' cans, they suited my needs very well. I mean these things had great bass response, highs, lows, mids but after about two weeks, the little adjuster bar thing cracked and broke. So, I did the  thing that everyone else does, I sent them into skullcandy headquarters for evelauation. So I have been waiting...and waiting...AND waiting for them to give me the heads up that they have recieved the damn things and say that they will send me a replacement set. NOPE, I have been waiting since APRIL for them to send me at least an email or text or SOMETHING. I sent them emails and emails and emails. Just do yourself a favor and don't buy headphones from skullcandy...
p807
aVThese headphones are amazing for 30 dollars! I cannot stress it enough! The sound quality is incredible for the price. They are also very comfortable. I cannot say how durable they are becuase i only got them today, but if you take care of them they should last. One tip: when you take them on and off do it in a straight line. This prevents less movement of unnecessary parts. They also come with a pretty nice carrying bag. Also, don't bend the cord around the jack too much so the cups will still work.
p808
aVOh my gosh, do these HURT to wear! I can't wear them for five minutes before I start fidgeting. They are so tight they make my ears numb. I tried wearing them upside down and it helps, but I shouldn't have to do that and it still hurts, just less. They look snazzy, the cord is sleek, and they work but they are no better than the $20 JVC dinky ones I got at walmart in sound quality. They are nothing special and not worth the money or the pain!
p809
aVThis Product is Amazing!! Its built pretty sturdy, the material feels nice, and it fits pretty nice! For $35 on amazon compared to $50 dollars at zumiez this is a great buy! It shipped pretty fast even with the Free Shipping option and they sound great! Wouldn't mind buying another pair sometime! :) Great Product overall, the only thing is that after awhile your ears get kind of hot so you have to ventilate them a little bit! But I don't mind that so for me they work perfect!
p810
aVI got these for my sister for her birthday. She really enjoyed listening with them. They have very high sound quality and fit very comfortably on your head. The cord is also very sturdy, but I wish the internal part was made of metal rather than flimsy plastic. Overall good buy. Get it!
p811
aVThe packaging was taped back together but it was a refurbished product. The headphones themselves have been reconstructed to a degree of quality higher than that of a pair of the same headphones that my friend just bought fresh from Skullcandy. These cans are, for the price, very high quality and the build construction is solid.The headphone cord is thicker than normal and feels very sturdy and does not tangle. The cans fit tightly on the head but the head band is not noticeable and only the headphones themselves can really be felt especially if you are not thinking about them. Again, this particular product feels more sturdy than an original from the online store and it clamps onto my head more securely than the original, though it is still comfortable and not to tight. Your ears do get warn and i use mine as a replacement for earmuffs when it is cold outside but i have never had a problem with "sweaty ears" so I cant comment much on these headphones from that angle.The padding is more than sufficient although there is some sound leaking if that is an issue. Above 75% volume on a standard ipod will allow others around you to enjoy your tunes with you if they listen close but the leaking isn't significant and is easily offset by the sound quality.Bass is low and clear with minimal distortion even at high volumes. The Highs and Mids are clear as well although it is obvious that these are built for bass emphasis. Acoustic and concert music both sound wonderful and the sound stage is adequately large and deep. They are built for R&B; but i have yet to find a song or genre that sounds less than adequate through these cans. I listen to a lot of House music and artists like Morgan Page sound wonderful on these.Hesh Headphones are not professional quality and do not stand up to headphones priced in the 200+ range but for the 30 i paid for them through amazon they are head, shoulders, and body above other headphones that can be bought for the same price. I highly recommend these headphones for anyone looking for a solid mid-level pair of headphones that can take a beating and still keep playing and pounding on. I personally would have paid full price for these (49.99) if I had needed to and still would have  gotten my moneys worth.
p812
aVIve always went with earbuds when it came to something to listen to my iPod to but this time i decided to try out these headphones and the sound was better than any earbuds Ive listened to. maybe if u have used other headphones other than this than your opinion will be different. i looked for the cheapest pair of these and i found these for 30.00 which is awesome because these cost 50.00 usually. they don't break easily Ive only had them for about a few days but Ive fell asleep with them and no damage was done so i wouldn't call that easily breakable maybe if you like throw them at a wall or something then yeah they will break. Ive found nothing wrong with these headphones yet if i do i will update this review
p813
aVNot gonna lie, but these headphones do actually produce great sound. But since they're essentially all plastic, they break so easily. I had mine for only a month until the adjustable band on one of the headphones snapped in half and I had to super glue it together. And it lasted for about a few more months like that! I mean, the sound still worked and I didn't really care as long as it worked and the other band was adjustable... But... Then the other band broke where I couldn't fix it with superglue, and then the sound started going... All in all, they're great headphones but NOT worth the price. $50+ for cheap plastic. Do more research before investing in ANY SkullCandy product. You're just buying plastic and design.
p814
aVI was pretty hesitant to buy this but once i got it, i loved it. Yes, it is true that this headphones are not very comfortable and feels like a burden on head after extended use, bu, it is worth for the amount of money spent. The sound quality is great, bass effects and beats are pretty good, better than the ipod ear phones. To avoid the disadvantage i mentioned, i keep on switching between my ipod earphones and skullcandys at some intervals. Also, one big turn on is the look. It looks SEXYYYY..It also comes with a small skull sticker(Rasta) which i stuck to my ipod case on the back :) ;) Makes it look FUNKYYIt is a good buy, i find it better than any other skullcandys especially skullcrusher and GI. Great value for money.
p815
aVI recently got the "Rasta" version of these headphones, and I am more than satisfied (as always when it comes to Skullcandy).Comfortable fit (even with an earring in), easily adjustable. Sound is a little more bass-prominent, whereas I find the earbuds to be balanced, but my skullcandy earbuds hurt my ears after prolonged use. I can use these over the ear headphones all day (literally, a 24-hour period) without feeling discomfort.Great for music, great for TV or movies. I'm sure you could find headphones with a better sound, but for the price? These are clearly the winner.Also, it came with a drawstring pouch for toting the headphones around, a sticker (that you can put "somewhere cool" and submit to Skullcandy for a possible prize), and a stencil of the Skullcandy logo.I love the design, and the top of it is wrapped in a real woven band (feels nice). My family complimented me on how awesome they looked. The cord is a bright green as shown. It easily untangles (and doesn't tangle easily) but I find that it sticks to its shape (if you bend the cord, for example, it's going to stay a little bent). It's the same type of cord as the earbuds I have. It's also pretty long.The headphones are also durable-- I've dropped them about four feet and nothing happened, also I accidentally banged the two parts that go over your ear together, with no damage.All in all? I can't find a downside to these headphones. I'd recommend this buy to anyone!
p816
aVThese headphones are really awesome! I agree with all of the other 5 star comments, these are boss. If you go on YouTube, there are a lot of really helpful reviews on skullcandy headphones, especially for the Hesh's. If you are wondering if these are going to cover your ears, my ears are on the smaller side and they kinda touch the inside edges, but this shouldn't be a problem. I'm positive that these aren't cheaply made and that they ARE durable. These are sick.****************************************UPDATE!*************************************After a week of daily use for a week or so, one of the wires broke internally. Sweet while they lasted, I guess. I know a friend who has a pair of these and his have lasted a few years, so I guess I got a dud.Oh well.
p817
aVLove these skull candy's! For $30, best headphones I've ever purchased! After previously breaking MANY sets of headphones (by the plug in part) I love the way the headphone cord is covered! Worth the purchase, I use them when working by myself, at home, and taking rides to places. They block out all noise, and get very loud! If you have the money laying around and need headphones, I do suggest these!
p818
aVMy son saw these online after he saw another pair that I purchased for my older son and wanted them for his birthday.  I bought them as a surprise and we sure were surprised when he got them. They look very cool and sound GREAT!  I actually considered buying some for myself because I like them so much! I've had great luck with my Skullcandy earbuds and was confident these would be well worth the money and they are.  They fit nicely, are light, and made very well.  I have recommended them to many friends and would definitely say they are a great value for the price!!!
p819
aVI'm purchasing a set after using my brother's for a long time. I have no idea what most reviews are talking about. The product is durable, as I do like to wear them while sleeping or laying down. The sound is perfectly fine for headphones, and I'm willing to splurge abit just for a brand name. I admit they did get uncomfy after awhile, but that was because of my small hoop earrings pressing into my ears. Flip them in, or take them off. Otherwise, beautiful.My only big issue was the fact we didn't have enough for everyone in the house!
p820
aVThey are made of brittle cheap plastic and are shaped oddly. They are not really comfortable and the sound quality is disappointing. It seems that the bass is way too high. The bass overpowers and muffles the song. The cord is really really nice and the colors are even better. thats really about it. I recommend the Roc Nation Aviators by Skullcandy.
p821
aVThese have turned out to be a very good product. Ourson wanted a pair of headphones for his laptop thatwere functional, but also expressed his love for hisfavorite NBA team. He's very satisfied with them.
p822
aVThis is my first set of over ear stereo type headphones.  I've used ear buds for the past few years, and I am definitely not an expert when it comes to anything audio.  But Wow!  What a difference these make!It's awesome to be able to hear the same favorite songs in a new way.  It's like you can hear what the artist actually intended you to hear.  I walk to class with these on all the time, and they do a good job blocking out the noise from the outside.  You can still hear certain things if the volume is low enough, but that's okay with me as I'd rather hear a car coming at me than not.I love how the headphones look.  There have been some reviews saying that they don't fit very well.  I think it's like a new piece of clothing.  They definitely felt awkward at first, but after about 2 days of wearing they felt like part of my everyday attire.Durability might be a question, but I've dropped these, smashed them in my backpack and choreographed my hip hop dances with them on and they don't show any sign of breaking.  Honestly, I try to take care of them but since I'm at so many placed everyday they do get banged up.  You can't beat the warranty, and that was a huge factor in me buying these.Overall I would recommend these to a friend.  Other people might say different, but I think they look great, feel great, and sound great.
p823
aVI am a programmer and am looking for headphones that I can use 8 hours a day. I picked up a pair of HESH at target for $45. I was impressed by the sound quality for the price, but I'm no audiophile. Unfortunately, I have to return them because after just one day of use, I have found that they pinch my ears. My whole ear will fit inside the leather but it is very uncomfortable after about an hour.
p824
aVI got this delivered in a timely fashion as always, coming from Amazon. At first I didn't like them because they made my ears heat up too fast and didn't envelop my ear as I would've like. After about a week though it became better. The sound on it is nice, rap music, rock or whatever, the sound is always nice. The sound also doesn't leak that much, so you can listen to decently loud music and not bother your surrounding. It's a nice purchase for the price.
p825
aVThese headphones are the best headphones I've listen to. The sound is so crisp and clear and the bass is fantastic. Top of the line. Skullcandy Hesh's are second to none. Nuff' Said.
p826
aVAfter trying some Skullcandy earbuds, I decided that the quality of Skullcandys products was good enough to purchase some earphones. After seeing the prices of high quality earphones, I felt that  Skullcandy would be a good value. I chose the Hesh earphones mostly on looks but the specs had a little to do with my decision as well. When I received them I immediately connected them to my iPhone and played all different types of music to really test them out. Sound quality overall is good but the bass isn't as deep as I had hoped it would be. They also weren't as loud as I would have liked either. I don't want to blowout my eardrums but sometimes you just want to crank it up and you can't really do that with these earphones.
p827
aVThe sound is awesome but they break for no reason and customer service is a Gamble trust me find a better brand. The warranty is a joke. You send in the headphones and they decide whether or not the damage is something you caused. IF they determine the damage was your fault which most likely 90 % of the time they will, all you get back is a 50% off coupon on your next purchase. They keep the headphones and you loose half of what you paid for them. Some warranty. The headset adjuster is made of cheap plastic that breaks simply because you take them off your head.They lasted about 3 days. I am very disappointed in this product.  My advice... go somewhere else to buy headphones.
p828
aVAfter reading several bad reviews, I figured maybe they just had a defective product. After weighing the good and bad reviews I decided to buy them and if I did not like them I could just return them. It took only two days after I placed my order to get my headphones and I have to say they fit great. Some reviews say they are bulky, they don't fit right over my ears, they are made of cheap plastic, when you wear them around your neck it does not fit right. Well to the not fitting right over the ears I will be the first to say I have huge ears and these fit comfortably and with any over the ear headphones you have to adjust them after wearing them for a long time. They are a little bulky but that is exactly what you are buying, bit headphones that will fit over your ears. One review I read about the cheap plastic and they bought it for their child(teen) and after a few days they broke. I am only 22 and can tell you those headphones did not bread from normal wear, the teen probably horsing around with his friends dropped them and broke them, as with anything if you drop it or are rough with it they will not last. Overall I give these headphones a 5 out of 5 and they are about 60% noise cancelling without music on. I don't know what other reviews have said but when I am listening to music at half volume I can't hear anything, they are perfect. I highly recommend these headphones. (and if there is any defects skullcandy has a warranty and will replace them or if you break them you can get a new pair for cheaper)
p829
aVI've been using this headphone for like two weeks now, and so far it has met my expetations.The sound is not very loud, still it's clear, and as it avoids most of the outside noises you won't need it to be very loud.The material seems very week, but the cable (where headphones often break) is very good and flexible.For the price, i guess it's pretty much worth it.
p830
aVI just ordered these headphones a week ago, and one of the sides is already starting to crack. I even treated these headphones like glass. These are just way too fragile.
p831
aVWhen my brother asked me to buy him these I thought they were a ripoff but I eventually bought them. After he finished using them I decided to try them on and see how well they sounded, my mind was blown. Being the first high quality headphones I think they are amazing, whatever music you listen to is going to sound great. Now a few months after even I started using them on a daily basis when my brother is at school so they get like 7 hours of use everyday and they don't seem to notice. We don't treat these like they are some sort of jewelry they are always on on the desk sometimes I wear them to go workout.The build is very durable and I don't know how other users manage to break them in such a short notice, they must treat them like crap.
p832
aVThe headphones are great the sound needs a little bit of improvement but for the price it's a lot more what you can expect for, the thing is that they feel a little bit heavy compared with others that I had, when you used them for a long time they feel a little bit uncomfortable. They look really cool and most of the people like them.
p833
aVThese headphones have the greatest sound and bass I have ever heard! These are DEFINITELY the BEST headphones I have ever had! I recommend these to everyone looking for great sound, great looks, and a great fit for headphones.
p834
aVThese skullcandy hesh headphones were by far the best skullcandies i've ever owned. They expanded far enough to fit over my larger than average head, a feat that the skullcandy crushers can't boast. The only problem I have is the comfort after an hour or two. The top really pushes down on your head. Still, an overall superior pair of headphones.
p835
aVIt works well with my  laptop but when I connect this headset with my iPhone4G to play music, the music stops. The Amazon spec did not mention anything about the compatibility issues.
p836
aVNot only do they feature some cool art on the ears, but they are a great sound cancelling pair of headphones. I use mine everyday and love them to death! When people see them, they're in awe at how cool they look. I recommend them to everyone who is a casual music listener. They're not extremely loud or bass thumping but they definitely get the job done - and at a great price!
p837
aVMy mom brought me to the mall the weekend before my birthday since y birthday was the second Monday of school & I couldn't have a real birthday party & I told her I wanted Dr. Dre headphones but then we found these awesome headphones & since they were cheaper than the Dr. Dre ones & more cool looking she got me those instead & now just yeaterday I noticed once I got on the bus that 1 of the speaker things was loose but figured it'd be fine so i continued to use them for thr next few hours but 2 or 3 hours later the speaker thing came almost completely off only dangling from the cord. I don't use them roughly or anything, I a very careful with my stuff, in particular any thing that was given as any kind of present 9especially if it's as awesome as these headphones. These are sound canceling and even have some sort of blue tooth in them so u can talk on the phone for ages without having to unplug them and putting ur ohne 2 ur ear. They are extremely comfortable and fashionable looking even come w/ a bag that I find a waste of money, since I only ever used it for about a week and got sick of it & now only plan on using it when I pack my headphones for a trip or something. Anyway I went to a cousin's place and she was able to glue the speaker thing back on & said I had to wait 24 hours to use them again so I am going 2 try them out & see how it goes, hopefully I wont have 2 buy a new pair of these. :(
p838
aVThey are really stylish. The only down fall is the cheap plastic. My last pair broke and i tried to order more on skullcandy,they were discontinued. I was lucky to find them on here though.Other than that they deliver in every aspect.
p839
aVI'm really not that hard on headphones. I'm not dancing around in them and people don't come over and use them. I use them for my work doing transcription. I am very disappointed to have to report that already -- in less than six weeks' time -- the right side earpiece is breaking off. Guess I'll have to go back to paying a lot more for headphones that will last for a decide amount of time.It's too bad. I had no problems with the sound and I think they are cute -- but breaking so easily just ain't cool...!
p840
aVI have a large head, and med ears, these fit over them perfectly. The sound quality is well balanced. They are not over bassy but have some kick to them. Good full sound.
p841
aVSkull Candy's headphones are like no other I have seen, they have a variety of interesting designs that stray from most competitors. But have they sacrificed physical quality for an appealing look? I must admit I really brought these headphones because of the awesome design and I have heard some good words for the actual sound quality which was quite promising and true.Although the setbacks that made me think "Why didn't I read a review like this one" was that upon sleeping in my SOFT bed full of PILLOWS with the headphones on I woke up in the morning to realise the frame supporting the two earmuffs together had suffered a gut wrenching crack. The headphones are still usable and it isn't much of a problem, but if I were to accidentally bend the frame any more it would surely snap. Now you could probably point the finger at me and say I could of rolled around too vigorously at night which would of snapped it, but I have read quite a few articles online by a simply Google search to use as my evidence of a poor quality frame. The major problem I see here is that Skull Candy is a well known brand and should live up to its expectations, in Australia you have to pay about $135 dollars at the local skate shop for these, I'm just glad I got them for an awesome price at Amazon.Now my half hast attempt is to try warranty them at Skull Candy Australia, if I get rejected it won't be a big deal. Now if I were to have brought them from the local skate shop here I would of surely had to tie a slipknot out of the audio lead and kick the chair.
p842
aVI am a HUGE fan of The Miami Heat and ofcourse Dwyane Wade. as soon as i saw my friend with them on my bus i said, i gotta get myself a pair! i went to stores in dolphin mall and stuff but they were 60-70 $$$ i found that a little too much so i went on amazon.com and i found a great price for only $31.40!!! i got my credit card and ordered them right away! i got them today they r great headphones, the bass is amazing! the style is cool, and the headphones r just plain awesome! i gotta say it feels cheapy and crappy but not if u take care of everything thing like i do. i dont even let my parents nor my sister hold them. they r delicate so dont rip them off ur head or u'll get wat u did...rip them off...but overall i'd give them a 4.5 awesome headphones i highly recommend these!!!
p843
aVThese are the best headphones I have ever bought. The sound quality is pretty good and the bass is awesome cause it doesn't overpower the whole sound. I would recommend these to a friend and I am already saving up for another pair
p844
aVthese head phones are great my friend has a pair of dre beats and these arent quite as good but they are amazing for the money they fit superb are comfy and the sound quality is AMAZING for the price i was blown away with the quality and the price the sound cancelation isn't perfect but it is pretty decent the bass is as good as you can get in headphones without a subwoofer amp thingey if your looking for more bass look at skull crushers but overall these are amazing im not too concerned i take good care of my headphones and if you do that you shouldnt have a problem with breaking plus theres a lifetime warranty :)Skullcandy Skullcrusher Over-the-Ear Headphones (S6SKDY-119) - Blue
p845
aVNeeded a new set of headphones. But I'm not made of money. There are more important things in life than to have the ultimate iPod experience. These ears sound excellent and they didn't break the bank.
p846
aVSo I got these for a 13 year old as a birthday present. So far it looks stylish as I got the "Dwayne Wade" Edition. The cloth is cheap looking but solid. The only place that really concerns me is the plastic adjustable part that allows your headphones to get smaller or bigger. It seems pretty easy to snap....even a 13 year old could do that. Anyways I just got it a week ago and the sound is good. Bass is solid and higher pitch parts are above average. Make sure you leave some breathing room for year ears though. They are very tight and easily make your ears sweat. Overall I would buy this item again as it was only $31. Although no Bose, I may just buy 7 of them to equal the amount I paid for my bose :)
p847
aVMy son bought these and loves them...Mom...listen to this! Of course he's now sequestered in his room and I wonder when I will see him again. (I'll save on food). He was proud I saved him some money by finding them on amazon instead of ordering them directly.
p848
aVI got it for my brother for his birthday and he loves the headphones and I have tried it as well and its a good product. The sound is great and I like the look of the headphones as well.
p849
aVI ordered these earphones for my son.  He seemed to be very pleased with them as they are always around his neck.. The quality of the sound is absolutely top notch.. They were so popular in this house that I had to order another set for the younger sister.. Very cool!  Greenbean
p850
aVWe got these headphone for me to run with and just to listen to music at home. For the price the sound is fantastic and the bass is awsome..would hightly recommend them
p851
aVAt first, I loved my Hesh Skullcandy Metallica headphones.  With the tight ear pads and in-line volume control they were the perfect match for my treadmill TV watching.  However, because the sliders for the headphones are plastic they cracked and became broken.  Now my headhphones are useless.So even though in the short-term I enjoyed them, they did not last without breaking.  In looking at the Skullcandy website, I noticed that most of their overear headphones have plastic sliders.  This is something that clearly needs improvement.
p852
aVThese headsets are great for the price!!!  The highs and lows on these headsets are outstanding.  Most importantly, there is no bleedover as others around you don't hear what you're listening to.  Will see how long they last me.  I would recommend these headsets to another.
p853
aVSkullcandy Hesh is a very good quality. I was very satisfied with my purchase even after a couple months of use. However, these headphones are not very comfortable for prolonged listening sessions. The plastic headband is soft. Later I noticed a small crease on both sides. This crease continued to grow until the cups completely dislodged and held on by only copper wires. However, the headphones failed during the return policy period, so I got refund thankfully. I would buy HESH again if Skullcandy improves in the plastic quality.
p854
aVthese are some of the best headsets i have ever bought and the padding is awsome and the bass is the best and another thing i like about them its like theres nothing in the room bt music because with those normal earbud headphones you can almost hear everthing in the hole entire building
p855
aVThese headphones are just fantastic. I was hesitant to order them at first because I ha know nothing about them. Once I got them i instantly loved them great comfortable feel. Adjustable and amazing sound quality. Also not a pair of headphones either. what else could you want in a pair of headphones?
p856
aVheadphones are great! provide just enough bass to love the song and still understand whats being said. For $38, I feel as though I got a great deal. Only problem if I had to point one out would be that your ears do get hot after wearing for a while.
p857
aVMy opinion about these headphones - they are very good. The sound quality is great. They are comfortable ,too.I am really enjoying them! Plus,I'm a D. Wade Fan , which makes them even better for me.
p858
aVI've owned a lot of headphones and this isn't one of my best pair but they are great. They have amazing bass that rocks your head, great sound quality, and amazing look. They feel great to put on and I just love listening to music with them.
p859
aVGood product for the money. Sound quality is good, I like the rope feeling cord, and the noise cancellation is fine if turned up at least halfway. The only real problem is that they leak a pretty good bit but I only use mine when I'm alone so that doesn't bother me. Overall a good product and if looking for a solid pair of over ear headphones less than 50$ then this is a great item to consider.
p860
aVThis brand was suggested by a cousin of ours, i have never heard of it before and to be honest did not expect much for the price paid, however, its build is acceptable(could improve a little) but its sound and fidelity is simply outstanding to the point that it makes me think that it does not make sense to spend more than $40 for any stereo headphones.Bought them for my 11 year old son and he is thrilled.
p861
aVI wasn't thrilled with these for a couple of reasons. 1) the sound quality wasn't as good as I expected, some of my skull candy earbuds sound better than these did. 2) The quality of the materials used to make these is awful! the extensions (so that you can adjust how they fit on your head) snapped off within the first couple of weeks)
p862
aVI just received these in the mail today-safe to say this was a pleasant surprise to come home to. Anyways so i checked out the reviews and i must say i was amazed. before buying these i read all types of reviews from amazon to best buy to skullcandy itself and upon trying them myself i give it a solid 5 stars the quality of the sound is great the bass is clear and on point the drops you hear them wetter than rain. the durability appears solid as they are well manufactured and so long as you take care of them they shall last you- but then again all electronics are that way no?So i'll finish with this; if your on the fence about purchasing this product cause of the few bad reviews or on the fence in general i say GO FOR IT!! any fan should have this as its a great way to support as well as listen to your favorite jams. lastly these are $60 headphones available for 30-35 thats a steal in my opinion! NYK 2012!!!
p863
aVNice huge headphones with very decent bass and a pretty solid build. Cord is short, but I like that because I only use it for my computer while I do HW. Cheap and decent headphones.
p864
aVLet me first state that I am a Radio DJ and an audiophile. I know how good headphones sound and I know how bad headphones sound. Normally low-budget headphones provide decent sound quality. After owning a few pairs of different Skull Candy headphones, I can honstly say that they are all just gimmicks. The 2011 Hesh headphones sound terrible. They sound extremely flat and the bass is virtually unnoticable.  As I just stated, I know how bad headphones sound and for Skull Candy to market these as premium headphones with 50mm drivers is complete BS. I have listened to a complete multitude list of songs and albums set at different kbps and genre and each song sounded terrible with these headphones. A cheap pair of Sony headphones sound way better than any Skull Candy product.The only genre that sounded better than Apple earbuds was Rap/Pop/Dance/Electric. Rock music sounds awful with these. So if you generally don't care and want to look cool, by all means waste your money on Hesh.For similarly priced headphones I would recommend Sennheiser HD 202  II Professional Headphones (Black) for these have the best overall sound for entry level over-ear headphones. Trust me, AVOID SKULL CANDY!!
p865
aVThese headphones HURRRRT!!! to wear. They are extremely uncomfortable. The sound quality is decent enough but the build of these headphones is terrible. The chord will wear through at the base where it plugs into your audio device. Skullcandy has great headphones, this product just isn't one of them.
p866
aVI work in retail and stock various priced headphones, in and over ear. I have tried many of them out. The hesh's have to be the best sound for the price of all the ones I've tried. The construction isn't top notch, as 6 months after buying part of it broke so now the left ear piece is a lil flimsy, but it is still held together and manageable. Will def buy another pair. The price and sound quality is Uhhhhh-mazing!
p867
aVI have been using these headphones for approximately one month now, and I am pleased with my purchase.  The sound quality is some of the best I have ever had for paying $35 dollars for headphones, and is an incredible improvement over the $30 (vastly overpriced, and utterly crappy) Apple ear-buds. They have the typical good quality of parts that Skullcandy is known for, and they feel solid and fairly sturdy. These headphones DO NOT have any significant noise cancellation when you are not listening to music, but they were not advertised with that capability, so I was not expecting much. When you are listening to music you hear almost nothing else. My only complaint with these headphones is that, because I have a rather large head, they put some pressure on the top of my head, which can get uncomfortable over time, but it is not anything serious.Overall, this is a great product and an excellent purchase for anyone looking at budget headphones. I absolutely recommend these headphones.
p868
aVi absolutely love these things they sound amazing and at only 30 bucks where can u go wrong? They are not poor quality in any aspect i think they are very well built and the sound does even the most complex sounding song justice!!!
p869
aVMy husband bought me these headphones for Christmas 2010.  I'm an administrative assistant and use them for work.  To avoid my headphones getting lost or broken during my commutes, I keep them under lock and key in my desk at work.  I take extremely good care of my things.You can imagine my surprise when both of the headband adjustments cracked and broke by February.  Mind you, I don't even adjust the headband because they fit find without it.  The material is a cheap thin plastic.  I went to the Skullcandy website to see if I could get a replacement set and I did.  Only that the replacement set took nearly a month (March)to get back and I had to pay for the shipping, which was not reimbursed, about $8 and some change.  The first time, I'll give them the benefit of the doubt. However it is now August and guess what?  The same headband adjustment material, that had already begun to crack in July, has broken yet again. If you're keeping count that's 2 sets in less than 9 months.I'm contemplating on sending them back again, but what would be the point?  Eventually, I'll have to continue sending them back and spend more on shipping and handling than the damn headphones are actually worth. I feel bad for my husband that was laid off last year, because it took him a few months to save up to get them for me so he'd have something to give me on Christmas.Wait there's more! The headphones are cute and I find them reasonably comfortable but the noise leaks...a lot.  On days I don't want to wear the headphones I could easily use them as speakers with my iPod volume at less than half way and that's not a compliment.I would not recommend these to anyone. I find that they are banking on a trendy brand name and designs, other than that the quality is terrible.  Do not buy.
p870
aVMy cat killed a pair of Sony studio reference headphones and I was in desperate need of a pair of over ear, middle of the road price range headphones.  I found these on sale from here and was stoked when they arrived.  I was pleased with the design up close, and they sounded decent.  Not as as much deep bass as my old Sony headphones, but punchy enough to get passed it.  They started out a bit tight but loosened up over time and the ear pads were comfy. The sound isolation was good enough to block out most noise but not all.  The problem is the durability. The cord is tiny and feels as if the slightest tug will sever the wires and instead of making the adjustable part(which IS the stress point on these) out of metal, they used plastic.  3 good months of usage and they snapped  right above the ear... bummer.
p871
aVthese headphones came 2 days earlier than scheduled so that was and upside when i got them i quick opened the box and opened it  i put them on plugged them in and the sound quality was great also it blocks out the surrounding sounds very well. then i plugged them into my iPod and when for a bike ride i couldn't even tell there was wind because of how good it blocks it out finally there one of the most comfortable pair of headphones ive ever had.... ive tried beats by dr dre but i prefer these over them
p872
aVFor the small amout of money i paid for it, i guess you get your moneys worth. The sound is good, as well is the noise canceling. The one that that urked at me, was how small the headphones where. The ear piece did not fit around my ears very well... In fact there increadbly small. They only seem to fit my 9 year old brother, and then its still kind of tight. Just keep that in mind when you purchase this item.
p873
aVPlease read this before buying!! These are my SECOND pair of skullcandy over the ear headphones. The first ones where the foldable subwoofer model and they broke after about 6-8 months of use. I chalked it up to coincidence and concluded they must have been weak because they were collapsible. So I purchased this pair here, treated them like they where made of glass, and they are still already fracturing after less than a MONTH of use! The plastic part where the ear piece slides up and down is what has started to crack, causing one ear piece to be much less snug than the other, and I KNOW it will eventually just snap off just like my previous pair did. Learn through my experience - DO NOT BUY SKULLCANDY. They look awesome and sound great but WILL BREAK ON YOU IN LESS THAN A YEAR OF REGULAR USE, EVEN WITH THE MOST GENTLE OF TREATMENT.
p874
aVFor me, when a head phone costs more than $50, it better be good. I bought these at the store for $50 after my other headphones broke. I like these big ones, but they are kind of hard to find in stores. Its mainly just ear-buds they sell, which i don't like.I bought that and Sony MDR-ZX100 Headphone for $20, so i spent about $70 on both headphones. Anyway, I tried Candy first, because they were bigger. I was disappointed that it didn't come with a audio enhancer on the cord. My other pair (that broke), for $30 came with this feature (they lasted about 5 years or so). I put them on, and they fit my head very well, and your ears just slide right in.I turned it on (my MP3 player), and noticed it sounded different than my other ones. It sounded lower quality than the one i replaced it with, so i fiddled with the custom setting on my mp3 player, ect. It still sounds off to me, like the songs are low Q or something. If it makes any sense, it sounded like a triangle in terms of how the music is distributed. The lower stuff, guitars, ect, come out on both ends of the head phone and sound further apart (stereo), and to me, more balanced, but the vocals and drums are at the top, and sound like they are more mono, like a focal point, which bugs me. I guess if you like this set up get it, but the other headphone i bought, Sony MDR-ZX100, are square, as in, it doesn't sound mono, and everything is stereo and balanced, rather than having a middle-like focal point.The cord is short, but very light, it looks like a string, which is nice. It doesn't look like it will tangle or knot easily. It should have came with a sound enhancer for $50. IIRC, the one that does come with a sound enhancer is like $70 or something crazy.It comes with a stupid sack case thing, and a stupid sketch thing, just to raise up the price probably, I could have lived without both. These will be my backup head phones, and Sony's will be the main stage for now.TL;DR[-]Overpriced[-]Doesn't come with a sound enhancer[-]One cord coming out of the left side[-]Comes with a stupid carrying case[-]Drums and Vocals sound mono (like a focal point or something)[-]Other instruments sound stereo[-] I like the design with the skull[-]Short cord[-]Cord isn't heavy or bulky, but very thin, string-like[-]feels cheap[-]Light (as in, not heavy)Overall, its ok. It comes down too, if you like the focal pointing or the drums and vocals sounding mono or not. Not bad, i like a few thing, but the focal point kills me. Also, its very expensive, and doesn't come with a sound enhancer.
p875
aVI bought this item for my son but it does not appear very durable because in a few days the narrow part of the head piece snapped. I do not feel I got value for money.
p876
aVthe sound quality in this headset is great it is sturdy and a great design the only thing i have a problem with is how it fits on my head. i use them when im on my computer and after about 30 mins i have to re-adjust them they have caused headaches. mainly just fix them every so often and there wont be any problems. overall quality and sound is good but the fit could use some tweaks
p877
aVMy 15 year old begged for this headset. Delivery was prompt (actually earlier than expected) and my son was elated. He never takes them off. He says they are comfortable and no matter where he goes he gets compliments and requests to know where he bought them.  Great product!
p878
aVI bought these hoping I could get a descent pair of headphones for $50 at best buy.  At first feel the plastic feels cheap, and the ear pads are stiff and not very soft.  They fit very tight on my head, it was very uncomfortable to wear even for a short period of time.  My hat size is usually a 7 1/2.  I returned them and picked up the phillips o'neill stretch headphones from amazon, and they are extremely comfortable for my big head.
p879
aVthese are great headphones. they look awesome but they hurt alittle when you have them on for a while. i had mine for 5 months and so far only the part that you pull to make it longer broke. i super glued it and it still works amazingly. i definitely would recommend just take care of them!
p880
aVwithin a few days of receiving my headphones one of the speakers stopped working. Amazon was great and had a new set to me before the broken set was back in their hands , the problem is after only one week the replacement headphones died too!!
p881
aVI was initially scared to buy these headphones because of reading so many reviews of them being bad build quality, but I ended up getting them anyways.  After using them for a day, I am very impressed.  They look and feel awesome.  They also sound amazing. Overall I am very satisfied buying these, especially at $30.  This is an absolute steal.  I highly recommend getting these.
p882
aVThe old problem with these headphones I have is the short chord, but that is a personal preference. These are great for the price, I am going to order another pair as a gift.
p883
aVI was quite disappointed when I received these. They are too small, WAY to small. The sound is actually not THAT great. I would probably not suggest these to anyone. I find the earbuds are much better in sound.
p884
aVafter i saw this headphone on amazon i say i have to get them. i now have 2 moths with the headphones and they still work great, shipping and handling was amazing because they came within 2 days. i sincerely recomend this headphones to anyone who like good quality music and loves dwane wade. the bass is sick, expecially if used with iphone or ipod.
p885
aVI purchased these headphones from my local F.Y.E store. I got them on sale for 35 bucks thinking they'd be great for just listening to music. I didn't need any high quality headphones at the time, so I figured these would be perfect. And to be honest, for a few months, they were. Right out the box, they were especially louder than any other headphone I've tried! The 50mm drivers are to thank for that, even though these are the only 50mm headphones I have ever listened to. The sound quality served my needs quite well. But these were my second pair of Skullcandy headphones that broke. I won't go into my first pair's experience but this pair was different.I was listening to them at high volume when all of a sudden the left driver started cracking, so I took them off to see what the problem was. I tapped on the outside of the left cup and the speaker stopped working immediately and it hasn't worked since. These headphones were nice and they were loud with quite a lot of bass, but I doubt i will be buying anything else from Skullcandy for a while, sadly. The reason I gave this product 4 stars is because of its loudness and its sound quality which, to me, sounded remarkable. Great product while it lasted.
p886
aVAll i can say is wow... Being from a company like skullcandy I had high expectations for this product, iI decided to go with a more expensive, but not the most expensive pair they had. Turns out I wpuld have been better served if I had just set my money on fire. The pair of... Well i guess you can call them headphones arrived late, no suprise there, but the box it came in was HUGE!! No wonder my shipping required a second mortgage! And when I opened this huge box i see the heaphones in this weird plastic, with zero packing material of any kind, apparently $40 shrink-wrapped heaphones will be fine if they are able to fly all over the huge box in transit. I finally get the headphones out, and i can already feel what other reviewers have commented on, its cheap, brittle plastic, from the pictures it looks like it would be somewhat durable, but once you feel them you know they arent going to last. They only fit my head when fully extended, and even then they are very snug and uncomfortable. The only reason they are called noise cancelling is because the thick padding fills in your ears and ruins the music, sounds like im listening to my music while under water. The ear pieces are too small, and make your ears sweat and hurt after 10 minutes or so. I DO NOTRECOMMEND TO ANYONE!!!!! This $40 something pair of headphones are made to fit children and the quality feel like it was made BY children!
p887
aVBefore I bought these headphones i read tons of reviews about them because my music quality is really important to me and i wanted to make sure i was making the right choice. With these headphones, i made the best choice without a doubt. I've read reviews about how they hurt you're ears and are uncomfortable. I'm sorry, but thats a bunch of bull. They are extremely comfortable and i can wear them for hours without any problems what so ever. The music quality is very very impressive, i love using them whenever i can. The bass in them is fantastic, but also isn't overwealming and does not distort the music. If you love enjoying your music, and are looking for a quality pair of headphones, you've found them. And for $35-$45 are you kidding me? enter your credit card number right now and get these headphones. The only problem you should have is deciding what color you should get. Enjoy!!
p888
aVThese aren't bad cans but they don't surround your ear and are very uncomfortable. Only reason I got them was a warranty replacement. My sennheiser hd 202's sound 10 times better and were only $23. If you are used to good sounding music these aren't for you. If you wanna look cool have at it lol
p889
aVI love these head phones! Their so stylish and compared to my last earbuds, have amazing sound and are comfy!PROS:Pretty comfortable, i bought them on sale so for 35 bucks they have amazing sound! The noise blocking is pretty good, it depends on how close you are and how loud it is and stuff but its good. I LOVE THE CORD! Its amazing! It never gets tangled, and also makes for a nice toy to play with when im bored in the car! The padding on the sides and top is very nice too.CONS:Well along with style, they dont look the best sitting on the top of your head cause they look kinda flat. Its hard to explain but they dont look super awesome if you wear them normally. but who really cares. Umm it does leak sound, but its not bad. as long as you dont have your music blaring its okay. and again it also depends on how close someone is to it for them to be able to hear it. The only other thing is they kinda suction to your ears and it gives me a little headache after a while.But overall these headphones were worth all the money! Annnnd as a plus it comes with a carrying bag and a skull candy "Skull" cut-out! I put mine on my laptop:)Hope this was useful! It was also my first review! ^,^
p890
aVI am a 15 year old kid and I bought a pair of skullcandy skullcrushers a couple months ago and they still work perfectly but I just got the hesh yesterday and I would like to say for 34$ it's an amazing deal it has great sound quality and the bass is tight. They do cancel out voice very well and I Do prefer these over the skullcrushers because it has better sounding bass and the sound quality is almost the same and that's a 20$ difference plus te hesh feel more durable but what sucks the more u adjust them the more stress there is at te top of the headband and they stay on your head great! My problem is that I have big ears and it doesn't completely cup my big ears but oh well I would still recommend these to anyone on a budget (like I am) but if u pay over 45$ for these go with sony headphones or sennheiser. Oh I almost forgOt they do leak some sound not a lot but I mainly use them to run and to ride my bike and they are great!
p891
aVI love the game of basketball & also love music, so this was a nice pick up for me.The shipping was great, fast and on time. The product itself was amazing the sound quality is great.Looking forward to buying some Miami Heat Skullcandy's also.
p892
aVThese headphones have changed my perspective about over the ear headphones. I used to not like them because no matter how much you would turn up the volume you could still hear people talking. Now with the NBA headphones with just putting them on it is hard to hear people talking. Then as soon as you start playing music it is like that is the only sound in the world because that is all you can hear. All in all the Dwayne Wade NBA Skullcandy Headphones is the greatest headphones I have ever purchased.
p893
aVI've been using earbuds for a while now and I forgot what music sounds like! Can - type headphones are way better for music. These Headphones from Skullcandy are perfect and the price is just right. Cheers!
p894
aVI was thinking about getting these headphones for a while. I had owned many pairs of skullcandy headphones and they had usually lasted me a long time. I wanted to upgrade to a pair of studio-like over ear headphones and it came down to the skullcandies and the beats by dre. Although the quality is lower than the beats in both sound and comfort, these headphones do a great job for a great price. The Beats are better than these, however they are not superior enough to justify the price. If your looking for a solid pair of headphones all around, then these are for you. They are light weight, sturdy, and block out sound (great for buses, trains, crowded areas). Little discomfort on ears due to them pushing on your ears, but you will break them in. Like I said for the price, you can't go wrong.
p895
aVI bought these upgrading from the apple default buds and obviously anything will be an upgrade from those awful things. For the money these are great, the sound is decent (much better than my original buds), the bass is decent...not crazy over doing it and the build is very nice. I'm glad I bought these because for the money I spent on them I upgraded. Who wants to spend $300 dollars on headphones anyways these days?
p896
aVThese are a pretty standard headphone. The have Great bass response and ok mids and treble. You wouldn't want to use them to try to do a studio rough mix, but they make decent reference headphones. They're also great for the Airplane, car trips, or just Ipod listening. They're pretty comfortable, however the vinyl ear pads can get a little sweaty with extended wear. They do not isolate sound really well. I will give them the fact that they're not advertised as noise cancelling so this was less of an issue for me. The only real issue I have with them is that the adjustment bands on the side are cheap plastic.After about 4 months of standard use they're to the point where I have to have them replaced. I called Skullcandy and they set me up with an RMA no problem. The only downside is that you have to pay the shipping to them.
p897
aVAs soon as I opened the headphones, there was a rattling sound coming out of the left earpiece. The sound was average, I've had seven dollar sony earbuds that sound the same, They are however comfortable headphones. I would stay away from skullcandy as their quality control is horrible. The material used is also cheap. For the price get a pair of Sony MDR-7506's
p898
aVthese headphones aren't going to be perfect, your paying 37 dollars, you cant expect a BOSE sound, but if your looking to spend under 100 dollars or under 50 dollars, buy these headphones you wont be disapointed at all, the bass wasn't overpowering, i listed to electro, stuff like skrillex and deadmau5, and i am not disapointed in the sound at all.
p899
aVThis product is inexpensive and works very well!  It isolates the music from all other outside sounds, just like Beats do.  They are really cool looking and they have no flaws so I'm very happy.
p900
aVI am not a dj, or one that needs to use headphones too often. I use headphones while on my personal computer for listening to music, watching videos on youtube, movies and the like. The headphones have a great sound, no doubt that the sound quality is high. The headphones get a little bothersome though, the cuffs are completely round so they fit kind of funny on the ear and get uncomfortable after a little while. I found myself needing to take them off to "rest". Also, they aren't made very well. The plastic has cracked on the left ear side and is starting to on the right. In all fairness maybe I just have a big head, but nevertheless, I cannot fairly high recommend. Very Bulky and I feel made rather cheaply. The sound is great though so I give 3 stars.P.S. My hat size is 7.5.
p901
aVMy opinion and overview....I  believe the average person will find these comfortable, but for me, sadly, they are not.It seems that if the cups were constructed just a little bigger in circumference,  my ears would fit inside allot more comfortably.  I would advise trying em for a couple hours or days before throwing away the packaging..I will be returning them for that reason :(.other than that Id say these phones are a great buy and if you like rap, dance, or anything with bass, these go hard !!If you want a great set of cans, then forget buying those 20 dollar pair and invest some more $ in these, you be happy with the sound, and  Skull candy has that lifetime warranty, so your set. You'll waste more $ replacing those cheapo's besides the sound quality is levels above .
p902
aVlemme put this in simplest terms as possible.Me look at these headphones.Me like these.Me order them.Me listem to them and they have AWESOME AND CLEAR SOUNDMe like the way they look ( they are so stylish like u just wanna show them off!)me would really recommend these and by the way me a sophomore in high school and me like these ALOT! BUY THEM
p903
aVPURCHASED THE HEADPHONES FOR MY 12 YEAR OLD SON, VERY IMPRESSED WITH APPEARANCE OF PRODUCT BUT AFTER TWO DAYS WE NOTICED STITCHING AROUND EAR LEFT WAS COMING UNDONE, A COUPLE OF DAYS LATER, STITCHING ON RIGHT WAS ALSO COMING UNDONE. MY SON TAKES VERY GOOD CARE OF HIS ITEMS SO IT WAS NOT DUE TO MISTREATMENT, I AM CERTAIN IT IS POOR QUALITY AND I AM VERY DISSATISFIED WITH PURCHASE. ALSO, NOT VERY GOOD QUALITY LISTENING EITHER.
p904
aVthese headphones are pretty kool but the only thing i dont like is they are not good for wearing around your neck.they try to close so they stay tight on your head, they almost like choke u a bit. other than that the sound quality and bass are very good.
p905
aVJust received yesterday and love,love them.  I was a little skeptical about ordering them for myself...being that I'm in the "40 age range" but I am not disappointed.  They are a little bigger than what I anticipated but I can adjust; besides I am a big "Heat" fan.  The sound is like no other.  Good bass tone.  My daughter compared them to the Dr. Dre' headphones so you will not be disappointed!
p906
aVI bought it for my son and when i read the reviews they said that they break easily but you just have to take care of them and you'll have the best earphones ever!!
p907
aVI've always been a music enthusiast, however I was never able to use earbuds because my ears are far too small for them, thus began my search for a decent pair of headphones.These are not only decent, they are incredible!  The noise isolation is high quality and the sound quality is amazing; it was definitely love at first note.  These headphones are light, comfortable, and durable.  They truly live up to the quality that Skullcandy is known for.
p908
aVI bought these for my girlfriend whose a Celtics fan and loves music. She loves them but can't stand how they can't produce the same sound in any other electronics besides her cell phone. She plugged them into the TV at night to listen to movies without making much noise but couldn't get %100 sound without holding down the volume knob. Very strange. That's the only minus we have on them. They look great, feel great, and have AWESOME sound! No better headphones for your mobile electronics!
p909
aVI like these because they are comfortable but they sound a bit muffled. I mean, I like the way they are made and I am going to keep them but I am not that happy with the sound and I am not at all into my music. I expect a person who takes their music really seriously would be really disappointed in these but maybe I am wrong
p910
aVHad 2 pairs break! The side plastic narrow piece snaps apart from taking the headphones on and off.  The first one snapped after 2 weeks and amazon replaced them. The second pair just broke after only 2 months!
p911
aVThe headphones were very nice, good quality, and arrived quickly! I couldn't be happier with these. They also came with a cool bag to hold them in and some other stuff!
p912
aVI was really pleased with Skullcandy earbuds in the past, so I decided to buy a pair of over the ear headphones. They were great for about a week or two until I noticed the sides started cracking. I was careful with them to begin with and they have never been dropped or shoved into any small spaces, but after I noticed that I decided to be extra careful. Unfortunately that didn't seem to work. The right side is almost completely cracked off and I am super disappointed. They sound phenomenal, but they are not durable. I'm afraid to use them for fear that the entire right side will break off. Luckily, Skullcandy has a really great warranty and I told them about the problem and I'm getting them replaced.
p913
aVThis a great pair of headphones. They are low priced for the great quality of sound they put out. The volume can get loud so it would be a good idea to moderate the volume level. These headphones do a good job of canceling out other noises by you.  They look stylish and feel soft. My only complaint would be the size. They do feel a bit small on the head and around the neck. Good thing they're adjustable. The only other thing that would be a deciding factor is if you like how they cup your entire ear inside. Not to mention the cord to insert them into your MP3 player is a bit long which can get annoying.  But if you're looming for a great pair of headphones at a low price, this is the pair to get.
p914
aVGood sound quality. Get very uncomfortable after extended use - can not be worn with glasses. Overall quality seems to be pretty good, but they are tight. It can be seen how they would break if your not careful with them.
p915
aVWhen I first bought these, there was an incorrect picture up for the product. I wanted the blue ones but ended up getting these. I guess they were ok, but that left me a little angry. I already left a review about it, but I think maybe it was removed. I could be looking over it. Didn't take long for the plastic parts holding the ear cups to crack.
p916
aVI personally love Skullcandy. I live in Utah, and it's nice to see a Utah-bred company get some attention. These are the first pair of Skullcandy headphones I've owned. I got these at Best Buy for a good price. Here's a breakdown of everything:Sound Quality: 4.5/5Great sound quality; bass was great but not overpowering, mids weren't muddled, and trebles were clear. Great reproduction of sound. The only complaint is that the bass could have a little bit more of that "boom" factor; right now, they're just "there." Passive sound isolation isn't the best, but this isn't intended for sound cancellation anyways.Comfort: 3/5When I first got these, I thought that the padding was a little bit stiff. I thought I just had to break it in for a while. Now, after a couple of months, it hasn't gotten any softer. Compared to the Skullcrushers' soft padding, this is hard and doesn't create a very good seal. I constantly have to readjust the headphones, and the cups aren't the biggest. Maybe I'm just a wuss, but these give me a headache after just an hour of wearing these.Durability: 3/5Almost all plastic; I haven't had any problem with anything breaking, and I even keep it in a backpack that gets thrown into lockers and stuffed full of books. I don't know how much longer these will last, though. Even a little movement makes them creak.Portability: 3/5These cans are HUGE! Add that to the fact that they don't fold up, and you've got a huge thing you need to lug around. These also don't look the best on your head, and aren't ideal to wear under a hat.Honestly, if I were you, I'd get the Skullcrushers, which can be had for not much more than these. They fold up, are much more comfortable, and have some wicked bass, especially if you like hip-hop/dance music. The sound quality is the most important aspect, so I guess I'm going to give this a 4/5 overall.
p917
aVAfter reviewing several different options, I chose to go with these due to the price and the specs. This was my first pair of Skullcandy headphones. I usually spend the extra money and go with top of the line sound products such as Bose or Sony. I knew they would sound good, but I was very pleased after using them for just the first time. I didn't realize these headphones would do so well with noise cancellation. The sound from these things boom! I've used them for music and also with my PS3 for loud sound at night. They are very dynamic and put out loud sound even when just hooked up to my mp3 player. I've already ordered my second pair of Skullcandy headphones.
p918
aVThere is little bass, Break amazingly easy, there is distortion when they are turned up. And they sound a little muddy. A large scale example is talking with your hand over your mouth.
p919
aVI found that the Skull Candy Headphones were very stylish and received a number of compliments on them. For the low price I purchased them for, the quality of sound and noise cancellation were excellent. Also, they arrived at the exact projected date in wonderful packing condition. However, upon wearing them upwards of 60 min, they become annoyingly uncomfortable and can sometimes cause a headache. If one plans to wear them for less than an hour at a time, they are a great value. Unfortunately, they are not exactly dorm-friendly, as you must wear headphones in order to watch movies or listen to music for long periods of time.
p920
aVThe Headphones are Overall Amazing, especially for the price. the sound Quality is excellent and they are comfortable to wear on your head.Now the Only issues with these headphones are that when you wear them around your neck they kinda choke u a little. So Avoid that, I just used the slack of my belt to wear them on my pants when I had to take them off.And the other thing is that the Plastic extension on the headphones are of poor quality, the right hand side broke off from just normal wear and tear and the right hand side is now cracked. I easily fixed this with Black duct Tape, and no one notices.the speakers on the headphones are truly amazing, they never scratch or get any type of interference. So GOOD JOB! on that part SkullCandy! by now my headphone speakers would have blown... you can Definitely BLAST the music and not expect to go deaf or break your Headphones. LIKE I SAID EARLIER- GREAT BUY FOR THE PRICE!!!
p921
aVI bought these headphones in January. Within literally two weeks, one side of the headphone rails had started cracking. Being the lazy, non-receipt keeping consumer that I am, I taped them up and went on my way. Today (April 11, 2011), the other side has begun to crack and break apart.In summation, these headphones are crap and not even close to worth the money. They are simply poor designed, and can't handle the "stress" of being worn the way they're supposed to be.DON'T BUY!
p922
aVThese headphones are definitely not top of the line.  They aren't too comfortable and they aren't too durable.  But the sound is pretty good. I guess you get what you pay for.
p923
aVi like these but a wish i could of got the monkey ones for the same price so i settled for cheaper ones. The quality are the same they play fine + they fit well on your head. they seem like they will last.
p924
aVGood buy for the price that it is. As a college student it was great for keeping my ears warm and listening to music while walking to class. Great quality of music. Great headphones. A few downsides is that it if I use it too long it gets a little uncomfortable and also it looks really bulgy and big around the head.
p925
aVthis item was purchased fro me as a gift and the inner extension broke so therefore i rebought a new set only for within two weeks they broke again. not real happy with this product.
p926
aVI use this with my lap top to study for school - it allows me not to have to deal with any ambient noise so i can concentrate on my studies - it was a god send!!!
p927
aVI bought these headphones with a bit of reluctance because of some reviews, but some people obviously don't know what they're talking about. The whole thing is great! It even came with a nice carrying case. The sound is amazing, crisp and extremely loud. I have to turn it really low so people don't hear it! Bottom line, definitely reccomended. I've tried Beats by Dre, Sony, and Bose, and surprisingly the cheapest headphones I bought are the best. Great product.
p928
aVI bought these as a gift for my nephew and he has so far enjoyed them a lot better than his old ear plugs. The bass and the treble are so distinctive that it is a joy to put these on and listen to how music should be listened to.
p929
aVThe headphones were not very comfortable, but I continued to wear them because I had an ear ache and didn't want to use my in ear buds. The real problem became apparent when they broke. I hadn't had them a week when the thin adjustable part snapped. Complete waste of money, do not buy under any circumstance.
p930
aVwork pretty well, for the price(28$ you can't go wrong) note amazon rises and lowers the prices all the time. At first they hurt a little, but its not too bad, you can only wear them for so long and then half to take them off. they are seriously not worth 50$; the quality is no were close to be worth that much. they are stylish, but if you can afford to pay more, look elsewhere,go with another company, skull candy tends to be cheap in quality. They sound pretty great, although not the best pair of headphones (you get what you pay for). if your someone who brakes things easily i would Not recommend these; i knew in advance that the quality was questionable but also knew that if i take care of them i could make them last longer.
p931
aVGot them earlier this month. Love the quality of the sound, I love the DJ/Studio headphone style, BUT they break unbeliveably easialy. This is my second pair. broke in the exact same place as last time. The arms are very flimsy despite how the might look and feel. I STRONGLY recommend Adjusting the headphones to a comfortable size then coat the arms in super glue, then fill the ENTIRE area with hot glue. Then cover the hot glue with duct tape, preferably black. The wire is very thin and brittle, if an arm breaks it won't be long before it cuts the wire.On another note, these things get REALLY loud, and they leak. Everyone around you can hear what you are listening to, and you can hear them too. Even though they are over the ear they do nothing to block out outside noise and they might as well be speakers. The sound quality is amazing for the price. I spent a little under $30.If you do decide to do what i did with the tape and glue, make SURE you get them comfortable first, they might be comfortable at first, but the get uncomfortable real fast, i suggest making it slightly bigger than you think you should.
p932
aVok first im 15 and ALWAYS buy skullcandy and in a few months they either BREAK or stay the same but these only took a month for the leather muffs to come off. BUT they have an awsome sound quality and very good BASSnow the adjustment peice is starting to break not very happy with them
p933
aVyhis has been by far one of the best headphones i ever purchased... they're loud, comfortable and affordable... hooowever i only had them for 3 months and snap went the left side plastic adjustable peace... i wanted to cry that day and hell i wanted to even order them again because of the reasonable price... sure they bleed sound but you know what.. i never gotten any complaints and i wore them on the bus, train, and even the gym, these are a good buy if u have a small head since theat happened i purchased the Sony MDR-XB700 and i am in LOOOOve with them... they may be double the price but they are damn sure worth it
p934
aVHeadphones are very nice but not very loud at all I am in fact going to buy a new pair that are louder also if you wear hearings and sunglasses there is some discomfort which may lead to a headache besides that they look awesome one of the black covers though is already coming off from were it is tucked in on the back of the earphone. Would I buy these particular ones again no they aren't what I was looking for but I am picky I Also own another set of ear bud skull candy headphones which I love.
p935
aVThe sound quality is terrible--it's like I am listening to music through a tank of water.  Also, the sound leaks so everyone around me can hear the music I am playing even if my iPod volume is low. The design is great and they are very comfortable, and they also cancel the noise around you very well. However, if you are looking for clear sound, these headphones were a waste of $35 dollars. I suggest if you have Apple earbuds, stick with those; their sound quality is much better.
p936
aVSo, I had been looking to  purchase a pair of headphones recently. I was hesitant at first, but after reading the reviews I went for it. Since I recived them I haven't been able to take them off. I totally recomend this headphones for all music lovers out there.
p937
aVThis purchase was for my daughter.  When we first began searching for the headphones, I couldn't understand why she wanted them, and why they cost so much.  But then I began to see other teenagers with them and soon found out this was the in thing to have.  Once we found them on Amazon, they were much cheaper than the big name stores.  When she received, I have never seen her so excited.  Of course you know teenagers don't get excited anymore.  Anyway she loves them and she wears them all the time.  Excellent price, sturdy and long lasting, and a great gift for a teenager.
p938
aVI picked these up because they were pretty cheap, looked cool, and I wanted to try some over the ear headphones (I usually use in-earphones). My biggest problem with these is that they are very uncomfortable for periods of long listening. The ear cups aren't large enough for my ears, combine that with how even though the size is changeable for larger heads, they are really tight. Consequentially, my ears were really banged up after wearing them for a couple hours. The sound quality is also very mediocre, with it being relatively weak and tinny. Also, it blocks out enough sound to make it hard to listen to whatever is in your environment, but loud annoying sounds seem at times almost worse. Furthermore, the plastic construction seems a little cheap, though I don't know yet how easy they'll break. So in the end, I guess you get what you pay for.Edit: After a few uses of these headphones, the thin little piece of plastic you see in the picture between the head band and ear cup snapped when I lifted one ear to talk to someone. So I learned my lesson, don't ever buy earphones from Skullcandy, they're cheap pieces of crap.
p939
aVSo i bought these headphones thinking these would be nice because they are skullcandies. After about three weeks they broke! The volume and stuff still works and everything but the extension part you adjust to fit your head broke. i haven't used them in a week because they look like they are going to break if i use them more. I'm disappointed, the extension part is plastic so it just cracked and is about to break. the sound and stuff was nice, but there is no point in buying this because it is pretty cheap. I payed 50 bucks for these things and they dont even last.
p940
aVI do not recommend these headsets.  We purchased a new pair and the extension rod broke immediately. We purchased a 2nd pair and they did the same thing.  Bottomline, don't waste your money on these.
p941
aVthis is an amazing headset and i love mine. listened nonstop for hours once and felt minimal discomfort. the sound is great and the base is exceptional for headphones without a subwhoffer. very comfortable and stylish.
p942
aVThey sound great but the quality of the material is not so great. I've had them for 2 weeks and both sides of the headband have snapped in half. These are the second pair that I've had that happen to. I thought it was just me at first but the plastic is just not that sturdy.
p943
aVI bought these headphones about 6 months ago and have been very impressed with the quality of sound.  They are a little heavy but thats to be expected from full size headphones.  The music is crisp and clear without any rattle or distortion, i have owned several pair of headphones mostly from sony for my walkman but these are by far the best.
p944
aVThe first day i received my skull candy hesh headphones, I instantly loved them. They look amazing, they aren't the most amazing sound quality in the world, but they are well worth the money, my father has a $70 set of bose headphones. My skull candies blow them out of the water. Im a college athlete so im on alot of long road trips. These headphones are ridiculously comfortable, most of the time i have to readjust  every two or three songs, not with these puppies. I recommend them to anyone!
p945
aVThese headphones sound all right, they're more balanced to my ears than my Sennheiser CX-300 IEMs. They are definitely not worth $50 though. I got these on sale for $25 and I found that they sound more like headphones in that price range.1. To me they are extremely uncomfortable since they clamp to your head like vice-grips even after letting them stretch out, and they're pretty heavy on my small head.2. They sound better in terms of tonal balance compared to my Sennheiser CX-300 in-ear headphones. The mids and highs are laid back compared to the more forward bass and seem a muddy to my ears (the notes seem slurred and not very detailed). The bass is there and has a decent bass punch. I do have to compliment them on their soundstage. The soundstage for these closed headphones is definitely a lot larger than my Sennheiser CX300's. A larger soundstage makes the music recording sound more realistic, as if you were in a concert hall, so that's a good thing.3. The cloth carrying case that's given in the package is not very useful unless you're storing these headphones somewhere for a while. I use these at school and they're reaaally bulky since they don't lie flat nor fold. They are not very portable.4. The pleather ear pads are stiff and also uncomfortable. They do isolate some noise but not too much since the stiff pads do not conform to my head. In the back of the headphones' ear cups, there is a gap between my head and the pads themselves, despite trying to adjust the headphones around.I haven't had any problems with these myself, but when I move them, they do make a creaking sound so I'm not sure how durable these will be. For $50 I hope they last a while. I've had my $25 Sennheiser CX300's for 2 years without any problems yet.UPDATE March 24, 2011: I took a look at my headphones in the sun today and I noticed that the joint connecting the 50mm driver housings with the adjustable headband has a crack in the plastic on both sides of the headphone. It seems like this is the weakest spot of the headphones considering other reviews, and I can see why. At that specific spot, most of the flexing of the headband occurs there, which is a hollow plastic tube. Very poor design on Skullcandy's part.UPDATE July 13, 2011: So the cracks on the headband have now become even larger and my right ear piece is barely hanging in there. I'm looking for a replacement headphone at the moment since these are really loose on my head (due to the headband cracks).UPDATE August 9, 2011: Now both sides of the headband have become cracked to the point where I cannot place them on my head and remain in place. They slide off of my head since there is essentially no clamping force. I purchased a Shure SRH940 headphone and my review for that product can be found on its product page here: SRH940 Professional Reference Headphones
p946
aVIve already used these headphones for a week now, it really works well on music, but it sounds even better if you use your EQ on your ipod or your portable music device, it helps the headphones adjust to what you want them to sound like Rock,Electronic,Dubstep,Techno,Alternative,Country you name it these headphones work like a charm. My only problem seems to be the noise cancellation a bit, i can still hear a little bit, but that is only if i focus on that. I have not had these headphones break on me so far and they seem to work like a charm. It feels like i am a DJ and the sound is kept within my ears only, plus i can feel the bass on Dubstep and the sounds the way they were sopposed to be without the earbuds these are excellent. Plus for the price they are C+ headphones, meaning they are above average quality for a cheaper price than what they use to cost(60$), buy with confidence. One last thing be gentle with your headphones when sliding them down, because i keep noticing by the reviews that they say the Skullcandy headphones will break, but i bet that is because they put to much force adjusting the sides to their ears.August 2011-------------My Skullcandy broke sadly i accidently sat on the side of it, i had good times with this one, and i learned that these headphones are good but not great. I recently baught Sennheiser HD 202  II Professional Headphones (Black) I hate to say it but Skullcsndy looks good but is decent at best, but Sennheiser is a relieble brand like Bose,Koss, in which it can deliver on Dubstep,Bass and all of that plus it has good noise cancellation which Skullcandy barely had it. It is 20$ right now with HD type headphones, and i am liking it right now as i baught it, to me it is a steal. This is only an alternative if you do not want to pay the price for Skullcandy and want something that is cheaper and better.
p947
aVGreat design and shape. I love Skullcandy headphones, they are some of the greatest headphones out there! The Hesh headphones are VERY comfortable, fit nicely around your ears and on your head. The sound quality...eh, it's okay, not the greatest but it's still pretty good. It isn't completely bad but then again it isn't the greatest in the world. Very light headphones which can be good for some and bad for others. The good part is that they aren't that heavy when having them on or just having them around your neck. The bad thing is since they're light and made of some plastic, they could go out but who knows. They also come with a nice silk-like bag for you to carry them around in. I would say these would be the perfect set of headphones if you love to just listen to music to relax, get some steam out of your system, etc. These wouldn't be the kind of headphones for anyone who is professionally in the music business and need some of headphones to do work with; if you need something like that then look for the Skullcandy DJ headphones at the Skullcandy website or a nearby Apple store. But otherwise these are a good pair of headphones and again I would recommend them to anyone who just wants to jam out to music.
p948
aVPurchasing this product on Amazon.com was easy, since I don't like to order stuff thru the internet, it was affordable and had free shipping. I bought this headphone as Birthday gift for my grandson, he thinks it is awesome.
p949
aVMy 15 year old son asked me to order these for him. He said they were the best headphones that he ever had. They block out all sound, which bothers me a little since he can't hear me. :-). Great sound quality. If you are looking for an inexpensive pair of headphones that block out sound, they are perfect for you.
p950
aVi have bought 2 pairs of these headphones and they both broke. i took very good care of these headphones. after 2 weeks of having these headphones i will go to put them on and the left side will just split in half. its not worth the buy.
p951
aVI purchased these because they'd been recommended to me by a friend. In hindsight I probably should have gotten the DJ-style headphones, because they collapse and are therefore more portable. Although these headphones are very comfortable for the most part, they are a tight fit (width-wise) and tend to be snug on the ears. This is good in the sense that they won't fall off, but bad because they get uncomfortably tight very fast. Otherwise a decent product, for the price.
p952
aVI bought these back in the summer and was pretty pleased with them. The bass hits hard and they sound great as long as your not an audiophile.However, they broke after VERY light usage after a couple months. They're made of cheap plastic and the thin piece between the head band and the earphones crack easily. So if you plan on using your headphones for more than a few months before buying a new pair, look elsewhere.Also, they're horribly uncomfortable. They will squeeze the heck out of your head, so prolonged usage is usually associated with headaches.Good luck. However, I've yet to have a problem with their earbud headphones.
p953
aVI bought this set of headphones and I take VERY good care of things like this. I kept them in the little travel bag and never thrashed them around, etc. They are awkward fitting, but the sound is great if you like your bass. However, shortly after purchasing these headphones, the extendable plastic pieces that adjust the size started to crack and one just snapped entirely in half, making them unwearable. After adjusting them to the appropriate size, the plastic pieces didn't have the bend in them and they broke. This is not something that was my fault, it was a defect in the product. I felt that I should have spent the extra money and invested in a nicer pair of headphones. That is my suggestion to my fellow consumers. Hope this helps!
p954
aVThese do leak sound, but if all you're going for is style, these are the right headphones. They are also a little tight on the head, but it's really something you get used to (or over, after the first couple wears). Very durable. I'm not some sort of audiophile, but I still love these headphones. I had a pair of Sony MDR-XD100s before, and they were pretty much equivalent to these headphones in everything except comfort and style (they were way more comfortable, but less stylish). In the end, you really are just paying for the brand, which isn't necessarily a bad thing. Skullcandy never fails to shine in terms of looks.
p955
aVI got this skull candy and they broke after two weeks,had to tape both sides of the head phones after two week .looks like crap but they still work ,not happy ,the sound was great,but they broke on both sides above the ear piece,i would really like u to replace them.  u may contact me buy email  and i can send pictures  cooperlilly@aol.com Laura
p956
aVWhen I had first ordered these headphones, I was thrilled because of how great they looked, and how great the sound was. A month goes by of some less than average usage; they aren't used everyday, mainly within the house, and when I do use them outside, I always use the included baggie and make sure the individual earphones are not extended out. Never dropped them, no harsh contact, etc. So about two days ago when I'm pulling (lightly) apart the headphones to put over my ears, I hear a crack. To my dismay, the extension part of the left headphone had cracked somewhat, with only the center part not having fully cracked. They've been sitting at my desk collecting dust since as I'm afraid to damage them any more from normal use. Also to note, I do extend the headphones nearly all the way out. I did not think of this as much of a problem, as I had hoped the construction of the extending parts would be fine; I was wrong. Eventually I'll work up the nerve to use them again, but for now I just feel a bit ripped off at how easily they became damaged.Overall: Great style and sound for when they weren't damaged, which was about a month's time. Bad construction, which ultimately, if a product like this doesn't last at least nine months to a year, much less at least six months bare minimum of average use, the sound and style cannot make up for how soon mine became damaged. I know customer's usage will vary, and this will not happen to everyone, but I advise purchase at your own risk for these headphones.
p957
aVI brought these about a month or two ago. At first I was one happy camper as the sound quality was great - WAY better than my old Sony MDR-V250s to be sure! Before purchase I'd read some of the reviews warning about the weak plastic pillars but just blew them off. Dumb move on my part for lo and behold not two weeks later it happened to me on the right side! It hadn't cracked all the way through yet, mind you, but was clearly headed in that direction. The left side wasn't looking too hot either. I considered returning them, but riding the train home from work I saw a girl with the EXACT SAME model headphones as mine. She'd wrapped duct tape around both the pillars so I just decided to do the same. Didn't really want to go through the hassle of a return, and after all the audio, at least, is first rate...Bottom line...I really can't recommend these. Sure they SOUND good but for the price you pay, the construction should be much much sturdier. Neither my Sony MDR-V250s nor my XD100s have fallen apart like this and I've had both of those for far longer while paying way less!
p958
aVI bought these cuz i broke a cheap $10 set and i thought they were really big when i first got them. It was only because i wasn't used to these type of headphone,but that was easily forgotten with how great they sound. They came with a pretty nice little bag with the logo all over it and a sticker!Anyways, the point is the moment i plugged them in i had to reduce the volume on my laptop. I had everything set to the lowest volume and could hear just fine. they feel kinda stiff at the band that goes on top of your head,but i'm careful with my stuff,so it should last.~great sound~muffles a good amount~great for guitar practice~gets a little tiring on the ears,but you can get used to it~great design~be careful with the adjusting band and it'll last you
p959
aVFirst of all, all you audiofiles out there are dumb as hell nobody cares if these headphones aren't as good as your 300-400 dollar headphones! And if they break, CHILL!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! Skullcandy has got your back and will replace them...for life...free of charge. As far as sound quaility these headphones are pretty good. I listen to music...A LOT. And I listen to almost every genre, but I mostly listen to John Mayer,Maroon 5,Dave Matthews Band, etc.. And these headphones work excellent. Although they are not listed as sound cancelling they do offer some sound cancelling properties with music playing. As for appereance these could look better I think. They looked good in the picture, but the ears are pretty big, and you can look a little goofy. They do sit on your head good and they will stay there! I warm up for wrestling in these and they stay on good through that. The cord isn't too long and having the cord go to only one ear is nice. BUT you can't wear them around your neck very well. And they don't have swivel cups.Overall I would give these headphones a 4 out of 5. But if you are buying these on amazon I would recommend the Skullcandy Skullcrushers, although they do require a battery I found the sound cancelling properties better. Also they had better overall sound quality. They are much easier to carry around and the bass is much better. Also they have swivel cups.
p960
aVI bought these headphones 2 months ago, and so far, I love them! First and foremost, the sound quality is good. The only setback is that the bass is not as strong as I would like, but I prefer a lot of bass, so these would be perfectly fine for the average listener. I listen to pretty much every type of music, and everything sounds great. The design is comfortable, I've worn them for hours on end without any problem. The speakers fit over my ear, unlike other over the head headphones I have tried, and they have a snug fit without that "crushing" feeling some headphones create. Before I bought them, I read many reviews where people commented that the headband had broken, but I have had no issue with this. They have been extremely durable, I have taken them on many trips, and have had no issue. Sound isolation isn't the best, but this is not a huge issue for me. In a loud place, such as on a bus or train, sound isolation is not a problem at all. The only time I have had any issue is in a car or quiet building. Overall, I am very glad I made this purchase, and I am currently looking at buying some lowriders, which would be less bulky to travel with. But these will still get plenty of use, and I got them for a great price compared to some other brands!
p961
aVI got these as a christmas gift from my mom and they worked great out of the box. Half a month later the fake leather around the sound-output thing started coming off. I have only used these at home on my laptop for watching videos and music(i have not taken these out side or left these in places they could get damaged). Just a few minutes ago i was putting them on and the plastic piece that slides inside the headphone for adjustments cracked and now they won't work anymore. They lasted two months with minimal use. I'm no expert but there are definitely better ones out there for the price. When they worked everything was awesome. Now they are broken.
p962
aVAs you would expect from Skullcandy, the style of these headphones is great. The ear piece is more round and sticks out more than the picture lets on. The design and comfortability is great though. Great for someone who is looking to have a nice pair of headphones to match their style.When it comes to quality.. maybe not so great. I'm used to using Bose quality headphones/ earphones and honestly I'm not so sure these are the ones to try and compete. Now I'm not going to go into saying that these are the worst out there, because they aren't. Sure they get loud enough to enjoy. The bass is OK but don't expect to hear the deep bass described on the website. Everything else is heard pretty well, but it's just not as clear as I think it could/should be. There is no umph. Anyone whose has used Sennheiser Headphones,Bose® Headphones or even Bose® headphones most likely won't be a fan of these. I'm sure not.For any kid(like most) who haven't been exposed to any of the named, these are a good choice.
p963
aVThese headphones are good especially for the price. The sound is good as well. They do get a little uncomfortable after a while and it could be better if it had a little microphone but otherwise, its a good product for a good price.
p964
aVI bought these from this seller and they are nice, but I never did any investigation on them.I got these a month ago and that plastic side is weak and it broke.And these dont have bass like I thought they would
p965
aVThese headphones are amazing! When I'm listening to my iPod, it's like the band is playing right in front of me! The bass is awesome and the sound isn't muddy at all. The only problem is that it leaks sound, but that's not such a big deal for me.
p966
aVGood looking, good sound.Loved it, until it broke. If you buy this,be very careful with it. The thin plastic part, witch reveals itself when you want to make the headphones bigger, is very sensitive. Mines Snapped just yesterday [15-feb-'12] and it has only been a week.
p967
aVThese are definitely great headphones, at least in my opinion. They are comfortable, the noise cancellation is great, they look nice, and everything else about them is nice as well. I honestly don't understand why everyone dislikes this brand, their headphones have never broke soon after I got them, as the reason why I've had to buy them over and over again is because I keep losing the earbuds, which is simply my own fault. I use these as DJ headphones (I've just begun DJ'ing, and this is currently all I can afford), which means I'm not sure how they would work outside (if they could be damaged in the rain, for example). I assume that they would work just fine because of their durability overall. The art work is very nice, especially on the over-the-head part. The ears are comfortable, canceling all noise around me. Overall, these are definitely worth the price and I would recommend them to anyone looking for a cheap, but reliable pair of over-the-head headphones.
p968
aVthis is really a good choice for those who like music. I also use it for some video shot ( sound) and it's gorgeous.. The sound isolation is perfect.. It's not the best that you can find ( Bose, or Beats) but for this price it's impressive !
p969
aVI love it it sounds great and is very comfortable i hear everyting in the song and the noise extra noise cancelation is excelent when i turn up the volume i can't hear anything and when their is no music playing i still bearly hear things
p970
aVI have only had these headphones for a couple of weeks, but they seem pretty good. The bass is pretty loud though. If you listen to rap then you're probably okay. I listen to Hardcore and Pop Punk and I have to mess with the EQ on my iPod so it sounds better. They look amazing though. There should still be a Scalabrine edition...Oh, whatever website they were from took FOREVER to ship. They took over a month just to leave the shop. It also took them over a month to charge my card.
p971
aVThese headphones can play really good sound. I have had them for a couple months now and they are still serving me great. they are big and soft and comfortable and can play really loud without people around you being able to hear it. I have been walking to school since I started college and so they also worked really well as ear muffs :) They kind of feel fragile at times but they haven't broken at all. Overall definitely the best buy of headphones I have ever gotten.
p972
aVThe headphones sound really good. Dont listen to the other people saying it is easy to break there not i mean there made of plastic but i use mine everyday and if u just give a little effort to protect them they will be fine.
p973
aVThe only thing is that the cups do not turn when you take them off and put them in your shoulder!, but great sound!, good quality materials, and the best that a product can have, life time warranty!, great price also!
p974
aVWell Im not a headphone expert nor interested in audio.I gave this as a gift to my friend and he told me that this headphone has a great sound quality. Actually when i first bought this, i didn't expect much from skullcandy, cuz some products are quite lousy. Well since my friend loves it i believe this is a great product within the price range.
p975
aVWhen i saw the price i couldnt beleive it.. but when i finnaly gave in and bought them, i realized how awesome these things were, they cut out all other noise, feel great on your ears, plus the design is amazing.
p976
aVBought these headphones after my pair of skullcandy ear buds went south. Used them for 6 months and was relatively pleased with them. They were comfortable enough to listen for about 1.5 hours, but anytime after that and they would give me a horrendous headache from the pressure of the spring on my head. They sound decent enough for the price, if only a little bass heavy. My biggest complaint is that after 7 months of ownership, the plastic in the size adjuster broke, requiring me to tape it fixed, 2 months later the other side broke. Since wearign these around campus I have seen 2 other people wearing identical headphones, broken in the same spot. I would not buy these again considering I know they will break in the same spot. Nor would I recommend them to a friend.
p977
aVUmm, first of all, they look kinda' dorky. I mean, they have a blue skull on each ear piece, so I think it is something that a 5th grader would consider "cool".But, I don't really care about how they look. I am all about utility. Unfortunately, I cannot wear these earphones for more than a few minutes at a time. They are too tight, and they squeeze my head. No -- if you are wondering -- my head is not an air-inflated balloon that is easily squeezed. So, it seems that there is a design flaw inherent in this product, in that the headphones do not mold to my head. And no, I am not a behemoth giant; I am a regular Joe. I don't want to jump to any conclusions, but I do have to wonder if these were even tested in the lab while they were being developed. I've tried for several days, and I've decided to return them to the store for a full refund. Ugh.
p978
aVI bought these on amazon and I think I payed $33 with free shipping. These headphones look great, and they sound really good! My only complaint is that they have absolutely no bass unless you're in a completely quiet room and you're listening intently to hear the bass hit.  These headphones came with a protective bag to carry them in, I carry them in my backpack everyday and they seem to be fairly durable. Overall, i'm disappointed in the lack of bass but the sound quality is really good, well worth $30.
p979
aVOk first of all the people that say these headphones suck, suck. I would say I am an avid music listener and always have headphones on or in. These have pretty sick sound quality. If you are expecting a lot of bass though you may be a little let down. Now I'm not saying that the bass sucks, but it was a little less than I thought it would be. Also they are a little fragile, but if you just take care of them you'll be fine. Finally, if you are looking for sound cancelling headphones these are probably not what you want. They do cancel the sound alright with music on but you can still hear background noise. Over all these headphones are a great buy for price and I would definately recommend these headphones to everybody!
p980
aVI think that the skullcandy hesh are great over ear head phones. They are comforatable, durable, and sound great. The one thing that I don't like is that they are plastic. But for $50 dollars ( I got them for $30 ) you get what you are paying for they are great head phones. I think that 'beats' are way too expensive so I found these and they seem almost as good. i have used both and I like the Hesh better. GET A PAIR. They also have great bass.
p981
aVI love these headphones. I got my husband the audiophile the Derrick Rose Hesh headphones for Christmas and when they arrived he loved them, but I too loved them so much that I ordered the Paul Frank's for myself, because I hate earbuds. My ears are so small they never stay in. These are great headphones, and I got them even cheaper on Amazon than on Skullcandy. I noticed that there are many reviews that say they hurt after a while, but I'm not having that problem at all. I'm thinking that maybe it depends on your head size, because to me, they're extra comfortable. I wear them mostly for my daily commute into Manhattan by train and their great! I don't blast them, but I can hear my music comfortably as well as stay aware of my surroundings. I get tons of compliments on them too. They're like a fashion acessory - and I do love fashion. The only issue I have is that they don't have the in-line mic. For those who say they hurt I say maybe try another one of the skullcandy line, like maybe the agent or the icon. They're over the head but not as snug as the hesh line. Hope this helps!! Electric Animals, I'm coming for you next!!
p982
aVBought these for my girlfriend. Bigger than I thought they would be, but still great. Always been a fan of skull candys so going with this brand was a no brainer. Sound quality is good and the travel bag is a good bonus. Will buy myself a pair soon.
p983
aVI've been waiting to find a pair of headphones that I liked because I can't wear earbuds (my ear holes are too small...). Anyway, when I saw these, I immediately picked them up because I like Paul Frank and I figured you couldn't really go wrong with Skullcandy, plus the colors were super cheerful and cute.The sound is fine and everything, but I used these to watch a movie on my laptop...and the movie was 2.5 hours...Anyway, halfway through the movie, I noticed that it was really getting uncomfortable. Then towards the end, my head was screaming to take them off because they hurt so bad! I was hoping for the movie to end quickly so I could throw my headphones away! It was something about the way these things fit around your ear or something, plus the pressure from the whole headset was unbearable. But it was just no fun. I noticed other reviews also talked about discomfort too, so I'm not the only one! Don't be fooled by the picture where the padding looks really nice and cushy.I am not one to exaggerate. When I write my reviews, I always try to be as accurate as possible to help others, plus I don't usually take the time to write negative reviews, but I felt these warranted one to save someone else the literal pain. The other downside is that I bought these elsewhere at full price, so I'm sad to see them for a better price here and I can't take it back because I already threw away the packaging... :( I really don't think they should charge this much for these particular headphones. I'm already going on a search for a different pair. I've only used these once. Such a waste. :( I gave it 2 stars because the sound wasn't bad, but on the comfort level, it gets a zero from me.
p984
aVPeople say Skullcandy headphones hurt, my Paul Frank headphones are beast! The thing is it depends on the person's ears. For me it was like an hour and a half until they started making my ears sore. I took them off for 5 minutes and their back on my head.
p985
aVI bought these because I was sick of the terrible quality that earbuds give, I wanted something more for home use but it turns out I cant really use these out of home much anyway.The sound is great everything is clear and I was impressed my the quality of the bass for the price! The only problem is that unless you are surronded by quite a bit of noise everyone can hear what you are hearing. I have even been able to use my headphones almost like portable speakers they are so loud off of the ears. So thats a negative but it is the only reason I gave the product 4 stars.They are a lot more lightweight than i expected but i also expected to be more metal details etc, but it was mostly all plastic which gave them a little more of a cheap feel, but hey they are 40$ not 90$ so you get what you pay for.
p986
aVi was looking for something different than just earbuds so i ordered these and they are nice and all but there are somethings that make it not so great1. doesnt block out noise well2. cant put them around your neck easily3. kind of tight on your head4. kinda big5. ear pieces dont swivelbut all and all its decent for the money i get alot of compliments but im ordering a set of earbuds for school use
p987
aVWow, I had a pair of skullcandy earbuds and they were awesome so I was psyched to get these pair of headphones, I immediately put them into my ipod and listened to one of my bass heavy songs and it was truly amazing with great sound quality. Definitely a good product
p988
aVPros:- Good sound quality- Looks really sexy ^_^- They're simply amazing headphones. I'm really satisfied with my purchase.Cons:- All of my skull candy products (3 earphones) have broken within a few months. So I'm hoping this won't happen to these headphones. Unfortunately, people have said they're very fragile and break/won't work easily.. So I'm just putting this up here as a warning. Mine are fine, though.- Very LITTLE sound leak. If you put the sound quite loud in a rather quiet environment, you'll be able to hear your music.But this is not really important to me. It is for most people. So I'm guessing this would be a con. This is probably due to the cheap plasticky sides of the headphones.Overall: I love them and I recommend them to music lovers. :)
p989
aVThese headphones are a good pair of headphone to get. They provide very clear sounding music. The only flaw really is that if your ears don't fit in them and you use them for long periods of time your ears will start to hurt. Otherwise great headphones!
p990
aVlightweight, easy to use, great sound quality and stays on my head.  I love these much better than ear buds, but of course, running with them is not an option.
p991
aVI bought the headphones about a month ago to bring on long bus trips. I treated them well and was only able to use them a couple times. One morning, I while I was adjusting them, thep plastic snapped. Under further investigation, I found the plastic used is very cheap and thin, and once you break it, absolutley NOTHING will fix it. I would suggest these headphones, because the sound quality is great and they're comfortable, but it's kinda hard when I'm back now to my crappy regular apple headphones. Skullcandy is too over rated.
p992
aVThe bass is a little lacking, but I use them for my guitar, and for that purpose the sound quality is unbelievable. I recommend them for anyone who wants an inexpensive pair of quality headphones.
p993
aVI ordered these headphones for my son as a Christmas gift.  They were exactly what he wanted.  He loves them.  I tried them myself.  Excellent product.  Great sound and great quality item.  Of course, the skulls design is a great attention getter. Everyone notices them.
p994
aVOur son definitely loves these headphones and he wears them often. Only flaw is that they drown out parents voices all too well. Or at least thats what he leads us to believe .....  :-)
p995
aVI just got these headphones yesterday and so far I like them more than Dr. Dre Beats...if thats possible lol. Sound quality is pretty good and I like the bass. My only problem with the headphones is that they're a little tight and makes my ears hurt...and they also feel uncomfortable when i put them on my neck.
p996
aVGreat...Once its working. I got it on christmas and on the 5th of january it decided to go mono and one side stopped working. It was annoying because of the time limit in which it was bought and stopped working.
p997
aVBought these for my 11 year old son who uses them with his ipod and with our portable dvd player. He loves the funky design and says they work great and they keep the outside sound out and the inside side in!
p998
aVI bought these headphones a while ago and I love them. I kept looking at the Beats By Dr. Dre but the price tag was just too high for my liking. For the price of these headphones you get a lot. The sound is very nice. I have listened to a wide range of music and they can handle most of it. The highs are a little muddy but if you get past that everything else is perfect. The headphones in my opinion are very comfortable. I listen to music for long periods of time with them and I do not get the headache that occurs with in-ear headphones. They seem very durable and they have lasted me through everything. I have taken them on a couple of trips around the world and they are perfect for the plane. Overall: when you get these headphones you can expect to be sucked into the music world and they look stylish. They were a great buy. Hope this helped.
p999
aVWell for the price, its decent. It hurts my ears and doesnt fit as comfortable as I thought it would. Now the thing that bugs me the most is the leakage of sound..but its still something you should consider picking up for the price.
p1000
aVThese are some of the best headphones i have ever had if you are looking at getting them it would be a great idea. The only flaw i can come up with is they are all plastik that means they can break. there is also a short coard and a long one i dont know why they did that. but the sound quality is the best i have ever heard but these are also the first expinsive headphones i have bought. but in the end these are the best headphones i have ever had(:
p1001
aVThese headphones are great! They are a great quality for the price, especially if you don't want to spend $100 on a really good pair. Sparkle Motion might be a little deceiving for the design (I thought it was a graphic that was glittery or something but it's a flat color vs metallic or glittery, but that's alright). Cord is a good length, and I like how it's wrapped in cloth material. Good choice for headphones.
p1002
aVBasically, these headphones are 100% worth the money you'll be spending for them. They look pretty good, and they get pretty loud so even if you feel weird about having them on your head you can hang them over your neck and you can still hear the music- plus it's really cool.First things first, these headphones are not THAT sturdy. They are durable enough so that if you drop them or maybe even throw them on the ground, they won't break but be careful where you store it because they have been known to snap. The headphones are mostly plastic and there are a lot of moving/swiveling parts. A little bit of TLC will prevent these headphones from breaking- plus it comes with a cool little bag, a sticker, and a spray paint stencil.Next, these things are pretty tight. If it's your first time getting skullcandys or you're upgrading from earbuds/cheap headphones, these things have noise cancelling foam rings, and they snap onto your ears pretty tight. This is good and bad- It's good because it does cancel out some of the noise... When I'm listening to my music on normal volume I can't hear anyone unless they're shouting into my ear, but its bad because it can get uncomfortable. It's the type of thing you have to get used to. When I first put them on I was like "Darn, this is really tight" but after a few days I got used to it and now they're pretty comfortable. It also varies from person to person as some of my friends say that they are really tight and others say they're perfectly comfortable. Something else to keep in mind, they don't fold up like other skullcandys or other headphones for easy storage... They stay in the headphone shapeThose are the two main cons about this product, but it still gets 4.5/5 stars because the sound quality is aboslutely amazing. I listen to rock, pop rock, punk rock, alternative, metal, and dubstep (techno but VERY heavy on the bass) and this headphone can easily take any of these. One of my favorite things to do is to close my eyes, set my EQ to bass booster, and listen to the skullcandy doing work. It sounds absolutely amazing and the headphones handle the heavy bass extremely well. I brought these headphones to school and people were trying them out and they were mostly all impressed at the quality of the music.All in all, if you're looking for an afforadble upgrade to your cheapo headphones or annoying earbuds, this is a great deal. With only trivial problems and amazing sound quality, what more could you ask for from a pair of $35 headphones?
p1003
aVI was actually inspired to get these headphones after purchasing a pair of Skullcandy Skullcrushers.  Those were a quality purchase and these headphones didn't disappoint either.  There isn't a person I give these to that doesn't believe they are comfortable and the sound quality is excellent.  One unique attribute of these headphones is that the audio cord is wrapped in nylon instead of rubber.  They come with a nice carrying bag for travel and the every component of the headphones is sturdy.  The designs on the earphones are attractive as well.These headphones are definitely a deal for the money and I can see myself buying many more pairs in the future.
p1004
aVI got the Shattered Rasta, design is cool.Pro'sDecent sound quality and bass to the untrained ear.1 wire from the left side onlyFull over head paddingAdjustableCon'sTight after wearing them for a while. A while being 50 minutes+Not as much bass as I wantedFor $32 it's a good buy. They were too tight for me though so I sold the Hesh and got Skullcrushers.Skullcrushers are the better buy for $10 more on here. <--Insane BASS & more comfy
p1005
aVI purchased the headphones for my teenage son.  He wanted headphones for christmas and these were exactly the ones he had his eye on.  They arrived quickly and in perfect condition.  I was extremely satified with my purchase.
p1006
aVTerrible simply terrible. No midr-ange what so ever, flabby slow muddy bass the completely drowns anything else out. The fact that these things feel like they are going to burst into flames the second you touch them due to the poor build quality. They also make the person wearing them look like a complete ass. My point being that many many MANY other HI-FI options exist in the same price point, and if you spend a little more*and you will get what you pay for* you will be blown away that you ever considered buying these.Sony MRD-XB500-700 being one, and the Koss PRO DJ100 being another that simply annihilates these.
p1007
aVI got this for my daughter for Christmas.  She absolutely loves it.  She likes the style, sound quality, and comfort.  I can't get her to take it off sometimes.  Thanks for having this in stock as I hate to shop at malls and such.
p1008
aVThese Paul Frank inspired Skull Candy brand full ear headphones offer a cute look for fans of the artist but overall they should not expect any sort of significant quality in terms of both sturdiness and sound. The speakers wrap around the ear comfortably, and while they do feel sturdy enough, these obviously aren't the type of headphones that should be taken outside in the rain or dropped on the floor too often. The wire is actually a good highlight as it is wrapped in a soft yarn-like material and not your typical rubber, therefore it feels more like a shoelace and not so much a wire. This ensures that the wire will never become tangled or stuck in any sort of annoying twirls especially if you're the type that likes to wrap up wires when the item is not in use. Therefore, just take care of these physically as they may tend to scratch easily.Now in the area that matters - sound quality. Unfortunately, most of my rating was lower simply because of this. The headphones emit whatever sound you put them through, but for the most part things just sound too average and flat. There is no significant bass or overall good balance. The bandwidth is not Bose or Westone quality, so don't expect to be blown away. I mean, even in the least. Plus right out of the package, I noticed that with some songs, if the volume was even significantly louder than average, the headphones would make this small rattling and distortion type of sound, as if the speakers weren't strong enough to handle a higher than average volume. This is the biggest disappointment with these headphones. One would think that with speakers this big these phones would be strong enough to handle a good amount of bass without any distortion whatsoever. Then again, Skull Candy has always been notorious for their style of substance, and these headphones are unfortunately no exception.These are a good idea for a collector's item if you are buying them for a fan of the Paul Frank artist, but if you want to do your music justice, spend a little more on a quality brand, like Sennheiser, Bose, Westone, Sony, Phillips, etc. (Actually, some of these other brand names would probably offer BETTER sound quality headphones for a cheaper price).In the end, being a big fan of music, I simply cannot recommend these, or any other Skull Candy product.
p1009
aVI am posting this here because Skullcandy won't let me post a NEGATIVE review on their site! I bought these headphones thinking 1) they're Skullcandy and 2) they are $50+, so they must be good. I was totally wrong! The headphones all around feel cheap! From the 'Made in China' label on the plastic to the other material used, they were NOT comfortable. The headphones were circular so they did not fit my ears. They also let out wayyy to much sound when I had them on. In other words, if you don't want to have people hear the music you are listening to, the volume must be extremely low.Do yourself a favor and avoid these!
p1010
aVNot many complaints at all! Pros- keeps outside noise out very well, can even play drums outside and hear the music inside, also very warm in cold weather. Cons-only con they do tend to bleed music so you'll have to turn them down in libraries. But overall really good product, great sound quality, great bass, love it
p1011
aVI bough these for my boyfriend for christmas, he says they are awesome and give s them five stars. they have great sound, quality, and bass. These are the best headphones we have ever had!
p1012
aVThese headphones are excellent! I bought them at Best-Buy for $49.99, and, for the price, everything about them is great! The sound clarity is superb, and the bass is perfect. It is not over-powering like the Skullcrushers, or many other, more expensive, headphones. And these headphones actually grow softer with use.  When I first bought them, I thought that the padding was a little hard, but after owning them for 2-3 months, I must say they beat my old Sony MDR-NC7 headphones in terms of sound quality. Definitely one of the top choices for a pair of headphones under $100. I definitely recommended them!
p1013
aVI got this headphones for engineering purposes because they are simple, NOT biased and NOT EQ'ed for studio monitoring. Listening to music though this guys is pretty awesome to be honest, bass in punchy, mids are excellent, and treble is crisp. I use an Apogee DUET for recordings, and having this headphones plugged into the headphone jack of the Apogee makes the sound much cleaner and clear. I listened to all the genres I could possibly think off, and they all sound amazing with this headphones.This might not be Beats by Dr.Dre, but for the price you got yourself some excellent monitoring headphones. If you are into DEEP bass or DEEP hip-hop beats... I recommend the Skullcrushers by Skullcandy (unless you want to drop some major coin on major studio headphones).
p1014
aVConsidering I bought these headphones for $50, the sound quality is very good.  I also own a pair of $120 Able Planet NC Headphones and of course there is a significant difference in sound quality.  Do not buy these if you are looking for a pair of traveling headphones as they do not assist in reducing the low humming of voices or car engines.  However, they are good headphones with decent enough quality to play a wide range of music.  And I would agree with other reviews... I have never heard a non-powered headphone pair sound this LOUD when simply plugged into my iPod.I strongly recommend these headphones to anyone on a budget who is looking for a decent pair of comfortable, over the ear headphones.  Personally, I use them when I play the drums.  They cancel out enough of the noise from the drums and they're loud enough to still hear what you're playing (without spending over $300 on Studio headphones).
p1015
aVCould not wait to get the package open and plug my ipod up so I can hear the type of sounds that was gonna come through.  Very hot joints I must say.  DWade is my man, so I had to get them.
p1016
aVI got these for my daughter's 14th birthday and they have been a huge hit. She was using the cheap iPhone earbuds that Apple provides and even tried some of the noise isolating earbuds (cheap ones).  She kept losing and/or breaking earbuds or the rubber pieces that actually seal them into your ears.  My daughter is really into fashion.  So, when she saw the Paul Frank monkey headphones, she wanted them.  She's not really concerned about sound quality or even how sturdy they are.  But, I was.  After reading several reviews, I was a little concerned about how sturdiness.  After having had them for a week, the quality seems to be decent.  They aren't exactly built like a Mack truck.  But, I think if cared for properly they will hold up.  The cord seems to be pretty decent quality.  The sound is really good.  Definitely as good as I would expect for the money paid.  One knock on them is the plastic used for the cushions on the cans doesn't breathe at all.  So, your ears can get very hot and sweaty very quickly in these.  The look is very cartoonish.  But, it's perfect for a teenager or a pre-teen. She gets lots of compliments on them.  Overall, we are very happy with our purchase.
p1017
aVI ordered these headphones for my boyfriend's birthday. I selected the free supersaver shipping and it actually got here early! The product was still in the package and is actually a Really great product. He loves them and so do I. I've even thought about buying a pair for myself. I would definitely recommend this product to anyone looking for great quality headphones.
p1018
aVI ordered these headphones for my son.  He already had a pair of skullcandy headphones, but he wanted the extra base that these provided.  He is very pleased with my purchase.
p1019
aVThese things look awesome. They also sounds awesome. They hold sound really well too. (no one else around you can hear what you are listening to) However the thing that kills this is its insanely uncomfortable. I have a very average sized head and ears but this thing did nothing but create headaches. I tried to push past it cause they look and sounds so nice, but in the end I could no longer take it.
p1020
aVSkullcandy found their niche when they ventured off into their versions of designer headphones. Who would of thought to take such a simple product and fuse it with designs that probably will soon become (if not already) the JORDAN of headphones.I have purchased two Skullcandy headphones for my nephews, both HESH's, and my nephews absolutely love them! The great feature about these particular Celtic KG Hesh DJ Headphone's vs the HESH Paul Frank Blacks is that they have a mic switch that allows the user to mute the sound and hear what a person is saying without having to take the headphones off. (Which is not on the first pair of Skullcandy headphones that I purchased so that nephew is not too happy with his lil bro having an extra feature he doesn't have.)However, the important fact is the SOUND. Both Skullcandy headphones produce amazing quality for the money. The Skullcandy headphones are perfectly unmatched in this category and excellent for anything you need to listen to on a regular basis. From an iTouch or any mp3 player to the XBOX or a PS3; Skullcandy provides various models for you to bang out with and is truly the choice of the ear.COPYRIGHT TSTREETZ 2010
p1021
aVI just got these awesome headphones today! They have amazing sound quality! It's like listening to a speaker when the volume is full blast and they are on a desk. I'm in college and really need headphones to block out sound as much as cheaply possible for studying. I have used them only for a few hours, but love everything! Everyone else loves the cute design! Despite that, my favorite aspect is the cord. Instead of being covered in some latex plastic stuff like most headphones, these are a braided cloth cord decreasing shock risk and increasing the longevity! I was surprised to see that these come with a satin carrying case as well. I give it 4/5 because I hadn't had them for very long. But I would Definitely suggest buying!Carmanita RavenFreshman at Converse College
p1022
aVI'm used to using the separate headphones where you rotate this awkward piece of plastic behind your ear because those are cheap, but I decided to buckle down and get some nice over-the-ear headphones because the original ones I'm referring to never seem close enough to my ears. I love the style and color; I feel like Skullycandy is all about expression. I read the reviews before my purchase and I took note that these leak sound (which is unusual considering the style), but I truly don't mind. I usually only wear headphones when I'm walking outside or at home, not in public places anyway. This product also comes with a pouch which is really neat; I just store these and my iPod in there so I always know where they are. I also love how the cord doesn't get tangled and ruined like most headphones! Whatever material they used for the cord is ingenious.
p1023
aVThe headphones are good listening tools but broke in a week. I sent them to skullcandy who then gave me a 50% store credit of my warrented item. There good 'phones but remeber to do two things: 1)Warrenty, 2)And put defective product when you're returning them for breaking.
p1024
aVThis is a great item looks good. I get lots of compliments on the  and the sound quality is great... the only problem i would say i have with this is that it is mostly made of plastic... i just hope it holds up through normal usage wear and tear....
p1025
aVThe first pair of these I bought fit comfortably. The sound quality was pretty good, but although the cups fit over my entire ear, they let in more outside noise than I wanted them to (used on my daily ferry/bus/street commute). Returned the first pair when edge of the vinyl ear pad cover started to come out from under the hard plastic cover on one side after less than a month (exchanged for a new set). When the second pair started to do the same thing, I took them back too - the clerk was unsurprised, indicated they got a lot of that with the Skullcandy headphones. Didn't give them a third strike, decided to try another brand instead.
p1026
aVi love this product i was unsure after reading other reviews how they were saying they break easily but then my cuzin bought them and i tried em out and they rocked there the best 50 doller headphones u can get i use them almost everyday the onley con is after wearing them a while they hurt your ears but otherwise they rock
p1027
aVThese headphones are EPIC!!! you can turn them up loud enough for everyone within 20-30 ft to hear and the sound quality is still very smooth and clear. the comfort is less than perfect, but what headphones aren't? overall, the best quality and best deal on headphones i've ever bought.
p1028
aVI love these headphones. They are very snug and good for simple music listening. There is no volume adjustment, so you would have to adjust the volume from your mp3 player or computer speakers instead. These headphones definitely take away all the extra sound around you.
p1029
aVExcellent product. And the service was amazing. It got to me in great condition and good timing. I am over seas on deployment and the package was still delivered thank you very much.
p1030
aVi bought them,used them for five days on the PC,didnt have the chance to hit the park with them...and guess what they just cracked on the side where you adjust the size of 'em...cool design pretty low quality.and the warranty service isnt that accurate if you're european..i had a cheaper model and they served me much better...i dont recommend these, try wesc or even phillips or the cheaper models these aint worth the bees...
p1031
aVThese headphone are absolutely great!! The sound quality is crisp and loud. I enjoy when I am on the subway and someone else is dancing and singing along to the music I'm listening to in my headphone. I also get a lot of compliments on my headphones alone.  Great look and a great buy. The only thing that bother me about the headphone was the material that it is made out of.  One week after I got them, the blue cover to the speakers came apart. Haven't yet tried to figure out a way to fix it but overall, the product is a great buy if you can keep it from falling apart.
p1032
aVThis is my second pair of Skullcandy Hesh Headphones. The last pair suffered from cheap construction as well as this one does, but for $50, you can't beat the sound, and the comfort. This aren't noise canceling headphones, they amplify, if you listen loud enough, others can hear what you're listening to. Other than that, my second pair, will see if they last six months, good computer mixer sound as well.
p1033
aVWhen I was considering buying these headphones, I was reading a lot of reviews on them that made me not want to buy them. People were saying they were the crappiest headphones ever & that they're a waste of money. Truthfully, these people are just plain wrong. They're expecting way too much out of $50 headphones. I think that these are pretty beast for $50 headphones. They sound amazing & the bass is awesome as well but not so overpowering that it distorts the sound. They also do an awesome job of blocking out surrounding noises. I know there are a lot of people who say these hurt your ears after wearing them for too long, don't worry about that too much. Just a simple readjustment will stop that from happening. The only thing that's a bad thing is that they do leak some sound. But that's not that big of a deal for me so to me, this product is flawless. Another thing: everyone is saying that these are made out of some cheap crappy material that breaks easily. Once again, wrong. If you don't yank them off your head & actually make an effort to take care of them, they should last a while. & even if they do break, Skullcandy will either replace it at no charge or replace it for 50% depending on what happened. So if you're not planning on buying these because of all those reviews that say this product sucks, you should just go ahead and buy them. You'd be surprised at how amazing they are & how all those reviews were just a bunch of bs. These headphones are just so amazing. My very first pair & I couldn't ask for anything better for such a cheap price. Oh yeah, they're also stylish as well (;
p1034
aVI bought these because of reputation.  I wanted a non-earbud type headphone to use while I worked in the office.  I found that these headphones..1) Leak a lot of sound.  Expect to keep them turned down pretty far if you are in a quiet office setting.2) They squeeze your head far to tightly.  After an hour or two of wearing, I get a headache.  And before you even say it, I have adjusting them.  I've even tried wearing them at max adjustment till they no longer touched my scalp at all.3) Brittle.  Is there any metal in these headphones?  The last straw was the arm snapping on them.  Upon inspection the cross section of arm is a very thin layer of plastic.  If you are going to make a device you put on & off your head day in & out.. at least make it robust?!  I've probably gotten less than 50 uses of these.
p1035
aVI really like these headphones, even though I just got them today. I picked Skullcandy for their reputation, and I wanted a solid pair of over the ear headphones with good bass and sound quality for $50 or below, and this is what I decided on. I'm really glad I picked these! They're pretty cool looking and the sound quality is awesome, lots of bass but not so much that it's too overpowering. They fit well on my ears, though they might hurt if your ears are either really sensitive or abnormally large, I guess. They seem pretty heavy duty for the most part, but even if they don't hold up (Again, I just got them), be aware that Skullcandy has a really awesome warranty where they'll replace them if they fail randomly and they will reimburse you for half of a new pair if you break them by accident, no matter how long you've had them. That alone is enough to make them worth the price, as you will never have to pay full price for another pair. Just be sure to write down the date you bought them and you're golden. If you are on the fence about these, go for it.
p1036
aVI don't see what all the negative reviews are for. I bought these to use when i mow the lawn mostly, because normal earbuds just couldn't over power the sound of the tractor. These do a great job! They're super loud, and pretty comfortable. But like the other reviewers said, they definitely leak sound out. Majorly.
p1037
aVOkay first of all i bought a paul frank hesh for my birthday i was ecstatic about buying this since it was skullcandy but when the package came and i put it on my ears it was hell it was  uncomfortable for my ear and the sounds leaked even at the lowest possible volume.to buyers out there who wants to put their money and time to something worth it i recommend you to stay out from skulcandy products they may look cool but they don't offer what you are looking for i recommend ifrogz headphones
p1038
aVBeing skullcandy, I didn't hesitate purchasing these at retail price (49.99). My old over the ear skullcandy headphones were incredibly loud and sounded great.I'm not going on skullcandy by brand anymore. First set failed in a few days and I had to go through a huge hassle exchanging them since I couldn't outright return them.These are extremely uncomfortable, especially after wearing them for long periods, and for the brand and even at the price they're simply NOT loud enough. The sound quality and bass is superior but the uncomfortable ear padding is complemented by painful pressure from the sound I don't usually get at such low volumes.I've been sticking with my $5 clearance Sony mega-bass ear buds until I can find a replacement for these massively disappointing headphones.
p1039
aVI was a little skeptic when I ordered these.  There weren't many reviews on these or the over NBA themed headphones.  But I have to say I am very satisfied with these headphones! The sound quality is great and they look cool!  The only little thing is they don't fit over the ears that well (my ears are average) which can be a little uncomfortable after wearing them for a while but it's not major at all.  Overall a great product I definitely recommend these!Update:Ive had these for a few months now and they still work great.  Although one of the side adjusters recently broke.  I didn't drop them or anything I was simply adjusting them when it cracked.  I was able to fix it with some duct tape and some plastic to act as a splint.  If you get these just be careful with use the plastic on the adjusters isn't that strong.
p1040
aVSKULL CANDY HEADPHONES ARE THE GREATEST. WE GOT THESE FOR MY SON FOR CHRISTMAS. HE IS A HUGE CELTICS FAN SO IT WAS PRETTY EXCITING TO SEE THAT THEY HAD CELTICS HEADPHONES. THEY FIT GREAT, THE SOUND IS AMAZING AND REASONABLY PRICED.
p1041
aVWow, I have been waiting literally years for a quality set of wireless headphones. I listened to many including the previous generation of Sennheiser's. All of them had some low level of hiss and less than audiophile sound quality. The wait is over. These cans utilize Kleer technology and an open design. I always preferred open headphones for the more natural bass response and to my 50 year old ears these sound great. The headphones are comfortable though I would like a bit more padding spanning the entire headband. The buttons on the headphones that control power, volume and balance (handy if you have asymmetrical hearing deficits) are too small and flat but I can now control the volume without removing the headphones. The range is listed as being up to 100 meters and practically speaking, as I can walk on either floor of my house and even outside in my yard without any noticeable effect. Every 30-40 minutes I may get a brief 1 second or so loss of sound but it is infrequent enough to not bother me. Expensive and surely not equivalent sound to an equally or more expensive pair of cans but they are very close in terms of sound and the wireless performance makes them the real deal, totally worth it.
p1042
aVOK, I've got all these. The RS 160, 170 and 180 's along with the ear buds, MX W1 .THE HEADSETS:They all work well together or separately. Most importantly, when pairing them to the same base and adjust the volume on one headset, the volume will change on ALL the units with the exception of the RS-160 's. They'll work independently and are likely the best choice for adding additional pairs.Not much to say about the MX-W1's. They're portable and that's it. They don't compare to the headsets. They do sound clear. The highs sound good, but there's a noticeable lack of bass.The 180's sound the nicest over-all for all material. They're also VENTED so your ears won't sweat during long usage or in a hot house. They also give the best airiness/surround sound when paired to the 170's base. They're also the most comfortable for long sessions. I never knew it, but your ears do get "tired". Additionally, these provide the least privacy. Not that they're loud, just that they can be heard clearly on it's highest volume with someone a couple feet away and still notable in the next room.. For normal TV usage, it really shouldn't be a problem, but music or a good movie could depending on your situation.The 160's and 170's sound EXACTLY the same and are the best for music, especially bottom heavy material. They're CLOSED units and are best when you need privacy... I.E. bedrooms, late-night. These are my fav's except in late summer.... lol, you take them off and get instant relief..... you didn't really notice how hot your ears were till you take them off. On the upside, they make really good ear muffs in the winter!THE RECEPTION:First and foremost, these do NOT work well through walls when compared to the RS-130's. The MX-W1's work reliable from 10-15 feet away, no matter the base unit it's paired to. The 160's, maybe 25-30 ft with it's base unit and NO walls. I couldn't tell a difference between the 160's, 170, or 180's when pair to a full size base unit. I'd say maybe 100 feet, line of sight and around 20-40 feet through a wall or 2, depending on thickness. After that, they're unreliable. If you want the best reception, you'll need to go back to the old model. The RS 130 's were my goto's for several years and goes through 6 inch thick concrete! Maybe 100 yards through numerous walls. They do start cracking up as you go, but you can still make it all out. Unlike these new models that either work clearly or don't transmit anything. The only thing that effects the reception for me is the microwave. If you're within 5-8 feet, it will come in and out.THE BASES:MX-W1 - Just good when you're on the move. I only use it with my PC when at home.RS-160 - We have several PC's and TV's in our home. We use this were it's needed, usually at night, VERY convenient, works on 2 AA's and is great for portability.RS-170 - I LOVE the 170's base. The BASS and SURROUND work with ALL of these headphones when paired to the 170's base. The 180's left / right function will still work when paired to the 170's base, but WILL NOT effect the other units paired with the 170's base.RS-180 - This unit is the most expensive, least useful to use when pairing multiple unit together. It's got a left/right balance control that is only useful for people with a bad ear. For me, it gets in the way and there shouldn't even be buttons on the headset. You should be able to just set it and forget it, not like your ears are constantly changing. I always find myself screwing up the balance when laying down or simply thinking I'm wearing the 170's and was looking for the bass button.Bottom Line: They ALL pair very well to EVERY base, regardless of how many units paired to the base. The 170's base unit is most useful, especially when pairing multiple units. The 160's headsets are best to use in this situation as the volume control will still work independently of the other headsets paired to the 170's base. REMEMBER, ALL the other headsets will trigger each others volume control whenever any of the volume controls are used.
p1043
aVI bought and returned two other pairs of wireless headphones in the sub-$200 price range before springing for these, and simply put they are worth the extra money. There's no interference, the sound quality is excellent throughout the range (bass, mids, highs) and the hiss that plagues most other wireless headphones doesn't exist. Range is also excellent. The only thing to note is that the base station does not have optical audio input, only a standard 1/8th jack.
p1044
aVI have used the Sennheiser RS-130 for the past 4 years, and the surround sound was incredible and delicious, but I was looking for an upgrade, the next generation from a high quality manufacturer. My main uses are for blu-ray movies and late night TV viewing as to not disturb any neighbors, plus it's an intimate experience without any street noise. When I decided on the RS-180 I bought it from J & R because their customer service is outstanding. The DVD product guide estimated an initial charge of up to 16 hours, but mine was ready for blastoff in about 7. I was immediately blown away, swept into a cinematic oasis, a sound panorama that disintegrated any assumptions about how a movie should leave a lasting impression! They are exceptionally comfortable and well worth the price, and you will not be disappointed!!! Without a sound system hooked up to my Samsung 1920 X 1080 HD-LCD TV, I realize now I haven't totally appreciated the blu-ray player and movies until this wireless headphone purchase. Thanks to Kleer's uncompressed audio transmission technology another journey began via listening to some of my favorite blu-rays like Oliver Stones "The Doors". WOW!!! The bass sounds are outstanding and precise. You will venture forth into a new world of audio pleasure. If the Sennheiser RS-180 was a painting it would be a masterpiece by Kandinsky or Dali; a sculpture, La Pieta via Michelangelo, a song, something by Lennon & McCartney. Remember this: escape is not a luxury, it is a necessity if you want to get an advanced degree in sound and mind travel. Now get out and buy these phones!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p1045
aVHaving previously owned the earlier RS 160, I knew the quality of these "cans."  The RS 160 didn't have enough RANGE to cover my home, and wanted the increased range and AGC (automatic gain control) to tame loud passages.  I am THRILLED with the new RS 180!  It covers my whole home and out into the yard for a little distance.  You'll never get the rated 100 metre range unless the transmitter and receiver are both outside and in the clear, but the range of this pair is very adequate!Only complaint I had was that the control buttons are FLAT on the edge of the right earphone.  THAT WAS EASILY SOLVED by mixing up a small batch of acrylic polymer resin, and applying ONE DROP to the volume + and volume - buttons.  After it dried in about an hour, it left those buttons with a raised "bump" that my fingers can easily find.  The on/off/standby button is between the volume buttons, so it is now easy to find with my fingers also.  With this easy modification, I give this headset a solid 5 STARS.  Too bad Sennheiser didn't do this at the factory, but it is very easy to do at homeThe sound of this headset is outstanding.  It fits comfortably on the ears for hours of use without discomfort.  The AGC works VERY WELL indeed.  The two AAA NiMh rechargable batteries will run the cans for 24 hours, and all I have to do to recharge them is to "hang" the headset on the transmitter.  Nothing to plug in.  When, in time, the batteries are exhausted, I can simply purchase replacements at the grocery store and change them out in less than a minute.I was SO PLEASED with the RS 180, that I purchased a second pair to carry with me to field locations.
p1046
aVI have used the Sennheiser model 130's for years and have been perfectly happy with them.  I found them very comfortable and could wear them continuously without any discomfort.  The sound quality has always been great relative to other headphones I have tried, and I had no reason to change to another model except for two things.  First, the rotary volume control can easily change if you are lying down and make contact against the controls.  I have adjusted to this by switching the headphones around so the volume control is on the side away from where I typically lie down.  Second, I thought how nice it would be if the headset had a line out so I could choose to connect a speaker at a remote location if I wanted not to be wearing the headset.It is for these two reasons that I was curious to see if Sennheiser had a solution to the line out idea.  I called Sennheiser and spoke to someone who said that the 180's do have this feature.  I was excited about this alone, but I also learned that the volume controls are flat and therefore will not accidentally change as per my first point made above.  Of course, I was excited to learn about the other enhancements such as higher quality sound (remember, I was already happy with the sound quality of the 130's), the automatic level control, which has the benefit of leveling out the highs and lows to provide a more intelligible spoken voice, and the potential for the range to be expanded beyond what the 130's have (which don't bother me since I don't travel too far from the base station).Here's what I found about the 180's after one day of use.  First the good things.  Yes, the quality of the sound is excellent.  Whether it is much better than the 130's is a perception thing since I can't at the same time be hearing both.  If I had found an issue with the sound quality of the 130's, then the 180's would have solved it.  I've tried these with music and TV, and both sound great.  Regarding the volume control, there is a tradeoff.  I find the 130's much easier to change volume since it is a simple roll of a wheel but the 180's won't change volume while lying on my side.  The 180's do take some getting used to if you want to change volume while you're wearing the headphones.  You need to go by feel, and I suppose after some time this will become easier.  There was a comment by someone else about this where he developed a workaround by applying a small drop of adhesive on each of the two volume controls, and this gives the same feel as the home keys on a computer keyboard (the F and J keys have raised dots).  Regarding range, there may be some slight improvement but not dramatic.  It is sufficient for my needs.  Lastly, the 180's are as comfortable to wear as the 130's.Second for the negatives.  Regarding the main point of my search in the first place, I was given incorrect information when I was told by the Sennheiser rep that there would be a line out or port on the headphones that would give me the ability to attach a speaker remotely.  This is simply not true, and I don't know why he told me this.  This is not a negative about the 180's since maybe nobody is looking for this feature except me, but it is a severe mis-statement of fact by a Sennheiser representative.Now for the big complaint I have, and a reason why I will probably return the 180's in spite of all its good points.  There is a slight out-of-phase problem with the source sound.  If the TV sound is on while I'm also listening through the 180's, as is the case when someone else is watching TV while I am watching with the 180's on, there is a slight delay in sound at the headphones that provides a very irritating dual sound experience which is hard to explain since it's not quite an echo but just the sensation that the sound is coming from two sources, the headset and the TV.  With the 130's, which I have used for years, this does not exist.  If I'm wearing the 130's and the TV is on, I only hear the sound from the 130's.  Both the 180's and 130's are open, so this is not explained by some type of closed environment in the 130's.  It is something with the technology of the 180's that creates a slight delay in sound transmission.  If you never need the source to be on at the same time you are using the 180's, this will not be an issue for you.  For me, it is very typical for the TV to be on for others while I am using the headphones.This out-of-phase problem is not something I hadn't heard about before.  Prior to purchasing the 180's I read reviews to the extent they existed (the 180's are a new product) and found a review where this problem was pointed out.  In my discussion with the Sennheiser rep, I pointed out this reviewer's comment about this and the rep said to just turn down the TV.  After I said that wasn't an option, he then stated that the 180's won't behave any different than the 130's.  FALSE!  I don't know why this Sennheiser rep, whose name I won't reveal but who sounded like he was in the know, or should have been, couldn't simply be honest with me.  While he did achieve his objective of getting me to try the 180's, he is also now responsible for a returned set of 180's and this negative review.  He has done a disservice to his company, in my opinion.In conclusion, you won't be disappointed with the quality of sound and comfort of the 180's -- top notch.  If the sound source will be on at times when you're wearing the 180's, you will probably be bothered by this.
p1047
aVThese headphones are excellent. After listening to music with mediocre headphones for the last few years, the RS 180 opened up a whole new level of details to my music. I'm impressed by the clarity and 'crispness' of the sound and good reproduction of lower frequencies.Pros:- excellent sound quality- comfortable to wear even for an extended time- electronic noise almost not noticeable, no 'hiss'- easy to set up and useCons:- may interfere with wireless network- power button on base station difficult to operate with one hand.- usable range in realistic living environment significantly smaller than advertised, idealistic range- small delay may be a problem when using as hearing aide for TV- noise threshold causes cut offs during very quiet partsLong review:The headphones are light and comfortable to wear even after several hours. In fact, I would forget that I'm wearing headphones if it wasn't for the music. Thanks to the digital transmission there is no static noise and the electronic noise is almost unnoticeable. The sound quality is great and can compete with high-quality wired headphones. The unit is easy to set up and can be operated with normal batteries or rechargeable batteries. Rechargeable batteries are charged when the headphones are placed on the base station. I like that the unit includes several useful accessories: the power supply comes with country adapters, the main audio connection cable has decent length (2m), there is a 3.5mm jack socket to 6.3mm jack plug adapter and a 3.5mm jack socket to 2 RCA adapter. A cable mount and binder help to install all the cables neatly. The RS 180 base unit also has RCA outputs. In this way it can be integrated into an already existing connection between a sound source and an amplifier.The overall good impression is impaired by a number of minor problems, though:The KLEER technology for digital transmission promises to work without interfering with other wireless devices, such as wireless phones and wireless networks. However, I observe interference of the headphones with my wireless network: one of my computer loses the wireless internet connection occasionally. Sometimes it would work for several hours without problems, sometimes the connection dropped out every few minutes. Everytime the connection was re-established as soon as I switched off the RS 180 base station, so there is a clear link. This happened when the base station was located close to the computer. After I relocated the RS 180 base station to the other side of the room the situation got much better. So far, I haven't encountered any more drop-outs. I also noticed a negative impact on the speed of my wireless network if the RS 180 base station is located near a computer. In my experience one has to separate the RS 180 base station as far as possible from a wireless computer network. Note that I never noticed any interference effect on the RS 180 headphones.Transmission from the base station to the headset seems to require the input signal amplitude to pass a certain, small threshold. As a consequence, transmission cuts in and out during an extremely quiet part of music. It is therefore a good idea to follow the suggestion in the manual to turn up the volume of the input device as much as possible (but avoiding distortions) and to regulate the volume directly on the headphones.The range within my apartment building is about 70 ft before the connection brakes up (the Sennheiser web page declares a rage of up 100 m = 328 ft line of sight). The usable range certainly depends a lot on the specifics of the building and I can move around anywhere within my apartment without transmission problems.Both the base station and the headphone are easy to operate. It may take a little time to get used to the buttons on the headphones while wearing them as they are not easy to distinguish by 'the feel'. The only real complaint I have is that switching the base station on or off requires two hands: one for pushing the power button and the other one for keeping the base station in place. It would be better if the base station could be powered with just one hand.A general feature of wireless headphones appears to be a tiny delay in the signal. This is only a problem if the headphones are used as a hearing aide when watching TV, for example. If the headphones are used in parallel with the TV speakers I notice a small delay in the audio coming from the headphones. It's tiny but noticeable and causes an echo-like effect. However, I'm not using the headphones as a hearing aide so it's not a concern for me.The RS 180 has an open design so that outside noise is not suppressed. This is a design feature, not a disadvantage and results in a more natural sound reproduction. But if environment noise is a concern then the closed systems RS 170 and RS 160 may be a better choice.In summary, I can recommend these headphones because of the high audio quality and ease of wearing. The problems I encountered could either be resolved (interference) or are only minor annoyances to me and are outbalanced by the superb sound experience.
p1048
aVIn almost every respect, these Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphones are excellent:- The good experience starts with the packaging.  The main box, the two inner boxes and the inner plastic container are very well designed and built like tanks.  They're also fairly easy to open (the fit of the plastic container containing the actual headphones and base was a bit snug, so there was a bit of tugging there).- Setting the headphones up is very easy.  It boils down to 1) connecting the audio cable to the source and to the headphone stand (I used the LR adapter and connected them to the back of my TiVo TCD658000 HD XL Digital Video Recorder), 2) picking the correct country-specific plug to snap onto the power connector and plugging the result into the wall and into the stand, 3) putting the two batteries into the headphones, and 4) listening to the results.  In my case, I used my own already-charged NiMH AAA rechargeable batteries (900mAh vs their 600mAh), so I was up and running immediately instead of having to wait the 16 hours the documentation says the initial charging should take.  The one minor quibble I have here is that it took me a bit of effort to figure out the pictograms in the setup manual.  Mitigating that, Sennheiser includes a CD with the full manual on it and their web site has a downloadable version, too.  The full manual uses actual, honest-to-goodness words and pictures instead of those pictograms.- Every aspect of build quality is excellent.  Everything is well designed and well constructed.  It all feels very solid.- And, most importantly, the sound is absolutely amazing.  There's no extraneous background noise at all:  no hissing, no hums, no snaps, crackles, or pops.  The only thing coming through the headphones is a beautiful reproduction of the source material.  The sound coming through these FAR surpasses anything coming out of my VIZIO Class XVT Series TruLED XVT472SV 47-Inch 240 Hz sps LCD HDTV (Black).  Even better, when listening through these, I don't lose the voices in the music (as happens through my television speakers).The only minor gripes I can come up with are that 1) the buttons on the headphones (specifically the volume up/down buttons) are not very finger-recognizable:  I have to remove the headphones to adjust the volume (perhaps the problem will go away once I become more used to things), and 2) my head and ears feel a bit warm when wearing the headphones.  But, then again, I live in Florida.  So, that's probably an unavoidable issue.  However, all my complaints combined don't add up to the loss of a full star.  So, I'm very happy to rate these headphones at an Excellent 5 stars out of 5.
p1049
aVIt took me a long time to pull the trigger on these headphones, but believe me it was well worth the the money.  I am not an audio geek by any means....so this review is for the normal everyday person that would like a pair of quality WIRELESS headphones to watch TV at night or sit out on the deck on a summer night with a cold Bud Light without fear of waking any neighbors.  There is no static or hum that comes through these headphones....I REPEAT NONE!!  I ventured about my backyard with them on and at 60-75 feet from the base they tended to cut in and out.  I have the base unit behind my flat screen to keep it away from the grandkids....I'm sure if I had it higher the range would be sufficient enough to go 75 plus feet.  I am the kind of TV watcher that constantly inches the volume up bit by bit until the wife screams bloody murder at me to TURN IT DOWN !!!  No more!!  The last pair of wireless headphones I tried were years ago.  I am telling you what....these are the ticket.  Guys if you are ever banished to the Man Cave and still catch hell for the TV or movie being up too loud......worry no more.  I realize they are a lot of money (I managed to get mine for under $230) but I think in the long run they are going to be worth every penny.  FIVE STARS !!!!  I have never given anything five stars until this product came along.
p1050
aVThese headphones were a replacement for a set of 5 year old Sennheiser RS120 headphones that we wore out (which had in turn replaced a cheaper set of headphones).  Our 97 yr old mother uses them to watch TV.Positives: The sound quality is much better than the 120's.  Also the RS180's fit on her head better than the RS120s which were always loose (and would fall off when she looked down quickly).  In my opinion The RS180s are worth the extra $.  I would definitely recommend these.Negatives: Our most major complaint is the design of the controls.  The RS120 model used one wheel for on/off and volume control.  The RS180's uses three small flush-mounted buttons for up/down volume with the On/Off button BETWEEN the volume buttons!  All three buttons are in a 1 1/2 by 3/8 inch space with almost no way to feel which button you want.  Not an easy task for any fingers, much less older fingers.  We partially solved that by putting a small foam pad on the on/off button (thus separating the volume buttons).  But why should we have had to invent a solution?  One other complaint, both the base unit and the headphones automatically shut off when the headphones are being recharged.  Then both must be turned back on to use the headphones.  The On/Off button on the base unit is very, very small and not easy to see if a person has vision problems and cannot be easily felt.  A light flashes slowly when the base unit is on, but is dark when it is off.  In an effort to make the units sleek, there is almost no tactile or color differential to highlight any button on either the headphones or the base. Again, we invented a solution which works for us, but the whole headphone unit seems to be designed more for appearance than ease of use.  The whole unit does look nice, however.  I'd rate it a "C-" in ease of use and an "A" in sound quality.
p1051
aVI've been using the Sennheiser TR120 wireless headphones for several years, plugged into my M-Audio fast-track for practicing and playing guitar along with iTunes, and also for recording.  They worked really well, but were definitely lacking in sound quality, and had a handful of other shortcomings.  I decided to spend more. A LOT more.  The RS 180s, once set up, sound fantastic.  Really.  They are very high-quality.  However, in order to move that much more sound data through the air, more time is needed to get from point A to point B, which means latency.  Extremely noticeable latency.  Probably about 1/3 of a second.  That may not sound like much, but when you're playing 32nd notes on a guitar, what you're playing gets to your ears 4 notes later than you played it, making these completely unusable for the application. For those listening to passive sound sources (stereo, iPod, etc) you can't go wrong.  For those watching TV, as long as your TV or other equipment has delay compensation, you'll be fine, too.  For active applications such as gaming or playing an instrument, however, these are out of the question.  A real shame.
p1052
aVOk first the particulars.  The evaluation system consisted of the following:  Sony STR-DA5200ES, Sony (Costco) BDP-BX57, Sony CDP-CX335.  The Blu-ray player was connected via HDMI & the 400 Cd Mega-changer was hooked up via analog connects. SACD were demoed both as 2-channel & Multi-channel.The initial impression with the RS 180's is their extreme musicality.  That is to say every note was rendered as a distinct & succint item.  Next, is the warm sound.  If you want headphones that are strident, then look elsewhere. I started off with a SACD (Super Audio CD) sampler from Concord Jazz (Volume 2).  Track 2 of this disc is one that I am quite familiar with as I also have the complete SACD where this song came from.  That song being the wonderful Nature Boy by Nnenna Freelon.  I know this is cliched, but I literally heard notes that I never heard before.  The headphones presented a very wide soundstage with ample presence but not too much "air".  As I stated above these are very warm sounding headphones.  This was, no doubt, influenced by the headphone amp of my 5200ES.  You would think a $1500.00 dollar receiver could do better, but alas that is a nit that I shall pick another day. It is easy to use these cans for long periods of time as the ear pieces are comfortable & compliant.  Listening to the very forward & lively CD, Greatest Hits by Duran Duran instantly transported me back to 1984 (17 is teh best age, evah!) as I reveled in the amazing musicmanship of the band.  I had forgotten just how good (& well produced) these guys were.  Next to Frankie Goes to Hollywood, I don't think another pop act captures the zeitgeist of the 80's as well.Next I moved on to a Blu ray concert of Hall & Oates Live at the Troubadour.  This is were the warm fuzzies of these headphones really paid off.  In this casual close-miked setting I felt as if I was actually there & had to resist the urge several times to turn around & "see" the rest of the crowd.  I should note that while I was listening to this selection I was moving around my approx. 1100 sq foot apartment with no loss of fidelity at all.  I finally ended up with the Blu ray of Transformers.  Now again I have to mention that my Sony receiver was found lacking.  Since it cannot process the lossless codecs via bitstream, everything was fed to it as PCM.  This caused the receiver to automatically apply its own processing (aptly named Headphone 2CH).  In a word I did not like it.  You could tell it was trying to distill the 5.1 mixes down to 2 channels & frankly it did not do a good job.  Voices were diffused & effects were too front & center.  Also, I had to play with my receiver volume & the headphone volumes several times through my listening today.  This was entirely the fault of the Sony.  Having said that, the sheer ability of this set to reproduce sound simply overcame the shortcomings.Setup was fairly easy as there is an ikea like pictogram (with words in several languages) that show/tell you how to get started.  First charge is supposed to be 16 hours, I let them go roughly 24 hours.  Others have mentioned that the controls on the right earpiece take a little to get used to.  Maybe it was the forewarnings, but I had no trouble.  The headphones are light & I hardly noticed that they were, in fact, on my head.  I like that the charging station gives them a "home" to go to.In a word, the Sennheiser RS 180 remote headphones are just about perfect.  I did not give them 5 stars across the board, because I feel that they are about 2 tenths away from that.  The high end could be just a tad more broad, the soundstage is (IMHO) too wide, but for less than 300 bucks, you could not do better.
p1053
aVSennheiser HD 598 v/s RS 180 v/s RS 170 Mini ReviewI went to the Sennheiser office for demo of their headphones.I preferred RS 180 in this lot because the sound quality was nearly as good as HD 598 but with more thumping bass and very little difference in clearness and clarity, while being wireless. HD 598 was a bit better but not by much.RS 180 was significantly better than RS 170. RS 180 has more quality and quality of bass compared to RS 170 even with bass boost enabled. The clarity is better with RS 180. It was deeper and more authoritative and with a much deeper and wider soundstage. It wasn't anywhere close to as loud as RS 170 though. And RS 180 didn't leak much sound, not enough to be heard outside the room. HD 598 did leak much more sound though, still not enough to be heard outside a moderately soundproof room.I proffered the sound signature of the RS 180 the best. The treble of the RS 170 was better than the RS 180 however the mids were best with HD 598, almost as forward and good with RS180 and slightly worse with RS 170.All three had forward mids. I tried the RS 180 velour pads on RS 170 and the difference between the two was reduced by 30-40%, the RS170 improved a lot by doing just that. And it was also more comfortable.In retrospect, I would prefer to buy RS 180 over RS 170. The price difference isn't as much as the difference in quality. The difference is not night and day, but certainly noticeable and very significant. Not worth upgrading at full price unless you can sell the previous can for at least 70-80% of the purchase price though.I recommend the RS 180 over the RS 170 at current pricing. Surround option is decent but just Dolby Headphone isn't bad either. And RS 180 has better bass quantity and quality than RS 170 anyway, partly due to the velour ear pads though. The HD 598 is like marginally better than RS 180 except for thumping bass but then the bass with everything nearly as good makes the RS 180 a clear winner if you can afford it. Especially since it is wireless.But all this was with the Lehmann amp which costs about 750 pounds. My Asus STX card doesn't power my RS 170 anywhere close. The difference from the Lehmann amp is nearly night and day with it being far livelier, open, with a bigger soundstage and brighter as well. With an STX card you don't get the same effect with a RS 170. It isn't even close.
p1054
aVI bought two RS180's headphones to replace RS120 I used for years. The sound of RS180 is definitely superior to RS120.  But the range is 20-30 ft at best (in direct view!) so that it's pretty much impossible to move around the house without loosing the signal. The signal drops when I go to the backyard, 15 ft away from the transmitter through a glass door (still in direct view). RS120 had strong reception in all these spots.The worst: I use 2 headsets with one transmitter station, RS180 system is self-tuning that is you don't manually tune the frequency, it does it for you. This sounds like a nice feature, as you should not manually tune the headphones any more. But if one headset looses the signal, the transmitter station starts searching for the signal to self-tune and THIS knocks off frequency the second headset!! That is, signal drops in both headsets at the same time even though one of them is in the range. With the clear operation range of only 20-30 ft it make the RS180 pretty useless for me.To the manufacturer: the claim was that 2.4GHz was supposed to boost the range without interference, but it not even close to RS120 running at 926MHz
p1055
aVI am very disappointed in this headphone. I simply cannot understand how a fine company like Sennheiser that makes such a marvellous sound equipment decided to introduce a wireless headphone with a signal-to-noise-ratio of 85 dBA and using it with a transmission system (Keen) that shuts off the sound completely at low signal levels, as if that were unhearable.In almost every recording there is some very low, natural sounding background hiss, that you are totally unaware of UNTIL it is suddenly turned off completely, as if the apparatus itself were turned off. Precisely in the most subtle or sensitive passages in music or tensed moments of silence in dialogs, you are distracted by this constantly turning off and on and off and on of the transmission.Did nobody with Sennheiser noticed that?
p1056
aVI'd rate these A- (4.5 out of 5) as far as wireless headphones go, and probably B+ (4 out of 5) out of any kind of headphone out there. The sound quality is nice, they handle bass without breaking a sweat, and lighter notes as well. There's silence where silence is to be expected; if there's hissing present in what you're listening to, you'll hear that as well. You can listen to quieter things like dialogue without that annoying ever-present hissing though, thank goodness. I guess it all comes down to your source, but plugged into a good reciever they can work very well, especially if you turn them up a step. If you go in expecting a revolutionary sound experience, a "lifted veil" and sounds you've never heard before, I doubt that's what you'll find (unless you've been listening through some standard iPod headphones your entire life or something). The real gift of these headphones is how well they are overall; the pads are soft and comfortable with plenty of room for your ears to "float" (there's only a slight pressure on your head, but they don't become fatiguing and are not too heavy), installation is pretty easy (lift the cups and insert the batteries, hook the right power cable into a socket, the cord into your source, add the optional gold-plated adapter, charge them for around a day or so). When they're ready, start the source, hold down the button on the base for a few seconds until it blinks, and hold down the button on your headphone for a few seconds until they blink, done.What are the weaknesses then? They handle sound-levels so well that you might be a little deceived. Playing video games for example, the menus were soft and subtle, and the actual game music explodes with vivacity; it's easy to strain your ears by underestimating how neutral they can be. If your source is turned up enough, you can fine-tune the volume on the back of the headphones with your right hand. There's been many complaints over the buttons being "feel by touch", but they're clearly shaped and easily used if you ask me; your thumb goes right on top for the extra big "plus volume"-button, the middle button is embossed with a power-logo which is easy to feel, and below that is the minus button which has a clearly felt bottom edge. Navigate around it with your right thumb as soon as you begin to use them and you'll be quickly aquainted. The only "real" problem I've run into so far has to do with the charging time. They're supposed to be fully charged after 18 or 20 hours if I remember correctly. After 24 hours and 45 minutes, that little orange light was still blinking, so I gave up and used them anyway. Sure, they worked fine, but I've since found that it takes somewhere between 36 or 48 hours for a full charge (leave them charging for two days and that infernal orange light will finally disappear). But this is just a nitpick really, they can still be used, and it should be noted that I'm using the batteries which came in the package, there are probably a lot better rechargable batteries to use out on the market. I can't vouch for the range though, I have little reason to prance around with these. But as for upstairs and downstairs in the same house, no worries. If you're going out jogging for miles, don't take anything for granted. Take in mind the open design though; if you're in the same room as someone who's planning on sleeping, you can't turn these up too high. If they're in a completely different room with a closed door, you might be able to. I haven't heard any complaints about that, but lifting them off my head, I can tell they're definitely broadcasting the music outwards quite a bit.The RS180 are a blessing as far as wireless headphones go. If you want to get up and grab some snacks while you're watching a movie, sit in the couch and play video games at night, or clean the house while rocking your favourite disco tracks, look no further. If you're an audiophile who demands the absolute best and wants to hear every note of Tchaikovsky, it won't be on these. But regular pop or rock tunes work just fine, same goes for video games and movies, and that's good enough for me.
p1057
aVOh my gosh! I am so glad I spent the money for these headphones. I have been researching various models and brands and I decided to go with these due to the reviews here on Amazon. I am not a technogeek but I know good sound when I hear it. These have no hiss or any other interferences as of yet. I can walk around my house and not miss my program. I got these because my late night tv watching was interfering with my husband's sleeping, and I can cook and not have to crank up the tv volume in my dining room which interferes with family watching tv in the living room. The set up was fairly easy although I did have to print out the manual from the included software. I would have preferred to have a nice manufacturer booklet. The packaging was so secure, it took me some time to actually get into the box. Initial charge time is around 16 hours but I couldn't wait so I used them after 12 hours. Five hours later, I went to bed but the sound was still great. Customer service tells me that extra headsets are not available until around June '10. These headphones also come with rechargeable batteries. The headset is comfortable and it was not difficult for me to get used to the sound adjustment buttons. I highly recommend these and I wish I hadn't waited so long to buy them.
p1058
aVFirst, let me say that these come highly recommended.  Sennheiser fixed some of the problems that plagued their previous wireless headphones.Pros:1) Headphones stay on, regardless of source volume level.  This is a hassle with the RS 130s as they shut off when the volume was low.2) Integrated charger/transmitter means no batteries to replace and the phones are always handy.3) Looks far better than the RS 120s or 130s.  If you've got to look at them all the time then they should look good and these do.4) Phones charge faster than the RS 130s.5) You never hear static or noise from these headphones.  When you get to the limit of the range they just cut off.6) Adjustable balance control is a handy feature that, although seldom used, is completely absent on most headphones.Cons:1) Pricey (but worth it)2) You've got to manually turn on both the phones and the transmitter.  I guess you could just leave the transmitter on and save a step, but I'd rather not.3) Hard to find those little buttons on the phones to adust the volume.  You've got to memorize what they do and find them by touch. Too easy to accidentally turn the phones off when all you wanted to do was adjust the volume.4) Range is low.  I've had wireless headphones that you could use outside of the house, but these cut off at around 40 feet.  That said, these are no worse than the RS 130s.
p1059
aVThis is my third set of Sennheiser wireless headphones. These are the first I've tried with the digital "Kleer" transmission, and it really does reduce the hiss and static compared to my previous RS 130 set.  Comfort, range and sound quality exceed my expectations.My main complaint is the controls, which are much harder to operate than the ones on the RS 130.  The volume is controlled by two little buttons that you have to feel for -- if you're adjusting the volume without taking them off, as most people will want to.  (Even taking the headset off to look at the buttons won't help if you're listening in the dark, as I like to do sometimes.)  There are actually three buttons in a row, and the one in between vol+ and vol- is the on/off button, so if you try for say vol+ and miss, you turn the headset off. This seems completely stupid to me, sorry if that seems harsh, but the controls were so much more copacetic on the older, cheaper headset.  The RS 130 volume control was a wheel, like a scroll wheel on a mouse.  Intuitive, and impossible to get it confused with anything else.I also dislike having to turn the base unit on, then turn the headset on, every time I put them on.  The old 130s would turn off when I hung them on the base/charger, and turn on automagically when I lifted them off and put them on.  The On button on the RS 180 base is stupidly designed also: When I push it, the base just slides out of the way, unless I hold the base unit down while pressing.  All they would have had to do is put the button on top, so you press down, and then the base wouldn't slide away from you when you press it.  Or better yet, just have it turn itself on when it detects sound input, like the old 130s did. I shouldn't have to touch the On button at all.I took one star off for these dumb design decisions.  If my nitpicks don't sound like they'll be an issue for you, then buy 'em and enjoy.
p1060
aVHad been very disappointed with 3 Sennheiser previous lower-end models of cordless phones, so I tried their top of the line digital RS180.  Initially I was blown away by the best sound I have ever heard from cordless phones -- as I sat in one position in a chair near the base station and listened to an entire CD.  Unit seemed to have good workmanship, fit well and comfortably on my head.  But when I had the nerve to try listening to music while standing and moving about the room, sound was only heard in short bursts of static and music with dead silence most of the time.  Every move of my head or body killed the sound.  Turning on any appliance (vacuum, microwave, et al.) killed all sound.  I even tried turning off my computer's Router (2.4 MHz) at the other end of the house, but no improvement in the headphones' performance.  Once I got more than 12 feet from the transmitter, there was no sound at all other than the occasional brief burst of static.  I had planned on listening while working around my house, a small one-level in the AZ desert, but this was fully impossible.  After 3 weeks of trying everything I could think of to make them work better, they were returned to Amazon for a refund.  I am now happily using  Brookstone analog cordless phones, and the sound is clear, loud, and steady all over my house and immediate yard.  The sound is quite good though not the superb performance of the Sennheiser (on the rare occasions when they worked), and the fit and comfort are not fully up to Sennheiser.  Plus a drawback: my 2.4 GHz router does have to be turned OFF or the Brookstone phones do not work well, but I can live with that limitation.  Definitely, the Sennheiser name (once a proud brand) is off my list of acceptable brands I might purchase in the future.  ---LarryKJ, Wickenburg, AZ
p1061
aVI purchased this item because of the proclaimed reception distance.  NOT TRUE!!!  I can't even go 30 feet into another room without losing reception. Not worth the price - save your money.
p1062
aVI got this because I didn't want to disturb my wife when she was sleeping in the bedroom and I was watching a movie in the living room. Once I got the hang of it, it works perfectly. I'm used to listening to 5.1 channel stereo on speakers, and so it's a bit of a comedown to hear only stereo, but the placement of the speaker stage is really good. This particular model tends to emphasize the center channel, which is good for me because I usually find dialogue is mixed too soft against music. So wearing these, I hear the dialogue much better than with the speakers. I think there's another similar model that is made to emphasize the "feel" of a five-speaker system.I find that in my house I can walk ANYWHERE and get a clean signal. I imagine those who complained about a hum or buzz or something else have some location issue, like lots of walls, florescent lighting, or a conflict with the frequency the headphones operate at. I use a DECT 6 wireless phone system, and have a dual-band wifi network in the house, and NEITHER interferes with the clear sound.One last thing, which is amazing: these headphones (which surround the ear) are actually comfortable enough to watch a double-feature (okay, maybe taking a short break in between). I think these may be the most physically comfortable headphones I've ever worn.
p1063
aVI've owned these cans for a month now, and I can say this headphone is not bad. I listen to classical music mostly (90%) along with a bit of rock music and others (10%).To me, it took about 20 hours of listening to break in. At the beginning, brass and voice especially sounded rather recessed and dull. But now they sound upfront as they should. Also, the cans sounded too mellow at first, but they sound much more neutral now. It is still rather on the "warm" side, but I would say only to a pleasant degree to my ears.To be specific.... Sound staging is quite good. Bass is full, prompt, and accurate. Range is rather limited, but I was going to use them indoors mostly anyways, so it is not a big deal. Control keys on the headphone is not really well designed as many reviews pointed out, but i can live with it. Convenience factor of a wireless headphone is a huge plus.Then...Why only 3 stars?The main problem that bothers me is the presence of "noise" especially when listening to solo instrument music. Even at a not-so-high volume, quite audible noises kick in when a piano player playing piano sonata, for example, hits keys strong enough. What happens if you raise volume further?? You hear severely distorted sound (or "clipping").(However, for other genre of music where many instruments play simultaneously, RS180 doesn't show a similar issue and it is usually my ears, not the headphones, that cannot take any more before clipping kicks in.)I am no expert, but here is my guess for the issue.Your music is sum of all sound waves at different frequencies. When you listen to a symphony, you typically have a wide range of frequencies going from ~20Hz to ~20kHz. But when you listen to piano sonata, you have narrow peaks at a few frequencies in the sound spectrum at any given time. At a similar volume level recognized by your ears for these two different kinds of music, there should be much larger wave amplitudes to be delivered by your headphones in the single instrument case compared to symphony.The "KLEER" wireless transmission should have a certain threshold for "clipping" for any narrow frequency range. The problem, I believe, is that this threshold is set rather low either due to technological limit or for safety reasons, and this limit leads to sound distortion at a not-so-high volume when you listen to solo instruments. (I don't think the clipping comes from the diaphragm itself, because my other Sennheiser headphones handle similar volume levels without a sweat.)To exclude the possibility that other parts of my system is causing the problem, let me point out that my RS180 is plugged into an amplifier (Rotel) capable of handling lots of amps of currents. I tried various combination of volume levels on the headphone and on my amp, but I couldn't resolve the issue. I talked to a Sennheiser rep to get around the issue, but I figured that they don't have solutions to this either.... And yes, the transmitter is set at -8dB.Despite the problem, I didn't return these cans because they do their job for most other genre of music. Again, convenience of a wireless headphone (and decent sound when it works) certainly secures its spot in my man cave. But still, I should go back to my good old, "wired" cans when I listen to single instruments. Hope Sennheiser comes with better wireless cans next time.
p1064
aVSound quality is great for these headphones.I have two problems with the HDR 180:1) The placement and size of the buttons on the headphones to turn them on and off and adjust volume and balance is terrible.  The buttons are tiny and placed very close together.  The only way to do anything, whether it be to turn them on or off, adjust the volume or adjust the balance is to take them off, turn on lights if necessary, and watch what you're doing.  I'm a person who can pretty much do everything on a TV remote in the dark by touch.  With these headphones, I can do nothing by touch.  The most important button, the on-off, is between the buttons to change the volume.  It should have been off by itself.  All the buttons are more or less flush with the surrounding case and this makes the problem worse.  In the end, the only way to change anything is to take them off, turn the light on and watch while you press the proper button, which on the face of it seems silly.  I have big fingers and that makes all of this much worse, given the minuscule size of the buttons.2) Previous versions (RS140 for example) turned themselves off when they did not get a signal for a while.  That meant that you walk away from them and they would shut themselves off, saving precious battery life.  The HDR 180 shuts off the sending unit, but not the headphones when the signal stops, for example when the sleep timer on the TV shuts it off.  That means that you have to physically walk to the base station to turn it on to resume.  The RS 140 stayed in some sort of sleep mode and came on when the signal from the TV returned.  The headphones themselves, by contrast, have to be turned off manually.  Given the tiny buttons, that means turning lights on to do it.  This is the exact reverse of the way the RS 140's worked and the previous method was far superior in daily use.Again, I like the sound, but hate the interface.
p1065
aVAfter returning 3 different sets of wireless RF headphones back to the shop and thinking if there is anyone who could stand the inferior sound quality and all that interference I found out about these.When Sennheiser came out with the RS 180 and after reading reviews I thought this could be it.Finally someone delivers and stands up to all the promises.After opening the box I was quite pleased with the build quality and colour.The ease of setting it up! Simple, straight forward.And the transmission? Yeah! Clean and crisp. These will probably be the best set of headphones around your houseor office and will enable you to rediscover music and put a smile on your face.I do realize it sounds a bit over the top, but it really was like that for me.I love the sound, I love the fact that when the song is over there is no hiss or static... Next song comes on and it emerges out of silence as clean as with a wired pair.IMO it definitely delivers for any listener with a keen ear as well as for anyone who just wants the comfort and ease of use.Very happy with my purchase and worth every cent to me.+ the battery life is amazing too! Beautiful gadget that will not let u down.
p1066
aVDespite Amazon lists this item as "Sennheiser RS180 Digital Wireless Headphone System with Dynamic Surround Sound", this is NOT the model with surround sound. If the surround sound feature is important to you, RS 170 is the one you want.I purchased the RS180 from Amazon. No until I openned the item, read the manual, and confirmed with Sennheiser's website, I realized that Amazon made a mistake on listing it as "with Dynamic Surround Sound". RS 180 has something call ALC ("Automatic Level Control" enhances speech intelligibility). Sennheiser made no claim to have surround sound feature in the manual or their website for the RS180. Unlike the RS 170, the Dynamic Bass Boost & Surround Sound on/off buttons do not exist on the headset.  RS 170 is the one with Dynamic Bass Boost and Surround Sound simulation features.Amazon promptly accept our return request and we placed the order for the RS 170. Good customer service! Hope they fix the listing title soon. Very miss leading.
p1067
aVI had the RS130 headphones and they lasted me around 10 years before finally dying. Got great use out of them. I could put them on and go from the TV lounge to my home office and work on my computer all whilst listening to CNBC for the latest financial news or another general news channel. I could even go outside and catch some sun or go to the kitchen and make a cup of tea or coffee. The sound was great and there was hardly ever a dropped signal.So, I bought the RS 180 thinking that these would be superior as a much newer model. What a huge disappointment. If you put them on while your main speakers are on you get an echo delay that is very annoying. Secondly, when I go from room to room or outside as I used to do, the signal cuts out almost as soon as I leave the TV room.However, the actual sound is better than the RS130 but not by much.I will be taking these back to the shop and  using my really old RS 45 instead.
p1068
aVI have owned these Sennheiser RS180 headphones for about a month (bought them elsewhere from a reputed online dealer) and am completely satisfied with them. My positive and negative experiences are listed below.1. Crystal Clear, Great Frequency Response, Wireless Works Great -- After about 50 hrs of breaking-in, they really open up and shine. They are very airy (typical of expensive open-air designs), bass is very balanced (not booming), and extremely good frequency response all the way up as far as I can hear. I can even pick up nuances in some tracks that I hadn't heard before. These are good for extended listening periods since they don't fatigue the ears due to the lack of boominess. Bass heads will be disappointed, but all other music lovers will definitely love these. The earpads are super comfortable too, and these headphones are super-light - almost all plastic, but they seem to be OK in fit and finish and will probably last a decade unless I walk over them several times. The digital transmission system from Kleer is almost flawless, but you will probably get half the range they claim. If I move 3 rooms (3 walls in-between), I get occasional sound drop-outs (about 1 sec) but no loud buzzing or shrill sounds. But that's not a big problem.2. Setup - I had some problem with interference when I first set them up; the transmitter and receiver would lose sync frequently). But after moving them about 3 feet away from my other wi-fi equipment, the problem seems to have gone away. The cords provided are long enough (5-6ft) long to allow placement adjustments. I have tested the RS180 with my HK DPR 2005 receiver, with a Squeezebox v3, an HD TV and a Blu-Ray player, all in different rooms. Seems to work just fine. You don't have to fiddle at all to get them to work. It took me a while to realize that the power led on the transmitter is also the power button. Once you power up both the transmitter and the headphones, it takes less than 5 seconds to sync and begin listening.3. There is a slight delay about 100 ms (in my unscientific estimation) due to the pre-processing/transmission-reception/post-processing. Not enough to cause any noticeable video-audio sync issues - I looked hard, and couldn't see any sync problems. But, if you turn on the TV speakers and use the headset as well, there is definitely an echo effect due to the headset's lag. However, if you turn down the TV volume to a somewhat low level (or turn up the headset volume) so that the headset "overpowers" the TV speakers, the echo effect diminishes greatly. But for general listening from your stereo, or late night TV/BluRay/DVD watching, the quality is superb. There are no sound drop-outs within the same or adjacent rooms. But, of course, since these open-air cans, they will leak some sound. So, that is not acceptable, you need to look at the RS160 or the RS170 closed cans - but remember that those will have slightly different sound quality.4. The supplied rechargeable batteries seem to last 16-18 hours on a charge, which is very good. Best of all, these are standard AAA size, so when these die, you won't have to hunt for expensive proprietary batteries. A big plus!5. The only shortcoming (and for this, the product gets a star deducted) is that there is no optical input to the transmitter! All devices nowadays have digital line outputs. The transmission itself is digital, so it is strange that there is no provision to accept a digital signal as input to the transmitter. Perhaps, it's a cost-cutting decision?
p1069
aVSound Quality-I've had the priveledge of hearing some the best headphones on the market both wired and wireless and I can honestly say, when it comes to sound quality, you will not find a wireless headphone that's better. Sure Sennheiser's HD650 sound better to me, but can they grab a snack from the kitchen, or allow me to keep my little rugrat out of trouble while I can still hear the movie or music I'm listening to clear as the sky is blue?... Nope, they can't. IMHO for under (...) you would be hard pressed to find a headphone, even wired,  that you could tell a noticeable in sound quality difference over the RS 180's if you aren't a headphone aficionado.Transmission-The move to KLEER technology is a godsend, no more crackles and pops found in the wireless headphones of yesteryear or for that matter yeasterday. This is especially important these days with so many possible sources of interference in our homes.Comfort-What's not to like about plush earpads, a well padded headband, and just enough pressure on the sides of your head to keep them snug, but hardly notice they are on?Noteworthy Features-I have always had difficulty hearing dialogue in movies, especially whispering...fortuneatley these headphones automatically adjust volume levels when speech volume is lowered so that speech intelligbility is always maintained. It also has balance control for those of us who need it louder in one ear instead of the other.The buttons on the side are an improvement over the 120,130,and 140 models becuase you can lay down with them on and not accidently adjust the volume. They do have one flaw though, who decided that putting the power button between volume up and down?...He/she was not a smart person. The fact that they are flat buttons isn't ideal either, however I got use to finding the buttons pretty quickly.Additionally, like the old RS 120,130,and 140 models, the batteries are recharged when the headset is placed back on its stand after use, all ready to go next time you want to use them.I can sit here and tell you how much I love the Sennheiser RS 180, which is obvious by now, but at the end of the day you need to know what the consensus opinion on these headphones are and not just take the opinion of one man to heart. So, I will share with you my secret to buying a new pair of headphones.  It's (...), which provides consensus reviews for you...no more searching the internet for user and professional reviews alike. I don't know why there aren't any other sites like this because I've always had difficulty finding enough good reviews on headphones, especially new products like the RS 180's. It not only makes finding reviews easier, but summarizes them all for me...more time for me to enjoy the headphones and less time shopping for them Hooray!
p1070
aVI have/had both multiple wired/wireless headphones, so I've put together a mental list over time, of what worked, and what hasn't.  These headphones were meant to be multi-purpose: music, primarily classical, New Age, contemporary (a wide range), as well as T.V. (connected to the stereo). This is what I found:Positive:1. Charging is pain free... just drop the phones on the base unit, and they not only easily find their own center, but charge very quickly.2. Range.  There is nowhere I can go in my home (3-stories, 3500 sq. ft.) where I can make it drop out, or even produce any noise/static, including down my driveway to my mailbox. Range is fabulous.3. Sound.  Excellent. Best I've had in a headphone.4. Comfort.  This is a complaint I've had in other headphones, that either didn't have enough padding in the headband, or the earcups, or were not adjustable enough, too tight, etc.  The RS 180 resolves all that.  Perfectly surrounds your ears (as opposed to 'open-air' which press against your ears), and the headband is thickly padded.  The phones are adjustable, hold their adjustment, and apply the perfect amount of pressure to create a soft "seal" without cutting off your circulation.Negative:1. While the controls are very versatile (balance, on-off, mute, volume), I would have liked the on-off/mute button a little more pronounced, or separate from the other row of buttons... perhaps on the other earcup.  However, a small nit, that in no way puts a dent in a fantastic product.2. Pricey.  It's an excellent, well-designed, quality product.  You should expect to pay the price, unless you want to sacrifice/cut corners.
p1071
aVFirst, let me say that I don't really consider myself a "die-hard" audiophile, that said, besides owning these rs180 wireless phones, I also own Sennheiser hd-555, hd-598, and the hd-650 corded cans.  I appreciate solid performing headphones and the rs180's fill that need exceptionally well and have the big added benefit of being cordless.  I'm not going to go into a full sound quality breakdown here, but I will say for those familiar with the 598's and 650's, the RS180's IMHO fall somewhere between the two.  Closer to the 598's I think.  A little better mids and bass than the 598's.  Brighter, airier, but not quite the very fine overall perfomance of the 650's in regards to soundstaging and imaging. Although, I do think they work better than the hd 650's for movie watching.  But not with music.  This really is an incredible achievment for a wireless headset.Set up was as simple as it gets.  I tried connecting through both the headphone jack and also the zone2 outs on my pioneer vsx-819h (used for home theater).  There was really not a noticable difference in the quality of sound between the two connections, so I decided to stay with the phone jack for ease of use.  Charging the headset took about 8 hours.  Once charged I was able to stroll out into my back yard (150ft) with no signal loss at all.  I also haven't experienced any problems with my wireless network as described in some other reviews that I've read.  I found the headset to be light and comfortable (a bit heavier than the hd555's they will replace for movie watching) and have worn them for up to four hours so far with no sense of fatigue or any other difficulties.  I also connected them to my Denon AVR-3312CI (used for music) and found them to be very competant for music appreciation.  Though as stated above, they won't be replacing my hd-650's for this purpose.  I would also add that so far I haven't experienced any drop outs or noticible back ground noise at all.  I've been very impressive.As for the controls, yes it's a bit of a bother having to turn both the base and headset on before use.  And yes, the controls on the headset take a little getting used to.  However, I find both issues to be very minor and believe the perfomance of these phones far out-weighs the few negatives.Overall, I would most definitely recommend these to anyone looking for solid performing wireless headphones.
p1072
aVI have a 170 unit and have liked it for the last few years, but the cushions are wearing out and I thought I would just upgrade to the 180, which (being an open headphone) might be more comfortable anyway.Unfortunately, this 180 does not charge the headphones...  At first I forgot to remove the plastic, so user error.  Once I did that though, the headphones still are stone dead after 2 days charging. The charge light on the base does not come on. Fiddling with the headset only gets it to light for a second at most. Unit is useless.I even tried charging the 180 headset on the 170 base, but that doesn't work either.Worse part is that I cannot return this, so am stuck with an expensive doorstop.  I had this shipped to a friend when I visited the States, but the unit is now with me in Ecuador, so I am stuck. :-(((
p1073
aVThese headphones are excellent in every regard except three.  First, the seal that is to keep the sound from leaking into the room is not much of a seal at all:  My wife can hear the dialog when I'm watching TV using the headphones.  The sound is, of course, at greatly reduced volume, but just loud enough to be annoying. Unfortunately, Sennheiser offers no alternate ear pads for the easily-replaceable open-foam ones supplied. It could have and should be doing so. That doesn't mean they shouldn't also supply the ones they are: The advantage to the supplied ear pads is that, when you pause the sound, you can hear people in the room speak without taking off the earphones.  And they let in enough fresh air so your ears don't heat up, as happens with denser ear pads.Second, the controls were designed by an incompetent.  In order to hear anything, you have to not only turn the headphones themselves on, but the charging/transmitting tower as well.  The tower should blow through 2 cents worth of electricity per year and "listen" for headphones to request it to power-up.  What's worse, the switch on the tower is located in a place that requires you to grasp the tower with one hand while pressing the on switch with the other. Otherwise, it just slides away from you across the table.  Really, really bad design.  But the headphones are worse:  All five controls, the three you actually use and the two you never use, are all lined up together in a perfect row just below your right ear where you can neither see them nor feel them with the headphones in place.  Except one of the five, the one you actually can see because you use it to turn the headphones on before you plunk them on your head, has a just barely raised logo of some sort on it.  This string of five-in-a-row buttons makes trying to change the volume maddeningly difficult.  Essentially, you find a volume you can live with, and you live with it.Finally, and I can hardly fault Sennheiser for this, the RS 180s lose when they go up in battle with my microwave oven, cutting in and out as long as I'm within six feet of the oven.  What's remarkable is that I've never owned a pair of wireless headphones before that could even approach the kitchen before transitioning into white noise, the transmitter being 30 feet away in the living room through two walls, so the fact that the Sennheiser headphones work perfectly in the kitchen and beyond, save when the oven is actively turning, is quite remarkable. The way to have address this would have been to decouple where the headphones have to be vs. where the transmitter has to be, but since they put transmitter and charger together, then insisted that the transmitter be separately powered up, they precluded the possibility of putting each device in the best place.Now, all this may sound really, really bad, but in spite of these negatives, these are the first wireless headphones I've ever elected to actually keep. Other reviewers have talked about the good stuff, and the good stuff adds up to the full four stars I've given them. And I've come up with solutions to the last two problems I can live with: The tower I've velcroed to my side table (I'm hoping my wife doesn't read this) so I can turn on the transmitter with one hand. I've touched the up and down volume controls with a hot soldering iron to to make them so that I can feel them (the DOWN is sufficiently rough to stand out, and the UP ended up with a round blob of old solder melted into it--both easily discernible), and I have a remote in the kitchen that will let me pause the TV while I cook something in the microwave while I'm under the headphones. Now, if I can just address problem one by dampening my wife's hearing a bit by maybe injecting a little caulk in her ears while she's asleep... Well, perhaps not.
p1074
aVI bought these for work (at home.)  I wanted something wireless, of decent quality with good range.  Setup was quick and easy.  The base station charges the headphones when you place them on top, which I do at the end of the day.  They play fine all throughout the day so they are full charged each morning.  When you take the headphones off, you must press the ON button on the base unit, then press the power button on the headphones before they will work.  The buttons on the headphone are definitely hard to discern without looking at them (ie, while wearing them.)  You can feel the power button, it has some raised edging, but it's rather thin and small - the volume up button is above that, but it's a little clumsy.  I would have designed it with a little knob to press for power on/off and turn of volume up/down.  That would have been so much nicer and easier- especially when you need to quickly adjust the volume to, say, answer a phone or talk to someone.  The way it is, you have to pop them off using both hands (so no holding a phone), and press the on/off button, or click and hold the volume down button, or otherwise adjust the volume from the source (computer, stereo or whatever the base station is getting it's audio from.)I like the "around the ear" design, I find it more comfortable.  These are perfectly comfortable for extended periods; though I find I usually never have them on for more than a couple hours.  Sometimes I just let them hang around my neck instead of putting them down; convenient.My biggest gripe is the range.  Advertised 320', which is quite a long ways.  My mailbox is about 60 feet away and the headphones start cutting out- though the signal IS going through a layer of brick.  Also it cuts out inside my house, at only 30 feet or so, if I am in the kitchen.  But, to be fair, there are a couple walls and partially a refridgerator between the headphones and the transmitter.  I can listen to them upstairs, the signal going through the floor, no problem.  I will experiment with them soon and update this review.  I will move the transmitter just outside and test unobstructed line-of-sight range and also move it to a higher spot- above my bookshelf; right now it's about a foot off the floor next to my computer.  Conclusion: Range can severly suffer if you start walking around corners or have too much between the headphones and the transmitter.  Inside the house I get about 30 to 40 feet before it starts cutting out.  House was built in the 70's and there's not a lot of internal wall insulation.  I'd like to be able to sit in my screened porch and listen, but it cuts out just before I get to the door, which is no more than 50' from the transmitter.  Arg. We'll see if moving the transmitter (use a long audio extension cable) helps any.These are pretty expensive headphones, I had expected to be able to go anywhere in my house (including the porch) and get a good signal, but that hasn't been the case.  I don't know of any good alternatives, though, so I'll keep these and experiment with moving the transmitter so that I can get a better signal in other parts of the house. (It's not a large house, about 2400sq/ft.)  My wireless phones can reach everywhere, why not a pair of $300 headphones?
p1075
aVI purchased these wireless headphones for quiet listening late at night so I would not disturb other people.  I have used the wired Sennheiser HD 414 headphones for the last 20+ years and have had zero problems with them. They are open air design like the 180's and have very excellent sound quality.  That is what made me decided to go with Sennheiser when I was looking for wireless headphones.  The sound quality is very good and are very comfortable to wear.  Along with other reviewers, The only two negatives that I can see with these headphones is the transmission range and the design of the control buttons. I average around 75 feet before it starts to cut out.  However I have extended this range a bit by putting the transmission base as high as I can reach to put the headphones back on the base for recharging. Control buttons are very close together and when first using them, you tend to push the wrong ones quite a bit.  I consider this a minor inconvenience since after a bit of practice you can determine which buttons you want to use/adjust by feel.  Overall I am happy with the headphones performance.  I upgraded the stock NiMH batteries with a better brand and charge times were greatly reduced since they have almost 40% more capacity (600mah for stock batteries compared to 1000mah for replacement batteries) Power button could be placed on top of the base unit to push down on rather than have it on the front since you tend to push the base unit away when you push the power button so you have to hold unit down when pushing it.  All of these are minor since I wanted quality, comfortable headphones.  I would still recommend these headphones even with the few negatives it has.  With what really counts for me is quality construction, comfort and excellent sound reproduciton, these headphones have it.
p1076
aVLet me start off this review by saying that if you need a huge rundown on the specifics of these particular headphones, you're better off just searching for video reviews on YouTube since they go into great detail on every aspect of the product. I'll be as brief as possible listing the annoyances I had with the RS 180's, but I will say right off the bat having owned the RS 120 II & RS 170 from Sennheiser - these definitely are more comfortable and way better sounding (at least to the RS 120 II).At the end of the day I really want to emphasize that I do like these headphones a lot, but there are some things that you may find annoying about them as I do. I've listed them below in no particular order.AC adapter has short cabling and is on the thin side. Ideal for traveling, but less so for home setups.Automatic shut off after 5 minutes of no audio signal. Would have been nice to be able to toggle this feature; since I like "always on" setups.Requires pressing of the power button on the transmitter to wake from standby instead of automatically when an audio signal is detected.Flimsy plastic tabs on ear muffs can easily be broken with gentle force. Most complaints about the RS 180 is regarding this.Power on/off button is located right between volume up and down buttons (On headphones). Very easy to accidentally press when adjusting volume.As far as everything else goes - I couldn't be happier. Sound quality is leaps and bounds better than the RS 120 II's and ANY Bluetooth set I've tried. Slightly better than the RS 170's as well. Still nowhere near the quality of a wired headset in terms of full range sound, but this is the best offering we can get for now and I'm grateful for it. If you have questions, feel free to ask in comments.
p1077
aVI've got these headphones around Jan 5, 2011. These are my first pair of over the ear headphones (i've used IEMS and earbuds before) and first wireless headphones. I wanted wireless headphones with good battery life, sound quality, and comfort. I use these headphones for music, movies, and gaming.Sound: These are the best headphones I've ever heard, though all my past headphones were <$20 so that isn't a very helpful is it? Despite not having a trained ear, I'll try describing the audio as best as possible. I found that the bass had a decent punch, and was very clean. Past headphones I've used tend to have a muddy/blurry bass compared with the RS180. While all genres sounded better than I have ever heard on a headphone, I found orchestra music to benefit the most from these.edit: the "ssssh" sound was due to my poor source. Male sure to check your/source.I found that there seems to be a slight "ssssssh" sound when the headphone volume is less than 4 clicks from the max. One can eliminate this problem by leaving the headphone volume at 4 or more clicks below the max, and instead changing the volume from the source. These headphones aren't as loud as others, but they play loud enough just to be slightly uncomfortable rather than ear deafening loud which is nice. You just need to get used to raising the volume higher than you normally would with other headphones. Of course since these are open headphones you get sound leakage. The leakage is about as loud as a pair of desktop speakers at a semi-low volume. If the big transmitter wasn't a hint enough, it is obvious that these headphones should only be used at home for private listening.Design: I love how the transmitter also works as a stand/charger. I just wish that you could connect it to two different sources at once; I have to unplug the cable from the transmitter when I'm switching from my PC to my TV. I think the volume button issue is a bit overblown. I found it very easy to use, since the power/mute button which is slightly beveled, is actually between the Vol + and Vol - buttons. So I just have to slide my finger from the Vol + button down to the Vol - button if I want to lower the volume. It took me literally less than 5 minutes to get used to this. The headphones are extremely comfortable. They literally feel like pillows because none of the plastic has contact with your head; the plush velour pads are the only things resting on your head. Velour pads can be removed by turning them counter clockwise. They attract dust but can easily be cleaned by rubbing both pads together and blowing away the dust with a hair dryer or low powered vacuum.Range: I honesty only needed these to work within the vicinity of my room but the RS180 had signal within my entire house (even the garage) which is excellent. Though when I went near the kitchen the signal would cut out when I moved or touched my headphones; that however is to be expected with most wireless devices.Build Quality: While good, the materials feel slightly cheap for this price point. While the build quality is definitely not poor, the headphone feels more like a $50-60 headphone rather than a $250 headphone. The plastic though is of good quality, and the gloss surprisingly looks nice while being scratch and finger print resistant. You cant see in the photos but there is a sparkle to the paint job which looks nice. The velour quality of the pads is excellent and is very soft and comfy.Battery Life: The battery life is supposed to be 24 hours which I highly doubt, but even then I don't expect battery life to be an issue at all. I forgot that these even ran on batteries. I wear them every day and place them on the charger when I'm not using them. Never had the battery die on me, but the fact that it takes regular AAA Nimh rechargeable batteries means you can easily replace them if they ever die.Overall: These headphones met my every need. The reason that the RS180 is not perfect is because of the "ssssh" sound volume is less than 4 clicks from the max (can easily be fixed by adjusting source volume and even then it isn't that big of a deal and most would probably not notice it), the build quality for the price you're paying, and the lack of another headphone jack on the transmitter (most probably don't care about this). They retail for $300 but I suggest you get these for $250 or lower as $300 is a bit overpriced for the build quality.
p1078
aVWe have three of the older analog Sennheiser wireless headphones (one RS140 - it failed recently after 5 years and two RS130s). The RS180 has zero hiss/pops/static whereas the older units have had these at times.  The bass has been punched up as others have noted, so these do not give high fidelity sound - I am using a home entertainment system amplifier and can adjust for this. I have had no problem getting good reception around our Garrison type house, where as I have AT TIMES with the older RS140 and RS130 analog units; when I go into the garage or outside the house (we have an aluminum covering on our wall insulation) reception becomes a problem, even at 50 ft from the transmitter. Standing within two feet of our running microwave cuts off all sound from the headphones; the sound returns when I retreat 4 to 5 feet away. The one feature that has caused me much trouble is the new method of adjusting sound and turning the headphones on and off. I find it hard to believe Sennheiser did any Beta testing of these headphones in a population with large fingers or toughened finger skin or abraded finger skin. One needs supple, sensitive finger tips to quickly discriminate the buttons and I doubt this applies to most people over 40 and to people who work with their hands a lot! Except for this serious design flaw I would have rated it 5 stars.  They are comfortable, and give clean good sound when the bass is adjusted.  Those wanting a more booming bass are no doubt the target market and they will love the sound as is.
p1079
aVMost of the negatives mentioned on other reviews are pretty accurate - the controls are way too tiny so other than the up volume button you need to take them off to avoid hitting the wrong button.  Having to turn on the base station every time is also a big negative.  I haven't seen what I consider the biggest negative mentioned previously though - if I plug them into the analog out on my receiver, I cannot listen to any digital (I.e., HDMI) sources - so no Apple TV, Blu-ray/CD player, etc.  I suppose I could run a separate set of analog cables to every source from my receiver (some, like the Apple TV don't have analog outputs though...), but that's just ridiculous.  The other option (and the one I am doing currently) is to plug the base station in to the headphone jack when I want to listen through the headphones...somehow not as slick as I was expecting "wireless" to be.The sound quality is pretty good, no problem with wireless interference at all.  The bass response is pretty weak however, but I can't fault them for that as it is pretty well documented that the bass is not stellar.All in all they aren't bad, but I think I will go back to wired headphones.  The negatives for these just outweigh the positives IMO.
p1080
aVMisleading product name.  If you have any modern components you will have a digital optical out.  It is useless with this.  You will have to purchase a converter from digital to anlaog.  The unit broadcast in digital but only with an anlaog signal.  (RCA jack's)  Beware!!  Purchase somthing with an digital opticlal input.
p1081
aVI absolutely love them.  I get perfect reception in 97 percent of my two story house and most of the back yard.  They make house work a LOT less boring.
p1082
aVWorks better than I had expected.  Having a slight hearing loss, compared to my wife, I could never hear the dialogue on the TV without blasting the volume above what would probably be called "normal" hearing.  The best part, my wife can actually turn the volume down to almost a whisper, but I can adjust my volume totally independently of the other audio outputs.  I can hear everything on the TV even without my hearing aids.  My only minor issue is the pads on the ear phone could be a bit thicker/firmer.  The headphones tend to press on my ears after a bit and I find myself having to readjust/reposition them to relieve the pressure.  Then again, it might be that I have weird shaped ears.  Excellent product all in all.
p1083
aVUpdate #2:  Still going strong after 20 months of use.  We use these daily and they are still going strong and the original Eneloop batteries are still holding a charge.  No issues after almost 2 years of near daily use.UPDATE:After owning these for close to 2 months, I have to say these headphones have changed my life.  My home theater system is a force to be reckoned with, with 5.1 speakers perfectly balanced, a 120" pull down screen and 1080p Epson 8350 projector.  But listening to movies with these headphones is really the best way to experience movies.  They are nice for music, no doubt, but having 2 pair of these (for my wife and I), no wires, no static, perfect sound, is just spectacular.  Movies just come alive.  Of course, you can do the same with any good headphones and 20 feet of knotted cables, and everyone has to sit still or you yank the other persons' headphones off their head...but doing it without wires is obviously the way to go.  The freedom to move around while hearing perfect sound is just great.I'd recommend these to anyone with a home theater system, anyone over 50 who is starting to have hearing problems, anyone who misses the dialog in movies and TV shows, or anyone who wants to enjoy music and movies.  Okay...I recommend these to anyone who can afford them.Again, I have a lot of wireless going on in my living room, and have never had a problem with a single lost syllable.  Even watching streaming movies over wifi with the PS3 right next to the transmitter has not been a problem.  I have had zero issues with these after 2 months of use.  I even dropped one pair once (my heart skipped a beat) but nothing happened to it.I increased my review to 5 stars, even with the terrible button placement for volume and power.Here is my original review:I have two other open Sennheiser headphones:  HD555 and HD518.  My favorite are (were) the HD555, for their crisp sound.  The HD518 have more bass, but I think it sounds fake or muffled.  Anyway, the RS180 sound like the HD555s.  I have the Berringher 4 port headphone amp, so its very easy to compare all 3 headphones at nearly the same time.  The RS180 sound like the 555s but with no cords!  Also, they seem to weigh the same.  How do they do it?  I used these for 1 day and immediately bought another stand-alone set (you can use 4 headphones with one transmitter).  My wife and I watched the last Downtown Abbey with our matching headphones and it was such a pleasure.  Being able to move around, not get tangled in 20 feet of cable (we used to use the 555 and 518 to watch movies on our home theater projector) and have flawless sound with no static or drop or hum.  So the RS180 sound better than the HD518, as good as the HD555 (my former favorite headphones), and have no wires.  So why not 5 stars (I'd give them 4.5 if I could)?Well, going wireless makes life a little more complicated.  Pairing additional headphones with an existing transmitter was harder than it should have been.  The buttons (as every other review says) are hard to press by feel.  They have a balance (why?), which is easy to hit by mistake instead of volume.  The off button is between the volume up and down, so it's easy to turn them off when you meant to change volume.  What a poor design.I was able to get them to lose the signal by putting my iphone5 right next to the transmitter while downloading an app.  It's hard to do, but I was able to get the signal to drop.  But the iphone has to be within a few inches of the transmitter.My first floor is around 1200 feet, and the headphones work all around the first floor.  But if I go out the slider onto the deck, they start to lose the signal, and it's only 20 feet from the transmitter.  So, it seems to work fine in open space but doesn't handle walls or windows very well.But for using it in the room with the transmitter, and have such awesome sound and no wires, it's absolutely worthwhile to have two sets of these.  I'm glad I got them and wish I got them sooner.  I now use the 518s at work, and my son the movie editor grabbed the 555s.
p1084
aVI really like the headphones as they have excellent quality with amazing sound. It is slightly difficult at night (in the dark) to lower the volume as the buttons are flat but once you get the hang of it they are great and you can adjust without looking at them. I am usually watching TV at night in the dark so it is my particular circumstance that causes this inconvenience. If the adjustment knobs stood out they would rub against my pillow and that would be a disadvantage, so I will accept this issue. Once in a while there is a little pop in the sound but remember these are wireless. It enables me to listen to TV while my mate is sleeping and visa versa. I was really amazed at the quality of sound and the range as you can go anywhere in the house or outdoors on your property and listen to high quality music.  The first week I got them I made everyone that came over listen to the sound.... it was that surprisingly good.These headphones may look bulky but are much lighter weight than they look and cover the ear. It does not block out room sound , just muffles it a little. I didn't want them to block out room sound.I did have a slight problem setting them up as my band new Samsung Tv didn't have a headphone jack and I had them plugged into the wrong jacks but that was quickly resolved and it is my lack of experience. I am very pleaseed with them and would recommend this model as they are updated and perfected to give the buyer a good quality for the $$. The week I purchased them they were 50.00 less in price and I don't know how I lucked out...but I paid under 300.00. Very good purchase for me as I am pleased with this product.These would also be excellent if one person in the house was hearing impaired, they could wear these wireless headphones and everyone else could turn on the TV volume that would be suitable for them. The TV would not have to be blaring to accomodate one person.
p1085
aVI have five other pairs of high quality phones by Sennheiser and Beyerdynamic, but had given up on finding a decent pair of wireless phones until discovering these. The sound quality is on a par with the best of my other phones, but the comfort and convenience of wireless puts these in a league of their own. My only caution is for those who are looking for phones that will drown out the sound of a lawn mower or nagging spouse. These are open phones and provide absolutely no isolation from ambient noise. If you want sound isolation, consider the Sennheiser RS 170 closed wireless phones; also sold on Amazon. My subjective rating on a scale of 1 to 10 for sound isolation alone follows for the options that I have tried:Sennheiser RS 180s: zeroSennheiser HD 280 closed headphones: 4 *Foam Insert intra-canal headphones: 7 **Bilsom Leightning L3 ear protector:  10 **** I would expect the Sennheiser RS 170 closed wireless phones to be about equal to their closed wired HD 280** Best for airline travel: Fits easily in pocket. Dual driver models needed for decent bass.*** Ear protection only. No phones. Best for mowing the lawn.
p1086
aVIt has started making annoying noise from left side after 2 months of use.I have watched about 15 movies for three months, and have never given any damage on it.But now it makes tap-tap-tap noise from left side whenever any movie make base sound.It was ok before this issue.
p1087
aVI own both the 170 and 180's and use them for different reasons.  The headphones for the 170's block out a bit more ambient noise than the 180's and I use them when I need to block the world out a bit more.  For anyone looking, I use the base for the 180's to transmit to both the 170 and 180 headsets.  I have never tested if the "extra" features of the 170's (surround and bass) actually work in this configuration. but sound comes out.They are physically quite comfortable, and I have left the house forgetting I have the 180's on.  This brings us to the only downside.  They stretch.  Over time, they will not cling to your head as vigorously.  I spoke to Sennheiser about this and they said they had not heard this was a problem, but were responsive.  They suggested I put a damp towel over the headset in the charge base.  This never seemed to do anything, but I have found using a rubber band around them in the base restores some of the shape for a limited time.  Given that sometimes I wear these 18 hours a day this is somewhat to be expected, but I expect more from such a high-end product.  One star off for this.As for the sound, it's beautiful.  I have super-good hearing and while I'm not an audiophile, I'm a snob about static and overall audio quality.  These are not only the best I've found, they are so by quite a margin.  I hope Sennheiser refreshes the line soon to address the durability and/or make the part that stretches user-replaceable.
p1088
aVI bought this as a gift for my boyfriend's birthday (at his request).  His first comments about the product came before it was even out of the box.  The outside of the box literally has instructions on how to open the packaging!  Once opened, it's clear that the makers thought of everything; from the various country-specific power adapters, to the cord organizer.  You will not be left wanting with these headphones.The headphones come with rechargeable batteries, which is a great addition for people who want to try out their new toy straight out of the box (without waiting for the full charge).  So of course the boyfriend had to walk all over our apartment complex to see how far away from the station he would still be able to hear the television.  Let me just say that he hasn't found the magical area where the sounds begins to fade.One of the best features of these headphones is that they are open, so even though nobody can hear what he is listening to, he can still hear what's going on around him.  The sound is really great quality, and because they are so lightweight, you can probably wear them for hours without any discomfort.I highly recommend these headphones, especially for couples who don't have the exact same sleep schedule.  Living in a one bedroom apartment, it's awesome to sleep in peace and quiet, while not forcing boyfriend to keep quiet as a mouse as he stays up late.
p1089
aVSo I bought these because the RF headset that I normally use was starting to break down physically.  I had used it for years with no real problem.  Panasonic I think.  I wanted to spend the money and get something with better sound and more comfort.  I use these for watching TV when my wife has gone to bed or play my video game when so she can listen to the radio and we don't compete with each other for sound.  I have to say the sound quality is there. I am impressed I can hear things on my games I never knew existed and the music and television is awesome.  Plus these are much more comfortable than the older set that I had.  If the game is going very well and lasting a long time I don't feel like my ears are rubbing off.  If I had one suggestion it would be this..and forgive me I'm an engineer.  The control buttons are too difficult to adjust while they are on your head.  You need to be able to easily identify which button is which with feel so make them more distinctive in feel and spatial separation.  Most of the time I adjust the volume or turn them on and off.  I don't adjust the balance much.  The room in many cases is dark due to the fact that I am watching TV and my wife has gone to bed.  The range of transmission is great no problems working and walking around the house. I have even stepped outside in the backyard with no problems. All in all great stuff I would get them again
p1090
aVI am sure I have not even explored all this headphone set can do. The sound quality is crisp and clear; the stereo sound is almost a surround sound--sometimes I've had to check whether a sound I heard in the "background" was coming from the phones or from my brick-and-mortar surroundings (and so far it has always turned out it came from the phones). The automatic level control is nice especially when watching TV; that feature does make a difference, so if you want to preserve dynamic contrast, e.g., when listening to classical music, leave it off.The ergonomics of this headphone set are nothing short of superb; it adjusts snugly to the shape of your head, fits comfortably around your ears, and stays put as you move, without ever putting too much pressure on. Only the volume and balance controls took me a little while to get used to; sometimes I would accidentally turn off the phones rather than adjust the volume. And when you first plug it into the stereo (turning off the speakers), a few seconds may pass until the sound is played through the headphones, leaving you in the mute during that time; therefore, you might want to not switch from speakers to phones during key dialogue or so.Previous reviewers have remarked on the slight delay in sound transmission; I'll say it is about one-tenth to one-fifth of a second. That I can live with when watching TV, and it certainly is "same difference" when consuming audio-only sources.Brief dropouts can occur when my microwave oven is on and I happen to pass within 2' of it. But I haven't had the experience of the headphone transmitter signal and the wireless Internet signal interfering with each other: the transmitter sits about 3' away from the wireless router, and I sometimes wear the phones while sitting at the computer. The two wireless signals seem to work just fine at the same time.
p1091
aVThese headphones are comfortable to wear, easy to set up and provide great sound.  I can walk anywhere in my home and hear the sound as clearly as I can in the room where my sound system is located.  The recharging system is very convenient.  While the price is fairly expensive, I have found that the headphones are first rate in every way.  I would highly recommend them to anyone that wants to watch TV or listen to music without disturbing others in the room.
p1092
aVGreat sound!  Feels great even after several hours of wear.  I was confused by inclusion of regular batteries (ran down overnight) but once I started using the rechargeable batteries it works great.  The controls on the head set are poorly designed and take some time to get used to.  At first I had to take the headset off to adjust the volume.  Same with the on-off switch.  Those are minor problems so I recommend the headphones highly.
p1093
aVI am not the person who enjoys writting negative reviews.I received these as a gift, we have a lake no more than 30m behind the house and wanted to lay on the beach without turning the outside speakers all the way up. I was able to correctly install the unit. I let the batteries charge for aprox 30 hours. When I tried the headphones in an unobstructed range of 30m they kept going in and out. I then moved the transmitter to a location that was 27m (I have a digital range finder so my distance is exact) away from where I was standing and the signal still kept going in and out. I was actually able to see the transmitter from where I was standing, the only thing between me and the transmitter was glass and an "open" 4'X7' door. I also disconnected all the wireless electronics I have in the house (the neighbors wireless will seldom even show up on my laptop network and is poor at best), so as not to disrupt the wireless connection on the headset. Obviously there is a problem with something either with the transmitter or the headphones since they claim that the range is up to 100m. I am very disappointed for the price I would expect to get at least 50m of service and thats all we really needed.Sent Sennheiser an email but have not heard back from them yet, hopefully I can update this with some positive feedback.
p1094
aVWhy did I wait so long to buy these?  I have been listening to a very enjoyable set of Sony cans for about 15 years, but the replacement ear pads are now falling off from extended use.  The Sony cans were VERY comfortable, but a bit heavy because component integration back then was not what it is today.  Another problem that has been becoming more troublesome is because wireless headphones in that era used the 900 MHz band and that continues to make them more susceptible to interference. I am old enough that I still have 4 good-quality Reel to Reel tape decks, 4 turntables including a Dual Golden 1 that I bought new in the previous millennium, and a slew of discrete components that can feed me a great signal.  I will concede that I do little casual listening to something in the background while I work. I much prefer to listen to a wide range of jazz, classical, and popular music - closely, and as the main focus of what I am doing. I feel I have a good basis for judging the quality of my recordings, whether they are a seldom played 1970's Quadraphonic vinyl DG recording of the Boston Pops coming over my living room system vs. the same recording digitized and coming from my PC.  Is there a difference? Definitely.  Enough of a difference that I am willing to lug around a couple of tons of media, components, and wiring when I want to listen somewhere else?  Not a chance.Thanks to the RS 180's, I am pleasantly rediscovering my music collection with every new listening session - be it 100% analog or the digital version I can fit on a two terabyte drive in my pocket.  With very gently applied adjustments from a software plug-in called the DFX Audio Enhancer, I find I can re-experience the sound stage, imaging, and frequency profile I remember from before the time (last 5 years) my listening was restricted by living in an apartment! Either way, good electronics all the way is a must.  Purists will say using any "signal enhancer" is bad, and I totally agree - IF your listening room is Symphony Hall or some other first rate venue.  But after a now long ago decade as a high end audio salesman (after several years at Radio Shack helped me earn my electrical engineering degree), I still say the best sound is what YOU like best, and if you start with a great sound, have a great sound chain, top quality reproducers be they buds, cans or the best room shakers a kings ransom can buy, there is still no shame is adjusting for room acoustics or hearing problems due to disease, too much time as a roadie, or just advancing age.Although may the Gods save us from $99 USB turntables and most motherboard-mounted audio solutions, it IS possible to make a decent copy of a recording in any format and clean it up without destroying the visceral experience of what made that recording great.  Again, almost every purist will have a slightly different take on how to get there, but all will agree there are two key points - don't waste your time on making a FLAC (lossless) copy of a 56k MP3, and DO make sure that you LIKE the sound that is traveling that last inch from your headphones to your eardrums.  I have found over the last several months that the RS 180's provide one great way to get there, without breaking the bank, your neck, or your lease. I listened to a half-dozen competitors before buying this model, and I even asked a friend to NOT buy me what HE liked the best for HIS needs ( Bluetooth connection between his iPod and his active-suppression Bose cans so he can listen to e-books and music while mowing the lawn).  Don't get me wrong - his choice was a valid one for him, but if you are looking to kick back a bit and focus on the music without too much racket in the background, the open-back RS 180's are a very convenient and enjoyable option for you to consider.  For me, they are definitely well worth the money.
p1095
aVVolume - excellent, maximum setting is very uncomfortableBass - excellent.Clarity - excellent - meets Sennheiser reputation.Overall sound quality - surprising and extraordinary -- almost as good as my Sennheiser 580's (which are wired).User friendliness - setup is intuitive.Signal - excellent, was able to walk full extent of home with zero loss of signal.Bluetooth - nope.  The choice here was between your entertainment center/some fixed location vs your iphone/laptop, and the choice was clearly made for home entertainment situations.  Another choice was between the superior "Kleer" audio transmission and the inferior bluetooth signal, and considerations that favored audiophile needs won out.Interference - no conflict with wifi or other signals, as some are reporting.Comfort - excellent, but people with large ears may have a problem right away.  Otherwise these are soft and extremely lightweight.Aesthetics - large and goofy, though nowhere near as ridiculous as the Pioneer SE-DRS3000C.  These clearly favor function over form.Privacy - none.  If your intent is to prevent the world from knowing you listen to Justin Bieber or Katy Perry, then these headphones will not keep your shameful secret.Sound isolation - these aren't isolation headphones.Controls - if you've read more than five reviews then you already know the controls weren't designed to be used blindly.  It would be nice at times to be able to adjust the volume without taking them off, so I'll play around with putting on tape so my fingers can feel out the controls better.  Edit: Solution for the controls issue: glue a couple objects to the volume buttons after you are certain you approve of the other features of the headphones.  I used those little rubber thingies you can get in most hardware stores, and now I can feel the volume buttons (and the power button in between them) with no problem.With tv - this is the unit's single greatest point against it.  What people are reporting about the echo is true, so unless your tv has a special syncing option you won't be able to watch this with your headphones on while other people watch without them.  The only real alternative is to buy extra headphones (the unit can support up to four) and have the whole family wearing them, though people who don't need them will probably resent this pretty quickly.  This single design mishap is costing the headphones a full star, but in light of the headphones greatest strengths (sound quality and signal strength) I'll be keeping them anyway because the primary motive for buying them was for work, and not for the entertainment center.Solution for the problem many people are reporting regarding the signal cutting out at low volumes: Max out the volume on your primary source (in my case my laptop computer) and control the volume from the headphones.  This eliminates the cutout and, oddly enough, a high pitch whine (don't ask me why).
p1096
aVI started researching wireless headphones when my neighbor called the cops because I was playing Mario Kart 8.  But that's another story...  I jumped straight to CNET and Amazon reviews, but I saw these babies all over the place in top lists for wireless headphones.Already I have sworn to listen to my TV with these exclusively unless I have people over.  These headphones make for an amazing viewing experience!  I was initially concerned because the RS 170's advertised bass boost and surround sound simulators, and I was worried these would be lacking in some way.  PUT YOUR FEARS TO REST.  I popped in my blu-ray of The Avengers for a test run and was blown away by how great they sound.  Music is also clean and gorgeous.This is my first pair of open-back headphones, and I must say they're a nice option.  There really is something to the "larger sound stage" aspect of the acoustics.  It's hard to describe, but people aren't kidding when they say it just feels more natural.  I like the intimacy of wearing the headphones, but love that I can still hear the doorbell ring or the kitchen timer go off.They are light and extremely comfortable.  I can binge watch Netflix or have a movie marathon, and my ears don't get hot or sore.  And the charge lasts for hours and hours, so there's no reason to need or want to take them off.The rechargeable batteries are easily replaceable!  It's so disheartening that electronics are moving in a direction that when the battery dies, the whole device is useless.  Not the case with these guys.  If and when I get annoyed by their ability to hold a charge, I look forward to spending six bucks to fix the problem.Regarding complaints I have seen around the web:Lack of a digital input:This is a legitimate problem if your TV ONLY has HDMI and optical outputs.  But that seems to be a problem with your TV.  Computers, tablets, phones, iPods, even car consoles all have 3.5 mm jacks.  This is not an outdated technology and hardly obsolete.  If you simply prefer digital output, you're being needlessly picky.  Analog is just fine, people. They are stereo headphones.  You're not going to magically get a 7.1 surround sound experience just by using a newer connector.The buttons are difficult:So there's a learning curve to adjusting volume and balance while wearing these headphones.  I don't understand why this is a talking point, much less a deal-breaker.  You have to look at the buttons until you learn how not to.  How is this a problem?BOTTOM LINE: I'm in love with these headphones.  At the reduced price on Amazon, they are absolutely worth the money.
p1097
aVI've wanted a set of these since forever, and finally due to the price I got a pair.Pros:They are comfortable, have long battery life and look nice.  They are also simple to set up and sound decent.  The range is decent, but certainly not worth bragging about.People mention the button layout on the headset being different, and they are absolutely right, haven't decided whether that is a pro or con yet.Cons:  The sound quality is only marginally better than that of my 5 year old USB Creative Fatality headset which was 1/4 the price of the RS180.The way you turn the RS180 on is very, very counter-intuitive.  You have to push a button on both the headset and transmitter, and the transmitter is so light you have to hold it while pushing the button.  Why they don't have it turn on as soon as it's lifted is beyond me.And the deal breakers.  There is a low volume, high pitch whine coming from the right ear cup.  A quick google search reveals that a few (I could only find 2) other people have the same issue, and ended up replacing the set to fix it, so this is what I will be doing.I also experienced having the audio cut off twice this morning while watching a movie, which is a bit disturbing since the transmitter is about 3ft away from where I was sitting.My general attitude towards the RS180 at this point is that they are not worth the price premium.  There are some very similar items on the market at much lower price points.Once I get my replacement set, I will update my review accordingly, but for now it is -1 star for how you turn them on (yes, it's that inconvenient) and -1 for the whine.--UPDATE 24Jun14--The replacement set has the same whine as the initial set I purchased.  This leads me to believe that it is part of a design flaw and not a fluke.  For a relatively high end set and the number of positive reviews, I would not expect this.  The whine is only in the right ear cup, and occurs when the transmitter and headset are both powered on, the audio cable doesn't need to be attached for this to occur.I use this set with my computer, and after every system sound (click noise from opening folders, etc) there is a short, substantially louder whine.  I should also note that I experience none of this with other (wired) headphones, and that it occurs on the RS180s even with no other wireless device turn on that may have been causing some flavor of interference.
p1098
aVI was upgrading from the RS120's, which I purchased reconditioned through Amazon for about $80 as an experiment to see how well the whole wireless media experience would work for me; it worked well enough with those, but when I began noticing more interference (neighbors' wireless handset phone calls, static) I decided it was time to really jump in and spend more for higher quality. After looking at the various models available from Sennheiser, as well as others (like Sony), I was convinced the 180's were exactly what I wanted, given my price-point and quality requirements.I feel I made an excellent choice--absolutely NO buyer's remorse here. With the digital signal there is absolutely NO interference or lag or anything disruptive that I've encountered. The sound itself is beautifully crisp with what seems like a very full range to me. Full disclosure: I am by no means an "audiophile". But I know what sounds good and what doesn't, and have what I believe are reasonable expectations pertaining to the middle, higher and lower ends of the sound spectrum (high tweets to low bass), and so far I can't detect any faults with the Sennheiser 180's. Explosions sounds deep and rumbly like they should, voices are easily discerned, high-note violin strains are suitably clean and clear. Perhaps these earphones only sound so much better to me because of the constant static, etc, of the 120's, but I've had my share of wired headphones in my day and I honestly can't recall ever hearing better sound. And the comfort! These are SO comfortable on my ears. I was a little hesitant at first because these are "over-ear" as opposed to "on-ear" like the 120's were, but I need not have been concerned at all--the velour cups make it extremely easy to forget one is even wearing earphones, and because the backs are "open", enough air passes through that my inner ear is happy and I don't get that claustrophobic feeling that "closed" over-ear headphones always give me. Also, unlike the 120's, these STAY ON--no slipping and sliding out of place should I happen to move my head into anything other than an upright vertical position, so I'm able to wear these around the house while I do other things with no constant re-adjusting them on my head. What's interesting is that even though I wear glasses and the 180's appear to have better grip than the 120's, I get no discomfort from these whereas the 120's would start to press the arms of my glasses into the sides of my skull pretty noticeably after an hour or two. Also, the signal has no problem traveling through the floors and ceiling of my 3-level home.Honestly, these are fantastic, IMO. If I could change only one thing though, I'd have made the buttons on the right side easier to detect and identify. As others have pointed out, they're very smooth and almost flush, so it's a little too easy to click, say, the power button instead of the upper volume control. I plan to try the trick mentioned here with a tiny dab of glue to add a bump to the power button so I can instantly tell what's what.Pro Tip: if you buy these and instantly notice a lot of popping sounds with dialog and such, be sure to turn down the volume of the providing device (like my receiver) and that stuff will go away. With the 120's I had to have the volume cranked up to like 60 in order for the headphones to stop turning themselves off prematurely and to provide more signal strength (apparently), but with these, dialing down to 30 was just fine, better, in fact, and also happens to be the "comfortable" volume level of my surround sound system whenever I'm using it instead, so no more having to remember to dial down the volume if I unplug the earphones, lolThese even look better on the fireplace mantle beside my 60" plasma tv than the 120's did. Very sleek and modern-looking.UPDATE: the "dab of glue" trick for the volume buttons didn't work for me. For whatever reason, the Krazy glue I used wouldn't dry properly on the buttons' plastic and spread out to the sides too easily. Luckily I was able to clean them up without messing up the buttons.So instead now I've settled for small pieces of duct tape with enough extra tape jutting out that my finger can feel them over each button. Not as pretty, but practical.
p1099
aVI've tried quite a few wireless headsets. Around a dozen from cheap $50 through $270. These have the best sound so far and also one of the longest ranges without interruption. The major downside is that I have a large head, so finding comfortable headsets is a pain, literally. And the Sennheiser RS180 did not cut it on comfort.The packaging that it comes in is slick and easy to open. All of the components are easy to remove. The design of the charging base station is minimalist compared to some larger bulkier units. The smaller size antenna did not impact the broadcast quality. It needs 16 hours to charge the first time, NiMh batteries are included. Connecting everything is a cinch, comes with lots of power adapters, a/v adapter, and a 1/8" to 1/4" plug adapter.It is an open air design allowing the bass to more freely resonate. I typically like the sound provided by those types, but the result is that it doesn't eliminate external sound. So not for everyone there.I ran the headphones through the paces, classical, metal,  jazz, 3d sound from a video game. It all sounded great. Good bass response, the treble doesn't turn reedy.This headset looks like it would be good for someone with a wide head, but my head is tall. The adjustable band was comfortable at first, but after ten minutes or so, I noticed a hot spot where it put pressure on my scalp. I tried moving it to different spots, but still the same problem.The ear cups and headband cushin are made from the same material. It is spongy, but not very soft. The ear cups especially were quite rough. I tried looking for accessories on their website, hoping you could swap out the ear cups with leather, but no such luck.I'll most likely return these as they aren't comfortable for me. Given the price and the sound quality, if you had a smaller head or your skin didn't mind rough ear cups, then this is a set to consider.Pros:Great sound for the valueGood battery managementBase station easily recharges headsetCons:Not for larger headsScratchy material on ear cups
p1100
aVI can't begin to describe how much I love these. I've owned many headphones over the years, but I'm on a Sennheiser streak in the most recent of them. I currently own HD590s, HD598s, and now these (with a second headset). The 590s and 598s both have a tiny bit more ear space, but these fit and are very comfortable nonetheless. Given the history, it should be apparent I'm a fan of open air headphones. Not being tethered by a wire but getting the kind of audio quality I've come to expect out of my other sets is just amazing. I've had them on my head for hours and hours since they arrived recently.Before I bought these, I was looking at the RS 160, 170, and 180 models. I read a lot of conflicting info and reached out to Sennheiser and talked with a tech there. He clarified to me that you can independently control the volume on each headset when having multiple paired without issue (confirmed) and that you can connect any of the 160/170/180 to the 180 base station (as well as the other base stations). As I really wanted open air, the 180s were the only option.I don't find the pairing system very complicated, and had no difficulty getting more than one connected. Range has been spectacular, and I can listen to music from anywhere indoors where I live. As I'm not in a single family house, I have to still pay attention to sound levels when it gets late at night, so the plan is to add two more headsets to the mix and have an alternative for group movie watching late at night. The open air backs let you still talk through the headphones...should make for awesome late night movie nights.An extra bit that I really like is that the headphones shipped with Eneloop AAAs and not some other, lesser option. As a result I was able to take them out of the box and wear them right away (Eneloops are designed to ship charged, hold that charge, and be used immediately before recharging is necessary).All in all, I couldn't be happier about this purchase and can't wait to use them more.
p1101
aVI've heard very-high-end audio systems before (costing deep into five-figures), and I own a pair of Sennheiser HD 600 wired headphones, so I have experience with a good set of cans.  That said, I wouldn't quite call the RS 180 audiophile grade. However, for anything less than highly critical listening, these headphones deliver clean, quality sound that should satisfy just about anyone.I don't use these for listening to music, I use them with my TV when I want to watch a movie late at night.  They allow me to mute the TV's speakers while listening through the headphones at whatever volume level I like without worrying about waking others in the house.  I wasn't expecting much bass response, but they do have a respectable low end.  Nothing that would match a good home theater system, but as much or more than what my TV's built-in speakers offer down low.I debated whether to splurge and get the RS 220 or these.  Reviews I read both at Amazon and elsewhere made me decide the RS 180 was the way to go.  Many have reported having problems with static or broken signals with the RS 220, which, apparently, uses a different wi-fi system.  I've had no problems with the signal using my RS 180.  Sound quality is very clear and static free.  My listening distance from the headphones' base is usually around 15 feet, but I've walked into other rooms while wearing these and found the signal remains clear and strong.  The headphones are comfortable even after wearing them for several hours.  Battery life has never been an issue.  Sennheiser claims these can be used for up to 24 hours on a single charge (two AAA Eneloop rechargeable batteries are included).  I've never even come close to testing that claim as I stop watching TV long before these things run out of juice.  The RS 220, in contrast, only lasts up to 8 hours on a single charge, which could be an issue if multiple people were to use it during the day.  The RS 220 reportedly does have slightly better sound quality, but you pay through the nose to get that little extra bit of quality.  There's a point of diminishing returns with everything, and for my purposes, the RS 180 is the right balance of price and performance.The only real niggle I have is with the volume buttons on the headphones.  The volume-up button is actually bigger than the volume-down button.  It's easy enough to find and press while wearing the headset.  The button right next to it is the power button.  It has a raised surface that aids in locating it by feel.  The next button over is the volume-down button.  It's notably smaller than the volume-up button (form over function) and can be a little hard to find when you're feeling for it while wearing the headphones.  Sometimes I have to remove the headset to find it, although I'm getting better at finding it the more I wear these.  It's not a huge deal since I don't have to adjust the volume often, but it's an area for improvement if Sennheiser ever decides to redesign these.As others have mentioned, there is a very slight time delay in the wireless signal (emphasis on "very slight"), so if your TV's speakers are turned up while you're listening to the headphones, you can hear the slightest echo effect.  If your TV's speakers are turned down enough relative to the headphones, you might not even notice it.  The signal delay really is quite small, so the effect is minor, but, apparently, not all wireless headphone suffer from this, so it needs to be mentioned at least.Despite these minor issues, I still give 5 stars to the RS180 for its solid performance at this price point.[Edit: 12-1-13] Just wanted to update this review with a word about Sennheiser's excellent customer support.  One of my kids knocked my headphones and its base off their shelf, which damaged them internally so that they would no longer produce sound.  I sent them in to Sennheiser with a note about how they got broken.  I acknowledged the existing warranty might not cover such abuse and stated I was willing to pay for the repair if needed.  A couple weeks later, Sennheiser mailed me what looks to be a new (but is perhaps refurbished) unit and base with all of the needed wires (I had only mailed in the headphones and base unit without the wires).  No questions asked, and no cost to me.  First class customer service.
p1102
aVAfter spending a few days researching the various wireless headset options, I settled on the Sennheiser RS 180 wireless headphones. There was some heavy internal deliberation between the this set (RS 180) and it's cousin the RS 170. Both are overall quite similar, with the most significant difference being the 170 is a closed design, whereas the 180 is open.Others have covered the differences between closed vs open, so I won't reiterate. The other consideration was the comparably priced Sony MDR-DS6500.UNBOXING:I received the order quickly and everything was in good shape. The unboxing experience was decent, and a was pleasantly surprised to find little touches like a vanity sleeve to hide cables. Not necessary, but a thoughtful detail.SETUP:Setup was quick and the rechargeable batteries came pre-charged, meaning I was listening to music in about 10 minutes from unboxing, after a short review of the setup guide.EXPERIENCE:I've owned a number of Senn's over the years (HD 280, HD500's) and they've always delivered accurate sound with a luxurious cushioned feel. However, with the RS 180 being  wireless, I was somewhat apprehensive of the sound quality, being my first foray into cord-cutting. Needless to say I am impressed.Being in my 30's, my hearing is no probably no match for a 20 year olds. That said, for TV and casual console gaming the sound quality is really excellent, even considering the nature of the source inputs. I did briefly consider the true audiophile positioned solution, the RS 220, but at $600 and a spotty wireless range, it was quickly out of the question.The headphones themselves are super comfy to wear for long periods and the open design means you won't get too hot. Wireless range is decent. I was able to walk around everywhere in my 2 Bedroom apartment without any signal loss or interruption.Others have mentioned some lag, however I plugged the receiver directly into the TV (Sharp Aquos) and when playing a game on the Wii with the volume turned up on both the TV and the headphones I was unable to detect any discernible delay. That is not to say there is none at all, but if there is, it's would almost surely below 200ms.IMPROVEMENTS:+ Buttons: I recall reading somewhere that Sennheiser's motivation behind the flat/flush button design of the headphone mounted controls, was to prevent accidental button pushing, when lying on one's side. While it looks like the company has been succesful in that regard, sadly it appears they've compromised on the overall user experience when it comes to changing volume. Hopefully the next iteration we'll see both goals being achieved. One random suggestion could be to have the buttons *indented* instead of protruding outwards? Either way, however it is solved, there needs to be some form of tactile feedback on the two most important buttons (Vol up/Vol down). Additionally it would be a good idea to spatially separate the volume controls from the other buttons.+ Sensor: How neat would it be if the trend towards smarter electronics (ie smartphones) in consumer electronics were adopted? For example, include a simple pressure sensor to let the headset's micro controller know when to turn the itself on an off. Of course, there would need probably need to be a suitable delay built in, so that after 2min or 5 minutes of it not being worn it shuts down, then as soon as you put it on your head it reconnects automatically. No fuss or user intervention needed and battery power is still conserved. As it stands power off is determined by whether a signal is playing or not, but that again places additional behavior (turn off the tv/sound source etc), on the user.+Digital input: One thing that the Sony MDR-DS6500 has going for it is digital input. Unfortunately Sennheiser only includes this on their most expensive model, the RS 220. At around $250 bucks for this set, I think this should be a standard feature on this model too.So there you have it. The RS 180's are a fine (if somewhat pricey) pair of headphones that will almost certainly make you smile.
p1103
aVThe first thing is to make sure you know what you are getting.  This is a set of wireless headphones meant for use within the home.  The charging base plugs into any sort of audio source just like a normal headphone jack, and the idea is to be able to wander around listening to your audio source with no cords.  They are not sound-cancelling headphones, their primary purpose is to protect your apartment neighbors or others in your home who may not want to hear your electronics at full volume.  Now, on to the review.I bought this product nearly two years ago, and the ratio of cost to how much use/pleasure I get out of this device is one of the best/highest of anything I own, right up there with my phone, PC, and bed.  I use these headphones in my small studio apartment, plugged directly into my main sound system so every device I own can play through these.I don't know how else to say it; they're phenomenal.  I'll try to list some of the highlights:-The sound is crisp and clear, it allows high volume with no loss in quality that I can detect.  I am no audiophile but I do love my music, and these are wonderful.-The comfort on your head is stunning, possibly the best feature of the product.  I can give it the highest possible compliment, which is that I very frequently forget I'm even wearing them and sometimes actually walk out of the apartment in them.  Unbelievable comfort, even when I wear them all day for gaming and music (6-8 hours on a weekend).-Charging is as easy as possible, simply place the headphones on the cradle and off they go.-Battery life is everything you could need.  I've used these for upwards of 12+ hours without needing a charge, I have never had them die on me unless I forget to place them back on the cradle.-Audio is instant, absolutely no delay detectable by the human nervous system (or, I suppose, not detectable by THIS human's nervous system...)I am unable to speak to the range of the headphones, since my apartment is rather small, but I have no problem using them in the kitchen, which is probably 20 feet from the charging base and has a solid wall between.  If you'd like to get more details on distance, I suggest looking to other reviews.  As stated above, these are not sold as sound-cancelling headphones, so you can still hear things around you if they are loud enough, and if there is anyone else in the room with you they will likely hear a faint murmur of what you are listening to, especially at higher volumes.With all that said, I am happy to give this product an 5-star rating with no caveats or qualifications.  If and when this product ceases to function someday, if I am unable to have it fixed I will simply purchase another set.  They're just that good.
p1104
aVThese headphones get 5 stars from me because the sound is clear, they are light weight and easy to set up and use. I wasn't upset that they had to charge 16 hours before I could use them cause lots of products require charging right out of the box and before use. It took some time to get use to the control buttons because they are small and very close together and there is nothing to differentiate, by touch, which button does what so I have to feel around a bit and go off memory. I have small hands so feeling around is not a problem for me. I did not experience any background noise like a few others have described nor did I experience the headset shutting off during times when the movie had long pauses or whispering. I even paused a movie I was watching for 10-15 minutes and when I returned the headphones were still on. I did experience a split second of sound delay. I'm not sure exactly what that was from. On some movies the sound will be on point then the next movie the sound will lag behind but it has only happend to me once so far. I share a living area with 3 other women so at any given time there are tv's, hair dryers, music, and chatter in the background. These headphones do a ok job drowning out the worst of the background noise and allowed me to hear the movie I'm watching. I compared all of the headphone manufactured by this company and I went with this model because I felt that if I was going to spend a large amount of money on headphones then I might as well go with the best. I purchased the warranty just in case. Overall 4 stars for the quality of the headphones and clarity of sound. I would have given 5 stars if it weren't for the small buttons and sound delay.Oh, and don't expect to lie down with these on your head. They are too big for that.
p1105
aVMy previous experience with wireless headphones were the 900 RCA wireless headphones which I hated because they had poor range and sound quality.  I got rid of them after about two months of use.Recently I needed a pair of wireless headphones for late night listening.  Owning the amazing (for the price of $100) HD 518 makes choosing Sennheiser almost a no-brainer.  These are expensive, but after the bad experience of owning the RCA wireless headphones, I decided to pay more for something better.  The total cost I paid was $303 after sales tax.Sound Quality:These are way better than the RCA wireless headphones I had before.  The hiss and background noise are gone.  Range is decent.  I get about 60ft around my house.  Battery life is fantastic.Unfortunately, the sound quality doesn't compare well to the much cheaper wired HD 518.  I know it's not fair to compare wireless headphones to wire ones, but for $300 I feel they should sound a little better.  Don't get me wrong.  These are fantastic for movies.  For music, they are not as refined as the HD 518.While I have no problem with the buttons, I don't like the blinking lights on the base and the headphones.  Why blinking lights on headphones designed for discreet, private use?  Another thing that could have been better is the ear pad ergonomics/comfort.  While the ear pads on the HD 518 are longer and completely surround my ears, the ear pads on the SR 180 are shorter and sit on parts of my ears making the SR 180 less comfortable to wear than the HD 518.Those minor quibbles asides, I think these are good wireless headphones and certainly recommend them.
p1106
aVFit, finish, and sound are fine, but the short range is really disappointing. I use wireless headphones while watching late night TV, movies, and talk radio. These are fine if you are plunked down in front of the tv, but they cut out if you get more than 30 feet away. So forget about vaccuuming, cutting the grass, or cleaning the pool with these. I would definitely send them back except that they were a gift and you practically have to destroy the box to get them out. Did I mention I am really disappointed, especially for the price someone paid for these.
p1107
aVFor the first time in years, I enjoyed watching TV.  I just got these yesterday and I watched TV for the 1st time in years.  I have always sat on the couch and played with my IPad while my husband watched TV because to have the TV loud enough to hear was unbearable  and nerve racking, even to myself.  No matter how loud the TV was, I could not hear the voices over the background notice, applauding etc.  I wear bilateral hearing aides with my left ear having severe hearing loss.  At 18 I started losing my hearing and at 42, I finally started researching products for TV and I think I made a great choice.  I would give anything to find a pair of hearing aides that made everyday sounds with such clarity and precision.  To hear live conversations like this would change my life.  If anyone knows of hearing aides that work this well, please let me know.  My first show to watch with these was Betty White's off their Rockers and my 10 year old son said "Mom, I have never heard you laugh so much".  I heard every word and the other noises were not over powerful. The commercials did not get increase in volume.  I can't wait to try music and watch a movie.  I may now know things that are happening in this world.  The buttons are close together and hard to feel while wearing them, but I don't think that I will be doing much adjusting to the volume anyway.  I love the fact that  I can balance them according to my hearing loss being greater in my left ear.  THANK YOU, Sennheiser! Please design a hearing aide with this awesome sound and clarity!  This would give life back to so many.
p1108
aVI've lost 65% of my hearing so hearing the Television has been a problem. The RS 180 lets me hear the voices very clearly. I've tried 4 different hearing aids and I can't stand the background noise that is so pronounce. The Rs 180 eliminates the background noise.
p1109
aVThese headphone can deliver the most amazing sound.  You will be surprised that wireless headphones can do what these do in terms of sound quality.Unlike some of the reviewers I did not experience any interference from or to my WiFi.  I had these set up right next to my Roku Box and was able to watch Netflix while listening through these headphones without any issues at all.Also...I found the range to be quite good. I was able to move throughout my 2700 sq ft ranch style house without a single drop out.I ended up returned them.What???!!!The only way I could get these to work with my Home Theater setup was through the headphone jack.  My receiver has no analog (or digital) audio out that isn't associated to a specific device.All of my devices are connected via HDMI to my receiver and try as I might I could not figure out any way to get an audio out other than to my TV via the HDMI out cable.This is absolutely a shortcoming of my receiver, NOT these headphones.Just do what I did not before you buy.  Check how you are going to hook these up and make sure you have a connection that will provide analog audio out while using whatever input devices you want to use these with (cable box, Roku Box, BlueRay player etc.)Of course, if you are OK plugging and unplugging these into the headphone jack then all is well.
p1110
aVI have several brands of wireless headphones including the Senheiser models 110, 120, and now the 180.  They all have good sound, as good as you will get for wireless.  I dont notice much difference between them in terms of sound quality.  Interestingly, when the models 110 and 120 go out of range you get static, but the 180 just cuts off (which is slightly better I think).  The range is essentially exactly the same, maybe 70 feet for the models 110 and 120, and 72 feet for the model 180.Now the downsides to the model 180.  It has completely worthless buttons  on the side that are too small and flat and unusable while you are wearing.  You have to take off the phones to adjust volume, etc.  Also, you have to turn the base on to listen to stuff.  The previous models turned on automatically when there was a signal.  Plus, I have had since initial release and still dont know what the ALC button does, im sure it is some gimmick.  Worst of all, the thing flashes the power light all the time wether on or off.  I find having the base beside the tv flashing at me all the time even more annoying than the complete idiocy of buttons that you cant feel.  Utterly ridiculous engineering.
p1111
aVLove these things.  I won't pretend to be an audiophile but these headphones sound great to me.  Prior to these I used a pair of Bose QuiteComfort noise canceling headphones.  While the Senneiser RS180 are not noise canceling their sound quality seems to be on par with my old Bose, i.e. - they sound great.  Set up is as easy as plugging in the base (transmitter) to whatever is playing your sound just as you normally would.  Install batteries, power everything on and you are wireless.The best feature to me is the wireless capability of these headphones.  Great if you work in front of a computer, great if you like to rock out after putting the kids to bed, great for a lot of reasons.  My home is a 6100 sq ft, 3 story solid log home.  Solid log homes are notorious for making life in the wireless world difficult.  Things like WiFi just don't transmit well through the logs.  With my transmitter placed next to my computer in the basement of our home I walked to every corner of every floor and the sound and reception quality of these headphones never skipped a beat.A+ Worth every penny.
p1112
aVWell, it just has to be said. These are brilliant headphones in terms of undisturbed sound transmission and quality of sound. However, there are a few things that really frustrate me about these cans. The much mentioned volume buttons that are too small are just one. Unlike others I do get headaches from the cushions, which are positioned on the sides of the head centre. Somehow these cushions seem to press on some nerves and after a few minutes I get headaches that emanate from these pressure points. I get around this by putting half a headband from a HD 280 in the groove between the cushions so that the pressure is spread between the top of my head and the sides. This works well, but why does the customer have to come up with a work around for such a problem? Ah, I get it - custom (er) meaning I have to customise the product.But now to my big gripe with these headphones - They constantly interfere with my WiFi network! About 50% of the time when I turn on the base station and as soon as I turn on the headphones themselves, my WiFi network goes down. And, as reported by someone else, as soon as I turn the base station off, my WiFI network comes back on. The most frustrating part is that Sennheiser Germany are not acknowledging this problem. Their response to an inquiry was "There is something wrong with your WiFi network, talk to the manufacturer of your WiFi equipment". Thing is, I've got two Apple Airport Extreme to create a WiFI bridge between the main house and my separate house on the other side of the pool and the WiFi bridge has been ROCK solid until I started using the RS 180. Knowing Apple, I am very sure that they have implemented the 802.11n standard down to the very minute detail, so I believe that it's Sennheiser/KLEER who haven't done their homework. The Apple Airport Extremes have an 'Interference Robustness' feature but even this is no match against the destructive power of the RS180. I even tried setting the channels of the Airport Extremes manually, hoping that the RS180 had a preference for a channel, but it didn't make a difference. You know, we wouldn't have this discussion if Sennheiser/KLEER had put a knob at the back of the base station with which one could manually set the channel (1-15) of the WiFi frequency. I am a long time loyal Sennheiser lover, but what they've delivered here is simply not up to their standards. Most of all I'm disappointed about the unfriendly, unhelpful and almost arrogant responses I got from the Sennheiser Germany Service team. Their last response was "If you're having these problems then move the base station away from your WiFi network". HELLO? Electronics gear is normally in one area of the room because the cables (audio, power, ethernet) are at a certain length of about 2 meters AND, I do not want to put any cables across the floor, over a door or behind a cupboard. That's the whole point of wireless headphones - To AVOID at least one cable. If I have to extend the audio cable to the other side of the room I've successfully added the one cable I was trying to get rid off back into the equation. Besides, I've put the base station at the other end of the room (and now have 5 meters of said cable across the floor) yet, I still lose the Internet connection due to a WiFI dropout from interference of the RS180. This is VERY annoying, especially since I want to use the headphones predominantly together with the Internet for radio and Skype.So, final verdict - great sound but definitely lacking in terms of compatibility with 802.11n networks. Shocker.If it wasn't for the sound these headphones would get 0 stars from me (In fact, I can't believe that I still give it 4 stars, but that's simply how good the sound IS).Sennheiser, please, please, get it right with the next iteration of the KLEER powered wireless headphones. And while you're at it, give us some bigger volume knobs and a headband that goes across the whole head, not just two small pressure points on the sides.God it feels good to finally get this off my chest. Hope Sennheiser read this one day AND do something about it.Hope this helps,Fazz
p1113
aVThese headphones work great, with the exception of one behavior.Easy to set up, easy to use (once I figured out how to turn off the speakers on the TV while using the headphones), but, as others have mentioned, the audio signal turns off during very quiet passages in the audio, then comes back on when the audio hits a certain level. The result is this horrifically annoying dropout you can hear quite plainly. In fact, I can't stand it. During particularly quiet dialog scenes, when no one is talking you can hear the signal stop. Then when someone starts to talk again their first word is sort of clipped as the system turns back on. It's so annoying that I will be returning these little gems.Now I must resume the search for a good quality wireless tv headphone.
p1114
aVThere are not enough stars to rate this wireless headphone. I have owned one for a number of months and have no remorse or excuses to justify the cost. I own Sony and Bose "wired" headphones and have found no comparison to the 'wireless" Sennheiser RS 180. The quality of sound, the wireless distance they cover, and the comfort they afford are second to none. After being so pleased, my wife pressured me to buy her a set. For cost reasons,we tried the RS 170, but found the RS 180 was better considering all factors. Both were great in quality of sound, but the "Kleer" feature on the RS 180 pushed the quality up a couple of notches. The exterior casing is much better on the RS 180. And the headset fit and design is better on the RS 180.They are both great units, but if the price difference does not enter into the decision making, the RS 180 is a much better choice.
p1115
aVAfter having these for over a year now I can honestly say this is money well spent. With all the noise around my house or when I just want to hear the program with out missing anything these headphones are superb. They are lightweight and super comfortable. I can wear these for hours before they start wearing on you. Yeah, you get an echo if you have the tv volume up higher than the hearing volume of the headset, but why are you wearing headphones then? Anyhow, these things work all over my house (including my basement) and way out in the yard. Awesome coverage as I never have to miss anything no matter where I am in the house. I even bought myself a second headset for the wife and replacement ear cushions for the set. You can add up to four of these headsets per docking station. Sterophonics are great as I listen to music channels all the time.
p1116
aVI own several Sennheiser headphones and I've never been disappointed with any of them. This was my first wireless and it didn't disappoint either. Sound quality is as good as other corded headphones. At least, I didn't notice any significant difference with my HD598. If you like the sound of the 500s you should like these ones. The wireless system seems very good. No noise and the range seems quite good. I walked around with these headphones putting  3 brick walls between me and the receiver and not only did I never loose the signal but the sound quality remained the same. I would just mention that I found them "hot" at the beginning but now it's fine. I can wear them all day (up to 6 hours) without any problem.
p1117
aVExcellent quality and design.Beautiful very adequate packagingFull of connectors and various accessoriesNoise free, no disturbances of any kind unless you are close to a micro wave or somethingCan walk all around the house 2 levels wearing the headphones, perfect listeningVery smart transceiver receiver, powerful, reliableHeadphones are a pleasure to wear, are light not pressing, with removable velvet ear cushions, all modular.Uses conventional AAA Ni-Cd hybride conventional rechargeable batteries which are very common and properly placed inside each earcup..A great example of Sennheiser's excellent engineering and superb performance! Very pleased!
p1118
aVFINALLY! I've gone though six pairs of headphones in the last three months. None have been satisfactory. They have either been too uncomfortable, had no power, had no bass or clarity. That includes a Bose and several that were at least $100 more in price. With this headphone I have finally found headphone  nirvana. They are the most comfortable phones I've ever worn. So lightweight you hardly feel them. There is crystal clear clarity. They produce what sounds like 5.1 dolby surround while watching movies..  The biggest surprise was discovering that when called for, it has incredible bass, not overpowering, but right on balance. WOW. .All I can say is get one asap.  You'll be glad you did.
p1119
aVSound on these headphones is great.  Compared to my Bose QE15 headphones the sound is more open and cleaner.  I would have rated these a 5 star but they do not offer surround sound (would like this for move watching/listening and they also do not have a digital sound input, only analog.  Would have opted for the step up to the Sennheiser  RS 220 phones as they do offer digital input and probably have little better sound but in researching them versus the RS 180 the RS 220 is still stereo (no surround sound) and the wireless strength seems to be poorer than that of the RS 180.Overall I am pleased with the RS 180 and see no need to upgrade to the RS 220 at this time
p1120
aVI returned my pair.  The controls are almost impossible to access quickly compared to the previous generation (RS140).  They are digitally controlled, meaning that you have to press and hold them down for a while before they really begin to respond.  Importantly, the controls are so close together that it is very difficult to perform simple tasks such as adjust the volume without taking the headphones off so that you can see their exactly location.  On the RS140s, the volume was just a scroll wheel that could be easily located and adjusted quickly, for instance, when you want to shut up "Crazy Larry's" TV commercial.  The sound is not well-suited to TV listening either.  It seems to have a huge amount of mid-range, which just does not work for TV listening.  If you're a purist audiophile who spends most of his time listening to music, these may indeed have the better audio quality, but I think most people would still prefer the manual controls on the RS140 instead of the RS180s digital controls if they had could try both.  This seems to be a sad case where Senheisser tried to 'upgrade' the product by installing fancier digital controls, but sacrificed, perhaps unwittingly, usability.
p1121
aVThis will not be a technical review, just a more "normal person's thoughts".  This came packaged well, and I was able to easily figure out how to get everything hooked up without any issue.  The sound is amazing, and it drowns out about 80-90% of exterior sound (which is what i would expect with these type of ear piece configuration).  You still hear a little outside sound, but to me that is good because i dont want to be oblivious to my phone ringing, a possible threat, or anything else that I would not recognize.  Overall, these are excellect earphones, and well worth the money.  I am a happy consumer of this product.
p1122
aVPeace in the Family. I have recently moved into a new home with my wife, daughter and son-in-law. The kids are blessed with excellent hearing, while mine has been sub-standard most of my life. My wife and kids were constantly telling me to turn the volume down. If I did this, I could nnot hear the TV. The Sennheiser RD180 has solved all our problems. I can listen at any level I wish and no one is disturbed. In addition, the sound quality is superb. I often hear things the rest of the family does not. I would recommend the RS180 for anyone with hearing problems.
p1123
aVThe control buttons on these headphones (volume up/down, power, etc.) are small, awkward, and difficult to use while wearing.  The power button would be better as an actual switch and the volume button would be better as a slider. You can use the tip of your finger to feel for the raised "power" icon on the power button and then just remember volume up is to the left and volume down is to the right. You don't want to have to take these off and turn on a light to adjust, especially if one of your goals is to listen at night without disturbing your bed mate.
p1124
aVSennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone RS 180 has a brilliant sound quality compatible to high end professional, wired system.Pro:Good build qualityComfortable fit for prolong usage.Exceptional sound qualityLong lasting rechargeable batteryExtended range of wireless transmission.Cons:Small control buttons on the right side of headphones, in order to operate should be removed from the head.Earpieces padding made of high quality cloth, but it is an attraction for dust, small particles and body moisture.Felix.
p1125
aVafter researching various options (both cost and quality) i purchased these for my 85 year old mom who is hard of hearing...she loves them...they are light and she is able to access the controls on the side of the ear piece even though she has limited strength in her hands...these are also nice because it allows others to sit with her and watch/listen to the same tv show while she is wearing her headphones - it's made a big difference in her independence and quality of life...they are well made and the set-up only takes a few minutes
p1126
aVI've only had one pair of wireless headphones, and they were complete junk. These are muchhhh better.With that said I am honestly a little disappointed with the sound quality, it honestly sounds like 40$ wired headphones to me. Not bad but for 300$+ I expected more. I just got them today so I haven't had a chance to play with them a lot. Maybe i'll figure out something that changes the SQ.The sound is free of any hiss or pops and It seems that the quality of the wireless signal is great, but the headset themselves leaves a little to be desired, Def not as good as my 120$ Sony headphones. If you are a true die hard audiophile, these are not for you. If you want a decent pair of headphones, and need them to be wireless, than these should be considered. With that said, they will not sound as good as 70$+ wired headphones.
p1127
aVThese are really nice sounding.I do audio editing and was hesitant about the automatic level control feature but found out that it has an on/off switch.Sennheiser should note this in the adverts because it kept me from getting these for a couple of years.I have worn the headphone for hours at a stretch and they are pretty comfortable.If you are considering these headphones, go for it.They are as good as you think they should be.
p1128
aVDefinitely fantastic sound. I can sit next to my partner in bed or on the couch with the sound levels up, enjoying movies or games and she doesn't get disturbed or hear the slightest noise. Best bit is that i can still hear whats happening around me and not ignore her if she speaks to me as well. A nice comfortable fit over my ears. Sennheiser for the win, yet again.
p1129
aVI couldn't be happier with these headphones.  ZERO background noise.  Exceptionally audio and as advertized the headphones enhance the audio clarity, as if bringing the voices to the front of the screen.This particular model -- the 180 -- focuses on "open air" and the audio clarity.  They do not dwell on the surround sound capability.  But, I have found the surround sound to be incredible.  Even much more of a 5:1 effect than I get with my room system (which is also fantastic).  So - I wouldn't even consider any other model, or for that matter, any other brand than the Sennheiser.  Pricey?  yes, but you get what you pay for.
p1130
aVI previously had a pair of Sennheiser 120's and upgraded to the 180 to add a 2nd headphone. The sound quality of the 180 is only marginally better than the 120 and the positioning of the controls makes it more difficult to use. The 120 could be easily turned on and the volume could be adjusted while wearing the headphones, but the controls of the 180 are flush to the unit so it is necessary to take the headphone off each time you need to adjust it.If you buy additional headsets you will need to sync them to the base before they'll function. To do this, with the base and headset both in the off/stand by mode, press and hold the on/off buttons on both units for approximately seven seconds until both units begin to repeatedly flash. Viola!If you find that only one of your headsets will work at a time, inspect the base and see if the bottom light is flashing more than once or only once. If the light is only flashing once, press and then quickly release the on/off button and the bottom light will begin to blink multiple times indicating it is broadcasting to more than one headset.Hope this helps. Enjoy.
p1131
aVI really like these headphones.  Now my wife can sleep or isn't bothered by my preferred volume level.  No more "turn it down" screams.  The set looks great, the sound is very good and they are very comfortable.  I also like being able to go to the kitchen and still hear things.  What else could you ask for.  Thanks.
p1132
aVI am still in the process of breaking them in; however, they sound great.  They arrived quickly and packaging was excellent.  When I wear them they are very comfortable and there is absolutely no hiss or indication sound-wise that they are wireless.  I live in a busy urban area and there is no interference whatsoever.
p1133
aVThese are really great sounding and comfortable for me. I've got a big head and it just fits me on the biggest size setting, but it does, and is comfortable. This is not a surprise - I've had other Sennheiser headphones with the velour ear pads and they are super comfortable and they know how to make a good sounding headphone.Having said that, Sennheiser's ability to make ergonomically sound products is dreadful. I've never seen one with sensible button layout or generally well thought out products, aside from the the drivers and microphones.- As everyone points out, the buttons are difficult to tell apart by feel and are all next to each other on the headphone, where they can't be seen when you are wearing them out. It's just a joke that the entire bottom surface of the right headphone is slick and with non-distinct features to highlight the different buttons. The mute / off button is in the middle of the volume buttons. WTF! The balance buttons are right next to the volume and there is no way to see if you have the balance centered, only listening. I can't understand how they make garbage like this. It's only the ergonomics that they are so terrible at. It's like they have someone high up in the company who makes the final decision on ergonomics and is clueless.- I expected the button problems because everyone has been so vocal about them. What really baffles me is that the headphones and base BOTH need to be turned on when you want to listen to them. If I have the headphones on the charging base and take them off, I can't understand why the base can't turn on automatically when I take the headphones off of the base. The headphones should turn on, too.- The main LED (multi-function LED) blinks all the time. I have the headphone base near my TV and it blinks whenever I am using the headphones. It's in my line of sight, so if it is working, it is distracting. It might be telling me that there is one headphone linked or two. It might be telling me that things are normal. It might be telling me the status of the charge. Lots of blink codes, but it never just is on steady. It's not like LEDs are expensive -- there could have been several if they thought it was so important to show all of that stuff.These headphones are too comfortable and sound too good to return, but they are firmly in the camp of products I just don't like, but can't find one that is better. I really wish Sennheiser would get their act together. They have the sound quality down. If they would only raise to the level of mediocre ergonomics, they would truly be great.Update after using these 2-3 hours every day for a month:They still sounds good.The ergonomics are showing even more details of how bad it is.:- You need to turn on the base all the time. The base isn't hard enough to push the button without the base sliding all over, so pushing the on button is a two handed affair.- I use these every day and still struggle to tell what button are which. It isn't impossible, but it's surprisingly hard. I have to focus to hit the right button. I can say that this is the only product I own where I need to focus to operate it.- Adding the balance button nonsense; if I lean my head back on the couch and turn my head to the right, the couch pillow hits one of the buttons, changing the balance or volume.
p1134
aVVery good sound quality.  I have been using this now for about 2 weeks.  I had been using the Sennheiser RS 130 for about 15 yrs and was consistently pleased.  I finally purchased this new product, RS 180 as my 130 was beginning to cut out even when I was right in front of the transmitter (I think it was the batteries and simply long term wear).  The RS 130 did last a long time with no visible signs of deterioration so I am hoping for the same with the RS 180.  My only complaints is that I preferred (so far at least) the RS 130 on/off switch on the head phones (simple, easy to use on one side of the head phones) and volume control (very simply, gradiant dial on the other side).  The RS 180 requires to first turn on the transmitter, and THEN turn on the head phones.  I suspect that I will quickly get used to this change, but have not yet.  The other thing I initially don't like as much is the volume and on/off buttons on the RS 180.  They are all push buttons (push in and release) for their incremental activation (push repeatedly for the volume to go up  or down).  The power button is in btw the volume buttons and can easily be confused.  It would have been much more intelligent to have the power button on the other ear/side so as to not confuse.Finally, I have not found the  RS 180s to be as comfortable.  I was surprised by this as the reviews I read commented about how comfortable these are.  I may just need to get used to them but I do not find them to be as comfortable as the RS 130s were.The reason I rated them a 4/5 with these short comings is the sound quality.  The sound is very good for wireless.  Hopefully I will get accustomed to the other things I do not like as much with time, but 'getting used to' things is not normally something I expect for a device that costs $200 from a quality brand such as Sennheiser.
p1135
aVI used Sennheiser 120s for years to help me hear dialogue on TV and movies with good results.  I bought the RS 180 after reading reviews here and elsewhere, thinking I can do even better with improved phones. Overall, I am not disappointed.SET UP:  No printed manual.  The quick setup guide is very sparse indeed - just diagrams, no words.  Although these are headphones (how complicated can that be?) there are different colored lights that blink, multi-function buttons, etc.  A more detailed "quick" setup guide would have been useful. I recommend watching the 4-minute installation video on the Sennheiser site before installing.  The full detailed manual is on the included CD and on line. I recommend downloading it to your computer or iPad for a searchable manual.  Instructions say to allow 16 hours for the first battery charge, but my charge light went out after 2 hours and worked fine.THE GOOD:* RANGE: I hoped the 180 would have at least as good range as the 120, allowing me to wander about the house and garden without interference or drop out. The range on the 180 is at least as good or better than the 120.*  SOUND QUALITY: Excellent, noticeably better than the 120.  Deep(er) base, bright treble. The automatic level control (ALC), which is toggled on/off, boosts quiet sections and quiets down noisier ones (i.e., commercials). I wouldn't use this feature for music, but for TV and movies, the dialogue stands out.* MUTE BUTTON: A small but useful feature: The "multi-function" button on the headset also operates as a mute.  This is handy for those annoying commercials.  On my previous phones if you wanted mute you had to turn down the volume.* COMFORT:  Snug fit, these don't fall off my head when I bend or move, but I can wear them for hours without discomfort.  They are considerably lighter than my old pair, I forget I have them on.* FLEXIBLE USE:  There is a cable included for use with the earphone jack as well as an RCA cable for audio outputs.  This is important, as you have the option of whether to silence the internal speakers of your sound source or have them independently controlled (are you watching/listening alone or with someone else who needs the speakers on?)THE NOT SO GOOD:* CONVENIENCE:  Unit must be manually turned on in two places before use - both transmitter and headset.  My previous set had just one on/off switch on the headset.  This is a minor inconvenience.  Unit shuts off automatically in a few minutes if unattended to save batteries, but it must be manually started.* CONTROLS: As was stated numerous times in these reviews, the headset controls are difficult to locate in use.  I agree.  In my opinion this is the only real downside to the 180 - I prefer old-fashioned analogue dials that you can feel.  Why Sennheiser didn't test usage, read the reviews, and simply put raised guides on the controls makes me shake my head-isn't volume control a rather basic function to headphones? One reviewer here said he used epoxy to make his own raised guide - I may do that if I don't get the hang of it soon.  I'll follow up after a few weeks of use.ONE MORE THING: Several reviews here mentioned a noticeable delay when the headphones are used with the speakers of the sound source causing an annoying "echo" effect.  Unlike my previous set, this was the case with the 180 when I first tried them with my wife listening through the TV speakers.  This would have been a deal-killer had I not been able to correct it.  However, on my late model LG TV under audio settings there are controls called "AV Sync" where I can adjust the audio stream of either the headset or the sound source.  The problem was quickly solved.  If your TV doesn't have this audio setting, it may be possible to work around it another way, such as using the TV or receiver's RCA audio output instead of the headphone jack.SUMMARY:Excellent sound, especially for a wireless set, reasonably priced for the quality, comfortable to wear, reasonably easy to set up and use.  I would give it a 5 star rating if....well, you know, those controls.ADDITIONAL COMMENT REGARDING THOSE CRAPPY CONTROLS: After a few weeks trying to get the hang of using the controls while wearing the headphones, I gave up -- it's just too difficult. I took the advice of one reviewer and placed a drop of epoxy on the control knob (off/on, etc).  It works perfectly, and now using the controls while wearing the phones is easy.  Before you apply the epoxy, be sure to seal the cracks surrounding the button with tape so glue doesn't drip inside and freeze the button.  I doubt the warranty would apply in that case. My 4-star rating stands rather than a perfect 5 -- there is no excuse for the poor design when the solution would be so simple.
p1136
aVI have waited a long time for wireless headphones that can do what these can do.  I have gone through several cheaper pairs that either weren't comfortable, sounded terrible - and often both.  I was blown away by these headphones after first listen.  I needed a pair of headphones that I could use late at night but wouldn't cripple my movie watching experience.  These things work beautifully, and I am able to keep that quality through every room in my house and even outside.  I've been using them as regular speakers during the day now while working, using my TV as a Pandora/Tune In Radio player and the sound doesn't drop for a second.One note - these are not noise cancelling headphones - if you were these, and there is noise around you, you will here it.  I find it a nice balance, as the soundstage is wide and clear, but if the phone rings I will hear it subtly.  This "open air" design also seems to give the sound a richer, clearer sound - especially during movies.  While nothing can replace a true surround sound experience, these do a great job of giving you that effect.Hooking them up is a breeze - and even though they suggest charging for 16 hours, the batteries (which are marked as pre-charged) worked right out of the box, and the first charge took less than a hour to complete.It's also nice that you can hook into either an analog output (which will allow you to listen directly from any A/V source) or more importantly, if you are using an A/V receiver like mine which cuts the speakers off when you plug in any headphone jack.  Not a problem for me in that I usually want my speakers off, but for someone just looking to "add" the headphones to the entertainment equipment without cutting out the speakers for someone else who might be enjoying the same medium.After about a week, I told my wife that it's one of the most rewarding purchases I have made for our living room.  I highly recommend these!
p1137
aVI've enjoyed Sennheiser wireless headphones for many years. The old pair was showing its age so I updated to the RS 180. These are far more comfortable to wear than the previous pair. The sound is slightly better. I can now make volume balance adjustments separately for each ear.Now for the controls. Not sure why the ease of operation wasn't a goal for this model. With the previous model I could click the on and off button on the left earphone. I could adjust the volume by turning a wheel on the right earphone. (no left/right balance adjustment). Now I have to first turn on the device by clicking on a button on the base. This is actually a two-handed operation as the base needs to be held in place when pushing the button lest it be shoved off its perch. (At least this button goes off automatically when the headphones are charging).Next I have to turn on the headphones by looking directly at the headphones. Although there are raised "pimples" on the on/off button they are very difficult to locate by touch. I have to look. It is difficult to feel the other buttons, all smooth, one each for vol. up, vol. down, L and R balance, since they are all crammed together in a 1 3/4" line and the buttons become smaller and smaller until the last balance button is smaller than the tip of my little finger. So one must look in order to find the buttons. (After a month I have learned by feel to turn the volume up...but not down). Obviously this requires taking the headphones off first and the adjustments can only be tested by placing the headphones back on and then taking them off again if further adjustments are needed. What a shame for a design where form trumps function.This device would easily deserve 5 stars if it weren't for the lousy controls.
p1138
aVI saw that this set of earphones received many great reviews. I'm baffled at that. Besides looking at the specs the deciding factor...? the reviews. I'm only slightly meticulous when it comes to electronics. I've been using the Sennheiser RS 180's for a couple weeks now. I have to say that I'm not really impressed with this set of earphones. I was expecting much more. In my opinion they sub-par at best. I have two other sets of cordless earphones that I purchased for much less and I don't see a big difference AT all.... I decided to buy this pair for work and thought I'd spend a little extra cash for a "good set". I really don't think they're worth it. I would say these are worth about $65 - $80 at the most. I have went out of my way to give them a fair chance. I plugged them into everything I own: TV, iPhone, laptop, desktop computer, iPad, and even a mp3 player. The disappointment was across the board. I compared them to all the other sets of earphones I own: Audio-Technica, Dre Beats Detox, ZipBuds, Sony MDR cordless, JVC cordless, and even a pair of Skull Candy phones. Still the Sennheiser set remained very middle of the road. I really... really wanted to like the Sennheiser set I bought, but I don't.I will give credit to the weight, very light. However, they feel cheap to me. Like fragile cheap. As for the sound....? I'm not really that impressed with that either. Good... not great. Not even close to the "cinematic oasis" as described in one of the reviews. They have a nice crisp sound and good stereo separation but seem to be lacking the "meat" you'd expect when spending this kinda cash. The best thing I think these headphones have going for them is... They are VERY comfortable, by far the most comfortable I've ever owned. Besides that, I can't give much more positive feedback. I'm happy for the folks that love this set of earphones, I wish I could say the same but I just can't.
p1139
aVI have two sets of these headphones.  The first set I bought a about three years ago and I use them with a TV at my main home.  They are wonderful for me.  I have a problem common to many men, hearing loss that interferes with my wife's enjoyment of TV watching with me as I have to turn the sound up too high for her comfort.  These headphones solved that problem.  They have excellent, clear sound  and I can control my own volume.  We have a second home so I bought another set for it.  There I have a modern, 52 inch Sony mounted on the wall.  Like so many big TV's it has analog out and digital optical out.  I used the analog out to connect my Polk Audio soundbar...it doesn't have digital optical inputs and I enjoy good sound from it. I then connected the Sennheiser's to the optical out with a digital to analog convertor.  I GOT AN ECHO!  It was so bad I could only use them when the soundbar was off.  No more watching TV with my wife with the proper sound for both of us!  Too loud for her, too soft for me.  She started using earplugs.  I was bummed.  I poked around on the internet and found that the delay and consequent echo was not unusual and no one had a solution that worked for me.  The headphones, a little pricey, simply sat there holding down paper.  I would revisit the issue from time to time, never finding a solution.I don't know why the last hunt for a solution finally worked, but it did!  I bought , from Cable Electronics Labs, their A/V Distribution amplifier model AV400.  I ran a cable from analog out to the amp and connected the soundbar and headphones to the amp and the echo disappeared!  Marital bliss ensued.March 10, 2014A new problem has surfaced!  I started getting sound only through the right earpiece.  I found that by pulling the 3.5 mm audio cord out a mm or two from the transmitter both sides would work.  A bad connector, I thought.  I tried three others, all the same.  Something must be wrong with the connection inside the transmitter.  Long out of warranty, I'm afraid. I've removed two stars.December 20, 2014Problems all solved!  The fault was mine.  I hooked these up incorrectly.  I'm not a ninny and usually have no problems with simple connections but I have a wall mounted TV and couldn't see behind it and inserted the audio cables by feel.  I finally realized that one cord was in an audio input rather than the output.  Once corrected the headphones work very well and, once again, the echo is solved with the audio distribution amp.  I have changed the rating to five stars and encourage anyone with an echo problem from their TV to try my solution.
p1140
aVI read many reviews on these before ordering them.  I use them a lot for watching TV and there was one review I read that concerned me some.  It said if you watch TV with the TV speakers on (for other people to listen) that there was enough of a delay in the sound to the headphones that it would sound out of sync and be annoying.  I have experimented with this and have not found this to be a problem at all.  I have my TV connected to a system with 5.1 surround sound and have noticed that if I turn the TV volume up at the same time you can hear both and while I don't like the mixing, it is not out of sync.  The same is true of the headphones.  I can hear both at the same time but they are in sync, there is not really a delay or an echo.  I also read in another review that there is a lot of sound that leaks out because they are an open design.  That is also an exaggeration.  Yes, some sound does leak out, but at normal listening levels other people in the room wouldn't really hear it. If you were lying next to someone in bed with the TV speakers off and they were trying to sleep they might notice the sound but it would not be enough to wake them if they were already sleeping.  I did try covering the outside of the headphones to make them a closed system to see if it would make a difference.  It reduced the quality of the sound I head through the headphones so I removed the covers.  it was just an experiment, I really don't think it's necessary.The range is excellent.  I also have a pair of Sennheiser RS 140s that are 900 Mhz and these have much better range that those do with no hissing or interference at all.  They just sound terrific.  I highly recommend them.  One other comment that is true is the volume controls on the bottom of the right earpiece are difficult to find and adjust while wearing the headphones.  I solved that problem by putting two drops of glue on the volume + and one drop on the volume - buttons and now I can find them with no trouble at all.  I just used 5 minute epoxy for the job.  They are great, I'm glad I got them.
p1141
aVI've been using a 20-year-old pair of Sony headphones (high-end at the time). I was finally fed up with the cord getting wrapped up in my desk chair. After viewing all of the positive reviews I decided to get the RS 180 headphones.I recently had my hearing tested by an audiologist and found that my word discrimination accuracy is at 88% in my left ear and 96% in the right one. My upper frequency limit is just under 12,000 CPS. As you might perceive, my hearing isn't what it used to be (I'm 67).The RS 180 delivers sound superbly. The nifty right/left control on the headphones allows me to balance what I hear. And what I hear sounds clear and crisp. Music presents itself better than I could have imagined. Freedom to walk around is also a huge plus!One thing I found is that the signal doesn't transmit very well through concrete block walls. Thus, placement of the base unit is a big consideration for my environment.I have a pretty good sound system in my movie room but have been having difficulty with voiced sounds--they are sometimes mushy. This unit fixes that problem!I've been using the device for about two weeks and it has not cut out, no strange sounds or popping as some have reported. It fits well and doesn't put undue pressure on my head. They're quite comfortable.Well worth the money and I anticipate that it will last many years.UPDATE MAY 6 2013I sent them back for a replacement. I was using alkaline batteries instead of the rechargeable ones that came with the unit. That caused battery acid to spill all over the inside of the earpieces. I got a constant series of beeps that I couldn't get rid of. I filled out the warranty return form on the website--they gave me a free UPS return packaging slip and they sent me a brand new pair! (A note on the packing slip in the new package said that the damage was not covered under warranty. The free replacement was a "one time only courtesy". If I used alkaline batteries again it would cost me $119.95 next time.) Great service!!
p1142
aVI ordered a refurbished RS180 to replace my existing top of the line Philips. The Philips was not bad, but definitely not execellent also. Bass was "hollow" and treble is flat, and its reception was problematic, frequently jumps channel even if I was working inside the living room, where the transmitter was placed.I've tried the RS180 in shop and wanted it for quite sometime but is keeping away from it deal to its price. But the longer I wear the Philips, my desire grew even more stronger, so I ordered a refurbished one from Amazon marketplace at around 50% of the original price.This is the first time I have ordered a refurbished item and I originally expected it would come in some kind of "white box". However, when I first received the package, I was shocked - it was wrapped in transparent polymer only. I said to myself that this must be crazy, who would send a headphone with a polymer wrapping! I opened it, and as I've speculated, it was seriously damaged. The plastic part left hand band had been totally broken and was holding in place by the wires only. Quite disappointed and I filed a claim and return it.Here's the best part I like about Amazon, most sellers were quite ethical and my replacement headphone came in again within 2 weeks. These time I pay special caution to ask the seller to send it with the proper packing - a box.I am very happy with RS180, it was as good as new. Sound quality is the best I have experienced so far. It is open-air designed so your wife will hear a little bit of what you are hearing, but this let it wear more comfortbaly, even for a long time. Reception is good, thpugh not excellent. I am living in a 90 sq.m apartment and there are dead corners, even if I keep all the doors open. But it covers around 90% of my apartment so I am quite satified. It open jump channels (or recover from a weak signal) occasionally which is much better than the Philips.It comes with the SANYO AAA rechargebale and if I am careless enough to forget recharging it, I can get spares to replace it. An interesting point of my Philips is that it is incompatible with the SANYO. I don't know why but if you put the SANYO into the Philips, it will continuously ask you to recharge it.I am very happy with my RS180. The lesson learned though, is you will better always ask the sellers to ship it with a box, even if that will cost you a few more bucks.
p1143
aVBefore purchasing the RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System I did a lot of research. When I listen to music during breaks at work I need to use headphones and I also need to be able to move around. Wired headphones were too confining, and I underestimated how much I would appreciate the ability to listen to music and simultaneously get up from the desk, walk down the hall to the copy machine, and move freely about the office.I wanted headphones with a wireless link that was completely transparent, as good as a wired link, because I'm pretty fussy about audio after working in the recording and broadcast industries for many years. The Kleer chipset with an OFDM modulated 2.4 GHz digital RF link that is used in the RS 180 has met my expectations. The transmitter is smart enough to frequency hop to a channel that is free from interference from wireless routers and other signals on the 2.4 GHz band.These headphones can be worn comfortably for hours due to the open-air design. The audio quality is good, although I can detect a little too much harmonic distortion on low-frequency sounds. The midrange and high end are crystal-clear and undistorted. There is absolutely no background hiss detectable, even in the quietest (ambient noise) location that I could find. The OFDM modulation scheme completely eliminates momentary disturbances due to multipath and fading. There is absolutely no detectable change in the audio as you turn your head or move around, something that no analog FM system can match. When the signal is insufficient for error-free audio, the headphones fade to silence rapidly. Upon restoration of signal they fade back up smoothly. The transmission range is adequate for their intended purposes.In short, these are the best wireless headphones that I've ever heard. My only complaint has been voiced by other reviewers. Sennheiser made a bad design decision when they decided to turn off the base station transmitter after a 5 minute loss of link to the headphones. As a result you need to return to the transmitter and push the power-on button again when this happens. The timeout needs to be longer; perhaps 15 minutes.
p1144
aVThis unit replaced my wired Sennheiser HD-580 phones (I finally got tired of replacing the wires every year or two).While the sound isn't quite as good as the 580's, it's awfully close. Far better sound than I'd expected to find in a wireless set.Range is impressive. I've only gone 50 feet or so from the base unit, but the distance included two sets of 2x6 walls plus 1 2x4 wall. I heard a very brief dropout once or twice, and they may have simply been the transmitter adjusting to the new receiver position. Other than those short quiet spells, the sound and reception have been excellent, with only minimal loss in volume.So far I'd give these phones 5 stars.The only reason I knocked a star off is because, as many have said, the small controls are a pain to find; definitely not something you just reach for by feel. I'll probably put small pieces of tape on one or two of the buttons to make it easy to know where my fingers are.I was worried about the 'ghosting' that some people have commented on. It's just not there if you follow Sennheiser's very clear instructions and turn your speakers off. If you leave them on, then it's perfectly normal for open-ear phones to let the ambient sound through and give that "echo".The other thing I worried about was synchronization with the video source. If there's an audio delay with the RS-180, I sure can't see it. I've watched about 25 hours of video so far and the lips and sound look perfectly fine to me.One other thing: as another reviewer or two noted, these phones do NOT have dynamic surround sound; that's a feature of the RS-170. Frankly, I don't think the RS-180 needs it.Overall, I'd highly recommend these phones, especially at Amazon's current price.Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System with Dynamic Surround Sound
p1145
aVJust unboxed this and tested it out.  I gotta say I don't understand some of these reviews from people saying how much they suck and how cheap they are and how poor the range is.  The sound is pretty much the best headphone sound I've heard, short of the sound you can get out of $400-500 MM550s or Dr. Dre Beats or other noise cancelling+SRS headphones.  But the range is fantastic for my needs.  I can go everywhere in my 3000 sq/ft house with no droppage or static.  I can go to the end of my 50 ft. driveway and then it starts breaking up.  So, can I get 300M or whatever they claim here? No, but that's line of site I'm sure.  I can get everywhere in my 3 story home and all the way around the outside of the house and the garage.I also was able to pair up a second pair of RS 180s very easily.  I don't get the guy who claimed the manual stunk.  It said how to do it...I did it...it worked.  Essentially, hold the ON button down on all the headsets for 7+ seconds, then hold the ON button on the base down for 7 seconds...then within 30 seconds, the blinking levels off and they're paired.  I don't understand what was so difficult.  Perhaps the instructions I got on the CD/DVD it came with were more updated?There was also a review somewhere about how cheap they felt and about the sound leakage.  I guess that's a matter of personal preference because I found them just fine for me.  I'm thinking it was a design decision such that if they'd made them solid-feeling aluminum or something, they'd be uncomfortably heavy.  As it stands, they're super light and the light, puffy velvety ear cups are very smooth and comfy.  They do leak a tiny bit of the sound, but it's not quite as bad as someone let on.  It's not like you can hear what someone is listening to from across the room, but if you know the song, sure, you can make it out if they've got it up high enough.  I had to get about 12" from my wife's ear before I could hear what she was listening to.  I wouldn't really call that bad sound leakage and a reason to not get these.  In fact, it's that quality which also lets you hear someone talking to you while you've got them on.  Some over-the-ear phones are so sound-tight that you can't hear a police car if it were in front of you.  These are such that you can easily hear people in the room at the same time without having to pull them off and go "WHAT!!??"Anyway, fantastic sound, great base, great highs, comfortable, good range, and more.  I found them worth the money.  I have 2 headsets with my base so my wife and I can watch a movie or TV show with the kids in the next room without bothering them or having them hear adult subject matter they're not ready for.UPDATE:  Minor con...when you have multiple people listening to the same audio stream on multiple RS 180's, when you turn your volume up, everyone gets their volume turned up.  When they turn theirs down, your's gets turned down.  This is fine as long as you're all the same deafness.  If someone is hard of hearing though, either you're going to get blasted or they won't hear it.
p1146
aVI bought a set of these a few weeks ago. I'm an overnight worker and try to keep my sleep pattern regular, so I'm often up all night on my nights off. I live in an apartment building, so can't watch TV or listen to music very loudly without disturbing my neighbors. I've been waiting for some time to buy some quality wireless headphones that are lossless and affordable. I listen to music mostly, so wanted something that was highly rated for it. I have to say, I'm very impressed with the sound quality of these. They aren't as good as some wired headphones I've used in the past but they are pretty darned close. As for the range, they have dropped twice, both times when I went out onto my back porch, and then only for a second each time. They work fine out on my front porch, though. I've used them in all the rooms in my apartment without any issues, including my kitchen which has metal cabinets. I haven't used them in the basement yet but I will next time I do my laundry. I forgot the last 2 times. I found the set-up to be extremely easy. Just plugged them into my receiver's headphone jack (I was too lazy to deal with plugging them into the line-out in the back) and held the button on the base until it blinked, then did the same on the headphones. Instant sound. I have found the buttons to be fairly easy to get used to but adjusting the volume required a bit of thought at first. Once I got used to them, it's fairly easy to adjust without hitting the power button. These headphones are exactly what I wanted and I'm so glad they are lossless so I can listen to my music at CD quality. I can move anywhere in my apartment without losing the signal, which is good when I'm in my work shop or in the kitchen. I'm not limited to one room while I still get CD quality sound. Great product!
p1147
aVI would put myself in audiophile / near-audiophile category as an evaluator. I listen critically and can tell the difference between different CD players, amps, speakers, headphones, etc, but I don't profess to hear differences with different cables and power supplies, nor do I treat every room perfectly with bass traps, etc. for listening. I also don't listen solely to lossless audio, but can tell the difference between bad compression and good compression.I wanted to point that out for similar users. In my opinion, these headphones sound great and are quite enjoyable and offer enough fidelity for the wireless application. It's not *as good* as wired solutions, but it's pretty close, and it's great to have the freedom to walk around without cords. Even the cords of earbuds.These headphones are a little heavy in the low end for me, but I do most of my listening with Martin Logan in-walls and Von Schweikert VR-1s, or with earbuds. Earbuds I have owned and used are Etymotic ER-4p, ER-6i, B&O;, and Ultimate Ears Super.fi 10, v.moda vibe. I'm not a fan of Shure's. Monster Gold was fun because of the bassiness. Only other "can" type headphones I have used are Denon AD-AH2000, which are very good, but a bit heavy.I would point out that the low end is not displeasurable. Just more than I typically listen to.The headphones are easy to set up on a one transmitter to a one receiver set up. I could never get it to work where one transmitter sent to multiple receivers (in my case, 2). So I instead had to daisy chain the audio cable from the first transmitter to the second transmitter.Pros: Very good sound quality for an audiophile ear, but they won't be your best headphone if you're an audiophile. They are light, non-fatiguing and immensely enjoyable. The open ear design is great for enjoying great audio in the house without getting closed off from the world.Cons: Not easy to set it up with 1 transmitter to multiple headphones, had to just daisy chain the audio cable to a second transmitter.Comment: Would be great to be able to remotely turn on the transmitter. I use the wireless headphones somewhat far from the transmitter. Would be great to be able to charge and store the headphones where I would be using them, rather than all the way back at the transmitter. It would be nice if the headphones could turn the transmitter on the way Xbox controllers turn the Xbox on.
p1148
aVI bought this wireless headphone system to use while watching TV late at night, so I won't wake my spouse who sleeps upstairs above the TV room.  I am very pleased in all respects.  The sound quality is excellent -- on par with expensive, cable-connected phones.  The digital system prevents the hiss often present in analog wireless.  I don't ask much, in the terms of "range";  I'm sitting but 10-15 ft from the base-station.  I can walk into other rooms on the same floor without drop-off, though if I go upstairs from the base station, I do encounter some occasional zones where reception drops off.  I can't say as how good the reception would be if I went outside to deck or yard -- an occurrence unlikely at the moment, since it's sub-zero outside where I live.  I haven't encountered any interference to the headphone system caused by other appliances (wireless telephones and WiFi) in my house.  Nor have I encountered any interference to the other appliances caused by the headphone system.  Your mileage may differ.The base-station cradle unit is relatively compact and hides behind my wide-screen LCD display, out of sight.  You have to be careful placing the headphones on the cradle, to insure the contacts engage for charging.  However, there's an amber LED that lights while the headphone set is charging, so it's obvious when contact has been made.The headphones are rather large and ugly, but not heavy or uncomfortable.  I can wear them for hours with no particular discomfort -- though in warmer weather, I might have a different opinion.  (It's winter, now, where I reside, so I don't yet know if I'll find them "sweaty" around the ears when worn in the heat/humidity of summer.)  The control buttons on the headphones take some getting used-to:  there are small buttons for (in this order, L to R):  volume up;  power on/off;  volume down; adjust volume balance towards the left channel;  and adjust volume balance towards the right channel.  The buttons are very small, close together;  and insufficiently raised above the background.  With practice, however, I've learned to use all of them without having to remove the headset.  They just take some getting used to.All things considered, I highly recommend them.  They're not inexpensive, but they work (for me) really well.
p1149
aVPicked these up for an xmas present for myself after researching wireless headphones online. My partner can't stand hearing gun shots & zombie screams coming from the living room. Couldn't find them in Canada so purchased them in the US for $254. The suggested retail in Canada on the Sennheiser site is $499.I have used these headphones about 6 times for usually about 2 hours each time (normally playing Xbox 360). As I write this, I am using them to listen to music streamed off my PC sent through my PS3. They sound great!Reason for Buying:-They are replacing cheaper pair of Sennheiser wireless headphones from 4+ years ago that stopped working. I dont remember the actual model - but it looked the same as RS 126 & RS 136Things I have noticed compared to my old pair:-There is no static anymore (if I oriented my head in a particular direction with the old pair, I could get static)-There is no picking up other people's telephone calls yet(I live in an apartment)-They are very light & stay on my head easily (the old pair would fall off if I was doing work around the house like unloading the dishwasher)-The ear pads feel like a dream when you put them on - but I have noticed my ears will get a bit sore after 60 minutes because unlike the older pair, your ears fit inside the padding. It doesn't hurt enough to stop listing to them though.-No more tuning into the correct frequency - turn it on and it just works!-No more dials for the volume - which is great because it doesn't accidently get triggered when I am leaning back on the couch with my head against a cushion-The controls are hard to use without actually taking the headset off and looking at which buttons you are pressing. The volume up and down are aligned left and right of each other... but there is a power button in the middle - making it easy to turn off. To make it more complicated, these 3 buttons are all unique sizes and shapes from one another - and don't feel like arrows or anything relative to what their function is. This feels like a silly oversight from the design team!I would easily recommend these and would buy them again in a heartbeat!Hope this helps
p1150
aVI've had these about a week and I think they're great.  My previous set of headphones was a wired set of Grado SR-60s, and these sound every bit as good to me - but wireless!  Indoor range seems to be about 60 feet through 5 or 6 walls.  I can essentially use them anywhere in my house and some outside as well.  Near the perimeter of the range you will get some cutting out, but step one foot closer and they're as clear as they are one foot from the base.  There is no static.I wear them for several hours a day and they're quite comfortable.  They have a soft velour pad that goes around your ear and more at the top of your head.  People who are bald or balding will probably find them pretty comfortable compared to unpadded bands.  They twist and adjust quite a bit to fit different size and shaped heads.The base is modern and nice looking.  I wish it were a little heavier because it's hard to turn the base on and off with one hand without pushing it over.  The headphones fit easily over the top for storage and charging.The batteries last about the rated 24 hours before requiring a recharge.  You do get about a half hour of warning that the batteries are getting close to being discharged.  They are just Ni-Cad AAA batteries so you should just be able to replace them with standard, inexpensive rechargeable AAAs when they eventually die.Build quality is excellent.  They feel like expensive headphones and look nice as well.  But they are expensive!  Cost is about four times what my Grados cost, and even a few times more than some of the less expensive Sennheiser models.  I was willing to pay the extra amount for an open headphone with superior sound quality and some extra range, but others might be just as happy with the cheaper SR 170 or SR 160 models given their circumstances.
p1151
aVNot sure why, given Sennheiser's reputation for *high quality* products, but the *buzzing* from *two different sets of headphones* for my Sennheiser HDR 180, along with the RS 170 backup headset I got really annoys me!!Come to find out after wondering why, I twisted off the removable earcups (used to access the batteries) and both the RS 180 *and* the RS 170 had DISTORTED DIAPHRAGMS!They don't even play that loud, so what's with the low quality??Pros:+ the wireless function actually worksCons:- pay too much- listen too little- disappointed too much!Verdict:I'm returning the whole thing plus extra RS 170 headphones, NOT WORTH THE HASSLE!
p1152
aVStraight forward setup, great sound! I believe another reviewer said that these headphones would make you hate your speakers. True! And I have fine speakers.Dialogue in some films gets lost or covered up by background sounds through my speakers, but not with these headphones. I can hear every word with these headphones; and base reproduction is outstanding.I live in an urban area, yet I hear no interference in these wireless headphones. They are expensive, but I would buy again.
p1153
aVWorks fantastic - sound quality is wonderful - Compared to "TV Ears", this is heaven - I can't understand the reviews that complain about the inconvenience with volume adjustment and with establishing a connection between the ear phones and the transmitter - it is a no brainer. I bought this for my wife after her poor quality "TV Ears" crashed. She is definitely no techie. After a very easy setup of 10 minutes including unpacking, minor assembly and connecting to the TV, I spent five minutes with her explaining the only three things that she needed to know and she was off and running, grinning all of the way - She loves it so I love it. I have used it rarely and agree that it is great. I especially like being able to get up and do something somewhere else in our 1,850 sq. ft. house and not miss a thing.- If you can't stand to read instructions then you might not like this but even then you can talk to Sennheiser and they'll politely walk you through any problems with the set up. My first delivery was Dead On Arrival due to poor packaging by the shipper. The Sennheiser packaging is excellent. I read and reread the manual trying to figure out what was wrong with my setup of the first shipment. Finally I called Sennheiser. They walked me through a very simple three step test that took thirty seconds and said "Return it to Amazon, it has been damaged in shipment". After calling Amazon and telling them what Sennheiser said, I had a new set in three days and my wife was smiling.
p1154
aVI just received the RS 180\u2019s to listen to music, internet radio, or any computer audio as I moved around the house. My former solution was to use strategically placed portable speakers attached to Apple AirPort Expresses sending the music via iTunes or other audio via Rogue Amoeba\u2019s Airfoil Software.That has worked getting the sound to various locations, but of course the sound quality was marginal, and the stereo effect was missing.The Sennheiser RS 180\u2019s have given me the ability to listen to high quality sound in full stereo, with unfettered movement.When setting up the 180\u2019s the first \u201cproblem\u201d I faced was that plugging the 180 transmitter into the headphone jack in the Mac killed the sound from the internal Mac speakers. It also meant the transmitter had to be located close to the Mac at one end of my house, preventing reliable reception at the other end of the house.That \u201cproblem\u201d was overcome by plugging the RS 180 transmitter into an AirPort Express centrally located in the house. Now with iTunes I can send the sound to both the computer and the AirPort Express at the same time. Additionally if I want to send any other audio from the Mac to the RS 180 headphones I can use Rogue Amoeba\u2019s AirFoil software. This gives me the ability to move anywhere in the house, or even limited distances outside the house, and listen to high quality sound.The Seenheiser RS 180\u2019s are a great product offering great portable sound. Highly recommended.
p1155
aVHaving paid a premium price for the RS 180 Im very disappointed in the quality of the product.  The first problem I experienced was that the fully charged head set would not sync to the base unless I unplug the base and restart it.  This has to happen every time I want to enjoy the sound.  The sound, when working both channels is excellent.  The secondary problem I am experiencing is with the Left and Right Channel.  Sometimes it works and most times the Left Channel just goes out and I cannot get it back unless I disconnect the power and reset the whole system.  Anyone else experiencing this?  I have an email in to the company for help.  I want to keep these Head Phones but at this price Im very disappointed.
p1156
aVThere are already many reviews and little else needs to be said; however, I will add just a bit.  First off, these headphones work, meaning clear transmitted audio signal only, with no static, or other external noise and way superior, in this regard, to my old wireless Sony headphones which were not an inexpensive purchase.  I have been diagnosed as "Profoundly Deaf," \u2026 I actually think that this is  a bit of an over statement/evaluation,  but I have to say that with these headsets, I can now understand what is being said notably better than with the old Sony(analog) earphones.  Of course, so much depends on the frequency of the voice and the speed of the speakers voice.  Network news comprehension is now 95% and on an average, most movies on t.v. are around 80%  -- both instances without hearing aids as feedback is generated with their use.Pricey, yes but I would buy them again and by the way, I receive steady audio signal all throughout my 2400sq.ft. home and yard; also, I will be darned if I see an issue with an echo -- yes, I have the Yamaha amplifier/receiver(RX-V871) with a full set of speakers on at the same time.  With the Sony headphones, this was a big issue!One other thing, I second the suggestion by another reviewer to simply place a drop adhesive like a rubber cement on the surface of the middle button, between the  two volume control buttons to give the feel of their position.
p1157
aVThe design of earphone is so unique that I have not seen before.  It is not like the way other manufacturers design their earphone.  I am able to hear the sound around me and yet without having the compromised sound quality.  I appreciate it.
p1158
aVReceived these in two days as promised. The good.... Sound is great, snug comfortable fit they won't fall off when you're doing other things. The bad.... as others have mentioned the buttons on the headphones are insane. I put a little piece of peel and stick velcro (loop side) on the off/on button so my fingers could easily find the volume controls. If I didn't I don't think these would be useable. Even at that I have small hands and fingers, someone with larger hands might have even more of a problem.  Also my hat size is 6 3/4, they are very snug, might be too snug for a larger person.  The range doesn't seem to fit the description, my workroom is about 30 feet from the transmitter and they won't pick up the signal in there. There is nothing that should be blocking the signal so I don't get that at all. I'm not to happy that I have to turn them on at the base unit, a extra step that seems unnecessary, small annoyance. But all in all I am happy with them but I think they are over priced due to the little problems they have. At least they don't make that annoying popping noise my Sony TMR-RF970R made. Although I did like Sony's design with the headband, instant off when you removed them. The Sony set died after using them for a little over a year. Prior to that pair I had always bought Sennheiser and was happy with them.  I've only had this pair now for a few days so will see how they preform over time.
p1159
aVI have been using my Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System for five weeks now.  It is by far the best performing wireless headset I've ever used.  I went through three previous brands.  Two of them were such a pain to use I threw them in the trash.  Literally!  The third one stopped working after about 6 months of use.  The Sennheiser RS 180 is a solid performing unit thus far.  It charges simply and easily.  It links up between headset and transmitter base in a instant.  No tuning required as with the analog types.  The sound is excellent in my book.  The highs are crisp, the mid-range/speech areas are clear and the bass sounds are very solid but not booming.  The surround sounds are incredible.  It makes watching movies with outstanding sound tracks a real treat.  I have only two issues with this headset.  The range of operation is not what I thought it should be.  The sound starts breaking up at about 25 feet but because I am sitting maybe 10 feet from my big screen 99% of the time this is not a big deal.  The thing I dislike most is the volume up/on-off/volume down button set on the underside of the right ear piece.  It's difficult to feel them at times.  I often turn the unit off while trying to adjust the volume down.  However this is a quality headset.  It is worth it's high price tag in my opinion.  Everything concidered I would recommend this headset highly to anyone!
p1160
aVI own Parrot Ziks, Shure SRH840s, Sony Monitors (the >$100 ones), Bose top-of-the-line, and several more sets.  Nothing beats the Sony Monitors for incredible sound (I've returned cans that are hundreds more).  However, full cans get hot and keep you tied down.  Bluetooth is great sometimes and when it's best, the skips, etc, are about equal to how many times I knock my earbuds out or they fall out.  In home, however, nothing touches these RS180s for comfort (soft, open ear design means not hot), clarity (couldn't get them to skip if I wanted to), and performance (fantastic!!!).  I change my EQ settings on iTunes depending on which headphones I'm wearing.  Easy, I just do whatever sounds best in two minutes of dinking with settings.  You don't need to do that, but if you've read this far, you probably do that anyway (iTunes->Windows->Equalizer-> fiddle around).  I took these two hundred feet away and behind concrete walls with wires and pipes.  No problem.  I have the transmitter parked next to radios, cordless phones, my super duty D-Link router, and I run two network extenders on the property.  Not a blip.  No interference between any of the electronics (guessing because it runs old school signal?), no drop in any kind of wireless performance for any equipment when these are on.  Bottom line:  PHENOMENAL.  Well, well worth the money.  You will be ear to ear grinning.
p1161
aVOver the years I have used many fine head phones, including all the top names and professional studio phones. The Sennheiser RS 180 is close to, if not level with the very best in terms of sound reproduction in every sense. Some reviews have talked about an echo when the Television was not muted, as when another person in the room was watching without the use of phones. I can attest to very thorough testing at various sound levels without any evidence of an echo. This is an extremely important point because some of the reviews claiming an echo almost convinced me to cancel my order. I am very glad that I did not cancel. Using these phones is like the difference between sitting in a state-of-the are theater with advanced acoustics and sound reproduction equipment vs. watching the same movie at home on an HD-TV with just the speakers in the television. WOW! What a difference. I was blown away. I am amazed at some of the nuances that I was never able to hear through the TV. And that is with the volume of the phones at a very nominal level. If you can afford these phone don't hesitate. You too will be amazed. Oh. . .  I have no connection whatsoever with Sennheiser, their distributors or anyone else connected with this company. I am simply a consumer with a very well trained and discerning ear who happens to be very impressed with a fine product..
p1162
aVSound quality is the expected from Sennheiser.  Very minimum interference or static, almost never and barly noticable when it occurs.  Volume is definitely adequate too, I usually float towards the bottom end of the volume spectrum with these headphones, something uncommon for me (I have some hearing loss in one ear).Range is a bit less than I expected but I am using them indoors in a large house with block walls, so upstairs on the opposite side of the house, they loose reception consistently.  However, for regular range (TV-kitchen, etc.) they work flawlessly.My 3 year old son twisted one of the ear pieces till it broke and popped out (a little) to where I cant set it back.  However, the unit still functions perfectly.  It only resulted in an aesthetic detail.  Rugged.I may not be a power user but they have only discharged on me once, and that was because they had been misplaced on the charger the previous two nights and didn't recharge.Pretty comfortable, sometimes after an hour or two, my ears get a little sensitive, the cups could be a tad bigger as to avoid ear rub.  They get a little hot too (I am in tropical climates), even in air conditioned environments.  This would be a plus in a colder climate (I imagine).Charging station is nice, maybe a little tipsy.
p1163
aVThese headphones sound great and are almost as good as the wired Sennheiser HD 598. Setup was a breeze. All you do is plug the receiver in to your system, press the power button on the receiver, and then press power button on the headphones. If you're using them with a portable music player like an iPod you need to flip the switch on the back to 0 db, and if you're using them with an AV receiver you need to flip the switch to -8db. They sound great with both movies and music which is what I use them for the most. Make sure that you don't turn the volume up too high on your source. I had turned my AV receiver up too high and the sound was distorted on the movie I was watching. This might be not be the same for all systems, but my Onkyo AV receiver volume goes up to 80, and I put it between 30 and 35. when using the headphones. The buttons on the headphones take some getting used to. The good news is that the power button, which is in between the volume buttons, has a slightly raised logo, so you can feel where you are when trying to turn the volume up or down. There's also a gap between the volume down and balance buttons. It takes some practice to get used to the button placement, and Sennheiser could have done a better job on that front. Other than that I'm very satisfied with these headphones.
p1164
aVWorks very well.  Sound quality is quite good and with the open cans I can still hear what's going on around me.  If somebody walks into the room I hear them coming.  Range is about half of my DECT 6.0 cordless phones, which is more then adequate.  I can go anywhere in my house, to the end of my driveway and a little way down the street before they begin to cut out. They come with eneloop batteries, which is a great little feature.  Eneloop's are probably the best rechargeable battery on the market today.  Sennheiser didn't have to include this good of a battery but they did, which impresses me.I have a huge head and these are still comfortable on their largest setting.The only thing I don't like about these headphones is that you have to turn on the base and turn on the headphones each time you want to use them.  It's not a big thing but just a minor annoyance.  On the other hand, this way if they get bumped off the charger they won't drain since they're still turned off.  But they could have had the base turn itself on when the headphones are removed.  Sometimes I grab the headphones and sit down, then have to get back up and turn the base on.When you're done using them you just drop them on the charger and they turn themselves off, which is pretty neat,
p1165
aVThis review will not provide sufficient information to people who can hear with both ears.  I have been deaf in my left ear since I was five years old, and thus cannot speak to any issue that regards both ears simultaneously.  That having been said, these phones are just wonderful.  I simply funnel the sound for both ears into my right ear, and the sound is, well, just luscious.  (I have checked both sides of the earphones by reversing them, and the sound is equally good from either ear-piece.) I connect the headphone transmitter to the headphone jack on my receiver (which provides the the sound for all my audio and video systems) and it in turn outputs flawless digital signals to my Sennheiser 180 Digital Wireless Headphones.  I am a musician, and have excellent hearing in my right ear, and I can tell you that what I hear with my right ear is as good as I could imagine from any electronic source.  There is a sense of auditory space in the sound coming into my right ear.  The illusion is that of hearing a a really good natural sound from up close.  And I can walk around anywhere in the house with these headphones on and they sound just the same as if I were sitting in the room with my sound system.  In short, this Sennheiser system is as good as I could imagine.  I am completely satisfied.
p1166
aVThese are simply the best full-sized wireless headphones that I have heard.  They have very reasonable range and auto-volume adjust.  NO extraneous noise.  If these were stolen, I'd buy 'em again.  The only con could be that, although the ear pads are very cushioned, my ears are a bit larger than the inside of the phone pad.
p1167
aVAfter very much research, I settled on this Digital Wireless Headphone.  The best surprise, is no surprise at all. They work as advertised right out of the box.Set up was simple, except, I had to print out the instructions in order to refer to them in the room that the TV was in. They are connected to a Sharp 32 inch LED HD TV.  The individual volume setting for each ear was a must for me as I have 40% hearing loss in left ear. Finally, I can hear everything as it was intended, crisp, clear, deep base, and high tones without the volume turned up high enough to disturb my wife. I had forgotten what I was missing. They make me want to go back and view movies again just to hear the total soundtrack! I had no idea that footsteps and door hinge sound was part of what I was missing.I can walk all over my home and not lose connection, except going in the basement, some locations down there will cause them to disconnect, and reacquire.Recharging is simple, just hang them on the transmitter as shown.. So far, the most I have used them for is three hours. No problem. I have to assume that they will continue to work past that.
p1168
aVI purchased my first set of these about four years ago and just purchased this second set as an add-on. Both headsets work perfectly, even four years into heavy use. I use these for blasting my movies when my wife wants silence. I purchased the second set so my wife and I can both enjoy late night movies and not wake our roommates, who's headboard wall is shared with my home theater speakers.One feature I really enjoy is that they breath. I have a pair of Bose QC2 headphones and had a pair of Beats Studio Wireless headphones as well, both sets have great sound and great noise canceling but part of noise canceling is sealing up the cups. These Sennheiser 180s breath nicely so you can wear them for hours on end without your ears getting all sweaty. Also this means that you can talk to someone right next to you without shouting at them.  I chose to purchase a whole second set with the receiver instead of a stand-alone set of headphones (no base) because i like both headphones to be constantly recharged to their fullest. I have both sets synced to one base unit, the second only serves as a recharging station.Overall I love them.
p1169
aVMy wife is in school.  She has to study evenings and weekends.  I like to watch movies, and have a surround sound system we enjoy very much.  But, I obviously can't play it if she has school work.  Headphones are the obvious solution, and I have a set of basic corded Sennheisers.  I've been happy with them....But then I read about these.  I found a deal on Amazon and I went for it.  Man I am so glad I did.  Now I get to enjoy high end surround sound without disturbing my wife.  She says this is one of the best investments I have made for her sake.  What stereo component can boast that endorsement!?Basically these headphones make it seem like your surround sound is contained within them.  The dialogue, the effects, the left to right, front to back is all there.  They are really comfortable, simple to hook up, and the charge lasts as long as I need it.  I love that the storage place is also the charger.  The reception is perfect throughout the house.It seems to me like Sennheiser set out the make a top notch product here, and acheived this goal.  I've had them for a few months now.  These are excellent headphones.
p1170
aVGreat set of headphones. Sound is very clear and I am loving the open design. While I understand the need for noise cancellation and closed headphones, these headphones are staying at home/work. I'll need to hear things happening around me.Headphones are pretty comfortable. I wear glasses and have been avoiding headphones because they press my glass frames to the side of my head. So I'd stick to earphones and wireless earphones. I decided to buy these headphones based on the reviews claiming the great comfort and they aren't wrong. However when I wore these headphones with contacts in, I didn't realize these headphones can get even comfier.One star off due to how bad walls can interfere with the receiver and headset. When I go to the kitchen to cook (kitchen isn't closed off from where the receiver is), there are times when they stop producing sounds for a second. This can happen pretty frequently if there is a wall in between the receiver and headset. I read that this isn't an issue with the RS 170's, so I'm wondering why the RS 180's can't be the same. The only complaint I have about these headphones.
p1171
aVI Got this RS-180 around Thanksgiving in November of 2010. I was very lucky to have gotten this at a great price from Amazon (about a hundred dollars less than the $329 it is going for now).The RS-180 arrived on time and in new condition.I have used a Sennheiser RS-65 wireless headphone since 2002. The RS-65 was a pretty good wireless set.  Battery life was great, the original batteries are still going strong. the Sound I thought was great.But boy when I turn on the new RS-180 and play some of my concert DVD's, and this is just from a DVD player to my Sony HDTV via HDMI cables, the RS-180 put my RS-65 to shame.  The RS-180 sound is really clear, the base tight, there is no static at all, none what so ever. Wow! And it never drops out like the RS-65 does once in a while!The quality of the RS-180 is pretty good. It only squeaks a little on the right side of the headset when I put them on, but after I have got them set, it does not squeak anymore.  So, I decided to keep it as is!I like the RS-180 so much that I think I will get a second headset, the HDR-180.
p1172
aVI had some reservations on these after reading some of the reviews saying that they are small or snug, because I have a ginormous head.  My hat size is about 8 1/8, and I'm 6'8 so I'm just a large person in general.  So imagine my surprise when they arrive working as advertised and even very comfortably fitting my head.  The top band that holds the two cups together actually seems to flex quite a bit as I wear them, making for a much more comfortable fit after I'd worn them for a couple of days than when they were first out of the box.  All the parts that touch your head are soft and velvety.  After breaking them in for a couple of days, they fit my head like a large comfortable head glove.  I've worn them already for hours on end with very little ear fatigue.My house is kind of small, but it's on two levels and there is nowhere I go in my house that I don't receive a clear signal.  Sound is very good and bass response is quite acceptable for this type of open headphone.  Whenever I've detected minor static or distortion, it has always ended up being in the source not in the headphones (I need to get some higher bitrate MP3s).  The only minor negatives I've noted is that there is a brief <1 second drop in the signal about every hour or so, the fact that you have to get up and push a button on the transmitter to turn it on (I am not too lazy to manage that), and the button placement.  Buttons are functional and with some practice I should be able to distinguish what's what without looking.  Protip from the manual:  If you accidentally hit one of the balance buttons, you can hold down both balance buttons at the same time to reset.  Oh, and one other potential drawback:  they make the wearer look like a total dork.  But it's totally worth it.
p1173
aVGreat headphones! The description on these headphones is absolutely true, at least for us. Have had about a month and they have really improved our listening pleasure, especially with low volume movies. Was really irritating trying to listen to movies that have the dialog mostly drowned out by the stupid music tracks. Now we can actually hear what the actors are saying! Its great. And its amazing how much fine detail they pick up from the background. My husband wears hearing aids and was really bothered by the dialog volume on most movies and other shows. Now he is amazed at what he hadn't heard before in some of our old movies. Normal program viewing/listening is also improved. Even sports program viewing is improved. If you wear hearing aids and still have trouble hearing your programs, these headphones are for you. Set up was a little confusing for two non-techies but we figured it out. They charged really quickly and were up and running in no time. They fit well and we haven't been bothered with them being too hot over the ears.
p1174
aVI am not an expert on headphones but I can only tell you my experience with the RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphones. When I was searching for the headphones, my requirements were long charge life: I used the RS 180 viewing movies and listening to music for more than 12 hours and no sign of power loss or sound quality but now and then you hear a break in the sound for just a half a second; not an issue. The headphones had to have a strong signal distance: I used the headphones in my three stories home and on every floor level I had a clear signal from the headphones. I even tested the distance by walking to my mail box about 150ft from the front door and the signal started breaking up about 120ft at a half a charge. But, if you live near lot of microwave towers you will get a lot of interference. I know this because when I\u2019m in the kitchen and the microwave is turned on, the headphone signal breaks up. I had the headphones for about 3 months now and had no issues with them. I\u2019m thinking about purchasing a second pair for down stars.
p1175
aVBought these for my husband to replace an older set of Sennheisers.  Debated between the RS 170's and the 180's as I was concerned about sound leakage.  He uses them to watch TV and movies while my the rest of the household is sleeping.  We didn't want him waking us but some sound leakage would be fine.The leakage is minimal, in fact, unless he has the sound completely cranked we don't hear anything even standing beside him.  The quality of sound is fantastic and I am glad I went with this open system in the end.  So much better than the closed system.The set up was extremely simple and the quality of sound these headphones produce is excellent.  For the price, I don't think there is a better wireless headphone on the market.  If your priority is the distance you can use these headphones, I might be concerned.  Ours cuts out on the far side of our condo, which isn't that far, however we live in an a very dense urban environment with countless wi-fi networks about so it is likely an issue with interference.
p1176
aVI didn't even get a chance to use my product because it came to me broken.  After giving the product a thorough lookover, I could immediately see how fragile it is.  I don't think this could survive a fall on the hard floor without cracking or shattering.  For $300, this should have been constructed a lot better.
p1177
aVI'm a bit of an audiophile, and I found these headphones to have terrific sound quality and an amazing bass response. About the only time I notice any audio lag whatsoever is when playing music based video games like Guitar Hero. The delay is so small you don't notice it watching TV, but the timing required with video games like those mentioned, it can be just barely enough to throw you off.I do get some background noise when the headphones are turned up to max. I personally never do this (my family sometimes does though... and I have to fix it) I turn the headphones down to where the noise is dialed out, then I turn the source up as needed to get nice clean audio.Button placement is a bit odd. The volume buttons aren't quite where I'd expect to find them. If I reach my hand up blindly, I should be able to feel which ones are the volume buttons. The ones that feel like volume buttons instead adjust the left/right panning.Regardless, I love these headphones and would definitely purchase again.
p1178
aVBefore I bought this Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone, I had used Beats by Dr Dre for two years. I listen to lots of heavy metal, thrash metal and hard rock music. I have been addicted to the strong bass that Beats provides for the music that I listen to. Before I bought this headpohne, I was a little worried that RS 180 would not have enough bass based on some reviews that I read. After I received it and used it, I am no longer worried at all. Sennheiser RS 180 provides adequate and very natural bass. In fact, not only the bass, all frequencies are extremely precise and extremely clear. The soundstage is spectacular. I am very impressed by the technology employed in this headphone. Plus, this headphone is more comfortable to wear than Beats, largely due to the velour earcups it uses. I had a JVC wireless headphone many years ago. It had so much hiss sound which made it unbearable. Apparently, much improved wireless technology has been used by Sennheiser RS 180. Great work for Sennheiser.
p1179
aVI have used the Sennheiser RS-130 for the past 4 years, and the surround sound was incredible and delicious, but I was looking for an upgrade, the next generation from a high quality manufacturer. My main uses are for blu-ray movies and late night TV viewing as to not disturb any neighbors, plus it's an intimate experience without any street noise. When I decided on the RS-180 I bought it from J & R because their customer service is outstanding. The DVD product guide estimated an initial charge of up to 16 hours, but mine was ready for blastoff in about 7. I was immediately blown away, swept into a cinematic oasis, a sound panorama that disintegrated any assumptions about how a movie should leave a lasting impression! They are exceptionally comfortable and well worth the price, and you will not be disappointed!!! Without a sound system hooked up to my Samsung 1920 X 1080 HD-LCD TV, I realize now I haven't totally appreciated the blu-ray player and movies until this wireless headphone purchase. Thanks to Kleer's uncompressed audio transmission technology another journey began via listening to some of my favorite blu-rays like Oliver Stones "The Doors". WOW!!! The bass sounds are outstanding and precise. You will venture forth into a new world of audio pleasure. If the Sennheiser RS-180 was a painting it would be a masterpiece by Kandinsky or Dali; a sculpture, La Pieta via Michelangelo, a song, something by Lennon & McCartney. Remember this: escape is not a luxury, it is a necessity if you want to get an advanced degree in sound and mind travel. Now get out and buy these phones!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p1180
aVBeing the owner of a sound studio, I own a couple dozen headsets. Each have their place when listening to a mix. One use is for the high end audiophile who appreciates engineering that helps filter obnoxious sounds. This headphone and receiver do just that. No schrilling highs (unless you really want to crank them up with an EQ) while the bass response is more than adequate... in fact that's one I, as a sound engineer, EQ'd down so I could hear something closer to what less fortunate listeners would hear and mix accordingly. But for watching movies and listening to music that's long ago mixed and produced, these are up at the top of my list. And they're as comfortable... pardon me, I had to think about that one... they're *more* comfortable than any other headphone I've worn. The digital transmission/reception is ultra smooth. If I'd only had a pair earlier in life. Now I have three pair and a transmitter. Extraordinarily packaged; Delivered on time; Smooth transaction. "Thankaya boys".
p1181
aVOk. I admit it...my hearing is going. If I didn't already know it, my condo neighbor made it perfectly clear by banging on our common wall every time I turned on the TV. Admittedly, I kept turning up the volume but I still couldn't discern the dialogue above the background noise--instead, it all became a distorted mess.I had been reduced to reading close captions, and I was not a happy camper ...  So I did my research, purchased the RS180, allowed my inner-geek to overcome my technical challenges, and installed it all by myself.WOW!! Chrystal clear dialogue and beautiful background music--where it should be...in the background.I am enjoying a whole new television experience...far surpassing any, even pre-hearing loss.Instead of being ticked at my neighbor for the threatening notes he left on my door, I thought about leaving him a thank you note on his.  Well, it was just a passing thought. I would hate to give him credit for my awesome rS180.
p1182
aVAs a person who has hearing loss as a result of military action, this product is an excellent solution to being able to hear and understand even the soft spoken words in TV programs and movies.  The sound quality is excellent and I can continue to listen to the program on TV from anywhere in the house and outside.  Now I can walk away from the TV and not miss a thing.  The "open style" headphone allows you to hear everything that is going on in and around you while listening to the TV.  You're not isolated from the rest of the world when you're using them.  Other reviews mentioned an echo when the TV sound is on.  If the TV sound is high when you are using the headphones, you may hear a slight sound delay through the headphones. However, when other people have the TV sound set where they are comfortable, I only hear the headphone sound and do not hear any echo.  I am very satisfied with the headphones!  They have significantly added to my TV listening pleasure.
p1183
aVThe good: these headphones sound good, are of quality workmanship, and fit comfortably.The bad: the control system will make you want to cry. I use these headphones at the office so that I can listen to music while working. The problem is that every time I leave my desk to attend a meeting or get something from the printer, my impulse is to put the headphones back on the transmitter base/charger to ensure that the batteries stay charged. This powers down the headphones, which is ok. What's not ok is that it also powers off the base transmitter and breaks the pairing between transmitter and headphones. This means that when I come back, I not only have to turn on the headphones I also have to turn on the transmitter and wait for the pairing process to complete before I get any audio. This is ridiculous. The headphones obviously transmit commands back to the transmitter for the pairing to take place so why doesn't the transmitter turn on when I turn the headphones on? Why don't the headphones and transmitter stay paired until I say otherwise? I feel especially bad for people who use these headphones at home where the transmitter is across the room from the listening location. Let's take this one step farther and ask why taking the headphones off the charger doesn't automatically turn the system on so that the phones are working by the time they're on your head? All I wanted is the functionality of wired headphones without the problems of getting tangled up in or damaging the cord and this headphone system falls short.
p1184
aVMy Sennheiser RS 180 experience was better than anticipated. I had read the reviews for the item and I was already convinced that would be a good investment to purchase the set; however, you always expect some degree of error, due to the difference in opinion on what is good for some people and what that represent to others. Well, even though I was expecting a good overall experience with the product, my expectations were more than satisfied. The wireless headphone system has excelent sound and reception. They are very confortable; you almost forget you are wearing them. Installation was very simple to do. The one caracteristic that was accurate in my experience when using them was regarding the control botttoms in the headset. They are difficult to feel and distinguish; really small inconvenience considering the remarkable performance of the product. I guess with practice this can be overcome, with no much frustration.Excelent Product.
p1185
aVI bought a pair of these for my parents who are in their 70's.  They were having television volume wars at their house, my stepdad in particular is having hearing trouble and really blares his t.v.  I have not tried them myself, but my parents really like them and there is now peace at their house.  They are wireless, they both say they are comfortable to wear (they both wear glasses, and it is not an issue), neither one of them seem to have any problem with the controls and I know my stepdad can actually go out into the garage wearing his and still hear the television, so the range is very good.  I do not know how they are for music but for television and our particular need for them they have been wonderful.  It has been about 6 months now and they are both still very happy and I have not had to listen to my mom complain about how deaf her husband is and how she cannot hear her television shows..........
p1186
aVI'm using these now for about 1.5 years and I absolutely LOVE them. The have good sound. I purchased other expensive headphones and in comparison I don't have anything to complain about sound wise. With a couple walls in-between they range about 30feet before you get dropouts. I charge them after each use but sometimes I forget but never had a problem using then for over 20 hours without recharging. Nice to have a product that simply works and that I don't have to worry about.I also owned the cheaper versions of these (RS 110) and wasn't as happy with them since they produces a hissing sound when you get out of reach. No problem with these: They just mute which is way more comfortable for your ears.Some people complained about the controls but I must say you simply get used to them. You memorize where each button is positioned after a while and then it's no problem anymore.
p1187
aVMost important feature upfront; sound.  It's great.  It either receives the signal or it doesn't.  No hissing and popping.I had an older set that finally broke after I dropped them on the floor.  These are a replacement.The bad.  As just about everry one else has pointed out they crammed all the controls on one side in a visually pleasing big to little button aray.  It llooks very nice.  I thought after using it for a month I would overcome the the near non-existant change from one button to another.  I havn't.  I pretty much have the volume increase button down pat.  The mute and volume down I still have to remove the headset - look - then choose and push.I would be so happy if they had moved just the mute button to the left side.  I never use the balance buttons.Bottom line I like them but they are not 5 star quality because of the ergonomics.
p1188
aVWe bought this for my 83 year old Grandmother who has terrible hearing loss. We got a cheaper option at Best Buy but it didn't work very well and wasn't easy for her to learn how to use.THESE ARE SO MUCH BETTER. They allow her to keep her hearing aids in and allow her to hear what's going on around her as well. She loves them so much and she never watches TV without them.They are simple for her to use! All she has to do is take them off the dock and put them back on when she's done and they will charge. She figured out the volume right away. She never misses a word they say on television anymore and she never misses a chance to watch a Brewers game. As her mobility declines, her mind is kept going.Two of her elderly friends now have them because they saw how great they were.Range is great, she can walk all over the house and still be connected.
p1189
aVI have had two previous sets of Seinheiser wireless head phones.  These are by far the best I have ever owned.  All previous phones have had a tendency to catch the volume control when I was lying down and either take the volume up or down.  The controls on this headset are recessed so no such problem.  Comfort is outstanding. If you are going to wear them for a couple of hours this is very important. I walk from one end of house to other and not miss a beat on the quality of sound. When you look at these you know you are looking at quality.  The  only downside is the price.  If you want the best then you are going to pay for it.  The controls are small and recessed but his helps prevent accidentally activating them when lying down or moving around.  These are as good as it gets.Today I have ordered a second one of these head sets for a different location. They remain as good as it gets.
p1190
aVI agree with the previous posts that say these are great sounding and comfortable.  My wife was shocked by the price I paid, but I assured her they are worth it.  No hiss or buzzing, dialog is very clear, and I am very pleased with the bass.  I like the open sound, although my wife is a bit bothered when she hears the crashes, booms and screams from the movies I'm watching.  Oh, and by the way, I use them primarily for movies streaming over Wi-Fi (Netflix) and I have had no issues with interference between the headphone wireless and Wi-Fi.The headphones were very easy to set up.  Granted, it is a minor hassle having to turn the base and headphones on separately, but at least turning off the headphones is sufficient since the base will then turn itself off automatically in 5 minutes.Overall, I am quite happy with the Sennheiser RS 180.
p1191
aVThe Sennheiser RS 180 Headphones have restored my ability to hear Television and Music with all of the Bass, Treble, Voice, and Stereo sounds that I have been missing for many years. I have an 80% hearing loss, and have been looking for something that would allow me to hear well without disturbing others. The Sennheiser RS 180 Headphones exceeded all of my requirements. There is ample room for over the ear hearing aids in the muffs if you need additional sound clarification and tweaking, but the sound quality is so great you don't really need them. The ONLY thing they need is a remote, as the control buttons are too close together making adjustments difficult while on your head. They are very comfortable and can be worn for extended lengths of time. Being able to hear so well again, makes the Sennheiser RS 180 Headphones well worth their cost.
p1192
aVI'm not a very technical person so this is a basic user review. For background we live in an apartment and leave the TV volume pretty low to not disturb neighbors. We relied on closed captioning for almost everything. We constantly increased or lowered the volume based on the show's background noise (gunshots, sirens, music). So we started the search for wireless headphones that would allow us to clearly hear the tv and have as close to surround sound as possible in an apartment. First bought 2 Sony digital wireless headphones but only one would pair up and the other was useless. After researching these and seeing you could pair up to 4 headsets to one transmitter base we were sold. It works beautifully. We can use 2 headsets with no trouble and can add more later if needed. They are comfortable and the sound is amazing! I highly recommend.
p1193
aVOk guys i will go straight to the point. This is not a headphone for those that desire good bass impact as in my opinion, the bass is a little lacking on the rs180 but well it is a little expected for a open backed headphone. IF you want more bass, go with the rs170.. do not waste time on these. However, if you desire a real good soundstage and good highs and mids are enough, than this is the way to go.  Pros: - Long range of up to 100m seriously  - definitely comfortable [it is warm and it feels great]  - Good battery life [ more realistic is what i should say. it can last up to 6 - 7 hrs continiously]  - GREAT Quality  Cons:  - You can say the lack of bass  - the sound leakage?[ but that is to be expected when buying an open backed headphone]Real great product. i will recommend it to my friends.
p1194
aVLove 'um... BUTThe BAD:1. If you use them with the speakers on at the same time, there is a slight delay in the headset, causing it to seem like an echo.2. Long term use isn't as comfortable as the older style ear-cups on the 120, 130 models... ouchie... achey ears.3. Must turn transmitter ON every time you want to use them.4. If you decide to turn them off for a while, you will have to get up out of your comfy chair, and go over to the transmitter unit to turn it back on again... bummer.5. Controls, even after memorizing their location and position, are very inconvenient, and awkward to use... difficult to tell which button is which by feel.6. Balance? Really? I have no idea why you would want balance on headphones. It did not bother me that they had it; I figured it would be something I just wouldn't use... no biggie. But when you accidentally touch it, feeling your way around the controls, balance gets messed up, and you have to re-balance... Annoying feature.The Good:1. Sound is crisp and clear... very clean sounding. And the clear speech thingy actually works; that's cool too.2. Except for the ear cups being too small and pinching the ear between the cup and your head, the rest of the shape and mold is quite comfortable; still doesn't make up for ear pain though.
p1195
aVWorks pretty much as advertised.  I haven't listened to anything that would test the sound quality tremendously, but what I have listened to is fine.  Maybe a little light on bass effects in movies, but OK for music.  I haven't worn them for more than 90 minutes at a stretch, but they are comfortable for that amount of time (and that's not the case all the time for me with other headphones).My biggest complaint is that I need to turn the volume up on my source quite loud, so if I forget to adjust it before unplugging, it's extremely loud unplugged.  They also make my head a tad warm, but I honestly think that's to be expected.Bottom line, I'm able to listen to the TV later at night as loud as I want without disturbing the rest of the family.  That's what I wanted to do with this purchase, so mission accomplished.
p1196
aVYES! These turned out to be perfect.In my household, 2 people work from home.So that means sometimes during the day when someone is watching TV, someone else may be conducting business on the phone or just needing quiet time to think without having to listen to a TV blaring in the background.So we needed some high quality cordless head phones.I had some cordless headphones years ago... but they were just "eh" and the sound quality was only so- so.So I had reservations about going the cordless route again.And then there was the price...These are kind of expensive and I wasn't sure I wanted to invest in them that much money.Well, all I can say is I am glad I decides to get them.They solved the issue of background TV noise disturbing people working from home in the best way possible. .I must say they are a fantastic product!The sound quality is AWESOME.  They are comfortable to wear for hours even.And they were easy as pie to hitch up.All I just had to do was to plug them into my TV's headphone jack. (I have a Samsung 46" ) and I was in business.Un-boxing, skimming the directions and setting up to use took less than 5 minutes.I highly recommend them. Thank you. Todd G.
p1197
aVI bought these to use with Skype so I could move around or lay down on group calls and studies I participate in. I had tried a cheaper pair that I returned because they wouldn't connect. Anyway, these sound so good, I also use them with my TV watching movies late at night, watching you tube videos online, and my Amazon Prime instant videos both on my computer and TV (I hook them up to my Sony Blue Ray that streams video too).. I find myself wearing them even when it isn't late at night because they sound way better than the sound from my TV and computer speakers and they are actually really comfortable to wear. They were expensive but I use them for so much now that they were worth the money I spent, for sure. And they are so easy to store and charge on the base- they are always ready to use.
p1198
aVThis product works! I unpacked it, set it up, plugged it into my DVR box and it works beautifully. The audio coming through the headphones is great. I hear things that I have been missing for years unless I turned the TV volume up to where it disturbed my wife. Even when a character in a show is talking softly I can hear them. I was concerned about there being no tone control. I find that it is not needed. The ALC does a great job. Also, when someone speaks to me I still can hear them. Going into another room does not affect the audio reception. It is worth the price. I tried a cheaper version and different brand of these type of product and this Sennheiser product beats it hands down.
p1199
aVFeel like I am a victim of false advertising.  The product specifications state the headphones transmit for 100 meters, 300 feet.  And naturally I knew not to expect that but maybe 100 feet of distance.  Well either the pair I bought don't work properly or this is plain deceptive marketing because these headphones don't work within my apartment.  I get constant sound drop-outs at a distance of less than 20 ft passing through two thin sheetrock walls.  These headphones are a big improvement over the worthless Sony wireless headphones I had been using previously but definitely fall short of expectations.  Hard to justify $300 wireless headphones that only work in the living room.
p1200
aVThis is the best looking headphones in the whole Sennheiser RS and new RS RF family, which is the first priority for me to buy them.You might laugh at me about my criteria of choosing, but when you are buying products from Sennheiser, sound quality would not be the issue, since they are all guaranteed above average.Besides looking, the headphones weigh light, are extremely comfortable on my head, and have very balanced sound signature.I was hesitating to buy them when they were 200 dollars, only to miss the opportunity. However, when they appeared again on Amazon for 200 dollars, I bought them with strong determination.Love them so much.
p1201
aVThese headphones provide great sound quality (to be expected from Sennheiser), and very easy to set-up. I red some comments before I bought them that they are difficult to pair - I didn't find that at all. In fact, as soon as powerd up the transmitter and put the batteries in, they came right on! The range is excellent too - works everywhere in my 1,300 sf appartment and in the hallway too (when I go to take garbage out for instance).What I do agree with is that the control buttons are pain to use. You are destined to hit the off/mute button by accidend instead of volume up or down, because it sits right in between them two, and balance adjustment - forget it - will never hit the right one - but you don't really need to use it that often. Another flaw - ALC button (to boost speech range)is located on transmitter only, so you have to walk to it to turn it on if you have a hard time hearing dialogs in movies. This is why I gave it 3 out of 5 for ease of use. But everything else - solid 5s all around.
p1202
aVI have a friend that has an older set (HDR 130) of these head phones and I tried them out. I knew I had to have a set of my own. When I started looking I didn't have to look very far. Amazon sells quality equipment at great prices. When I saw the price that this set was going for on Amazon, compared to the MSRP, I knew I had a great set of headphones and an even more amazing price. I cannot recommend these headphones enough. Fantastic sound quality, range, looks and style. Thanks Amazon for offering quality with great pricing.Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System with Automatic Level Control and Adustable Balance Control
p1203
aVThere are many positives about these headphones. The sound quality is great. You can crank of the volume fairly well. They feel light and comfortable. Range is good (I haven't yet lost the signal, but then again I haven't really tested that aspect to its limit). Set up was easy. And best of all there is no hiss. I first tried a $99 Sony wireless headphone, mainly b/c I've always been a Sony sound fan. Sound was Sony sound---but you couldn't really raise the volume too well. Worst for those was the horrible hiss....So these are expensive, but you get what you pay for. These are the first Sennheiser I've owned, and I'm sure I'll purchase more in the future.
p1204
aVI love the headphones.  The sound quality is great, I can move around with them on and not miss a thing.  My only problem is that we use two of them in the family, and syncing both is sometimes hard.  Once they are synced, everything is fine.  Every few weeks or so, one of them unsyncs (or unpairs) - then it is a big production trying to get both to pair.  I pair one, the other one becomes unpaired.  Then I work on the other - and you get the picture.  I don't know why I have this issue.  I see some other complaining about the same thing, then others saying pairing is easy.  Either way, I'm glad I bought them, even with that frustration in mind.
p1205
aVThis is my second set of Sennheiser headphones. I've had the first set for years and they were showing their age plus they picked up a lot on interference. The newer digital set is much better, although they still cause hot ears after a while. I wish they had more volume without turning the TV up so high. When I'm by myself, no problem, but when watching with the wife, her comfortable volume for the TV still leaves my headset a little low. I probably should have returned them and looked at another brand but the price was below $200 and I didn't want to pay more. Still better than the old ones, but I bet there are better choices out there.
p1206
aVPros:-Excellent range with no connection issues whatsoever.-Sound great for being wireless-The battery has never ever died on me, and I have occasionally fallen asleep with these still going. 8+ hours later, they are always still going strong.Cons:-The construction materials could be better. The plastic around the drivers seems pretty cheap. It didn't take them very long to start creaking.-On occasion, I hear rattling in the right cup that I can't seem to get rid of. It makes this noise during playback, so it is very annoying. Probably related to the issue of cheap construction materials. **edit haven't heard rattle in a long time. See below,**Overall I am still very happy with these. The creaking is only an issue when they are in my hands, so it isn't really a big deal. I said the construction materials seemed cheap because they creak and make noises, but they have lasted me this long without breaking. That is saying a lot considering I have woken up half of a dozen times with these under me (they creaked well before that).**Edit Sep 2015**Well, they are still going strong. I have to hand it to Sennheiser, these are some excellent headphones. While my headphones have continued to slowly come apart (no thanks to the way I treat them), They still sound fantastic. No issues with battery life, they are still mostly holding together, and the rattle is completely gone somehow! I think the culprit may have been a broken clip on the pad plate. One of them is missing now and I haven't heard the rattle for a long time.I'm going to eventually pick up a new pair of headphones for these, especially now that I heard that I can use multiple pairs with a single transmitter. I would give these 4.5 stars if Amazon allowed it.
p1207
aVI simply could't put it down. Now I can walk around the house, upstairs and downstairs, even the patio area of backyard, and not losing a bit of the sound quality. Extremely simple in setting it up, comfy and pure, just incredibly nice. I've had various Sennheiser headphones through the years, never dissappointed, but this is the best wireless set I ever had. The charging cradle is superb in both function and look. Very well built. Look, you do not have to have it, you can stick with what you have or stay away from it due the price tag, whatever else reason ... but you just have no idea what you have missed.
p1208
aVAwesome sound!  The Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System has been one of the most worthwhile purchases I've ever made.  Because our TV viewing area is open to the main part of our home and my dear husband seems to be a bit hard of hearing, this headset has been worth it's weight in gold.  The sound is amazing for him and the peace and quiet has been wonderful for me!!  The price seemed a bit high, but I wanted to invest in a headset that wouldn't compromise sound quality.  Sennheiser's reputation is what drew me to this headset.  Very easy to set up and to use even if one isn't a technophile.
p1209
aVThe Sennheiser RS 180 were purchased from Amazon after a complete review of different models.  The sound and clarity are excellent!!  Not  any of the hissing, as in an old set of Sony Wireless head phones.  The range is very good as I could walk to bathrooms and garage and not loose the signal.  The ONLY negative is adjusting the volume with the head sets on. It is difficult to feel the controls with the sets on your ears.  However; I am getting better as I use the RS 180's.  You can take them off for a second and push volume either up or down ONE time and this seems to work for me.
p1210
aVThe only problem we had was figuring out how to hook it up. We were getting sound coming from both the tv and the headphones simultaneously.  We have cable tv.  Fixed issue by hooking the headphones directly to the cable box.The headphones were everything we had read they were. Awesome sound, good range of distance when walking around the house, ease of use, and good comfort.We are so happy now! I can listen to my music while doing other things without worrying about the tv distracting me and hubby can watch whatever he wants without being bothered by my music!
p1211
aVI've been using these headphones for 9 months now and have nothing but good things to stay about them. Battery life is excellent, range is excellent. Most important, CLARITY is excellent. When playing computer games or listening to music I will occasionally hear things that I thought were coming from real life in the room. Once I take off the headphones I realize it wasn't real life. This hasn't ever happened to me before with headphones or speakers.5 stars all the way. I don't often leave reviews but these headphones deserve the high praise.
p1212
aVSound quality is excellent to my untrained ear.  If you are so inclined, you can go to the kitchen to get a drink and still hear the sound  with the sonic quality intact.  Next test is to see if I can still use them while barbequing in the yard.  Battery length before recharge is rated at 24 hrs.  I have used them for 12 hours without any difficulty. They come paired to the base unit from the factory and an additional headset can be added to be used simultaneously.  Volume controls controls are on the right ear cup and are easy to use while being worn.
p1213
aVThe range and sheer quality of these cans are incredible.  Audiophiles and newbs alike will be drooling over the sound from this headset.  Simple to set up (had to do some creative fixing to set it up with my Bose CineMate GS Series II system), but I couldn't be happier.If you want to be drowned out by heavy bass then these aren't for you.  If you want crystal clear clarity with a spatial range that will knock you sideways, then these are the ones.  The most expensive set in the range - and I can hear why.Perfection.
p1214
aVSuperb phones for portables! range is only 50 to 60 foot max though.Excellent sound, considering they are wireless and relatively inexpensive! lately, I'm having there horrible bouts of insomnia so they have definitely saved my marriage by letting my better half sleep. You practically forget that they're on and sometimes I get so engrossed on a Netflix series, she gets up and drags me back to bed because her feet are cold or some such nonesense! Enjoy, they are superb for TV viewing.
p1215
aVI had initally purchased the RS 130, I liked them so much I figured I would get the best ones.  The headphones are much lighter than the 130, and much greater quality.  I really so love these units and I even purchased the supplemental unit allowing 2 people to use them.  The sound quality is tremendous and I would definitely recommend them.  They give you complete privacy and your wife will love them at nightime when she wants to sleep and not hear what you are listening to.
p1216
aVI have tried several headphones and Sennheiser RS 180 wireless headphones are by far the best. Easy to setup and very light weight and comfortable. I wear hearing aids and there is no problem with feed back. The sound is great, much better than the TV alone. The controls are a little hard to get used too but not a real problem. I would recommend these to anyone who wants to have solitude and not diturb anyone else in the room.Thank you Amozon for carrying this product.
p1217
aVThese are an excellent pair of headphones. The Sound is very good. Easy to setup. I bought these to watch streamming movies through an apple TV. While this setup works great. My daughter who uses an iPad2 next to me has interference with her wireless network. When i turn the RS180 off the iPad works fine.So, i am reporting one flaw in these headphones- they probably do not work with an iPad 2.Thats why I gave it 3 stars only.
p1218
aVExcellent in all regards except for 2 minor things.  The controls on the side of the headphone are push button.  The fader and volume controls would be better if they were the wheel type.  Second, to turn them on you have to turn on both the headset and transmitter.  Older version of the headphones turned on automatically when you lifted the headset off the base.  Otherwise great sound, range, bass response and feel is great.
p1219
aVHaving lost a good bit of hearing in the military, I got these to watch tv without blowing my wife into the next room. They sound pretty good except for the short delay between the source and the headphones. I knew that was coming and accepted it. With a little jockeying of tv level and the headphone volume, I reached a happy medium. For those who bluetooth from your pc or stereo to headphones, it's a great product.
p1220
aVI bought for my husband who has hearing difficulty.  He bought different item and he was so frustrated but when he found this item's review, he decided that it is a little out of our budget but he could not hear TB without TV headphone so I decided to purchase it.Oh, the quality of sound is outstanding per my husband and he even can hear whispering clearly.Thanks!  Here is one big happy customer!
p1221
aVUnfortunately, none of the digital headphone systems will allow you to watch TV with your loved ones.  All the digital headphones I have tested (Sennheiser, Oticon Streamer, etc.) induce a delay that creates a echo effect when you are listening to sources that also have speakers going.  If you have the sound on the TV or stereo turned up loud enough for your girl friend/wife/kids to hear you are going to hear an echo that makes it impossible for you to listen and enjoy.I am using a Sennheiser analog headphone system Sennheiser RS 130 Wireless Surround Sound Headphones and it works perfectly, no delay so I can enjoy my evening TV with my wife.  It may not have the high quality of the digital systems, but it has enhanced my quality time with my family.
p1222
aVI've own several of these wireless headphones by this particular maker. The latest model by far is awesome. Works well, hassle free installation, sound crystal clear and the fitting is just right! The previous models couldn't even come close to this one. Great job Sennheiser, you sure listen to your customers.
p1223
aVWorks better when I thought it would, but the only thing I don't like is you have to restart it each time you use it. You have to hold the button on the  transmitter and the headphone until it blinks once each 5 seconds. It takes about 3 seconds to arrive at the 5 seconds blinks.
p1224
aVI bought these headphones after all the positive comments I read about them, but either way, one is never sure, as sound is a personal thing, so I wasn't too sure if they were as good as all the reviews I read.Well let me put your mind to rest, that these are just plain, and simply amazing.Setup only takes a few minutes if that, and when I first put them on, I knew that I had made the right choice in headphones.The sound is crystal clear, and there is absolutely no noise, or hiss, or dropouts whatsoever.A few reviews I have read, said they had hiss in the background, and if that is the case, that was entirely due to the input signal not being set high enough.There is a switch on the Transmitter, for 0db and -8db.. If you are using a high level signal source such as a home audio stereo, set the switch to -8db and set the volume of your stereo to roughly about 3/4 of its volume range.If you are using a Laptop, Ipad or something like that, set the switch for 0db, as this allows a smaller signal , to be amplified properly.I have tried using these watching movies, as well as listening to music audio, and both sound equally amazing.The bass is not overpowering, but its tight and definitely present.Comfort of the headphones will probably be a personal thing also, as not all heads are created equal, but on my I suppose my regular size head, the comfort is very good,. I wear these headphones around the house all the time now listening to music while I am doing my chores, and I sometimes forget they are on my head.Of course you will never get the rated distance for the sound to travel, but for me, I can walk all upstairs in the house, and get as far as the outside of the back door before the sound drops off.What I like is the fact, there is no loss of audio quality until you do go out of range, and at that point, the sound just stops, and will come back on once you are in range again. There is no in between loss of audio quality up to that point.My only annoyance, which is a common one, is the placement of the switches on the headphones for volume and power and balance..They can be really hard to find when they are on your head, and you try to adjust the volume, but I think over time, it will become easier. That to me is a very small annoyance compared to the overall positive.I find now watching movies, with the ALC (automatic level control) turned on , I hear things, that I have never heard before.. Every little nuance and subtle passage is recognized, which makes for a very enjoyable movie experience.Keep in mind these are open headphones, as compared to closed headphones ( RS170 ) .Open headphones are not as tight around the ears, and will let some sound out, but at the same time, it gives you a more open , airy feel to the audio passages, which is what I like and also makes for a more comfortable fit . Anyone sitting beside you will probably be able to hear what you are listening to , so if that is an issue for you, then the RS170 headphones would be more your liking , as they are a closed set of headphones, being tighter sealed to your ears, keeping the sound more to yourself.But the RS170's don't have the ALC option, which is what I like very much with the RS180's.So if you are on the fence about these, make the plunge, as you wont have any regrets !
p1225
aV*As a disclaimer, I am reviewing within the first week of ownership. I have no judgement on this product's survivability.That being said, I find these headphones to be very high quality and professionally laid-out, but lacking in headband durability. The sound quality of these headphones is incredible. That aspect alone is worth $200. The open-back design leaks every sound to those around you, but the reason for this is to hit the consumer's ears with every possible tone in a clear manner. These headphones do that very well. Crisp, high tones do not damage your ears with their intensity. Bass is subtle, yet strong. They are simply elegant in sound design.The Stand and headphones themselves are very elegant as well. The button layout leaves something to be desired, but panning the audio left and right should really only happen during initial setup, and the volume controls are felt easily enough. Other than that, the stand and headphones feel very durable. Handle them with care, though. The headband seems very brittle, but the innards of the band seem to move independently of the band, so my fear of breaking these is minimal.The range really should not be a problem for anyone wanting to use these as a home entertainment system, or just an audiophile looking to find a nice pair of wireless headphones. I live in a cookie-cutter neighborhood, and these had no problem sending the signal through the walls of my house. I cannot say this will be true for everyone, in every type of house, obviously.These are hands-down the best pair of wireless headphones on the market. Do some research yourself. Try to figure out what is important to you in a headphone, and then come back and take a look at the 180's. The $200 price tag is well worth it for what you get out of the product.
p1226
aVIn this case, "you get what you pay for," seems to be an apt description of these Sennheiser wireless headphones.  In my opinion, the price tag is no small sum.  These headphones match in quality the price of the headphones.  I would add that the quality of the headphones match the price, no more or no less.  My prior experience with Sennheiser headphones has lead me to almost expect far more quality than even the price paid for said headphones.  Over two years ago, I owned the RS120 headphones from Sennheiser.  For the price I paid for those headphones, I believed that the quality far outpaced the price.  I know that hiss was an issue for many with the 120s, but I had a hard time detecting the dreaded hiss.  I found those headphones to be clear and extremely crisp.  Unfortunately, those headphones have never been found since I moved about two years ago.  After months of no success finding my much regarded Sennheiser RS120s, I decided to go ahead and purchase new headphones.  Sennheiser was the obvious choice for me since I was so impressed with my last set of Sennheisers.  The RS180s appealed to me as the obvious next step.  While the price was higher, I was definitely interested in the improved wireless technology.  For comparisons sake, it should be noted that my setup and environment are entirely different than the environment in which the 120s performed.  The 180s are connected to an Onkyo 808 receiver compared to the Onkyo 805 for the 120s.  Plus, I live in town with plenty of interference in the environment to be considered compared to a remote country setting for the 120s where there was little to no interference.  With those conditions set for reference, I must admit that I was not as impressed with the sound for the money with the 180s compared to the 120s.  Not that the 180s are of less quality or poor performance, I was just hoping for something to blow me away since the price was double.  Unless the setup and environment accounts for the difference, it is my impression that I got more bang for the buck with the 120s.  With the 180s, it seems that I obtained the quality for which I paid.  Again, no more or no less.It does seem to me that these RS180s have a more full ranged sound quality.  While the sound can be sharp and crisp with the appropriate content, the 180s seem to have a more well rounded and full bodied sound with both lows and highs.  It should be noted that I almost exclusively use the headphones for late at night HDTV and Blu-ray movie viewing.  As is so obviously mentioned with these types of headphones, they are excellent for superior sound quality when one does not want to wake up the wife and kids late at night while watching movies or catching up on shows on the DVR.  As for the wireless technology, I do not detect any interference or hiss with these RS180s.  Granted, I really could not detect much if any hiss in the 120s.  If I did at all, I thought I might have heard a little come through on the 120s with some high range content that tended to sound a little like that old high treble sound.  With these RS180s, that is not an issue at all.Regarding sound quality, I have no complaints at all.  I do find the RS180s to be an aesthetically pleasing set of home audio technology.  I have no problem setting this product on top of my audio stand in my living room.  Also, these headphones have plenty of range from the base.  I'm able to move around the house without any interference or degradation in audio quality.  If I were to have to mention any complaints with the headphones and base station, it would be along the lines of ease of use with the couple of buttons on the front of the base.  While the buttons are easily accessible and function properly, I find that after six months I still have to check the manual regarding the settings, pairing, and the meaning of the number of blinking lights in the time continuum.  As I mentioned, everything works fine.  I just don't find the set as user-friendly as I would like.  On the other hand, the buttons on the headphones work fine regarding to proper touch and pressure.  I also like the volume control buttons on the headphones themselves.  They are simple and easy to operate without any problems.All in all, I think the Sennheiser RS 180 headphone set is of an extreme high quality.  I would recommend these wireless headphones to my friends and family.  I would add that with the RS 180, that quality does not come cheaply for the typical homeowner with an average AV system.  While the quality of these headphones seem to match the price, I would add that the quality does not sound like it exceeds the price either.  In closing, I continue to be impressed with Sennheiser.
p1227
aVOverall, I've been really happy with this purchase.First, it was really easy to set up the headphone system. I'm only moderately technically inclined, but it only took me perhaps five minutes to set everything up.Second, although I'm not an audiophile, I've been very impressed with the quality of the sound on these headphones; I particularly like the audio-leveling feature. That said, contrary to how these headphones are described on Amazon, these headphones DON'T have "dynamic surround sound."  I wish they did and I wonder why they don't, as the lower-level Model RS 170 headphones have surround sound.Third, I've generally been satisfied with the range of these headphones. I live in a 2 story, 2900 square-foot house, and I typically get reception just about anywhere in the house. I do periodically get a brief "hiccup" in the sound when I'm in the remote areas of the house, when I'm outside grilling on the patio, and when I walk into the garage. None of those distances exceed 150 feet, so I do question whether these headphones truly have a 320-foot line-of-sight range range that Sennheiser advertises. But, again, the range is generally fine for my purposes.Fourth, the headphones are really comfortable, and in my opinion, the headphones and base look handsome and cool.  However, the headphones and base don't seem to be constructed with particularly high-quality materials. The plastic feels light and thin -- which could be a positive, but makes me wonder whether they could break easily. (Mind you, they HAVEN'T broken, but I don't have high confidence that they could withstand much punishment.)Fifth, the volume and balance controls on the headphones are a bit cumbersome to operate. The volume and balance are controlled by small, low-profile buttons on the outside of the right ear cup. For me, it's been tough to find and operate those buttons by feel. So, to adjust the volume or balance, I've typically needed to remove the headphones to find and work the buttons. That can become a bit annoying after a while.
p1228
aVWe replaced a cheaper item with the Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System.  The cheaper one was half the price, but it was junk.  Don't buy a unit that uses infrared, which is directional, for the signal.  The Sennheiser is well built, sound quality is impressive, and it's appearance is elegant.  The only things I would change are the buttons on the earphones for power, volume and balance, maybe the way the unit is charged, and the way it turns on and off.The controls (volume up, volume down, and balance) are small and right next to one another, and I can't imagine trying to use them with the phones on.  It's very easy to hit the wrong button.  Maybe a knob on each ear pad would be better.  You could memorize which way to turn the knob.You can turn the unit off by holding down (not just pressing, because the buttons are made to do double duty) a button for a second on either the charger stand or the earphones, but it takes two pushes to turn it on (one for the charging stand, which contains the wireless transmitter, and one for the phones).  With a bit more smarts, the headphones could be made to standby in a low power mode, then ramp up when it detected a signal from the transmitter.  Maybe that's too much to ask for the price.For our installation, at least, it was an annoyance to have the charger integrated with the transmitter.  The transmitter has to be physically tied to the TV sound source with a cable, which limits your choices for where to plug in the charging station.  On the other hand, if the earphone charging station and transmitter were separated, I guess they might both need AC power, which would increase the cost of the unit.There is also a split-second delay between the time you hear something on the TV speakers, and the time you hear the same thing on the headphones.  Many people would not notice, and you can turn off the TV speakers if there is no one trying to listen without headphones.These were all minor annoyances, and overall we are glad to have the unit.  I advised my mom, who is 87, to ignore the volume controls on the headphones and just use the TV remote to adjust volume.  And the balance control really only has to be set once.
p1229
aVI have owned many wireless headphones. I am not an electronic geek but have all the geek equipment. In the final analysis the most important thing is how do they sound to you, comfort, and ability to deliver what you want.  These have clearly been the best wireless phones I have ever owned. I had been using the Seinnheiser RS-160. My complaint about them was they were heavy and not very comfortable. More importantly the controls on the earphones are elevated. If you are in bed watching TV or doing something else you can very easily change the volume by rolling over on the side of the phone where the controls are located. I seemed to do this several times each time I used them.The new phones are light and extremely comfortable. They sync with the transmitter quickly and you have a light on both the earphones and transmitter that lets you know they are synced. The ear phones have recessed controls for volume,balance,sync,etc. They are small so you may need to take them off to make adjustments until you use them for a while. The transmitter can be placed behind doors or anywhere and they will still perform. The phones automatically charge on the transmitter. I really do not know how you would make a better earphone set than these but since there are some that cost $500 I guess you can. These have been great and I have had them for about 7 months. I have no idea how long the batteries will last and I have used them for up to 4 hours continuously with no loss of sound. They are not inexpensive but quality is not cheap. Like most things some people will not like these and some will think they are the greatest thing since sliced bread. Good luck. Of course with Amazon you can always send them back. Does not get better than that.
p1230
aVAnother great product from Sennheiser.  The sound is excellant and as someone said in another post when using these headphones this is the first time I hear all of the words in a movie or TV show.  The sound is crystal clear and presents a surround sound type of image.  Price is high but then again high quality head phone that are not wireless aren't a whole lot less expensive.I agree with the majority of reviewers that the buttons on the headphones are not easily accessed (especially the volume controls).  However, having said that in reality once I set the volume I haven't thouched it since so it becomes a moot point.  IF I want the volume changed I use my remove to increase/decrease the volume on the source which solves the problem.Wireless range was satisfactory.  This spec is highly dependant on your individual room/house makeup.  Specs like these are always made in open areas so as to standardize this measurement.  I'm able to go to several different rooms and not lose the signal.Depending on your environment you will either like or dislike the "Open-Aire" noise suppression or lack thereof.  In my case I don't have external noise sources as that would be a real problem as you can hear quite a bit of outside noise/sound when using these headphones.  Open-Aire is good in that when someone comes into the room and asks you a question you can easily hear the question without taking off the headphones.  However, if a constant noise/sound source were present this would be a problem.Headphone fatigue is always a problem when wearing headphones for extended periods of time (like a full length movie).  The Sennheiser phones are the most comfortable that I have worn to date.  I can easily watch a full length movie without the typical ear pain that most headphones give you.  Also they are light enough that there are no other pressure points that become a problem after a certain length of time.Setting up the system was a snap and basically a plug and play process.  For me this has solved the problem of wanting higher volumes when I watch TV, movies, etc. whereas my wife likes the opposite.  Now we are both happy.  The real negative of this system though is now I rarely use my big surround system that I spent so much money on so it sits there gathering dust:):)
p1231
aVWoks well.  I had a new neighbor move in and his wife was overly sensitive to noise.  First time in my life someone called the police on me for watching a movie on my PC at 7pm at night.  So I purchased these and all is silent for my neighbor with super hearing.
p1232
aVI have been using the Sony RF-985R wireless headphones up till I picked up these Rs-180.  I found the two are totally the opposite in many ways. The Sony are the most comfortable for wearing for extended periods while the 180's are not so comfortable after wearing for even an hour or two.I found the diameter to be too narrow around the ears and they place too much pressure on the side of the head. While the Sony's are  many times more comfortable with their large foam ear pads and head band.  The Sony's provided a rather dull sound field while the 180's are much better.. ..almost outstanding.  The Sony's have a reasonably easy to use volume & on off switch while the 180's are so poorly designed ergonomically -- that you have to remove them from your head to adjust them to either turn on or off or adj the volume.  So neither set warrants a high rating.  Like some of the others posts, one fix for the 180 is to glue on some sort of raised button so you can find the vol up and down ..  I detest having to remove the 180's from the head to simply raise or lower the vol.  The only reason I dont give them one star is they do provide excellent audio response.  Personally,  I think they should re-design the 180 ergonomically ASAP.  Then they might get five stars.. Something else better on the 180's is the range is over twice as far as the Sony's.  So neither one is the perfect wireless headset.  I plan to try gluing on some sort of reference nib on the vol controls to fix it but a user shouldn't have to modify such a product.  So thats why I give them 3 stars. one neg for the uncomfortable head band ear pads and another neg for the poor vol controls.
p1233
aVI needed to replace cheaper headphones that had literally fallen apart.  I purchased the Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone after carefully reviewing their specifications and customer reviews.  I use my headphones for TV viewing. The sturdiest set I found had metal head bands but were bluetooth which I couldn't use.  These have plastic bands (I don't think there is a metal ribbon inside) but appear sufficient if used with care. However, I did notice the set with metal bands were a bit heavy and could become uncomfortable after a while.  The RS 180 is very comfortable due to the light weight, soft velour ear pads, the over the ear design and padding on the head band.  I have some loss of hearing and have a hearing aid (BTE) on one ear. It does not interfere at all with the close fit of the headphones.  The sound is very good.  I turn the TV on, pick up the headphones and press the "ON" button on the stand, press the "ON" button on the headphones and hold them at the stand for a second to sync. I chose these headphones which have the "open" ear design so I could hear other sounds too, i.e. someone addressing you. While being worn the headphones sound adjusting buttons are too smooth to differentiate.  However, it only takes a few seconds to remove the headphones and adjust. Some reviewers have their own cures for this. Since the wireless signal travels through walls, I can hear as I walk through the house. I can turn a second TV on with the same program in another room and listen from the first TV (where the headphones base is connected). I have found these headphones to be enjoyable and hope they stay that way.
p1234
aVSet-up was easy; just follow the directions. I recommend printing out the relevant pages from the .pdf manual. Sound quality is good, however I only use them to watch movies or TV programs. The wireless range extends through multiple walls (YMMV).
p1235
aVLove his headset and it so easy to use.  When my wife sleeps I turn on all the movies she doesn't want me to watch.  Oops I mean all the movies she doesn't watch.  :)Love this headset and would definitely recommend it to another person.
p1236
aVLoud booming music is brought down in volume and voices are brought up. I no longer disturb the household with a loud television. Getting an extra pair of headphones to work simultaneously requires reading some short instructions but is not hard.
p1237
aVThose are just the best, especially for TV viewingWe tried several high end wireless headset for our TV and audio system after our child was bornThe sound is just amazing, even better than our new audio system worth thousand dollars
p1238
aVThe product is fine, exept for the select bottons. They are hard to find, because they are even with the earpiece and one has to search for the right one. Our old headphone were more convenient in that respect. They had rounded bottons.
p1239
aVI have owned these for about a week now, and I have to say, these are by far the most comfortable over-ear headphones I have owned so far. After hours of use, they still barely feel like they are on top of your head, and I do not notice any fatigue at all. I gave them +1 star for comfort. That being said though, I am not impressed.My initial impressions going from a corded set of Sennheiser HD 280 headphones that I've owned going on 8 years now, was that the sound quality was lacking and hollow (especially on the bass end). I attributed this to the headphones being wireless and was willing to overlook the diminished sound quality for the convenience of being able to walk around while wearing these. However, that is not the only issue.These headphones cut in and out on a regular basis, even right next to the base station. I checked for interference and found that my router was actually broadcasting on interfering channels, so I made a quick adjustment. I was disappointed that the base station did not pick up on this and switch over to a higher frequency, but then again, these are headphones and not a router, so moot issue I guess. Now that the interference is gone though, and they have no excuse to drop signal right? Wrong. If anything it's worse. They drop off within seconds of going on your head, then fail to reconnect. For the price these cans go for, needless to say I am highly disappointed with how they behave. I may be returning these.
p1240
aVI liked the headphones. One thing that I did not like and had to return them is that they have a small latency delay when transmitting to the headphones. I could not record myslef with my yeti microphone due to this problem.
p1241
aVI was in broadcasting for over 40 years and I was used to professional grade ear phones.These sound as good as, in studio ears.Range is good in the house (1500 squard feet) and most of the back yard.
p1242
aVGreat sound if you want it for surround sound or stereo system.  But if you want to use it basically for TV its not the best--the background music is so amplified its annoying and hard to focus on the spoken audio.
p1243
aVFirst pair received had a fault with the right channel balance button - had to press extremely hard to get it to work. Also, the included stereo mini to RCA cord didn't work for the left channel.Second pair has given me no problem so far and has been impressive in all the ways that matter most. Both pairs sounded terrific to me. I did notice that when watching movies online that have a lot of quiet time, the automatic level control can cause distracting 'dead-spaces' in the sound - going from a very quite hiss to totally quiet repeatedly. Not really a big deal as you can turn the auto level off. The issue with delay mentioned by other reviewers has only been an issue for me when I use them for playing guitar through a guitar workstation (big multi pedal) which makes perfect sense.I bought these headphones because I recently moved into an apartment, I love music, and the soundtrack of a movie is just as important as the visuals to me. They will never replace my surround-sound for movies, but they sound great - and for music they outshine my surround-sound speakers easily. These are the forth pair of wireless headphones I have owned through the years and I can say in this case "you get what you pay for". They are very comfortable, sound terrific, and I wish I had been willing to pony-up the money for them long ago.
p1244
aVI took my time listening to these headphones under many conditions before choosing to write a review. I think I've done my duty on that now and I am ready to say my part. To begin with, I will state that this review is based on connecting these headphones to the headphone jack of a Denon AVR-2311CI.IF you are buying these headphones for musical interests alone, you may be pretty satisfied - for the most part. The dynamic range is quite acceptable - bass, mid, and treble are fairly represented. I experienced some wireless drop-out 15ft on the other side of an exterior wall and 35ft through one interior wall, but all-in-all, I was satisfied. Note that there are no other RF signals (the signal this unit uses) generated within my home that I am aware of that might cause such a conflict that would affect the range.The greatest disappointment came with signals that varied rapidly from low to high in all dynamic ways - satellite audio, and in particular live events therein. There were pops, crackles, and rattles every time I turned around. Apparently, a dynamic volume adjustment algorithm then triggers a volume decrease in an attempt to address this. This would seem to me to be an attempt at signal processing within this unit that fails in some unexpected circumstances and creates a rather nasty experience. Pop, crack, volume down - volume rises in a bit until the next crackle, then down again. It's like it's choking on the signal.The only way I could mitigate this behavior was to turn the receiver's volume below -23DB. This may also work for some, but be aware that there will be a loss of quality regardless as the circuitry in the unit is always trying to compensate and you will start to detect a sort of hiss in place of the pops and crackles as the unit continues to try and boost the volume. Since these headphones are open, the volume isn't high enough at this level to blot out external noises. If only the RS-180 could be ignorant and let you manually adjust the settings to your own satisfaction. In short, it needs a purely "manual" mode.If you expect to be fairly close to the base and are listening to audio sources that are consistent in their dynamic ranges, such as CD or DVD, you might be golden. If you are outside of the ranges in distance I noted, you may experience occasional drop-out; if you are listening to sources that may change their dynamic ranges or volume levels rapidly, such as satellite/cable sources, adjustments made to the audio signals by the circuitry of this product might create "artifacts" that will disappoint you in the least - or maybe render the product unacceptable to you.All this would have yielded 3 (really, 2.5) stars.But wait - there's more. I don't like the fact that when this unit connects the base to the headset that it fails to extinguish the LED on the base - it flashes relentlessly. I also dislike the fact that when you finally find the obtusely positioned on/off button on the headset to turn it off that the base then continues to flash furiously. Is this a by-product of supporting multi-headsets? Surely they could have done something else. Turn out the lights.And may the force help you if, for "sanitary" purposes (reading your product manual), you need to replace these earpad covers - they are quite specialized in construction, as they snap and twist on. Expect to pay at the least $50, likely more - if you can find them. I did find a UK source, none in the USA at this time. If your ears get sweaty, your time will come.These additional issues take this unit down to 2 stars... would have given 1 1/2, but that is not available. Premium price, not premium design or performance for general usage. The RS-180 may suit audiophiles that are happy with the range limitations. Mileage may vary for other users working with varied audio sources and applications.UPDATE: The ALC is not active and never has been. Not sure why most who would spend the $$$ on this model would need it.
p1245
aVThis is an odd product to review for me, because the product absolutely excels in their area of sound delivery over a wireless connection.  In fact, it is so much better than anything else I've ever tried, it's almost not in the same ball park, but the headphone design is relatively poor compared to the cheaper competition.  (otherwise 5 stars no question.)The great:Sound quality is better than anything else I've heard in a wireless setup.The battery lasts for many, many hours before the headphones need to be recharged (of course YMMV) but I can leave them off the charging station for weeks on end without them running out of power, where other brands would need to charge at least once a week under similar viewing conditions.The headphones are comfortable, breathe well, and provide excellent sound from low, mid to high.It's really nice to not need to be in line of sight of the transmitter and still hear what's being said.  Depending on the show, I might pop into the kitchen to make something, swing downstairs, walk outside to get the mail, and the sound continues no problem.  I've gone at least 100 yards away from the base and haven't lost audio quality.It's pretty easy to set up dual headphones on the same transmitter, which is nice if you and your spouse want to watch a loud/scary movie and the kids are in bed.The bad:For expensive headphones, they have some of the stupidest design choices I can imagine.1.  The volume buttons are tiny, and physically adjacent (on opposite sides) to the power button.  Try to turn it up by pressing the "+" button, and if you're off my a millimeter they turn off instead.  It's not easy to see anything on these buttons, so to adjust the sound you basically need to take them off of your head.2.  While the transmitter will turn off after about 10 minutes if no headphones are on, if the headphones and transmitter are both left on, and the TV etc. are turned off, both devices will stay on forever.  Headphones are not smart enough to turn off on their own.  Most wireless headphones I've owned know to power off after X minutes of no sound input.3.  When the unit is running low on power, the green light on the side of the unit will flash faster, rather than some sort of audible warning.  It would be nice if the low power warning were something you could hear, rather than something you can't really see when they're going to run out of power.I had some really cheap wireless headphones in the past, which used a dial for volume/power (rotate the dial to turn the volume up, all the way down and *click* and they're off, easy to use while you're wearing them) and auto powered off, they were a quarter of the price, and yet so much better in that one area.So for me, 4 stars due to the stupid button setups, but if you care about sound, then 5 stars and you will be floored with the audio they deliver.After over 6 months of usage I still love them, and am very happy I bought them, even with the negatives to the product listed above.
p1246
aV6 months later - updateJust wanted to leave a quick update now that I have owned these for 6 months. I would guess I spend at least half my waking hours wearing these and simply put, they are perfect. They are so light and comfortable that you never get sore ears and quickly forget you even have them on. The sound quality is fantastic and with a little equalizer tweaking on your mp3 or movie software you can really get these sounding just the way you want. One reason I love these, which may affect you, is that they are *not* sound blocking. I need to be able to hear surrounding noise (children) or phones ringing. If you want to block sounds then these are not for you.The wear on these has been great. After about 3 months they definitely adjusted. At first I was afraid that they were losing their structural integrity but this has not been the case. They are as sturdy as ever and seem to have just gone through a breaking in period where they are less stiff and feel even more comfortable to wear. The cordless comfort and freedom is just a bonus. There is zero sound quality loss from the cordless style.About the only complaint I would have, which is user error, is charging. If you wear them all day and then charge them all night you will have a perfect schedule. However these seem to charge in almost real time. Meaning if you wear them all day they literally take all night to charge. Because of this, if you forget a charge they can go dead the next day with no real warning and you can't just pop them on the charger for a quick refill to get you by.I have owned many high end headphones and now own several Sennheiser headphones for travel and home and these are simply as good as it gets. I would never wear anything else unless I were traveling.-------------------Takes some pretty fancy technology to really impress me these days, and but these headphones are nothing but perfection. I have used high end corded headphones for a long time, and have always preferred Sennheiser. After shopping around for a new pair I finally decided to give the wireless a try. I really did not want to waste a bunch of money for a lesser model so I went all in with the RS 180's and I am truely amazed. Not only do they sound better than my old HD595 pair, the wireless mode is truely the next step in multimedia enjoyment. With a fairly simple set up between my iTunes, Apple TV and an iPod remote I can put the headset on and have perfect high end sound quality at my computer for gaming, then walk away with music playing and then go lounge in bed and watch a streaming movie.Provided you remember to charge them every night, you will never run out of battery life. They are extremely comfortable. More so than my previous HD595. The fit is snug on an average size head, and with the over-the-ear style of these, they have no pressure at all on your ears. They are very well cushioned on your head and the material is very high quality and soft, but durable - it also seems quite resistant to debris and can be easily wiped if neccessary though I have not found them to attract much dust at all.They look great. They are a sleek charcoal/black and the charging cradle looks very cool and saves a little bit of desk space instead of having to lay down a giant pair of headphones like I used to. So far I have gone a few rooms nearby. I can't say the true distance as don't have a need to go that far with them, but within a room or two away I have noticed zero quality loss and zero distortion or buzzing or anything of the sort. They are just crystal clear all the time.I have watched action movies, played the latest CoD Black Ops and many other games and listen to a wide variety of music and have really found no weak spot as far as sound depth. They exceed any wired headphones I have used for any of the same activities.If I had one tiny complaint, and this may be true for all wireless headsets of which this is my first - when you are ready to put on the headset and you take it off the cradle to place on your head, you need to click a little button on the cradle and then a button the headset to "find it" and sync them together. Now this takes all of 2 seconds to do but it is an extra step I find just a tad annoying. Generally this just makes me not return them to the cradle until I am done using them for the day and I still usually just set them down on the top of my desk so as not to lose the connection and have to redo it if I place them on the cradle for more than a few minutes. But again, this is a tiny thing and in no way is a criticism of the actual performance of these great phones.
p1247
aVI got these for my pops to replace his HD555 wired cans that i got him a year earlier, both to watch TV at night.  even before that years ago i got him some Recoton 900 mhz wireless ones but they were hurting his ears.  he liked HD555 for comfort and excellent speech intelligibility but obviously wasn't thrilled about the fact that they were wired.well this headphone solves the problem.  it has all the comfort and sound quality that you would expect from sennheiser and it comes in a wireless package that has a decent range and for the most part doesn't drop the signal, doesn't interfere with wifi or microwave and otherwise just plain works.  the charging stand / base is excellent as well.my father's only gripe with this unit is the volume buttons on the headphone are hard to use in the sense that you can't see them while the headphone is on your head and they are difficult to locate by touch alone.  all the buttons are more or less same shape and next to each other which is obviously a bad design - they should be spaced out and shaped differently to be more usable.but that is a minor gripe, not enough to take off a star of otherwise excellent product.i am a serious audiophile and a speaker builder and while i would never use wireless headphones for music myself i have tested their sound quality with music and it is quite good.  they have more bass and warmer sound than many sennheiser open back cans, but of course nowhere close to my IE8 sennheisers.  rock music sounds very good on these headphones - very balanced.  for electronic music you would probably want something more bass heavy like IE8 which admittedly are not wireless.build quality is simply top notch both on the headphone itself and the base.  while it is all plastic the quality is excellent.  it feels much more solid than you would expect from its light weight.even with the high price i have absolutely no reservations about recommending these for watching TV at night.  they deliver.
p1248
aVSo I have an awesome sound system (Klipsch F-20 front Left and Right, C-20 Center and B-20 as surrounds), but unfortunately I live in an apartment with, what I eventually discovered to be, very thin walls. So after finding out that my sound system was shaking the walls of my neighbor (and I swear it wasn't turned up that loud!) I decided that I needed to find a solution to the problem that would still allow me to enjoy my movies/games/tv but not make all my neighbors hate me.After some searching and looking at reviews I settled on the Sennheiser RS 180 headphone system. I'm not gonna lie, I was a little let down. The headphones are really good, don't get me wrong... but they're not a good surround sound system. Quite frankly, I don't think a set of headphones will ever really be able to compete with big speakers.As far as the headphones themselves, I can't really hear any humming or anything when something isn't being played. I haven't yet went out of range of the base-station and it does sound really good. The headphones are really breathable and I don't get sweaty listening to things with them, but they are pretty sizable headphones which won't win you any fashion contests. The bass seems kinda weak on them but I'm still tweaking the settings on my A/V receiver and hopefully that'll help.
p1249
aVOverall I love these.  I replaced really old headphones (8-10 years old) which didn't reach past my t.v. room (about 14 feet).  These ones work upstairs on the other side of the house.  I bought this set and a separate pair of HDR 170 headphones without the charger/base.  It's nice to be able to have multiple pairs and not have to pay the extra $90 or so for multiple bases.  Another great thing about the 180 is that you can adjust the volume level to make one side louder than the other.  I have some hearing loss in my left ear, so being able to make that side louder is awesome.  I've only had them for about a month, but so far they work really well.Down sides:  they feel a bit flimsy, are really big, and sometimes the sound cuts out for a second or two.  Where the headphones ear pieces connect to the extendable piece, I sometimes feel like if I'm not careful they'll break.  However this could just be because the ear pieces pivot slightly, making for a better fit.  Size: I'm a short woman, and these look silly on my head.  But since no one but my kids sees me in them, not a big deal.  Sound cuts out: it happens frequently as I get further away from the base ((20 - 40 feet).  I'm not positive, but it seems like if I first turn on the base and then turn on the headphones, it doesn't happen as often.
p1250
aVI did a lot of research before I decided to order this brand and model of wireless headphones .  I wanted them for tv watching so as not to disturb family members that go to bed at an early time.  The headset came in about three days.  I was happy with delivery time.  The outside shipping box was in perfect condition.  However the product box inside was severely damaged leaving me to believe that these headsets were a returned product from someone that had torn open the headsets, tried them then decided to return them.  I was not comfortable even opening them.  Called Amazon with my concern.  The person I talked to was very simpithetic and immediately said they would send a replacement.  The replacement arrived the next day.  Even though the outside box had some damage, the product box was perfect.  I opened the box and was very pleased with the product and simple instructions provided.  Easy to put batteries in.  Look and feel of headset is awesome.  Extremely comfortable even for long periods of time.  Outstanding sound quality.  I can walk through the house and can still hear tv without problem.  Never once does the headset lose signal nor is there any fading or hissing which I was afraid of.  IF YOU BUY THIS I DOUBT YOU'LL BE DISSAPOINTED!  Definitely a must buy product!
p1251
aVAs a gamer, having the ability when needed to just get up for a quick something or change positions of sit further back from the TV its important not have to remove or put stuff back on or have the hassle of getting a cord stuck somewhere or get tangled. These have given the freedom to get up for those short needed stops while still maintaining the ability to still hear what's going on in the game while I'm in another room. These headphones are not only comfortable, but work perfect in all corners of a 1500SQFT apartment. So far I have not had ant problems with all the wireless electronics in the house, keyboards, mice, internet, game controllers, and other wireless headphones from other companies. With all the wireless mumbo-jumbo going on in the apartment I have not had any problem with them or any other electronic device in terms of interference. The only con, and it has been stated in the other reviews as well is the buttons, all are flush with the set and are close together. And like the other reviews is easily rectified by drops of some epoxy or glue of some sort. I fixed mine with small black sticker bumps. As for the battery, I'm a 12 on 12 off kind of person so the set has time to charge so I have no problems, but If I did, 2 AAA batteries is all you need.
p1252
aVActually works very well.  Headphones are comfortable even for extended periods of time.  Audio response good.  Charger works great.  Not sure range is quite as good as implied, but it is ok.
p1253
aVPros:I don't agree with the negative comments from others regarding quality. I think it's a quality unit and the audio is excellent. There is no issue here with sound leakage to others nearby. It does not however, block out room noises, which is great with me. I found no issues with syncing the base with the headset. It was simple, easy and fast. I liked how light and airy the headset felt on my head and ears. I liked the ability to use multiple headsets which was a major consideration in the purchase.Cons:The main issue is the poor range. I couldn't go into the next room without connection failures - intolerable. I agree with the other comments about the buttons. It's a complete disaster. You can't feel where the buttons are. If only they'd raised them a little or even just raised the power button which separates the > and < volume buttons. What the heck were they thinking? The same source input into the earphone jack will not work at all through the RCA jacks. I never got the RCA jacks to work. Maybe they're only for receiver speaker outs.  No charger supplied with secondary headphones is another failure.I'd be glad to know of other similar phones not having these negatives.
p1254
aVI love these headphones.  I have been a fan of Sennheiser for years and have pitied people who shell out as much as $ 400 for Beats.  Germans are obsessive, which is why they are such incredible engineers and they did everything right with these. They are lightweight, I have never run out of battery life (of course, I put them back on the stand when I am done with them) and are probably the most comfortable headphones I have ever owned, but the biggest reason I love them is the SOUND.  What I am looking for in a pair of headphones is faithful reproduction of sound, not artificial booming bass, but balanced sound through the range.  The trebles are crisp and clear, the mids and bass are both precise. When I first received them, I listened to a range of music (including the two "standards" I use to sample speakers and headphones, "Abbey Road" by the Beatles, "Aja" by Steely Dan and "Beethoven's 9th Symphony" conducted by Herbert van Karajan and the Berlin Symphony Orchestra on Deutsche Grammaphon.  All were impeccable.  I have also been using them to listen to Blu-ray discs and they are fantastic for that.  I have a 5.1 surround sound system, which I love, but there are times when I want to watch a movie and not disturb others.  When I was shopping, I seriously considered getting the RS 160s, which have a surround sound mode, but I have no complaints about these.  I can walk around the house with them, I listen to music when I cook. I am very glad that I bought them and would highly recommend them to anyone.
p1255
aVI purchased these headphones and absolutely love them.  I use them nearly 7 hours a day, 5 days a week.  Coming from several various analog sets through the years there is no comparison.  With the old analog ones I would get crossover and interference, but I have never experienced anything of the sort with these.  Also I found the bass to be great in comparison with my old headphones.  You must be aware that the headphones are an open design so there is a possibility that others can hear what you are listening to if you are really jamming.  But that also helps them stay somewhat cooler than other headphones I have used.  It also allows me to better hear when someone walks into my office.  The velvet covers feel great even when wearing them for extended periods of time.The only downside I found to these headphones is the price.  I feel the price point is rather high and it was hard for me to convince myself the end justified the means.  I debated for a month or more until I finally pulled the trigger.  I am not saying they are not worth it once you get them, but I understand the dilemma.  I definitely am glad I took the chance and made the purchase.
p1256
aVDoes not work as expected with our LG TV.  Cannot listen to TV audio and wireless headphones at the same time.  It works great for one person to watch TV and no sound in the room.
p1257
aVI'm almost deaf and the volume bar on the T.V. is set on 100. With these Sennheisers on my family can sleep and I can hear. Great audio quality, especially for an almost deaf guy.
p1258
aVI bought this pair of headphones after my old pair (also Sennheisers) were getting old and I got tired of the wires. This pair was on sale at Amazon, so I picked it up. It's pretty simple to use and setup. The instructions/unit are relatively clear and laid out.The sound quality is good and there is no noticeable latency. While I am a gamer and do listen to music, I'm not an audiophile, so your mileage may vary, depending on how stringent your requirements are.Two serious defects in this product are its lack of QC and range. As many others here have noted, my first pair have had a buzzing/static sound (right ear). On the replacement unit, this problem has disappeared, so you should only buy this if you are willing to go through Amazon's (quick and easy) return/replacement system.The second problem is the range. This product will NOT go through more than one or two very thin doors/walls, and will most likely NOT get the promised/advertised range unless you are in a clear open field, so if this is important to you (you like to roam around in a large house, etc.), then this product is NOT for you.
p1259
aVI don't think I have written more than 3 Amazon reviews despite using Amazon since inception and being from Seattle. Having lived in Asia for the past 20 years I know about the misconception of stuff, especially electronics, being cheaper here. I spent $600 on these headphones.  My brand-new Denon stereo receiver jack crapped out a year after buying these headphones. I have since hooked them up to my iMac and now listen to music rather than movies. I loved them as movie headphones as I watched cinematic productions from a 70" screen while the family was sleeping rooms away. Now, I am walking 100 feet away past steel structures and microwaves to get coffee across the house listening to stereo music. If you can hear any sort of imperfections it is from your music source or other frequency conflicts (wifi bluetooth screens transmitters etc).  The only concerns I have now is how much radiation I am receiving from my new earmuffs? Powerful!! I look for this brand again!They are nothing short of fantastic.  If you're an audiophile and want more than nice constant stereo in your ears (you'll have to test it with your
p1260
aVAside from the mystery of why Sennheiser's 'Quick Start' guide is basically a CD and an 8 panel cartoon, this was actually super easy to set up.  (Cartoon, FTW! But if you don't feel like loading a CD, here's a link to their manual: [...]I used the RCA cable provided to plug this into the back of our cable box, the audio in to the transmitter, and after some robust battery charging action, I was good to go.  (I could have plugged the audio/headphone end into our t.v. - there are options depending on what your audio source is.  TL;DR - YMMV.)Fantastic sound (no surprise coming from Sennheiser), surprisingly good range and very comfy ear cups.  Downsides have been written about in other reviews, and I agree:  the control buttons are impossible to differentiate by touch and these things are spendy.  I may try to fix the button issue by sticking adhesive dots (in tech-approved black, natch) on the Volume UP and DOWN buttons but aside from the annoyance of having to take your headphones off to do anything like turn up the volume, I'd highly recommend these.
p1261
aVLove em.  Can watch TV and movies full blast while the rest of family sleeps.  Can even walk anywhere in the house and outback and never miss any of the audio action.
p1262
aVThe Sennheiser RS 180 Headsets are one of the best pair of headphones ever owned.Pros:1.  Comfort.  I usually do not purchase over the ear type headphones, however after reading previous reviews I would now say it is possible to not give up sound quality over comfort.  The padding around the ears and the head band make the headphones very comfortable.2.  Sound Quality.  The sound qualities of the headphones are outstanding.  I would even say that in some instances the quality is better than what I hear normally through my speakers.  I was a little concerned about purchasing wireless headphones and the effect it would have on the quality, I would say it is not a concern any more.  I have not heard any interference or distortion due to it being wireless.3.  Range.  I was not too concerned about the range of the headphones since I knew I would be relatively close to the source; however I was really surprised to see the range of the headphones extend throughout most of the house.  The range of the headphones really exceeded my expectations.Cons:None.
p1263
aVI am pleasantly surprised by the sound put out by these wireless cans. I have the RS140 but this takes it up another level. The RS180s are lighter than the RS140s and wearing them for a few hours was very comfortable, sometimes you even forget you are wearing them. The only niggle is your ears do get a little warm after wearing, as compared to the RS140.I compared the performance of the RS170 and RS180 before getting these, and I would recommend you pay a little more for the better sound. If you use the RS170 with bass boost, you get more bass then the RS180. But if you use without bass boost, the sound is really lacking bass and sounds flat compared to the RS180. The RS180 has a bigger soundstage, probably helped by the open air design. I am a long time Sennheiser user and from experience I am not a big fan of leatherette earcups, I find they disintegrate after 1-2 years and get flaky. Go for the velour cushions. I had my RS140 for 4.5 years and I use they almost daily, and to-date the velour cushions are still holding up.
p1264
aVI have had the HDR-140 set for several years with excellent results.  The headband finally broke.  When I went to buy another set of the headphones I found that they were no longer made.After looking at all the options I purchased the RS 180 and am very disappointed in it.The sound is OK, but not as good as the 140.  The ear pieces are smaller than the 140 and tend to make your ears sore after awhile.You have to go to the transmitter to turn the set on.The controls on the headset are so small you can not feel which button you are pushing so you have to take the headset off to raise or lower the volume.The third time I used them there was sound only out of the right side.  After reading the quick setup, then downloading the manual from the disk supplied and fiddling with them all evening I still could not get sound from the left side.  The next evening, and subsequently they worked OK.  Don't know why.I would certainly not buy them again.  The only reason for three stars is that the sound IS decent.
p1265
aVI looked long and hard for the best wireless headphones for my home theater.  I bought & returned 2 other different brands but none compared to these. ( I hate being an audiophile sometimes)  After reading tons of reviews and speaking with the people at Sennheiser, I purchased these RS 180.  Prior to making this purchase, I ordered the RS190s thinking that spending more $ meant a better product.  Boy was I wrong.  Don't get me wrong, the RS 190s are great if you're primary interested in listening to music but if you're looking for home theater quality sound for movies or games, then look no further.  The RS 180 are prefect for that purpose.  4 reasons why:1.  Light weight & super comfortable.  Can't even tell their on2. Virtual surround sound makes you feel like your at the movies.3.  I love my bass, and these pack a punch thanks to the built in bass booster.4.  You never have to worry about dead batteries, they come with rechargeable  batteries & the base where you store your head phones is a recharging station.
p1266
aVI bought these after researching many tech website reviews of headphones for hearing-challenged people.  I wanted headphones that had stereo with clear sound that would help my spouse clearly understand what was being said during difficult-to-hear dialog as well as clearly hearing sports commentators amidst significant background noise.  These are excellent and are recommended for people with hearing difficulties.  Since purchasing them, another friend whose spouse has hearing issues, also purchased these, and they, too, highly recommend them.  They are very comfortable to wear as they have felt along the ear pads and are not heavy.  The sound is outstandingly clear.  Reviewers say the volume controls are not well placed on the headset because when changing the sound (increase/decrease volume), you can accidently turn the headset off; this is true so you need to be careful.  Even so, these are so worth the sound quality, clarity, and comfort, I still HIGHLY RECOMMEND them!!  The AMAZON price is also OUTSTANDING!
p1267
aVThese do have great sound and I can be anywhere in my house and they will still work. The padding around the ears is very soft and comfortable.  You can wear them for hours with no discomfort.  It's also nice still being able to hear what's going on around you. Set up of the unit was also extremely easy.The batteries last a long time and re-charge very quickly.There will be an echo effect if the volume on the TV is also turned up because of the slight delay.As most people have stated the controls are in the worst possible configuration. Absolutely impossible to distinguish one button from another when the headset is being worn. I still rated them as a 4 because I very rarely have to adjust the volume or touch the controls. I also wish the volume would go a little higher as I am hard of hearing and some programs are still a little to low on volume even with the head set turned all the way up.This set is a bit pricey but worth the money.Happy Listening,Ed S.
p1268
aVHave owned various brands of wireless headphones over the years as I wear hearing aids and they are a necessity to watch TV.  I have had 3 different models of Sony wireless headphones all in the $100 to $150 range and they worked fine.  Then a few years ago tried the Sennheiser RS120's and they had better sound and clearer reception than the Sony's and I was very happy with them but they were not as comfortable as the Sony's.Saw this new model RS180 Sennheiser and decided to givr them a try even though they were over twice as expensive as my RS120's.  Have to say the extra cash was more than worth it.  These headphones are so comforatble I can wear them for hours.  They have the open cell ear cups so hearing people taking to you while you have them on is possible.The sound quality is outstanding and the range is very impressive (they will work anywhere in my house).If you want great sounding wireless headphones, don't hesitate to spend the money for this quality product.
p1269
aVThis is my fourth Sennheiser wireless headphone set /I still have RS 120 and two pairs of RS 140/ and I must state that quality of sound is the best ever. Absolutely no hiss, distortion or audio dropouts. Low and high frequencies are right there. I'm using it with Bose 3-2-1 system, which does not provide me with an option of controlling the audio levels from the source, thus I can only use volume control on the headset and sometimes I wish for a bit more volume /compared to RS 140, which seems to be somewhat more powerful/. Also, I have some concerns about durability of the headband / two of my older headsets have cracks and I am really worried that soon they might break in half. Having said all that, I still believe that there is no better wireless system on the market and RS 180 is the king! Strongly recommend it to people who like to enjoy clean, powerful, uninterrupted delivery of sound from their home audio system without disturbing anybody in the household in the middle of the night.
p1270
aVUsed these to replace a set of Sennheiser RS 140 wireless headphones.  Unlike the 140, the 180 are digital -- no static or white noise.  If you are out of range, you get some chopping and then the signal drops off.  I prefer this to the hissing I would get using the analog 140.  The range on these is about twice what I got with the 140s (around 40 feet).  These are RF, so walls and enclosed cabinets pose no problem.The sound is excellent.  The controllers are much better indexed than those on the 140.  The controllers are laid out to make it easy to find the correct knob without having to take the headphones off.  There is also an ALC button on the base that amplifies voices -- useful when you have the volume turned down low.The headphones are light weight and comfortable to wear for extend periods.  They are over the ear and so they don't press down on your ears.  They are however vented so you can still hear load external noises like your wife yelling at you to turn the tv off.
p1271
aVI bought these for my husband who has a hard time distinguishing and understanding dialogue on the television. The Sennheiser headphones isolate the conversation from other sounds so now his favorite shows are enjoyable once again. Not to mention how much I appreciate not having to interpret everything as we go along. Another plus for us both is that he can listen to a program at the sound level best suited for him without blasting my ears off, including when I am ready to sleep and he wants watch another half hour before bed.The reason we rated this product 4 stars and an area of improvement would be to the controls. They are too close together. Volumn on one side and left/right balance on the other side with greater touch recognition would be helpful.We have tried less expensive headphones, but they did not work well for sound quality. These are definitely worth the cost!Check your TV connection options for compatability with these headphones before you buy.
p1272
aVThe sound from these headphones is second to none.  And the nicest thing is that the headphones DO NOT, repeat DO NOT go off and make a horrible white noise sound when the source goes to silence for any length of time (like the RS 120's do).  You can set them down for a long time and when you come back, beautiful SILENCE until you turn the music back on - then it's total immersion in the sound.  It takes a while to learn the push-button volume & balance controls, but after a while you will know where the on/off switch is and other controls.  The ear cups are comfortable and I forget that I'm listening to headphones after a few minutes.  The transmitter can project a pretty good distance through walls and structures, but I wouldn't push it too far.  I find that I can walk out to the curb before the signal starts to break up.  I agonised over the cost of these 'phones, but now that I've used them for some time, I have totally forgotten the price.  They are worth every penny.
p1273
aVThese digital wireless headphones don't have background hiss and white noise, so my years of searching are over! I don't like noise, and these headphones don't add any. It has a good range too. When the sound drops out from being too far away, it sounds like a brief, faint chirp (not a slap to the head). I was surprised it works as well as it does with such a lightweight switchmode 5V power supply. I might eventually replace the stock power supply with hefty shielded linear 5V supply, just to see if it can get even better. The no-modification trick to feeling the volume buttons is to use your ring finger or pinky (more sensitive) to find the gap between Vol- and the Balance button. Vol+ is easier to find. Synchronizing the headphones to the transmitter seemed a bit iffy, but not a problem with some sound playing into the transmitter. I used a separate charger to charge the AAAs faster, before twisting the earmuffs unlocked to put them in the battery compartments.
p1274
aVMy 82 year-old father has been using the RS140 headphones for a few years and liked them. We decided to give him a new RS180 set for Christmas. The sound quality on both is really good, but the new RS 180 set is not as user friendly. To begin with, the controls on the headset are more difficult for him to operate as his hands and fingers are large and he is losing his dexterity. However, the biggest problem is that the new set's transmitter has an auto-off function if the headphones are turned off for five minutes. I believe this is an energy saving feature, but there is no option to disable it or extend the auto-off time. Because my father's mobility is very limited, it is a huge inconvenience for him to have to get up from his chair and make it across the room to turn the transmitter back on. I have provided this feedback to Sennheiser and suggested that they include a disable option and/or options for longer times for the auto-off to trigger.
p1275
aVI am a ham radio operator.  I bought these for use with my ham radio station.  I did not like being wired to the equipment with the last pair of headsets that I owned.These headsets work very very well in a ham radio station.  The only disadvantage is that they can buzz a little when you are transmitting.  I quickly learned to live with this.  The manual says they are not for use around a transmitter.  By the time you read the manual it is too late since you have already purchased the headsets.These headsets are comfortable to wear for hours at a time.I can walk to other close rooms in the house using the headsets and have clear audio reception.  They do NOT work for 300 feet as advertised in a house.  I would say they work for a minimum of 30 feet through walls.I gave these headsets a 4-star rating because they do not work over a 300 foot range and because of the buzz while transmitting.
p1276
aVI had original purchased the Sennheiser RS120 but wasn't thrilled with the lack of bass, volume levels and interference issues. My ears also hurt after a short time due to the foam ear pads. After more research I decided to give the RS180 a try.RS180 = What a difference! No interference issues with my home wireless (operates on 2.4-2.8 GHz auto selecting). Excellent bass response that will actually tickle your ears  - depending on what you are listening to of course.Ample volume control when you need it. When I listen to live concert videos and enable the automatic level control, the speech is much easier to understand. The uncompressed digital really makes a difference.The only negative as mentioned in earlier reviews is the buttons which could be more defined which would make it easier when they are on your head but this isn't a show stopper.Very pleased with the RS180 and well worth the additional cost.
p1277
aVWork really well. Signal is strong and clear even when you walk away. I get a perfect signal from anywhere in my house. I can even go into my yard and hear music. They should get rid of the useless audio out and make that an RCA in. They only have a 1/8" input, which requires you to buy a converter instead of just using good quality interconnects that you already have. My only operational complaint. The sound is pretty good. A little heavy on the bass for me, and I think the "soundstage" is just OK. But you have to lower your expectations with any wireless headphones. If you shop around you can get these at a reasonable price. I think you have to be nuts to spend $350 on these when you can buy them new for $220 as I did on Amazon - and free shipping! At that price they are very good value. It's great to listen to music late an night. A must for apartment dwellers. I don't think you can do better for the money.
p1278
aVExcellent headphones.RS 180 is the open version of RS 170 and thus it doesn't isolate the sound, but in return sounds a little bit better. This quiality makes it a good choice for home use, while RS 170 are better for use in open office. In all other ways 180 and 170 don't seem to differ.As for the signal stength. I keep the base on the 3rd floor. I walked down to the 1st floor, entered the garage and sit in the car. I tried hard to notice any difference in sound quality, but couldn't. The signal stength doesn't seem to be affected by the 3 floors, closed doors and the car between the headphones and the base.The signal doesn't seem to interfere with WiFi: my laptop is connected to the WiFi router on the 2nd floor and so far I haen;t noticed any connectivity problems.They charge in a few minutes (despite the instruction recommends to charge them for 16 minutes).
p1279
aVI pondered whether to give 4 or 5 stars. My dislikes first:  I think that the controls on the headphones are very difficult to use.  They are small, flat with the headphones, and impossible to use when you're wearing the headphones.  So, any adjustment must be made after first taking the headphones off.  That is irritating.  Then there is the requirement to "pair" the headphones to the transmitter each time you use them.  My last headphones were always paired.  Also, the range is definitely not as large as I'd hoped.  I lose audio in certain parts of the house.All those negatives being said, the rich sound of the Sennheiser RS 180 forced me to bump the rating up to 5 stars.  Yup, that good.  No side tone, no static, no distortion.  I have a Sony 7.1 Surround Sound receiver in my TV room.  The sound out of the Sennheiser is comparable to that sound quality.  For my dime, it is superior to it.
p1280
aVLike many others have stated, the sound quality is very, very good.  The earpieces are comfortable.  Unless turned up really loud, there isn't enough sound leakage to bother others in the room.  However, they don't filter out much, if any, ambient noise.The buttons are OK after you become accustomed to using them.  I don't understand what all the fuss is about.My big gripe is that whenever the base is plugged in, whether it's turned off or on, it interferes with my home wireless network, shutting it down to a crawl and frequently halting it completely.  One could even assume that Sennheiser planned for this problem by providing the little wire clip to hold the electrical cable onto the base every time you have to unplug it, so the cable doesn't fall behind your cabinet.  Bravo, Sennheiser.  (Just a little sarcasm there.)  If it wasn't for this stupid problem, these headphones would merit 5 stars.
p1281
aVOutstanding sound I was amazed at how good the sound quality was. They were easy to setup and get functioning. After the charging all I had to do was connect to my CD player and hit the buttons. I had no trouble with the buttons on the headphones. The range was good, I have it setup initially at the far end of my house in the family room which is single story room attached to the house. When I went to my bedroom at the other end of the house on the 2nd story I began to notice skipping, that is the only room where I have had this problem. My only serious question is the durability of the headphones, they are all plastic and not heavy. I have been told by others that the phones are fairly durable time will tell. I would prefer a more rigid firmer and heavier construction. But the sound quality is as good as from phones I have heard that are much more expensive
p1282
aVAs far as these go for sound quality, I have purchased multiple sets of wireless headsets in the past 2 months all with extremely poor sound and horrid interference. Finally I found these searching online but after wasting so much money on other units was skeptical.  But the amazon reviews for sound were straight 5's so i decided to give them a shot.  They are well worth the price.As far as Quality goes it is a little sad they are not quite as adjustable as most units out there and they feel like they are made of cheap plastic and not very durable.  The volume control would serve better as a dial as apposed to buttons since they are located in areas that you cannot see without taking off the headset.  Also instead of a power button it would be nicer if it was more like most units out there where they auto turn on and off when you take them off your head.
p1283
aVWe  got a lemon.  It didn't work.  Their  instructions are ridiculous. The dvd  requires  a program our computer did not have in order to run  & a booklet  which is impossible to understand.  Nothing should be this difficult. Using the pictures  in the booklet, we attempted to hook our system up but nothing worked.  We called our cable co.  out to see if it was a problem with our  tv hook up, that was fine. Our Sennheiser Wireless headphones just didn't work. I spoke to a  Sennheiser  consultant who,  attempted  to walk me through the hook up. ( which was done correctly) he couldn't get it to work either.  He suggested I return it and they would repair and return them to us.  We declined  because  we paid for a "new in the box" item and didn't want a refurbished item. We were anxious to use our Sennheiser headphones and were  very  disappointed when they didn't perform as expected.  We returned them for a full refund.  I can't believe they don't test their products before they send them to their customers.
p1284
aVSo, I purchased these to use at work with my recent-model iMac to play music without bothering coworkers.  The problem that annoys me is that the transmitter station only transmits to the headphones when it "senses" sound coming from the computer.  This means that even in the middle of a piece of classical music, when the instruments fall silent, the very faint hiss behind the recording cuts out.  When they begin playing again, the hiss returns.  This is even true for the millisecond delays between phrases when an announcer speaks.  I can easily tune out and ignore the slight hiss behind recordings when it is constant, but when it is cutting in and out throughout the piece of music or monologue, it's very irritating.  To be honest, it's irritating enough that I'm not willing to pay north of 300 bucks for these otherwise great headphones.I'm returning them and picking up another pair of the PX 100 wired headphones that have done well for me at home for several years at a fraction of the price.
p1285
aVI bought these headphones hoping they would have great clear audio. When I turned them on I immediately noticed a hiss. I turned down the headphones to see if it was just too loud but no, there is a constant hiss no matter the volume level. This makes it very difficult to listen at low volumes and when you turn it up so that the his is hidden you still hear it in between tracks and during quiet moments.The headphones themselves were extremely comfortable and very light, the buttons were a little bit of a pain to use while wearing them, but nothing I couldn't deal with. If the audio was better and the hiss was gone they would be near perfect.I am sending these back, I might try the RS-220 instead, hard to drop $600 for a set of headphones though, I was hopeful the RS-180 would do the job.
p1286
aVIf you are looking for wireless headphones, that have rich sound, stay clear if you walk away from the unit, and are so comfortable you can fall asleep while wearing them, these are for you. Yes, not inexpensive, but as the saying goes, you get what you pay for and these are worth every penny. I bought a pair for my father in law, and I think he has not taken them off since.The sound is so amazing, I got up while watching TV to go to the kitchen. Suddenly I heard a glass break behind me which startled me, until I realized it was in the movie I was watching. I was amazed that not only do these afford a rich sound experience, it's virtually all around you. don't know how they do it, but I like it. Get a pair of these and you will not regret it.
p1287
aVThe sound  and physical feel is between open air and closed earphones:  the sound is not as live and transparent sounding as wired Sennheiser or Grado open air phones, but, it is not as boxy as closed phones often are. Bass is elevated and lower midrange is slightly recessed.The sound is very clean and interference free, the range indoors is excellent. The phones are comfortable, not light but not too heavy, and they are secure on the head while walking or in other non-athletic indoor activities, much more stable than the RS120. The on-off, volume and balance controls on the earphone are a bad design. They are small push buttons that blend into the surrounding plastic surface and are hard to tell apart.  The RS 120 is much better in this respect.
p1288
aVHere's a quick review for you.Pros:The quality is absolutely great, and the range is incredible. The rechargeable batteries last a really long time, and charge very quickly. The base station is stylish, and the charge mechanism is really easy (there are three contact points on the top, and when you rest your headphones on top, it charges them).Cons:The setup and daily use could be easier (the status light blinks differently depending on what the status of the device/headphones is), and the headphones don't fit comfortably on my ears. I have another Sennheiser set (PC 360) and those fit very comfortably, but the ear cups on the RS 180 are smaller and oddly shaped, and may not  fit comfortably on your head at first.
p1289
aVSimply incredible - surround sound is crisp and distinct, easily separating audio from Blu-ray movies and TV Premium channels so that the sounds are reproduced accurately just as my Yamaha system and SRS speakers  would. What really surprised me was the bass response - you would think the source of the bass was the powered sub woofer. Set up was extremely easy. You can easily walk around the house and still enjoy the sound of whatever show is on. The very best thing is that my wife no longer shouts down our steps to our rec room, telling me to "Turn that thing down."And I don't even care anymore that the Yamaha SRS isn't enhancing the movie experience. The RS 180 Headphones are that good. Awesome.
p1290
aVHate giving it 2 stars with such good sound quality, but don't think  I would buy again if I had known that the ergonomics were so awful.  Seriously.. they put the tiny power button right in between the tiny + volume and - volume on the headset.  I'm sure it saved them a few pennies per unit but makes living with them aggravating.  Also, and much less significant, the tower weighs nothing.  Brush against it and it knocks over.  And finally, the materials look cheap and feel cheap.Unfortunate this sounds like a bunch of complaining.  As I said at the start, the sound quality really is much better than the other Sennheiser wireless headphones I've owned.  It just wasn't enough to make me like these.
p1291
aVFirst I will just say I am not an audiophile... I just wanted something to watch TV in piece while the family sleeps.Pros:Easy setupSounds greatGood range around our 2 bedroom apartmentCons:Buttons a little fiddly and ambiguous as to operation - ie not always sure it is actually on or off...Something I just have to get used to, but when there is no noise coming through it goes silent - eg pauses during a dialogue will be very noticeable as it kind of stops transmitting if there is no sound to transmit... which makes it sound like it's going on/off... not such a problem for movies which constantly have backing music playing and all the rest.
p1292
aVThese headphones do not work very well with a Samsung home theater.  It seems that Samsung in its infinite wisdom does not include an audio output jack on its theater system and if you try to use the audio jacks on the Dish Network receiver, while using the Samsung, there is such a delay in the sound that it is totally unacceptable. I found a workaround by using the headphone jack on my Hitachi LED with the headphones and an included audio adapter, but it limits the sound from my Samsung to only two of the 6 speakers.  The sound through the headphones is pretty good but the distance that it transmits from the transmitter is not even close to what is advertised.
p1293
aVI have two RS-130s to compare with this.  Those sold for about half the price of the RS-180.  They both have high quality sound; I can't tell a difference, but I don't have a trained ear.  The RS-180 holds the signal better, while the 130s have little periodic static glitches.  The RS-180 seems a bit overpriced in comparison, for just a stronger signal.  Also, the volume control on the 180 is a dumb design and is hard to use.  You practically have to read braille to find the up and down buttons when its on your head and I am always pushing the off button by mistake.  The balance is even worse.  The older models had a volume wheel, which was much better.  I also find the RS-180 to be uncomfortably tight on my head, but I have a big head.  I had to stretch the plastic out before I could wear them.  For the price, they should have an adjustable metal band like the Grado's do.  All in all, a bit overpriced.
p1294
aVFor someone used to good quality audio (good loudspeakers, amps, etc.), even if you're not a audiophile or an expert, it will let you down a little. I don't know if it has to be wired to a decent DAC to deliver it's full potential. But on my Marantz receiver (SR 5002) the sound quality was just average, with a lot of emphasis on the low frequency, but the basses are not tight or clear. It's really meant to use on a home theater setup to watch movies, not for listening music.But again, I think that with a proper DAC it should sound better, as I realized that plugged directly to my iPhone It actually gained in quality, balance, and fullness of sound.
p1295
aVI've only used them for a few days, but so far they are excellent. Being hard of hearing, I purchased them for TV viewing and they do an outstanding job of clarifying the dialogue. I'll report back after a few months if I have problems.Note: The instructions are unsatisfactory. Sennheiser needs to survey some of their customers as their step-by-step instructions are all over the board. The following is one of many unclear instructions: Do I charge the headphones first? If so, tell me. Don't say, when the transmitter is first turned on, it's enrollment mode searching for headphones. Isn't the transmitter charging the headphones when first turned on?
p1296
aVI'm very hard of hearing (according to my wife), and have to have the TV sound up to 20-22 while she prefers 15-16. I have found myself cupping my hand over my "good" ear, just to make out dialog in my favorite shows. I did a lot of research and wound up ordering these wireless headphones. WOW, what a difference. They were simple to set up (had to find the correct output on my TV), but what a difference. I watched a recorded program (Homeland) and was even able to hear birds and crickets in the background, as well as all of the dialog, clearly. What an incredible difference! The velour earpieces are extremely confortable and can be worn all evening. I highly recommend these to anyone struggling to hear their favorite shows.
p1297
aVI've had these headphones for about 6 months, they sound great, are built well.  I know what good sound is, these have that.  I live in a 1500 sq' ft. home, and reception is good all around it.  I really never had in the past used headphones all that much, because of the wire issue, but now I listen almost exclusively with these on, in the late 90's I tried wireless headphones, they were awful.  I have noise cancelling headphones by Bose as well (model QC'2)the Sennheiser sound as good as them without the wire, and they are much more comfortable, (but don't have noise cancelling, which don't matter to me).
p1298
aVI've had these for a month or so now. The sound is excellent and they are comfortable even after hours of use. I've had no problems with range in our house -- work well in all rooms. However, I have not tried them outside.As at least one other reviewer pointed out, the controls are difficult to use with the headphones in use. I can feel the volume buttons, but have to work at it. If the buttons were raised above the case and separated, it would help.They are on the expensive side, but I'm pleased with them. I'd recommend them for anyone looking for wireless headphones in this price range.
p1299
aVI purchased these to use with my TV. The sound is good but not as good as my pioneer SE-DHP800 infa-red head phones. They have the advantage of distance over the pioneers. The pioneers have more volume but these are OK. The biggest plus for the Sennheiser is construction. The pioneers broke where the yoke holds the individual cans the the head strap. Pioneers warranty personel said tough, we don't warrenty against breakage. Originally the charge light would stay on constantly. I called Sennheiser customer service and they said to continue to use them and this would correct itself and if not to get back to them. They were easy to contact and their responce was correct.
p1300
aVThis is my 3rd set of Sennheiser wireless headphones. I started with their least expensive pair and have worked my way up to the RS180 headphones. The lower priced ones were good, but the sound from these are truely amazing. I can walk out front to get the mail or out back to do something and the sound never changes. I listen to TV and a wide variety of music (rock, pop, classic, blues, etc.) and everything sounds great. The headphones were easy to set up and are comfortable. I love them and would recommend them to friends and family without hesitation.
p1301
aVHaving had a set of R130's, I have nothing but respect for the range on the 130 set, it is absolutely astonishing, 100m+ (undisturbed) compared to the RS180 which pick up a range of not even 9 meters. That to me is a real deal breaker, it is very annoying to find the receiver is searching for the signal everytime I went to the bathroom from the lounge.The sound quality of the RS180 is magnificent, its crisp and vivid; the fit is very, very comfortable; watching movies with this set is a bliss, the RS 180s sound is well balanced across - bass, midrange and treble.I will return the set though, it could be that there is manufacturer's fault on the set I received but a 9m range is simply not on.
p1302
aVI purchased these headphones and they work great with or without hearing aids.I listen to TV - My Blue Ray CD Player, Streaming video (amazon netflix ) also Games on my XBox One with no problem at all.When watching with others in the room I adjust my headphones and the others adjst the TVWhen watching and do not wish to disturb others, I turn volume on TV down to 0 and listen on my Headphones.In The evening I listen without aids, as they are being cleaned and dried.I hope this helps all buyers with hearing problems.
p1303
aVThe $50 pair the same company sells is nice, and great for a work headset, but this is great for watching your movies at home.  After listening to these, the only reason you will not have a pair for work and home *might* be the price - love them.  And if you don't want to spend a fortune for 7.1 surround sound, this might be an excellent option.  The only downside is they can get a little warm (would not exercise with them on, for instance).  But day to day, incredible range and quality (I live in a townhouse and I can go between floors).
p1304
aVAfter reading other reviews I chose the Sennheiser RS 180 headphones for TV viewing. The noise-free clarity of spoken words was just as I had read about, and they are extrememly simple to operate. The head set is light for its size and quite comfortable. I saw some comments that suggested that it was best for spoken word but I have been satisfied with the music quality as well. It is true that there are no tone adjustments and bass can seem a little heavy in background music but spoken dialogue remains clear over any background.
p1305
aVOverall not bad. It's a real upgrade from my old ones (RS120). Good crisp clean sound. Real easy to set-up.Ok. Here's what I didn't like, but I can deal with it. You have to turn on the base and the headset to use the earphones.With my old ones all you had to do is turn on the headset and you were done.Next the buttons are a little hard to distinguish when you're wearing them. Easy to confuse up or down and the on off button.It will take some getting use to, but for the sound quality I can deal with it.
p1306
aVI have read almost all of the reviews prior to buying this product.I doubt that I could say the words as eloquently as most of those people. Take the best review and add a + to it for me.I have used a "FEW" electronic products in my 53 years of being in the electronics industry. This is one of those right at the top.Very easy to set up and a great manual.Sound is SUPERIOR to my new 42 LED/LCD TV.Mike FlanniganSennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System with Dynamic Surround Sound
p1307
aVI love these! I used them to watch TV, when my kids are sleep. They fit comfortably, and audio quality is good. The headphone attaches to the base very quickly and easily (on power up). They are a little warm if worn for extended amount of time, but that is to be expected. One thing to note, that even with the headphones on, you can hear outside noises - i.e. they are not noise suppressing, or noise cancelling. That is one reason I go these, since I need to be able to hear if my kids cry..... I am really happy!
p1308
aVI have had mine 11/2 years.  Still work great.  Mine lose signal around 40 feet on most days.  I am hard of hearing and for me they work great.  They were replacements for an old pair of RS140's that my father still uses.  That pair is old, worn out, and still sound great.  I hope these last as long.  The sound of the RS 180 seems a little better than the 140, and that's good!  The plastic looks cheap and flimsy, but I have not had an issue of any sort with everyday use.  I conclude that looks are deceiving!
p1309
aVWould recommend highlyPros:* CD audio quality and very little background noise* No interference from MW oven, WiFi, or 2.4GHz cordless phones* Replaceable, rechargeable AAA batteries (2)* Very light weight, and very comfortable.* Transmitter doubles as charging standCon:* Headband not expandable* Flashing lights on transmitter needlessly draw attention* Expensive at list priceNeutral:* These are not sealed headphones.  Background noise passes through.* Range covers 3000 sqft house.
p1310
aVOne star is too much! There were so many things wrong with these headphones.  They were flimsy and fell apart immediately.  After charging for the required time, they never received any sound from the source.  I sent them back and bought the Sennheiser RS 185 at Best Buy.  They cost more, and are clearly a superior product. Very sturdy, heavy, and no problem receiving excellent sound.  I plan to buy another pair to use on the same TV.  Best Buy matches the Amazon price, but they do charge tax.
p1311
aVThe good news is the headphone is light and the sound is good.  The bad news is that the ear piece is tight on my average ears.  If you have big ears they will be too small.  Also, the user interface is poor.  I know it is connected because a green light on the transmitter blinks twice every two seconds and a green light on the headphone blinks once every two seconds ( is this intuitive or what?). Also, you must remove the headset to see the small buttons to increase or decrease the volume.
p1312
aVConnecting everything up makes these no more convenient than audiophile headphones with cords. Less so in fact. You basically need to locate the transmitter by the same chair or something. It's almost a worthless product concept for me. I have headphones with wires that sound better and are actually more convenient. These headphones simply can't be used for so many basic applications that most people want wireless headphones for. I have a pair and rarely ever use them as a result.
p1313
aVMy husband is almost deaf in one ear.  Before these headphones our tv was so loud the neighbors probably heard it!  He told me that these headphones allow him to clearly hear the voices.  The volume was always up so he could hear voices over the background noises.  He has walked all over the house, even onto the deck (which is fairly close proximity to the TV) and says he had no loss of signal. They are a little pricey but this is definitely an area where you get what you pay for.
p1314
aVIf you want quality wireless headphones then these are just about as good as you can get.I do not understand why some people are saying they get "buzzing", "dropouts" and that the "range is poor". I can wear these all over the house and in the garden without any problems - maybe these people live in mansions (I don't).I would thoroughly recommend them - for me, they are brilliant.Yes, they are expensive but worth every penny - I have tried many other wireless headphones and nothing else comes close.
p1315
aVVery high quality styling and workmanship.  Over the ear feature makes for a very comfortable feel making possible longer periods of time on your head.  The headphones are very light, not heavy, and yet very well made and reasonably durable.  The sound is hi-fi and as good as you can expect.  The range is excellent.  I can walk through everywhere in my house with them on and no loss of reception.  Although the price is high I feel it worth it.  No regrets.
p1316
aVThe sound and comfort is first rate.  However, my only concern are the controls on the headset: When one has the headset on, it should be easier to feel which are the volume, balance and off/on buttons. They all feel much the same, except for the raised on/off indicator. There should be some sort of raised button indicator on each of the buttons that can be felt with the right index finger --- would also help blind people too find the right button.
p1317
aVI think a fair price point for this item would have been around 100 bucks. Sound is good but not spectacular, the headphones are very comfortable but the wireless connection is less than perfect. I found if I had line of sight the connection was perfect, but under 20 feet away with a single brick wall in the way things got spotty. I decided to keep them but I'm not sure I would buy them again and definitely would not recommend them at this price.
p1318
aVOrdered 2 and received very timely.  Very comfortableand sound quality is perfect.  I can walk around the houseand out on patio with great volumn.  The grandkids canplay the Wii game on a smaller TV in the same room whereI watch TV.  Now I cut my TV volumn off and listen thru theheadphones.  Great Plan for us. Especially since I waswatching the Casy Anthony trial and they hated this.  Iwould recommend these.
p1319
aVMy Mac's cordless keyboard and trackpad overpower the Sennheiser RS 180 and introduce so many clicks in the sound as to make it unusable for watching programs on the computer. Sounds wonderful if I use corded keyboard and mouse on the computer. I tried all the manual's suggested fixes to no avail.BTW: I thought it would be heavy with the batteries, but it weighs the same as my corded headphones. Go figure.
p1320
aVThese are the best wireless headphones ever.  There's no hiss or background noise thanks to the KLEER technology.  And the sound is as good as the Sennheiser HD595 they replaced.  There are a lot of controls that take some getting used to, but once you learn where the controls are it's easy to adjust the volume, etc.  These are over the ear, open style with velour pads which makes for very comfortable listening.
p1321
aVI read all the reviews, agonized over the negative reviews, bought them....and was so glad that I did. Not sure the deal on the negative comments, but I've had nothing but a positive experience. Well worth the money (even though they are expensive as heck). I ended up buying another set of headphones to tether to the base, so now me and my wife can watch movies while the baby is asleep upstairs. Priceless.....
p1322
aVThe coverage and clarity of this headset is unparalleled.  There is one major issue, however. If you're watching a movie with any dynamic range whatsoever, the headset will start to clip when the bass becomes heavy (like when explosions happen).  I'm not talking about max volume either.  Really disappointing.  Using my other headset plugged into my roku remote produced much better results unfortunately.
p1323
aVThese headphones are fantastic. I use them for both video games and movies, as well as music. I am not an audiophile so I dont have loads of experience with high end headphones, but these are the best pair I have ever owned. The sound envelops you, especialy when your watching an action movie like. You will hear bullets in front of your behind you to your right etc,Great headphones and no regrets.
p1324
aVThese headphones saved my marriage. With severe hearing loss in one ear, and the other not that much better, I had to turn the TV up very loud, and I still found I missed some conversation. In addition to being able to hear TV conversations without missing a word, the music quality is suburb! I paid a little more than I would have with lower end ear phones, but well worth the added cost.
p1325
aVI'm somewhat disappointed with these headphones. I upgraded from RS140 to the RS180. And the sound is a bit better. But every time I use the RS180, they need to be re-paired with the base. And this is a 7-second process (to quote the Sennheiser support person I just spoke with). This is quite an inconvenience. With the RS140, re-pairing with the base was not required and they would begin working almost immediately.
p1326
aVi bought this headphone hopefully that it doesn't lag in games as most of the wireless headphones do but it doesn't lag at all + it sound amazing i can't stress enough how amazing this headphones are and it's the most comfortable headphone i have ever used sometimes i can forget that i'm wearing them so amazing mixing that with its sound quality and power it's the best buy .
p1327
aVReturned because it is not compatible with an AV Receiver. Unable to connect to the sound system. Wrong connections.I found this out after investing $ 70.00 for various HDMI Splitters, HDMI-RCA Adapter. Customer service personnel were helpful, but in the bottom line is the unit was not able to function with a Home Entertainment unit. Works great w/ the TV only!
p1328
aVThe sound is great.  The fit is very comfortable.It would be more convenient to put the volume buttons on one side and the on/off button on the other.Unless you have very small fingers and while the speakers are on, you decide to increase or decrease the volume, you will be turn it off accidentally.Otherwise the product is of very high quality.
p1329
aVI use these head phones a lot to listen to different kinds of music. They have excellent highs and lows. They are cordless, and recharge any time they are on the stand, provided the stand is plugged in to a wall socket. I haven't tested it extensively, but going from room to room does not appear to cause a signal interruption between the base and headset.
p1330
aVThis product is great, I connected it to my computer, went to my backyard and listened to my music while working in the garden.  The set up is very easy and the sound quality is amazing.  the only thing I did not like so much about this product is that when you use it for a long period of time, around 30-45 minutes, your ears sweat and get desperate warm.
p1331
aVWhen my old rs120s died i was luckey to find this pair on amazon. a little over the top with turning on the headphones after turning on the transmitter i would have thought that would be automatic. i haven't wondered to far outside of the house but so far i am very happy being able to walk around in the house 2500 sq ft without any drop outs.
p1332
aVBought these as a Xmas gift for my father-in-law who has trouble hearing the TV when we're together for loud family gatherings.  Now he can listen in rich stereo sound while the rest of the family is mingling and making noise.  No need for him to turn up the volume in the room anymore.  Best gift for him and for the rest of the family :-)
p1333
aVThese are great.  The sound is terrific.  I can walk around the house with them on and still hear everything on the TV, even while I'm brushing my teeth or doing dishes.  The only thing that interferes with the signal is the microwave.  When it's on, the audio cuts in and out.  Other than that, they're good.  And pretty comfortable too.
p1334
aVThe unit works great, The controls are a little hard to get use to it takes a while, but they all work.The one cable that came with the unit was defective but an e-mail solved that problem and a replacement is suppose to be sent.Very nice unit,otherwise works well.Amazon had the best price and delivery was speedy.JAC
p1335
aVExcellent sounds, optimal for general TV watching or vocal-oriented things, not much closed back, buawat any of these other guys can do the explainging technically to you, I think that they feel flimsy and my left earcuff keeps falling off as it broke all the pegs holding it in place. Nothing a little tape can't fix...right?
p1336
aVMuch better than my older RS130. I think RS130 is analog sound and RS180 is digital sound. Sound quality is very good and no static background noise. Problem is controls, the power and volume up and down buttons on next to each other. You always accidentally turn the headphones off while trying to turn up or down the audio.
p1337
aVUpdated on 7/3/11I've used these headphones for over a year now and I can find no fault in them.In every respect -- from sound quality to comfort to quality of construction and everything in between -- these are simply the best.Even the aesthetics of the product are pleasing -- it is like a work of art nestled in my home theater.
p1338
aVI purchased this so I could listen to TV in bed without disturbing others. I am extremely pleased with it. Great sound and comfortable fit. I also have a small head and have always had trouble getting headphones to fit properly and have great sound. This is my second Sennheiser and I highly recommend it to others.
p1339
aVThese are really nice earphones.  For the cost, guess they'd better be. I have hearing problems, and the ability to filter to enhance the mid-range tones is very important.  The issue with the volume buttons on one ear cup is there, but I don't find it that inconvenient.Very comfortable, great RF range.
p1340
aVSound quality is excellent, but is somewhat complicated to turn on/off. I am somewhat hearing impaired. I have no trouble hearing things like news cast, but sometimes have trouble understanding dialog; particularly if an accent is involved. This headset clears up this problem, much better than hearing aids.
p1341
aVThe sound is great. The headphone controls are difficult to use while wearing them though. comfortable and let just enough outside noise in for home use but would not make the grade for monitor use while live recording.due the lack of isolation.  They are stll more isolating than most open back designs.
p1342
aVI highly recommend this headset. I have used several brands and this is the only pair that was comfortable to wear for a long period of time, was easy to charge and had an adequate range. The volume buttons are too close, but a drop of silicone glue made it easy to feel them while wearing the headset.
p1343
aVI am a little hard of hearing, so using a headphone while watching TV is pretty much a must for me. I had been using the Sennheiser RS120 for a few years. Treated myself to the RS 180. Well worth it. Clean vibrant sound. Good bass. No hiss, hum or noise. Very comfortable. Highly recommended.
p1344
aVI had one before so I knew it would be good. The only think is the ear cups are a little smaller and because I'm a big guy it does make it a tad uncomfortable. I do like that it is a little lighter. The controls are in a bad place and are hard to use .I love the new charging stand.
p1345
aVI have two(2) other Sony wireless headphone units.  Both perform fine, but the Sennheiser RS-180 blows them away.  It's top of the line.  We use Sennheiser products(Mics) in our Rock Band and the performance is consistent and high-end quality.  I would recommend this product to others.
p1346
aVSeriously, how hard is it to make wireless headphones to listen to your tv or stereo?  Must be hard because these are the first ones I've owned that actually work. Noise free, fretting about 120 feet range, clear as a bell. Hearing things with these that I've not picked up on before.
p1347
aVPros:  excellent sound.Cons:In multiuser mode, if one set losses connection because it is out of range, the others get disconnected in spite of they are in range.Buttons are very difficult to press  You have to take out the headphones in order to identify them.
p1348
aVI bought these for my husband's birthday.  He loves music and listens all the time....sometimes when others would prefer not to hear his music.  LOL  So these were perfect because he can listen without bothering anyone else!!  They arrived on time and in great condition.
p1349
aVThe reach of this unit is a lot shorter distance than my 8yr old model from same manufacturer. The auto frequency sync is cool but the volume and power buttons on headset are too small. The comfortable ear cushions are nice. Disappointed for price point
p1350
aVThese are wonderful headphones. This is my first set of wireless headphones and I love the freedom they provide. I am still getting used to not getting snagged on a cord. It's incredible getting up and going to the kitchen or the bathroom and being able to hear everything. My purpose for buying headphones is to be able to watch movies silently so as not to disturb my neighbors. These are great. The sound is very good. I find that when I watch one of my favorite TV series (The Good Wife) that they seem to do something with the background noise that somehow creates the illusion of sound coming from other parts of my room. I don't know how to explain it but I will try. For example, when I watch a scene from this show and there people chatting (in addition to whoever the camera is focusing on) in the background I almost feel as though I hear people talking in my apartment in the next room. Oddly, I don't seem to experience this with any other show or movie I have watched so far. It's truly an incredible audio effect and I feel as though I'm hearing sound from speakers somewhere in the room and not from the actual headphones themselves. The headphones fit quite comfortably on my large head but the sound truly is good. It doesn't seem to have a lot of bass for listening to dance music but it serves my purpose well; watching television and movie disks.I've had these for about three months. The instructions in PDF format that comes on a CD-ROM disk are a lot more thorough than the small booklet that comes with the headphones. I bought the receiver with headset and also an additional headset so that a guest and I can watch television and not disturb my neighbors. Pairing is a breeze and I am very pleased with my purchase. I would buy these again.
p1351
aVFirst, let me tell you, if you need some information before buying these headphones you can discard the 1 and 2 stars reviews right off the bat.  They are from two kinds of people for the most part.  One would post a review before even trying the item, like r William ward who wrote \u201cHaven't figured out how to install it\u201d yet.  The other, received a defective unit and is pissed, like Robert E. Kirk who chimed \u201cThe Sennheiser RS 180 Wireless Headphones sounded great for one time, after that I could not get them to connect to the base.\u201d  Once you passed this crowd you might be able to read some meaningful reviews.For my part I am satisfied with these headphones.  I use them for TV and music and they have comported themselves well on both counts.  The major drawback with them is the design of the volume and balance control.  What was the engineer thinking?  I compared them to only one other headphone, the V-Moda Crossfade M-80 which I like because of their size and comfort.  The Sennheiser is better in terms of frequency response as they seem to reach the entire spectrum.  They seem to keep going in the higher frequency region where the V-Moda had stopped.  I compared them mostly to my Hi-Fi system and they seem to hold their ground pretty well.  They are not as complete but I didn't expect them to be.  I have two 12-inch Martin Logan subs and my room is acoustically treated so I can for instance adjust the bass to my liking whereas with the phones I don\u2019t have that luxury.  The bass is nevertheless adequate.  Sound stage and imaging is what it is with headphones and I don\u2019t think they can be changed.  The center stage is always going to be on top of your head instead of in front of you.  Apart from that, they are very competent.  I have them connected to the stereo output of my venerable Sony C555ES and couldn't hear any difference when I introduce a headphone amplifier (FiiO E11) in the path, so I am using them without the amp that does make a noticeable difference with the V-Moda.  I am very happy that I can move around the house and be able to take the music with me.  I doubt any reasonable person would regret buying them.
p1352
aVThe RS 180 is the first large headphone I have ever purchased.  So, nothing to compare them to.  But, they actually provide a more enjoyable tv listening experience than my high dollar surround system.  Wife is early to bed type and I work a crazy half days, half nights shift work schedule.  We needed something to allow tv watching without waking one another.  For our particular single listener situation they have performed flawlessly.  If you need a simultaneous set-up for someone who is hard of hearing, these are open ear cup and will probably give the slight echo effect that other reviewers have noted.  Purchase accordingly and get a closed cup design if that is what you need.  Also, these may not be the best for in bed since sound does leak from the open cup design.Our reciever allowed for either optical or standard output so, no issues there as some with optical only have noted.  Set-up was extremely simple, standard base input cord to the back of the receiver, power cord to strip or outlet, then nothing more than plugging to receiver headphone jack when using and unplugging when done.  The sound is wonderful and volume more than enough for anyone with normal hearing.  We can move freely around the house and have never had any dropouts with 100 ft probably the max distance we ever get from the base.  They are quite comfortable and not overly hot to wear for extended periods even though a large headset.  Also, we have never experienced the slightest buzz, hum or feedback problem while using these.The only slight issue with these is the volume and balance controls not being easy to distinguish from one another.  We have found this to be a minor inconvenience compared to the quality in every other respect.  As other reviewers have noted, you can simply put a drop of glue or, glue a small bead on a couple of the buttons to help with this if you don't want to or can't remember the configuration.  Simply put, if your needs and intended use are the same as ours, you cannot go wrong with these headphones.  If you have any problems, all I can say is you must have received a subpar set.  We could not be more satisfied with ours.
p1353
aVGot these when they hit their lowest price on Amazon for $201.88, so pretty happy about that. I have one other wired set Sennheiser headphones which I've had for a decade and I expected the same superior quality, however I'm slightly disappointed. I really want to love these headphones, I really do, but the interference in the headphones really destroys the experience.The build quality is good (4/5) and very lightweight so I can easily watch a movie and remain comfortable. The buttons are difficult to press without taking them off your head which can be annoying. The worst part about these headphones is the audible hum/white noise which can be heard in moderate volume scenes. If it wasn't for this I would give the sound quality 5/5 but this hum is unacceptable. It could be interference from mobile phones or wireless networks in the house, but these are things which aren't going away.I don't have the best hearing in the world and I'm not an audiophile but to me when there is silence in a TV show or movie, then there should be silence in my ears. These headphones could not produce that. In addition to this the hum was actually noticeable in moderate to low volume scenes. So in summary, if I had the money in my pocket again, I probably wouldn't buy these without seeing if there were better options available.Recommendation:Only buy wireless headphones if you REALLY REALLY must buy them. You will get superior sound quality with no interference in a set of wired headphones half the price.Note:Just to give you an idea, I also have a Logitech Wireless Gaming Headset G930 with 7.1 Surround Sound which suffers from no interference when using my computer, however the sound reproduction isn't as good as the Sennheiser RS-180 headphones.
p1354
aVI purchased these after my Sennheiser RS130 wireless headphones finally died after 5 years of constant use. And if I were basing the review entirely on sound quality alone these would get 5 stars. The sound quality is fantastic, instruments can be heard very clearly in music, for movies it makes the sound effects sound more realistic and the dialogue more clear, and they work well for gaming, though they are not ideal for games due to the lack of simulated surround sound, which is something that the RS130's did very well.The build quality is also quite nice. I normally hate glossy plastic but the plastic on these is pretty nice. The headband feels pretty sturdy and the earpads/headband pads are all replaceable. However the first few days of use gave me massive headaches due to how tight these headphones were squeezing my head. However I have a very large head, I wear a size 8 in fitted hats so this probably won't be an issue for most people. They have become more comfortable each day as they get stretched out.However not everything is perfect. I discovered very quickly that these headphones will sometimes change frequencies all of a sudden and kill my wireless network. Its not a constant problem either, sometimes I will go a few days without this happening, other times it will kill my wireless to the point where I have to reset everything. I tried the suggestion the Sennheiser tech support gave me but it only fixed the problem for about 36 hours. It could just be a compatibility with my specific router. I have considered returning these because of this but so far the annoyance is minor enough to keep them. I would hate having to go back to wired headphones as I have a tendency to break wired headphones very quickly.Don't let this wireless issue dissuade you from getting these though. It seems that most people who bought these do NOT have any issues with interference at all. And I have to say, Sennheiser's tech support responded very quickly to my email and was very eager to try to help.
p1355
aVI purchased two complete sets of RS180s. Four previous wireless headphones sets I've owned transmitted in the 900mHz range and had the typical problems of constant hiss, dropouts and clicks. It was like having someone with a dog clicker right beside your ears. We use wireless headphones in the living room and the master bedroom so sometimes they even received audio from the wrong base.Perhaps past experience has heightened my expectations for such a premium-priced product. That said, I'll attempt to balance the good, the bad and the ugly.Pros:  * Great audio. Very dynamic with good voice definition.  * Good range compared to previous 900mHz headphones. I haven't found a single dead spot in the house.  * Comfortable cuffs that keep extraneous sounds out and the headphone audio in.  * Multiple sets of headphones can be used in the same home at the same time without interference or crosstalk.  * Headphones from different sets can be manually reassociated so they work on the same base at the same time.Cons:  * Both the headphones AND THE BASE shut off when the headphones are placed on the charging cradle or if the headphones are shut off for about 5 minutes. Neither one powers on automatically. Other headphones (at a fraction of the cost) turn on as soon as the headband expands from being placed on the head. No button pushing. Simple. Elegant. This is a major shortcoming. Nothing has required me to physically go to the entertainment center to turn it on for at least 30 years. What were they thinking?  * The pushbutton controls on the headphones are too small and too close together for reliable use by touch alone. The combination mute/power button is placed between the volume up/down buttons so missing it is a challenge when a single finger tip can easily press all three buttons at the same time.  * All controls and markings on the base are tiny and don't contrast with the base color so are virtually illegible.  * One's ears may get hot after awhile simply because the cuffs do fit so well.  * The "multifunction button" backlight flashes constantly as well as an LED on the headphones. I can see having them flash during base to headphone association but once that's successful the flashing in a darkened room is just annoying.  * There's no printed owner's manual included. You have to print your own from the enclosed DVD or from an online download. Not including the manual at this product's price point is inexcusable.The worst part is there was a 50% failure rate. Someone else submitted a review noting that he could not get the headphones to work farther than 3' from the base. One set of mine worked fine for a day and a half and then did exactly that. With two complete sets I could associate both headphones with each transmitter base. Sure enough, both headphones worked with one base but neither worked more than 2' away from the other base. A call to Sennheiser support confirmed that the base had failed. Amazon replaced the failed set since it was only 3 days old. Hopefully, this won't be a recurring problem.I'm going to risk keeping both sets only because the audio clarity is so much better. The constant dropouts and clicks from the old 900mHz sets were infuriating.
p1356
aVA neighbor complained about my surround system to my apartment management complex. The subwoofer was driving them nuts, as it would me. I thought I was destined to go back to regular TV audio (which is lousy these days). I like movies and I like to hear the effects, so I was really disappointed when I thought my relaxation hobby would come to an end as my Sony Bravia has less than adequate audio speakers.I started to research headphones as a solution. I never considered wireless an option. Wireless? Really?  The more I researched on line, and talked to folks at electronic stores, Sennheiser was the one constant suggestion. Skeptically, I purchased the RS 180 system. Problem solved.They transmit sound quite well (not quite as potent as a good surround system, but I will say I hear voice/speech better with headphones, just by their very nature). They offer freedom to roam about, obviously, because there's no cord. They are easy to set up and operate, for the most part. And I often forget I'm wearing them. They have actually become the preferred way I watch TV (and listen to my iTunes) in my apartment because they offer such clear audio and I don't have to worry about disrupting others.I keep the unit out of sight; behind the TV. There's no interference. There's no hiss while in operation. There's no frequency to have to find. Plug and play, basically. There is a speech intelligibility button the on the base which I leave turned on; it seems to give the audio a bit of a boost. I'm not exactly sure why I'd want to keep it turned off and the instructions don't offer much of an explanation, other than "when turned on, this seems to make voice intelligibility better." So, what's the point? Who isn't going to want to hear their audio?! It's a bit confusing.The only real downside is what many reviews mention: The audio controls on the headphones themselves are difficult to manage without taking them off. And the L/R balance buttons are a little strange but they are meant for folks with hearing difficulties so I can appreciate them, even though they are annoying when accidentally touched. Again, all of the function buttons are difficult to adjust while wearing the headphones. I have to take them off to adjust volume, for example, leaving me to guess at  adjustment levels before putting them back on; and I miss some audio this way. It's not a deal breaker by any means. I do think the developers would be wise to find a solution to the operational control functions in their next generation.Bottom line: An EXCELLENT solution if you live in an apartment and wish for better audio from your TV but don't wish to disturb neighbors with a surround system. Or, if you live in a house where others don't want to hear your audio, etc. The technology is very satisfying; more than I ever would have guessed.
p1357
aVI've had three different wireless headphones over the past decade-plus and none have sounded as superb as the Sennheiser RS 180. The only slight knock I have is that the range isn't as good as I'd hoped it would be. I can walk around the entire top floor of my house and the sound is absolutely PERFECT. If I go downstairs, about 90% of the downstairs is covered; there's a slight dead-zone in the garage. The problem becomes most prevalent when I go outside while mowing or working around the outside of the house. There are certain dead spots around the property where the sound will just drop out and then come back as I move around. I'll try moving the transmitter closer to the outside and see if that clears the problem, but it's really not that much of an issue.I almost thought I had a problem, at one point. I'm studying Chinese and the lessons have pauses while it waits for your response. I heard the usual question about how to say something and then - total, complete silence. I mean DEAD silence. Not a single, solitary sound. No subtle hiss, static or anything else. I can't emphasize how disconcerting it was to hear (not hear??) such silence. I thought something had gone wrong because when I'm wearing the earbuds and listening to my iPod Touch, the silence isn't as total and complete. As I started to worry that something had gone wrong the lesson continued. The sound is so clear, it's wonderful. I later changed over to listening to Norah Jones and I heard subtle sounds from the instruments that I'd never heard before, even while listening over external speakers connected to my laptop. I do have a bit of a complaint about the placement of the switches on the side of the right earcup. The volume and on/off buttons are in a strip roughly one inch long and about a quarter of an inch wide. You have three buttons: up-volume, on/off, down-volume. Invariably, I end up turning off the unit when I'm trying to raise or lower the volume. It's not particularly cold now, but I expect that I'm going to have a problem discerning which is which when my fingers are frozen as I rake mountains of snow off the solar panels on my roof. It's not a big deal, just something to be aware of. I would've designed it differently, but I'm certainly not regretting my purchase. I have to add that the left and right channel adjustments are there, also, but I don't really fool with the channels, so it wouldn't be an issue with me. Because of volume adjustment/on-off button placement and the range problem, I only gave it a four-star rating. Otherwise, I would give it a six-star, just for the sound quality, if that were possible.
p1358
aVI've been in search for good wireless headphones for years. I've finally found them and I'm impressed. I'm an audiophile on a budget. I listen to a lot of music, usually on my wired Sennheiser HD595s. I've been really happy with them and sold on Sennheiser's quality. These are almost as good as the wired HD595 cans. So good in fact that I will probably only use the wired headphones for mixing/monitoring. I would give the RS180 a solid B+ in terms of sound quality, which is as good as it gets for wireless so far (I'm excited about the RS220 coming next year). The range on these is amazing. I have a bunch of wireless devices around the transmitter, two wireless keyboard/mouse adapters, bluetooth, and a wireless router (using both 2.4 and 5 for N). I was able to walk all around my house without these cutting out. I was even able to go outside well into the back yard with only a couple drop outs. I purchased an addition set of HDR 180 to pair with the RS 180 transmitter. It was very easy and now I have two sets working perfectly for those times when I want to watch a movie with another person late at night.A lot of people complain about the location of the buttons on the right headphone, but it took me all but 2 minutes to get used to it. I was walking around the house adjusting the volume without a problem. This issue is a non-issue for me.SO to sum it up, these have excellent range and the best sound quality that I've heard on wireless headphones by far. If you're thinking about purchasing...don't delay. You won't be disappointed. I usually don't write reviews, but these really impressed me.EDIT: These were so good that I purchased another set for the living room. For those who are curious, you can run two transmitters simultaneously without any interference between the two. Also, even with two separate transmitters, I still don't get any interference with my WiFi.
p1359
aVIve used Amazon for well over 10 years, bought tons of stuff, but never wrote a review.I just had to write a review for these puppies.Quick Review: AWESOME! Just BUY THEM! well worth the price! They just work, and they work AWESOME!They just came in the mail today, and i quickly plugged them in, and put them on the charger... The instructions say to charge them for 16 hours. I couldnt wait.. after an hour on the charger, i had to hear how they sound.AWESOME!I listen to music while I work on the computer, a lot of electronica, so you know how that can bug some people. especially hearing the bump bump bump at 3am. And you need to listen to electronica on the loud side. It keeps the heart rate up, and keeps ya in the zone.  If you are a "vampire coder" like i am, you know what im talking about.Very light weight. Yea..they feel a bit cheap, but hey, they need to make them light, and plastic is pretty darn light, and economical. They are already pretty darn expensive. So I can understand their choice in materials. I dont think they were meant to be used while paint balling, or while you spar MMA style. And they were not meant for your 8 year old overly hyper active, A.D.D. kid.Distance. I have the base transmitter about 3 feet from my head. Its next to my computer. Tons of cables, octopus power outlets and wireless crap nearby.. no troubles. Perfect sound, and apparently my wifi still works.  I walked out to the back yard, and it was perfect sound.I just did a test..it doesnt like SCREEN DOORS.. screen doors, how they are fabricated will kill the signal. Screens are used to control Wifi signals too (google it). So if you are getting some cut out, then look around for screens. Its probably blocking the signal.But going through the garage, i made it 1/2 way down my drive way. 2000 Sq Foot house, built 2000, So Cali. to give you a rough idea.The transmitter is located in the office on the back side of the house.I dont know what that KlearSound technology they use is, but it seems like its transmitting digital signals to the head set, and the head set is decoding and playing them back. So you dont get any fuzzy buzz sounds like those other cheap wireless headsets.. You might get cut out, but no fuzzy. And i think they buffer it too. Sorta like the skip buffer used in Car CD players. But thats just a guess. The quality sure sounds like its doing something like that.Ok..something that immediately caught my attention.. was the ear muff material. Its like a velvety feel. and WARM. If you are a girl who is always cold (arent all girls always cold?) then you will love em.. Im HOT BLOODED (check it and see) , and they feel warm on my head, not hot, but warm. I took a quick search on the net to see if they have that other material (cold plasticy feeling) as a replacement..didnt see em..i will keep looking..And the infamous BUTTONS.. if you read reviews on these guys, everyone crys about the buttons..Yes..i have to agree, they should have put more time in the button design and placement.But if you practice a bit.. you can feel the Volume Up..its big and angled.rub your finger down and you feel the raised plastic of the POWER button.Well the next button is VOLUME down..then you get a flat "spacer", and the next two are Left/Right balance.Although not perfect, quite usable without taking the headsets off. But heck.. i dont do hard labor, so my finger tips are not callused. :)And remember you can still control the volume from your audio source (Computer, Receiver, TV, etc) using its own remote. So no biggy for me.The "Open design".. its odd, you can still sorta hear the outside world. Like right now, i can hear my puppies barking in the back yard. but just barely.If the purpose of the headsets was to COMPLETELY drown out your crying baby, you might want to look at a closed design one. Or duct tape the vents.If you just came back from Best Buy, returning those PIECE of SH***EET Sony 900Mhtz wireless headphones, and wondering if there was anything decent out there, you found em! the rs180's!!!! And they are not just decent..they are AWESOME!If you are STILL on the fence after reading all these awesome reviews, just remember you can return them if they dont meet your majestic standards.Amazons Customer Service has always been Triple A+++ in my experience.The search is over Indiana Jones... you FOUND IT!Ok..need to get back to work..the wife isnt going to be too happy knowing that we are $224 dollars short on the mortgage. j/k :)
p1360
aVIt could have been other reviews that had me overly anticipate the wave of goodness that I'll hear when I put these headphones on. So I guess I can't say my first impressions were that great.I just didn't find the sound quality THAT great. I'm not saying they're bad, but blow my mind? Wasn't sure. (Note: I've never tried any other wireless headphones before, so nothing to really judge against, sound is purely comparison between other earbuds I've listened to)I noticed a high pitched buzz in the background, not good, so I was wondering what the heck it was. Well after some digging, turns out that the input for the headphones are best if there's more power supplied, so my TV was pushed to 80% of the volume, background noise (because the Auto leveling didn't have to kick in) was gone.And of course then there was the source of the track I'm listening to as well. Youtube and downloaded videos well, just don't really cut it. I put in some lossless classical sound track... okay NOW I'm blown away. Cello pieces were amazingly clear, to the point where I can make out the musicians' slap on the 'fret board' (okay dunno what its called on a Cello) during more dramatic bars. Fantastic.I don't know if these headphones require burn in periods as some earbuds do. I hope they do though, because I'm just liking them more and more.Build quality, I like the lightness of the product, the plastic bits, don't scream 'high quality' but they're not bad. The felt ear cushions feel nice against the skin, don't over heat too bad, and I'm someone who is sensitive to heat.Range, personally within my 2000sqft house, I've had a few places that cut off (my room is top floor corner). Far ends of the house I get cut off, but thats through walls and floors... not bad at all.Overall, I'm really liking these headphones. Price wise, if you get them at a decent price, its totally worth it, I'm not sure MSRP, but that's me.Surprises to me, were that these were open headphones, so noise isolation is not its strong point. Having never had a headphone before (only earbuds) it'll take some adjusting for the weird hair I end up having after long periods of wearing them.
p1361
aVThe Sennheiser HDR 180 has been well-received and reviewed and that's why I bought my pair. The overall sound is very good and so I have no complaints about that.  However, though the apparent line-of-sight range will not be a factor for the average home, intervening walls and corners will - so if you wonder behind a couple of walls and/or corners you will lose your sound. If you plan to work in the garage while your RS 180 is in the living room you are not going to be pleased.What I must severely criticize is the dunderheaded ergonomic stupidity evinced by - not the engineers - but stylists and industrial designers. They had to get their fat, untalented little fingers on the cosmetics and general design/appearance of the headphones; it would have been far, far better had the same guys who designed the RS 120 been called upon to design the RS, HDR 180. In a nutshell: all the headset's controls are on the right earpiece - aligned in a row -without hardly any space between buttons. The volume control buttons are separated by a "multifunction" button - all flush one to the other, followed by (with but a slight space) L-R balance buttons. All work as you would want them to, but you have to take the phones off your noggin to look at what button you are activating and then put the phones back on to check the results; it really helps if you have Lilliputian fingers. I have no doubt that with enough practice one will be able to do this with pure feel - but why go through a frustrating, time consuming training process? Also, as is done on the RS 120, why not place some controls on the otherwise barren left earpiece and why not give each button ample space separation and a distinctive shape?There are a total of four LEDs - the important one being the red LED which tells you the base unit is charging. There are two others on the base unit and another on the headset which of course can't see when wearing the headset.  Steady and flashing LEDs, as well as the interval between flashes have different meanings and one has to look these up in the owner's manual - I refuse to commit them to memory. The utility of the foregoing LED messages is extremely limited and borders on the useless - other than for the charging and signal lights.The construction is nicely executed but all plastic; the headband really calls for spring steel but it too is plastic.  Each ear pad is held in place to its respective ear cup by two small plastic ears which have to align perfectly with matching holes. In each cup resides a rechargeable battery. If you drop the headset on a hard floor there is a high probability at least one ear pad will come loose and allow the retained battery to fly away to a no doubt hard-to-access place. How much shock and physical stress those little plastic ears will take remains to be seen. A better, foolproof, choice would have been to use Velcro tape to hold ear cup to ear pad. I may have to do that if the plastic ears break.All-in-all, I am pleased with the performance of the HDR 180 but the build quality and ergonomics are far less than remarkable.
p1362
aVThe Sennheiser RS 180 is Sennheiser's top US wireless headphone setup; and, with what Sennheiser usually delivers, I expected more.The PhonesThe phones are Sennheiser's usual top notch construction: the plastic is solid, the joints are dependable, the velour padding is immensely comfortable, and the weight is acceptable. The operating buttons on the right-hand phone, however, leave much to be desired. The buttons are flat and depress shallowly, leaving for difficult button-pressing. The power button is, oddly, between the volume buttons, leading to some referencing each time volume or power is to be accessed. Furthermore, the volume controls are on the phones exclusively and consist of  holding, not  pressing. Several attempts at discovering the change in level resulted in these findings: pressing the button rapidly results in no change of level while holding the button results in a constant change in level; therefore, to achieve an exact level which is not the highest or lowest, careful half-second-presses are required for meaningful measurement. The battery life of the included AAA rechargable batteries is respectable (16-24 hrs), though the time is diminished as volume increases. Even with the long life, though, the recommended recharge time of 16 hours is unacceptable. Users report that recharging can finish in 8 hours, though reports are mixed. No rechargable device that is conceivable for everyday use should need to charge for longer than an average night's sleep.The TransmitterThe transmitter, too, is top notch in construction: it's light because it's plastic, but it sits firm and looks good on a desk, with unobtrusive LEDs which indicate transmission (about one flicker per 5 seconds in sync with the phones) and a dim charge light which goes out when the phones have finished charging. The audio cable from source to transmitter is a gold-plated, good-feeling mini stereo jack on both ends while the AC has an international, exchangable head design with US, European, and Asian prongs included. While this is probably not intended for travelling convenience, it could prove useful to a select few.The SoundEven with the usual, Sennheiser construction, despite being marred by some thoughtless design choices, the sound that comes out of these has two big problems: lag and hissing. First, while we expect wireless headphones to be slower than wired headphones, users shouldn't be noticing this difference in movies, TV, and games. While this doesn't affect music or other non-visual media, visual use will suffer: expect .1 to .2 second lag even if the transmitter is within inches of the receiving phones. The result is a movie, show, or game that is visually ahead of its audio; expect lips, frenetic action, and aural cues to all be off. While users might grow accustomed to the lag, a price tag like this one shouldn't ask them to. Second, while reviewers here and abroad have raved about the lack of hissing, popping, and static, expect some. If the phones are near their max volume, the speakers will produce unacceptable levels of static to the point of hissing. The source volume affects this less, but silent sources are met with audible static regardless of acceptable source levels. Popping, too, can occur, though not to an excessive degree. Again, despite being wireless, users should receive what was promised for this price tag: inaudible hissing, popping, and static at all but the highest volumes and no noticable lag in audio.Until Sennheiser demonstrates that their wireless solutions can match the performance of their wired ones, I'll be sticking with the Sennheiser HD555 Professional Headphones with Sound Channeling.
p1363
aVI bought these as an upgrade from some very nice Sony IR wireless headphones that lacked in audio quality and range that were about the same price as these headphones 6 yrs ago when I got them.These headphones are a huge sonic upgrade.  I love the sound quality, I love that it's RF and I can walk into another room.  The stand is fair, the headphones are reasonably comfortable.  There is a lineout on the back of the stand so that these headphones can sit between your source and another device--for me, these are plugged into a computer and I have some cheap speakers downstream.  It's nice not to have to re-cable or adjust things to change the sound output.  Previously I was using a rackmount headphone amp to serve a similar purpose.I also own Sennheiser noise canceling headphones and the top-of-the-line HD 800s.  I really like Sennheiser headphones.However, where these fall hugely short is usability.  First, there's two power buttons, one on the headphones and one on the stand.  This is ridiculous--the Sony headphones these replaced had 0 power buttons.  Lifting the headphones off the stand should turn on both the stand and the headphones.  The user doesn't should have to do both.  The Sony headphones also had an ingenious on/off built into the band of the headphones that would conserve battery life by turning off the headphones when they were not on my head.  I'm sure Sony has patented this but Sennhesier needs to figure out something similar.So when I want to use these headphones, it takes me several attempts at hitting buttons to get things on and going.  It's frustrating and it's distracting.  There is a light on the headphones that flashes when the power is turning on/off, but unlike, say, my Plantronics bluetooth ear bud, it doesn't change colors for on/off, so I never know if I am turning it on or off.  I can't tell from the base either.  The headphones come with a complex grid of LED blink rates and what they all mean, but who has time to sit down with a headphone manual?Great sound and so I keep them, but the usability sucks really bad.  I might try the newer Sony models at some point.
p1364
aVSuperb headphones. Awesome sound quality and noise cancellation. But there is a small delay. If you are playing games or watching movies, this headphone is not a good idea. Listening to music is on the other hand is a completely different story.
p1365
aVeverything it was advertised to be.  The only thing I dislike it the positioning on the volume up/down.  I think it could have been placed in an easier to use spot, made oversized to feel it or something.  Otherwise would have been 5 stars.
p1366
aVReplaced a Sony set with the RS 180. Couldn't be  happier..  The Sony set I had would fade, crackle, and humm whenever I  turned my head or got up.....  No likey Sony.......This set is worth every penny and then some........
p1367
aVI ordered these partly to be able to watch TV without disturbing others and partly in the hope of clarifying dialogue, particularly in the genre of dramas in which the characters tend to mumble or whisper in the background. It really delivered. Dialogue is crystal clear, even the background stuff. And the fidelity is stunning -much better than my surround sound speaker system and no noise at all. Unlike my speakers, they are absolutely silent during breaks between scenes. I did not experience any delay between the TV speakers and the headphones as some users have described. I suspect this problem may be more prominent with home theatre systems than with the TV speakers. My only quibble would be the tiny control buttons.Setup was simple, except for a problem that was the fault of my home theatre system, not the headphones. There was no headphone jack on the back of the sound system! Moreover, while the home theatre setup had a setting for HDMI sound to go to the TV (and therefore out using the TV jacks), it automatically switched back to its own speakers and would not allow the HDMI setting to stay locked. After removing the system completely and plugging the headphones into the TV, I discovered a better workaround solution: connect the phones directly to the sound sources: The DVR/cable box and the DVD player. This worked like a charm, permitting the TV to be muted at will and still get sound through the phones. If you have more than one sound source, you will just need a couple of (1 female to 2 male) audio splitters from Radio Shack to plug into both sources. And you will never need a home theatre again!
p1368
aVI love these headphones. I have tried many wireless sets before, but the sound with these is amazing! They are very comfortable for long periods and have full rich sound with outstanding bass. I would certainly purchase these again.
p1369
aVThe NiMh batteries finally went bad after 5 years of almost daily use.  I confirmed they are bad when they were blinking green when placed in my Panasonic NiMh battery charger.  But otherwise, the RS 180 has performed flawlessly.
p1370
aVPros: Awesome sound (usually), very comfortable, very good battery life, good range, can use standard batteriesCons: Long charging time, charger is a little flakyI've these for just over two years now, and they are pretty much awesome. The sound quality is excellent (particularly with music),the batteries last from 6-10 hours (depending on volume) and they are extremely comfortable - possibly the most comfortable headphones I've ever used. The range is also quite good; I've walked from my second floor apartment to my car in the parking lot with no dropouts.The primary reason that I gave 4 instead of 5 stars has to do with charging. While the batteries last quite a while, recharging takes forever (according to Sennheiser's site, it takes 16 hours from zero to fully charged). This seems excessive, considering that there are only two AAA batteries. The other charging problem has to do with the base itself.The base seems to be very particular about placement. When placing the headphones on the charger, it seems as though they should just slot in and begin charging; unfortunately, this is not always the case. It is very easy to place the headphones on the base, get the charging light, and then any movement stops the charging. The headphones need to be placed just right. There is also no warning that the batteries are about to die; they simply shut off.Overall, these are very good headphones. The sound quality is great, they are incredibly comfortable, and the charging problems can be defeated by having some AAA batteries arround.
p1371
aVThe controls on these headphones are very hard to operate.  I owned Sennheiser RS-140s and they were easy to operate but we wore them out and decided to get new ones.  Not one of my better purchases but then they sound great.
p1372
aVI bought these as a holiday gift for my husband and he absolutely loves them.  They are high quality and very easy to use.  Great when one stays up late watching TV and doesn't want to disturb the rest of the household.
p1373
aVActually, this is my second set of Sennheiser headphones. I owned a pair for several years now, for my living room TV. My wife only recently tried them on, and I had to get an extra pair for her, despite an important shortcoming. The buttons, are almost impossible to access without removing the headphones and turning the light on in the room.- They are too small, with no space between them. Your tactile senses are futile.- They are the same color as the body of the unit, making them impossible to see in low light conditions.- The balance buttons have proven to be useless after several years of use. They actually add another annoying factor: if you push one of them by mistake while trying to adjust the volume, you're bound to miss a good part of the movie you're watching. You have to turn on the lights, take them off and put them back on several times while you try to find the correct balance setting through trial-and-error. It really sucks!I took off two stars for this. I'll give it five stars when the manufacturer removes the stupid balance buttons, places the volume and power buttons at a reasonable distance from each other, and makes them white or a another bright color, DIFFERENT from the rest of the device, so they can be distinguished in the dark.On the bright side, the headphones reach every corner of my 1,200sf home without static or drops, and the sound quality is great! Kudos for using standard-sized rechargeable batteries, and reasonably easy to replace when the time comes.
p1374
aVYears back my brother and I picked up some Sennheiser wired around the ear headphones for some home studio work and when I started to look for a good set of wireless those memories brought me to Sennheiser.I bought these to use with music and home theater for when the kids are in bed and the wife does not want to be disturbed.  My main system is a 7.1 with a mix of CerwinVega, Klipsch, Infinity and Advent speakers.  Even my 'normal' pc speakers are Infinity.I tried the RS120s and was dissappointed. The static bump between tracks and when automatically shutting down was unacceptable, even if the sound was acceptable. Plus the on-ear feature was not something I could endure for several hours.When these arrived I was impressed. The sound is good.  When not in use - end of album, film, etc they are silent.  They have just enough pressure to stay on the head without being uncomfortable.A feature not highlighted is these use removable standard AA rechargeable batteries. So if you find that you ran them dry (because you did not set them back on the charger over night) you can swap them out with a fresh pair. I also like this for longevity.  My last pair of cheapies had non-replaceable cells and after a year would start to alert the battery was low after only an hour - then proceed to chirp and work for nearly to more hours - talk about ruing the experience.  (Thanks GE.)I even went for the Amazon Wherehouse deal and had no problems - save a few dollars.
p1375
aVI love these when I'm in my TV room. It drops out when I walk out to my BBQ 30 feet away. On the same AV system my RS-130 worked to 300 feet. The RS 180 has much better sound. The 1 room only range is a big negative.
p1376
aVUsed for my PC to listen to music, movies, and TV when I want to keep the sound all to myself.  Exceptional performance from up to 50 feet away.  Never a crackle or distortion.  Very reliable.  No complaints.
p1377
aVMy significant other is hard of hearing, this is a marriage saver!  It also comes in handy when we are watching separate shows, like he is watching football, and I a girly movie.  PEACE all around.
p1378
aVDoes have its quirky drawbacks but works better than most. The fit is comfortable. The button controls are odd. Makes a buzz when there is silence. But still I prefer this to others I have tried.
p1379
aVI had the RS120 for 7 years which I really liked. These RS180 have even better sound quality, are very comfortable, especially the velour ear cups, and have no drifting sound like the 120's did.
p1380
aVThese sound great if you plan on simply sitting in a chair or walking around a quiet house. The open back design makes them less desirable in noisier environments. If you plan on trying to use them with your musical instrument, don't bother. There is about a 1/4 of a second delay which makes playing the guitar frustrating. I was hoping to use them at home late at night. I know they were not intended for that purpose, but it is a little irritating that you can connect up to 4 headsets. Seems like that would be a great option. The open back design does allow you to easily here your amplifier if you want to play over a music track. I do that with the drums quite a bit and it works really well.They sound really good and the range is great if you don't have too many walls in the way. I have two sets of headphones that each have independent volumes. They are just loud enough to wipe out most moderate background noise. Battery life is not bad and they are super easy to recharge. The design is cool and they are well made. These are defiantly for the audiophile on a budget, headphones can get REALLY expensive. These sound way better than a lot of more expensive corded headphones I own. If you listen to Rap or music with heavy bass, these might not fit your taste. If you are a musician you will want to check out wireless monitors.
p1381
aVI had previously bought the less expressive one, but this set is well worth the money. I do take out my hearing aids when I wear them due to feedback noise, other well worth the extra cost.
p1382
aVI have the HDR160 set, and while the sound quality is great, using them can be very irritating which is why I am considering the RS180. Unfortunately the RS180 seems to have the same poor design that made me come to dislike my HDR set enough to want to replace them.Instead of using separate led's or color states, the status of the headset is determined by a single green led that seems to flash randomly, if at all. You are expected to memorize a timing chart and then count pulses within the timeframe of a second, and be able to differentiate those between pulses that occur within the span of 5 seconds in order to tell how the headset is operating. Not exactly intuitive.The ritual of having to keep the power pressed on the base station, then doing the same for the set, gets tiresome since the base station does not automatically power on and wait to sync the headset as soon as there is an audio signal. It is happy to turn itself off, though, even though it is connected to wall power. Hold and wait. Hold and wait. Was that long enough? How many blinks was that? Is it syncing? Is that low battery? Is it on mute? The indicator is next to useless.These sets seem designed for an android with a built in chronometer and endless patience. Morse code operators might like them too.
p1383
aVThe sound, comfort and quality are amazing...There is no lag between the audio and video and I could wear them all day with no discomfort to my head. Well done Sennheiser...
p1384
aVControls on headphones are a little difficult to operate when wearing but my husband used to have the tv so loud that I would get a headache.  I now have my sanity back!!
p1385
aVThese headphones boast exceptional clarity especially for a wireless set.  I have had some very bad wireless sets before - Sennheisers included.  I have the Sennheiser (wired) HD598s and usually have to eq the treble up to help distinguish dialogue.  I do have some hearing loss in the higher frequencies so I was surprised I could understand the dialogue much easier (no eq) with the RS 180s.  I am not sure what that means in the audiophile world (given my hearing loss) but I like them since they do what I am looking for.  The RS 180s have a nice open sound stage and provide solid bass response (slightly more bass response than the 598s but still very tight) making music listening and movie watching enjoyable as well.  They also have noise leveling so the loud passages do not further my hearing loss.  They only get 4 stars because I hate the adjustment buttons.  They should have spread the controls out - perhaps even putting balance controls on the other phone.  I am always hitting the wrong buttons.  Also, these phones are not as comfortable as my HD598s - a little more clamping pressure than I like.PS:  And neither the RS180 or the HD598 play Celine Dion like my old HD540s did!
p1386
aVIts been about 24 hours since I received my Sennheiser 180. FIrst impression is that it looked cheap. Its all plastic which is fine if the plastic was durable but this plastic seems like a good drop would crack them. I feel like I just bought these from a dollar store because thats how the plastic feels like.I am nervous that my kids or wife will break them.After getting over the plastic that makes up all of the 180 the sound is really impressive. I live in a high wifi area and I get no distorted sound. I did buy a couple of wireless headphones before and I heard nothing but click or distorted noise so I am happy with this alone. I also walked all over the house and the volume stayed the same and that is really impressive. They feel comfortable and very light. Only problem is that the headphones can be heard by others. So I wouldnt buy these for plane trips because everyone around you will hear what you are hearing.Overall I think they are charging you too much for what you are getting.I am happy with them but if they break because my kids drop them or they fall off my desk that 230 I spent on them will leave me feeling very unhappy.
p1387
aVI'm a software developer and I work crazy hours from home.  In order to get into my "groove" while coding, I listen to music, usually too loud.  Recently I moved into a condo downtown and was concerned that my music habits would bother neighbors given my weird hours.These work great, sound great, and are comfortable.  I routinely wear them for 6-12 hours without removing them and they have not bothered me once.  My old set of wired headphones put too much pressure on my head and would start to ache after a few hours.  The spring in these is very gentle, and they cup your ears so they don't put pressure directly on the ear itself.I was planning to buy these at the higher $300+ price, but I paid $211, and as of the time of this writing they have gone down to $209.  I recently bought another set for our television, my son likes to play video games much too loud, and we have 3 headsets for the television, 1 headset for my computer, and two transmitters.  They have a great range within our 1700sf 2 story condo, and don't interfere with each other at all.Our neighbors have commented many times that they thought we were gone while watching a movie.  :-)
p1388
aVThese were easy to set up, and, they worked great, for 2 weeks. Yesterday, they shut off after 2 or 3 minutes, after many attempts to get them to work again, went to sennheisers web site.  I will admit, they made it easy to send in for repair. Even made out the shipping label for me.  So, they are off for repair, I have no idea how long that will take.UPDATE 1:  Received an Email from Sennheiser service center, the headphones have been received there. Given a repair number. Looks like Sennheiser is working to repair my headphones, will update when I know more.UPDATE 2:  I received my headphones back from Sennheiser yesterday, Nov, 19th. they are working perfectly. One reason it took so long, their repair faculty is in Connecticut, and was shut down for more then a week because of lack of power from "sandy".  I am now happy with my headphones, and give them and Sennheiser a 4.5 star ranking.UPDATE 3:  It is now almost the end of January 2013, and the headphones have been perfect since i received them back in nov.  I would say I am pleased with my purchase.
p1389
aVI have this item for more than 9 months and I am using it every day. I am extremely happy with the sound quality and product quality in general. I recommend it!
p1390
aVI spent two weeks deciding on a new head phone and finally decided on this.My biggest concern is the quality and the potential for interference.I wanted to buy RS 220, but decided against after hearing bad review on interferrence.On the RS 180, interferrence occurs occasionally, but is tolerable in general. Interferrence is worse when I walk next to the micro wave (obviously) or if I am in intense gaming over the wifi, but usually it is not too bad.Quality wise, at first I thought the head phone is aweful because the sound would fade in and out slowly and constantly. (as in becoming loud slightly for a while then becoming quiet slightly, in a periodic fashion). This went away after I bought a DAC to the headphone to. I am surprised that with such an expensive headphone it didn't come with it's own DAC and you needed to actually go but an external one. I got the sound blaster x-fi 5.1 for around 55$.the bottom line is, if you have a good receiver, this head phone works. sounds better than my wired low-end image s4, but does not sound so good that would blow me away.
p1391
aVThis is a great wireless product with excellent sound but it has one really annoying issue.  For some inexplicable reason the manufacturer has decided to have the front on/off green light on the transmitter blink constantly every few seconds while the transmitter is transmitting.  Since the transmitter is located in your peripheral vision while watching TV the blinking light is really distracting.  BTW: Don't expect these to be a substitute for a good surround sound system.  Although the dialogue through the headphones is clearer, you really do lose the surround sound effect.  Also, the batteries that come with the unit take forever to charge.  I tossed them out and replaced them with the ones that are listed as accessories here on Amazon and they work great.*** 19 months after purchase: Watching Transformers DSOTM 3D, action sequence.  All the impact sound effects turned into static.  Put my old wired Sony MDR 7506 on and the static went away and the sound was great.  Tried the wireless phones on regular programming and they seemed to be okay again.  Will test with other source material and repost...
p1392
aVUpgrading from my Sennheiser RS120s. Great to watch TV at night when everyone else goes to bed. My old RS120 was great but a little annoying having to tune the frequency in at times and it would get static if you turned your head wrong.  The RS180 has excellent sound quality when the volume to the TV is set to 0. Because of the slight time delay due to signal processing the sound of a faint dog barking like sound can be heard when the TV sound is able to be heard along with the head phone sound.  To Sennheiser's credit this is noted on their website.  One thing I liked about the RS120 was that you did not have to turn the power on to the headphone stand.  The RS180 requires you to press a button on the base for a second and one on the headset for a second.  On the plus side the RS180 does not hit you with eye popping static when the sound signal on the TV is not present when a movie is paused for a few seconds.  Overall, the upgrade to the RS180 was worth it, the digital sound quality is great.  I daisy chained the old RS120 base off the RS180 base for a second headset for another evening viewer when needed.
p1393
aVI am hearing impaired.  With the surround sound, I can hear the words more clearly with them on.  Best headphones I have ever used.  Sennheiser is the best.
p1394
aVI have a pair of Sennheiser HD 580's that are wired, and I keep tripping over & tearing the wires. I've replaced 3 sets already and to top it off, I sat on them awhile back and broke the headband. It was time to go shopping for a new pair. I researched wireless and chose these due to the KLEER technology, the ratings and the ability to mate up to 4 pair to the base. Another great feature is the audio pass through port, so I don't have to tie up another audio out from my devices. I am hard of hearing and am always struggling to understand TV dialogue, but with these on, vocals are crystal clear and I no longer need to turn on closed captions. These cans are extremely quiet, I have not experienced any background noise at all and am able to roam around the house freely with no drop in sound quality. They play way too loud for me, so I've not turned them up as far as they will go. Sound great with music and have a very natural sound. If you are into OTT bass response, aka BEATS, these are not for you. If you like music the way it SHOULD be heard, then I recommend these.
p1395
aVHaving had mixed experiences with wireless headphones in the past (including an older set of Sennheisers), I was a little skeptical when I ordered these. However, I am very happy with them. The set-up is dead easy, the sound is terrific, they are comfortable to wear.My only quibble is with the range. I used these first in an office environment with a very open floorplan. I didn't have the chance to test the full '300 range claimed, but I never had any dropouts. I recently brought these home, and the experience is a little different. Our house is a bi-level that is '48 long. The headset transmitted is on the lower level at one end, and the signal doesn't reach reliably to the bedroom on the upper floor at the other end. To be fair, we have two wireless networks as well as cordless phones so it might be an interference issue. But if you are planning to try these for roaming all around a big house you might have problems.But when you are in range, the sound is really terrific, with no hiss or interference. They really do sound like a good set of wired phones.
p1396
aVWell, I've had to update my earlier, glowing five star review.The headphones worked great for a while, then the audio started dropping out. I contacted Sennheiser, and they quickly responded with an email explaining how to re-associate the headphones and base unit. Their instructions were clear, and I was able to get the phones working properly.Unfortunately, now the headphones and base lose their association every time I use them, usually within the first few minutes. Five minutes into my listening session, the audio drops out, and I have to re-associate again.It's very frustrating, and it's a particular shame because it's otherwise a very good product. The buttons are small as other reviewers have mentioned, but that doesn't bother me. The sound and range are excellent.I still gets LOTS of use and enjoyment out of these headphones. It's just annoying to have to spend 30 seconds to re-pair them every time I use them.
p1397
aVI bought this RS 180 headphone set to replace an old RS 140 set that I have had for six years but which are wearing out. The new set is superior in important ways: very nice design, much less interference from WiFi, much greater range, excellent sound quality, and improved Automatic Level Control for better speech intelligibility. I use them for watching TV with my wife so I can adjust the sound level to my liking without disturbing her. The more open ear cup design allows exterior sounds to be heard better (like comments from my wife, phone calls, etc.). My only nit-pick is that there is a delay in the sound arriving at the headphones through the system as compared to the direct air pathway -- others have commented on this as well. The result is an echo-like effect, particularly for sharp sounds (gun shots, clicks, etc.). It is much less noticeable for continuous speech, music, and background sounds. The delay is not so great that lip synch is lost in watching and listening. Despite the nit-pick, I am very pleased with this headphone set.
p1398
aVI have trouble listening to TV or Movies when sound levels are set to 'normal'. My preferred listening mode is set at above normal. This of course causes audio problems for others. Investigating into wireless sound transmission led me to Sennheiser and their wares and the RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphone System is my answer. The ouput and sound amplification is about as good as can be and the audio-out connections from the source are simple.The quick reference guide booklet is a bit short but all needed info is found on the supplied CD. My receiver is not the latest so I had to wire into the TV Audio Out to the RS 180 Transmitter and its output to my receiver. All necessary wires are supplied and all works perfectly. The reception works all through the house which is all I need. The ear pads do get a little warm but they are comfortable. The controls leave something to be desired, too tiny and I'm sure Sennheiser will address this in later models. For what this system does for me, I would highly recommend the RS 180.
p1399
aVI have been a Sennheiser fan for years and bought my dad the RS130 but wasn't really impressed with their sound since they sounded like other wireless headphones I have tried which were also not good.  I bought the RS180s for $230 and I'm glad I did.  They sound great!!  I use them in my apartment when I want to listen to my stock shows after work but also want to be getting stuff done like dishes, clothes, that require me to go from room to room.  They really free you up to multitask.  I also like them because my girlfriend can be talking on the phone beside me and I can just pop on these bad boys and watch my shows and sports.  Oddly enough I was watching a basketball game the other day with them and I could hear more background noises (like players cursing) than you can listening to it over speakers.  I have an expensive set of Polk Audio speakers and was kinda surprised at some of the extra stuff I was missing. They are very comfortable and the charger stand is also pretty tight.  I would definitely buy these again.
p1400
aVI have some hearing problems so I have some wife problems also.Had a Sony line of sight product,thought was great at first but needed something for news when I was in kitchen or other rooms.I enjoy a good movie also. WOW these are great now I can hear all the sounds I had forgotten that where in movies the sounds in nature, bugs, water, wind, I get them all now.I was concerned about being refurbished not any more could tell no difference from new. For money saved I will do again.Yes they are pricey at lest for me.They are very comfey seem strudy enough.Yes there is a echo if you have tv volume louder than head set but why would you do this.Yes they will cut out standing next to running microwave oh well no biggey just step back one step. If have your TV so loud that everyone else can not hear anything but your show you need these.They also work as a wife cancelling devise but be perpared for the pillow to head hopfully not somthing harder. My wife is very happy for me and her with this purchase and so am I. Enjoy.
p1401
aVThese are excellent quality headphones with an amazingly faithful sound. They are a joy to use. The big issue I have keeping me from giving them 5 stars is that it is a royal pain to get them to recognize their transmitter each time you turn them on to use them. I constantly get frustrated holding them next to the transmitter and holding the "on" button until, after many attempts, they finally lock on. My several previous pairs of headsets were not Sennheisers and were not of this quality, but the moment you lifted them off of their cradle and put them on, they worked. There was no switch on the headsets that you had to fool with to get them to work. It is a shame that these beautiful headsets are tarnished by being frustrating to turn on and use. Plus the power switch on the headset is poorly placed so that it is not possible to turn them on and off while on your head. Once married with the transmitter, they are great.
p1402
aVI bought these in March of 2013.  I was debating between the Sony MDR-DS6000  and the Seinnheiser RS 180.  the Sony's are sitting pretty at $500 and I know sony's name but decided to go with these for less than half the price.  I don't know what the Sony sounds is like, but these are INCREDIBLE.  I have a 7000 sq ft house and it doesn't really matter where I go as long as there isn't more than 1 wall between me and the receiver I can hear completely crystal clear sound.  As far as style, I like the style of these, they don't look like some of the other "clunky"  Wireless headphones that I looked at.  The ONLY con that I would mention (And I'm not sure it even is a con)  Is the headband itself seems like it could break over time, If your careful with them I think they will be perfectly fine, just don't let a young child use them.  overall I would rate these a 10 out of 10!!  great product for the money.
p1403
aVWell,I received the product on time...Wow!  the sound on this momma is pure quality! All wireless headphone company wanna bee's should use this product as their BENCHMARK!(in this Genre of Wireless headphones...of course).  Easy installation, although a bit confusing and difficult to connect via receiver/amplifier....but, other than that, the input audio on the RS 180 is a breeze.  I would give it a 5 star...but, the buttons on the headphone is somewhat retarted?....its sooooo small and a little difficult to play with....I wish they made the buttons come out protruding so as to make it more tactile friendly.  The buttons are not spaced in a way, that sometimes you end up pushing the power button.  Nevertheless, This is an awesome product and if one day...Sennheiser decided to re-invent this product(make sure they separate the buttons on the earphone from left to right)....I would definitely buy it again!Your on my A list Sennheiser!  Achtung!!
p1404
aVSuperb set of cordless digital headphones. Would have been nice to have seen a socket on them so they could be used as regular corded phones if you really wanted to, but that's nitpicking. With decent CD rips or downloads, all you need are a pair of these and your iPod/iPhone to have top-quality audio.Bear in mind these are digital cans so the A->D / D->A conversion causes a slight delay of about 20-50ms. This might annoy you if for example you're using them to listen to the TV while the TV speaker is on loud enough for you to hear it in the background, beause you'll hear a pre-echo from the TV's speaker. They are probably also unsuitable for use in a home recording studio, because for example if you use them to listen to a backing-track while recording your vocals, the delay will put your vocals 50ms out of sync with the backing track.But for the remaining 99.9% of us, these are probably perfection.
p1405
aVThese wireless headphones are extremely comfortable and the sound quality is excellent. They're well worth the price.I ended up getting two pairs, one for me and one for my spouse. And that's where they lost their fifth star. Two sets of headphones with two base stations doesn't work perfectly all the time. Once in a while, the signals will get confused; suddenly I'll be hearing her base station's signal and she'll be hearing mine. Or sometimes my base station will "take over" and we'll both hear it. Or hers will.Resyncing the headphones to base stations is fairly awkward, too. You have to hold down the power buttons on both, wait a few minutes, and hope it all worked out right. It would be easier if there was a "sync" button or something.Overall, I'm very happy with these. I can live with the occasional glitch for the comfort and quality they offer otherwise. Would buy again.
p1406
aVMy wife was looking for a better set of wireless headphones to use with audio books as she works around the house.  We purchased these based on the positive reviews and technical information but when they arrived and she started using them the range was quite limited compared to the 320 feet specified in the product description.  I realize the range is dependent upon the area where the transmitter and receiver are used but the signal cuts out at 60 feet from the transmitter when my wife walks with the headphones from our computer room to the back yard of our single family home.These are otherwise a quality product with exceptional construction and clarity of reception; until the signal is lost; but the short transmission distance with no apparent interference in our area is a problem.  Without the range limitation I would give these 5 stars; we are going to keep and use them; just not outside the house.
p1407
aVOnly downside are the controls, everything else is fantastic. Sound is unbelievable and the comfort (velours earpads) is perfect for me.Definitely hate the volume buttons but I got used to it by first locating the power (mute) button.Had the RS 120 before but returned them.Considered RS 170 as well but the open design and the better sound of the 180's won me over. Ear cushions much better than on the 170's.180 are an open design and I like to hear when the door rings while watching TV.They do not cancel outside noise at all but on the other hand the sound is much better than the 170's.Overall I consider the RS 180 the best wireless headphones until Sennheiser makes absolutely necessary changes to the control layout.Again, what was Sennheiser thinking when signing of on the controls? Probably nothing, it's a real shame, however, everything else is pretty much greatboth for Music and Movies.
p1408
aVI'm using this to watch tv with and I'm very pleased with the sound quality. With this pair of headphones I can hear much more, the level of details and focus I'm getting in the tv watching experience is similar to, if not more than the experience of watching movies in a movie theater. I also love the fact that I can walk around the house to get something else done without missing out what's going on in the tv show. I love being able to hear the tv so clearly when watching tv at night.I've tried watching tv for over four hours with this pair of headphones on, and my ears nor head didn't complain. The only reason I'm not giving 5 stars is that I wish I could still lie down on the couch while watching tv, I wish there will be a headphone model that has great sound for tv watching while also can let us enjoy the couch, as a full experience.5 stars for the detailed sound.
p1409
aVI needed a good wireless headphone for watching TV while exercising on a treadmill.  Bought this based on the reviews in Amazon.  It sounds good but a little bit flat.  I have a 25 year old Koss wired headphone which sounds almost the same.  That one I bought for 25 dollars.  So go figure.  However, this does its job.  My issues with the headphone system are: 1) I cannot make it a wired headphone if I am travelling on an airplane, 2) Does not have bluetooth capability.  For a headphone in this price range these 2 should be a must.In terms of range, etc.  I do not seem to have any issues with loss of signal...  I do agree with other reviewers about the controls, these are terrible locations.  Even after 2 weeks of using them, I cannot "feel" them to use it without taking the headphones off.
p1410
aVI have been waiting on getting a wireless headset for awhile. This is my second pair of Sennheiser headphones and I am a big fan. These headphones are light, easy to use and work very well. I play starcraft and team fortress video games and love using these headphones. I am constantly walking around the house now with them jammin to music while doing house stuff. Definitely worth the 220$4 months later UPDATE ::::: The quality of the headphones has not changed. My biggest complaint is that I have moved my computer to another room and am no longer using a wired connection. I am using WIFI for my computer now and it is interfering with my headset almost constantly. This is a big deal and something you should be concerned with. I am going to buy a new router that is 5ghz signal so it will not be on the same frequency as my headset. Will update afterwards accordingly.
p1411
aVThese headphones have partially open exterior porting, so I can hear the phone ring, a doorbell, etc.Being somewhat hearing compromised, particularly with regard to speech recognition, I need speakers close to my ears to get the dialog in TV and movies. The RS 180 allows me to hear the media as well as not acting as tarmac ear protection.I can retire my fully enclosed Pioneer headphones after 45 years. With the fully enclosed style, someone could break in, rip me off and leave without me noticing.If you want to hear a media source without being isolated from your surroundings, and have the $ for the RS 180 or RS 220, I would recommend giving them a try.I took off 1 star because I have not run the headphones through all of the tests that I need to do before being certain. They are a bit pricey for the masses, but getting exactly what I want usually is.
p1412
aVI love the sound produced by the Sennheiser Rs 180 headphones, but the button placement holds them back from earning 5 stars. They sound great, picking up everything well, from voices to explosions. The bass is also pretty good. There is absolutely none of the hiss that I have experienced with the other two brands of wireless headphones that I have tried out. They are also comfortable to wear, and conveniently docked on the transmitter. Unfortunately, the controls are poorly placed. The buttons are all too small. The power button is ridiculously located between the up volume button and the down volume button. The left/right balance buttons are placed right next to the other buttons, when they should be isolated, as this feature is commonly not used nearly as much as the volume is adjusted. Overall, a very good product with some frustrating and puzzling design features.
p1413
aVFor the most part, I love these headphones.  The sound is excellent.  They are incredibly comfortable; I've owned a number of high end headphones, and these are the first pair I can wear for hours without any issue.  I also love that you can pair a second set to the same base station for a reasonable price.  My wife and I use them to watch movies after our baby has gone to sleep, and that feature is great.I have one issue with them though, both the base station and the headphones have a power button that is used for three different operations.  This one button is used to turn the power on and off, pair headphones, and switch between sending the signal just to the master set or to all the headsets that are paired.  Similarly the light that should be indicating if they are powered on flashes various morse code signals that tell you what mode it is in.
p1414
aVBest money ever spent!  love to watch tv after putting the kids to bed and this is a great way to watch.  able to select a volume that suits my needs and they feel comfortable.  we have a pair so we both can listen at the same time, at different sound levels. the batteries last a long time, but it would be nice to have a second charger just incase you forget to charge a pair and you end up with both sets drained.  you could just put in fresh batteries if youre in a jam.  so far I've been able to rotate charging them and haven't had to worry about batteries being dead.  The range is great, they work all over the house and even in the garage while I'm listening and trying to do chores at the same time.  you can even attach a mp3 device to the transmitter and listen to music.  they only negative is that there is no hdmi connection.
p1415
aVWorks very well. Sound is clear and crisp. Good bass response. Great for late night movies or early morning cartoons. There is a delay in signal processing so it will be frustrating to use in a music band setting, however if listening to the radio or CD/mp3,  it is perfect. Watching movies is varied. The delay is minor and seems to depend on the source, however it is not is bad as the old chinese karate / kung fu movies.2 - 3 mins into the movie, you'll forget that the delay was even there.Definitely getting another set and tuning to a different frequency for a second alternate listening source. You can buy extra headphones to allow more than one person to join in.The range is good too. It allows freedom to move all over the house and yard.The open back can give others a clue to what you are listening to.
p1416
aVPurchased these online looking for a clear sounding  wireless headphone.  Virtually no hissing which has been a problem with wireless headphones in the past, and a full clear sound.  They could use a little bass boost, but overall I'm happy with the sound quality.  Also, was able to add connect a second set, sharing the same transmission, which allows me and my son to watch movies late at night while the rest of the family sleeps.  I have minor complaints about the power buttons on the headphones which is nestled in between the volume up/down.  It's a little difficult to find in the dark until you have the headphones long enough to get used to the power button location.  Also, the power button must be held for 1/2 second to 1 second to turn power off.  Initially this caused us to inadvertently leave the headphones on
p1417
aVThese perform amazingly well for my purposes which are to listen to TV by blocking out piano practice, or to watch after hours when it seems people can hear the TV better upstairs in their rooms better than I can right there in the living room.  The range is great, I have not lost signal anywhere in our house, even on second floor, garage or outside on patio.  I have no experience with Senheiser's other models but the HDR-180 has surpassed my expectations with no noticeable static or other interference sounds.  These are high quality and very comfortable.  My kids have also now begun to use when playing PS4 which is something I didn't consider but is also very nice not to compete with that noise.  I did buy the warranty and like that peace of mind, but seeing the product now? I don't expect I will need it.
p1418
aVThe headphones are comfortable, the sound quality is great, and the range is great.  Balance control is a nice touch.  The build quality seems to be great.  The base looks like a futuristic gadget, and I like gadgets!As an engineer, I think the process of pairing the headphones to the base could have been designed to be much easier.  I don't really like the fact that I have to manually turn the headphones and the base on after they both go to sleep.  And the buttons on the headphones are pretty much unusable when you're wearing the headphones.  Personally, I control my volume through my A/V receiver anyway since my TV only has digital outputs, and the headphone base only has an analog input.  I think for the price, the unit could have been designed to take digital inputs (coax or optical or both).
p1419
aVTHIS HEADSET IS FOR MY WIFE WHO A A LITTLE HEARING THE TV . THIS PRODUCT WAS EASY TO ASSEMBLE, AND IT SURE LOOKS GOOD. THE SOUND IS PERFECT. WE PLAN TO HAVE THIS HEADSET FOR A LONG TIME SO I BOUGHT EXTRA RECHARAGABLE BATTERIES AND CHARGER. I MUST SAY THIS HEADSET REALLY LOOKS GREAT. I FEEL IF ANYONE NEEDS TO GET A HEADSET, THIS ONE IS WORTH THE MONEY, AND YOU WILL NOT BE SORRY. I,M GOING TO DO THE SAME THING TO THE BUTTONS THAT SOMEONE ELSE HAS DONE. THE BUTTONS ARE FLAT SO I,M GOING TO PUT A DROP OF GLUE ON EACH BUTTON , SO MY WIFE CAN FEEL THE BUTTONS. MAYBE SENNHEISER CAN FIND A WAY TO FIX THIS LITTLE PROBLEM, YOU NEED TO FEEL THE BUTTONS. I ALSO FEEL THE ON AND OFF BUTTON SHOULD BE BY ITSELF, NOT BETWEEN THE UP AND DOWN VOLUME BUTTONS. THIS HEADSET STILL GETS 5STARS.
p1420
aVI received these wireless headphones as a gift and like them.  The lower star rating is due to my perception that the frequency response and dynamics of the music were somewhat muffled compared to high quality speakers.  Overall, I like them a lot and their comfort, mobility and quality is excellent.  To serious audiophiles, they may not make the grade, but for the majority of listeners, they'll be a great way to appreciate music while doing other activities.My only recommendations for improvement would be easier to use controls on the ear cups and longer transmitting range, but that may be limited by FCC regulations.  All in all, I would recommend them to anyone who wants a way to enjoy audio content while on the go around the house or workplace.
p1421
aVAs a wireless headphone, this is the one with the best reception that I ever encountered. No matter what type of wireless technology used. As a high end stereo headphone, it sounds a little "boxy/echoy".The weight of the headphone is good and comfortable to wear. The battery life is amazing, two AAA Eneloop battery is included , last for a long time.Meant to give it only four stars but that might seem unfair because I was comparing to HD650 which cost almost twice the $$, plus this device has some budget has to invest in wireless circuitry.The clean wireless sound beats every one of my BT  or analog/digital. It ranges to every corners in the house no matter how many walls inbetween. Open range is about 40-50 ft.
p1422
aVIt is a fantastic set and elegant design. It looks good with your decor. Althought is made out of plastic it's sturdy enough to last a long time. It's is not the best sounding option but it depends on the sound source. For everyday late night tv listening is great and the range is more than sufficient; you don't need to be 300 feet away. Stay away from microwave ovens, it will affect it. As far as wi fi interference at least in my home it is not a problem and we have the 90 mbits service so the signal is strong. Although some what pricey in comparison with another set I have that costs half the price and it is 7.1 surround and by far is a better sounding pair. It's the Logitech g930 7.1 surround and you can get it for around $125.00.
p1423
aVI think that theses headphones are absolutely Awesome.I have surround sound.but my wife is always yelling at me to turn it down,i wanted the open end phones so if someone really wanted me i could hear them.but never did i expect them to sound like this.I would many times turn my head thinking someone else was in the room or a whisper from the movie and it would startle me because it sounded like the whisper was right in my ear. I hear things that i do not normally hear.they are absolutely unbelievable once you get used to them its hard to take them off.YOU WILL NEVER REGRET THEM.they sound better then my surround and my surround is not cheap .man let me tell you you are in the movie with theses phones..
p1424
aVThe two main reasons I purchased  these phones were for sound range and because they were Sennheisers. I,ve had sennheisers before and was always pleased with the quality. I can walk around the house and on my back deck and still get great sound and no loss of signal and no hiss. I must admit the sale price encouraged me to purchase  a lititle earlier than I expected, but I glad I did. The only reason I gave them a four star is because they were not  bluetooth, which  I did know but was not a big factor but would have been nice. Comfortable  to ware, great battery life, and nice looking. I bought these mainly for music and not for watching TV, not that you can't. I'm pleased and think you will be too.
p1425
aVThe reception is very clear.  There is no sound delay with the picture but I run the phones from the fixed audio output of the Comcast Cable Box.  .I have less acute hearing in the left ear vs. the right so a big advantage of these phones over the other Sennheiser wireless line is the ability to adjust the right-left volume balance to accommodate this problem.  The phone design is open so if you can't mute the TV speakers when using the phones, you will hear that sound as well, which degrades clarity.  It is possible to get around this by physically blocking the vents with a material of your choice.  The closed designed Sennheiser 170s unfortunately do not have right-left volume adjustment.
p1426
aVI bought this gadget from amazon back in october 2011 for $219.00it has given me lots of joy hearing hours,the sound it's almost perfect,I can be anywhere in my apt and won't lose signal.great for watching movies in sorround mode,nice to listen to your tunes,I've been wanting to get another set but amazon raised the price to $253.00fortunately,I found them for $209.00 somewhere else,Amazon lost my business on this one,lol.they say they have better prices than anybody else,but it's not always true.UPDATE Jan 7,2012it's unbelievable how amazon keeps raising the price on this thing,now it's $329.00 I don't think anybody is buying from them right now,Amazon do something about this.
p1427
aVThere is a bright blue multi-function LED on the right side of the headphones that flashes to provide information about contact with the base transmitter. Problem is that once the headphones and transmitter are docked and working well the LED flashes every five seconds. It can't be stopped. If you watch TV or videos with room with low light this is IMPOSSIBLY ANNOYING to a person on your right and potentially even to yourself as the LED is so bright that it reflects off walls and is visible all around. This is a ridiculous design error for a $200 headset.Aside from this, and the tiny control buttons on the headphones, these are easy to use and sound is great.
p1428
aVAll the 5-star ratings for the RS 180 are true. I have been missing so much good sound coming through the digital cable signal.  I have a big phat sound bar that is top of the line, but does not compare to the detail and clarity you get with these headphones.  Worth every penny, the RS 180 lets me listen to my favorite bands as loud as I want without disturbing anyone, or anyone disturbing me for that matter.  My wife likes the volume down low, too low for me, and I have excellent hearing. Now I can hear everything loud and clear.  The distance rating is accurate as well.  I can go outside and still hear everything crystal clear.  What are you waiting for?  Get 'em!
p1429
aVThis headphone may have saved my marriage.  We can now watch television together with both of us having the volume level to our liking.  My wife uses the television volume; I use the headphones.  They don't block out all external noise so we can still converse.  Yes, they are a bit expensive.  Yes, they are worth it.  Easy to install and easy to move.  The one thing that would make my rating five stars is this:  The buttons on the bottom of the right ear piece are flush with the rest of the case.  This make it very difficult to raise or lower the volume or (my favorite button) to press the mute button.  A small engineering change would make this headphone perfect.
p1430
aVI discovered I liked these for a different reason than I bought them. My wife and I bought these so one of us could watch tv while the other read, in out apartment. Turns out one can hear what the other is listening to. Still, it's an improvement over no head phones. I have not noticed a lag between actors' lips moving and the sound track of their speech. And I've discovered some shows are enhanced by using headphones. I recently watched Band of Brothers. With the headphones on, the effect of the sound engineering was much more immersive: I could hear incoming mortar shells launching from my right, whistling passing me, then detonating just behind me to the left.
p1431
aVThe sound quality of these headphones is excellent! Great highs and superb lows. Super easy to set up right out of the box. The range is awesome! It travels through walls (Brick and steel) like they're not even there, without losing a beat. I went as far as walking across the street to my neighbors house and they were still crystal clear.  Extremely comfortable even after wearing them for hours. I would truly recommend these to friends and family without hesitation. They are a bit expensive, but once you try them, you will see that they are worth every penny. No interference what-so-ever with router of the same frequency.  Bottom line...great product!  "Rico"
p1432
aVI can easily wear those for hours without sacrificing any mobility or dealing with heavy wires that get in the way. I also own the Sennheiser HD-280 Pro and noticed no sacrifice in sound quality or bass when listening to Rock or Pop music with 180s so that's all good. My only complaint is a mildly annoying hiss sound that manifests while listening to quiet conversations in movies with intermittent moments of silence in between; instead of complete silence I hear a hiss sound that goes away once the conversation is back on.I highly recommend those for listening to music but proceed with caution if they're supposed to be your movie night headphones.
p1433
aVI used several different wireless headsets for my tv but these are by far the best I used, most of the other ones were hissing or static sound and way too big to wear and couldnt adjust the headset enough for a good fit, I got one from this company and couldn't believe how good they sounded but problem was the battery's were not rechargeable or couldn't be recharged from the base so I got this one and it's even better. For me the sound is fantastic and love the way the headset fits,  I got a second pair of  the headset because it allows you to use more than one headset at the same time. I love watching tv at night and now I don't disturb anyone at home.
p1434
aVI had these headphones in my amazon cart for over a year debating whether or not to spend the money on these...they are not inexpensive.  However, after finally saying "screw it", I splurged and bought the things....only question I have now is, "why didn't I buy these babies a year ago?!" The sound quality is awesome for wireless headphones and this set is unbelievably comfortable.  I have a few pairs of "cheapies" that destroy my ears after 30 minutes of using them.  With the RS 180's I wore them for 4 hours watching tv, fell asleep with them on for about 4 more hours, and woke up with no pain at all.  Worth every penny!!
p1435
aVI am returning my second RS-180 wireless.  Amazon's warranty is only a month, and the problem this time took five months to manifest itself.  The units are very good when they work, but they cost too much to have the problems I have encountered. The first pair arrived and never worked/never charged up.  I tried different batteries, no dice.  Returned that set for a working pair, and I was very happy with it till it quit working.  Second pair does not charge properly.  I now have to deal with Sennheiser directly to see if they will stand behind their product or not.  I am quite hard of hearing so this is a significant matter in my household.
p1436
aVI have hearing aids and was expecting more volume. But, I discovered that I can get the volume with wearing over the aids after I adjust the aids down, however, unfortunately, I do not then get the beautiful sound/tone the set gives w/o wearing over the aids. I also find the adjustment buttons, other than the volume up, are too small and these are used often because of the sound level from ads to and from the programs.  I still have some difficulty with the balance buttons after two months.  They are clear sounding and I now hear ads that I heard before but never knew what they said clearly.  Also, movies are clear .....thank you...
p1437
aVI wear these while I walk on a treadmill.  It was so noisy I had to turn up the TV and it disturbed my family so I upgraded from the RS120 to this. I like the sound quality better and there is less noise and drop out of sound, however the top of the head band of the RS120 was more comfortable and had more cushion.  There are VERY small buttons to control volume and difficult to locate-extremely user unfriendly.  I would like these if they had the thumb wheel volume control or a more obvious method of changing volume but the clarity of the wireless system makes up for that.  I did not feel it was worth 2x the price of the RS120.
p1438
aVExcellent sound, comfort and construction.  Enjoyed the first set so much I purchased a second for our winter home.  Only negative comment (and then not so much) is that the on/off button on the headphone can't be located by feel.  So I followed the advice of another Amazon purchaser and epoxied a small plastic dome on it (Find a common pin with a 1/8" plastic ball for a head and grind it down to a hemisphere.  Pull it off the pin and epoxy it to the button.  Rough up the button surface first for good adhesion).  My second set has now survived being cooped up in the house in Arizona 115 degree heat without ill effects.
p1439
aVI live in an apt and respect my neighbors plus I am hard of hearing so this allows me and my wife to set the volume where we want it w/o disturbing our neighbors but more importantly, each other! They are comfortable to wear for long periods and the sound is good. My biggest beef is that the headphones become unpaired every couple of weeks and it is really beyond annoying.  Also the button location and design need improvement as you can change the volume if the headphones rest on a pillow and while the off/on button has a bump to locate it w/o looking there are NO tactile bumps for the up and down volume buttons.
p1440
aVThe sound quality is very good with this pair of headphones, and I like the ability to adjust the balance given that i have hearing loss in one ear.On the downside, after 3 months of use, I still find the button controls to be an absolute pain and have to take the headphones off my ears every time I need to make an adjustment.The sound volume is not as high as my HDR 130 headphone set and, of course, I much prefer the controls on the HDR 130.I also purchased the HDR 120 a year ago. I'll not make that mistake twice--very poor quality compared to the HDR 130 in my opinion.
p1441
aVI read these reviews ahead of buying these and was worried about wifi interference.  Rationalizing that these are primarily for late-night movie watching, I risked it and am so glad I did!  I'm writing this with my laptop right between the headphones and receiver-- all my downloads as as fast as ever, no problems at all.As far as sound quality, they're outstanding just like everyone said.  I'm a very stingy person and expected buyer's remorse for $200+ on headphones but it's worth every cent to not have the hassle and crap quality of the Bose and Sony's, respectively.  Sennheiser's got a loyal fan!
p1442
aVThis is an awesome set of headphones! The surround sound is amazing with these and the battery life is actually not bad at all as it lasts a good amount of time before charging it.  The set up with your receiver is actually quite simple and looks nice having it in your living room.  We have a baby who we don't want to wake up when watching a tv show or a movie, so with this, it makes a loud action movie so quite in a living room.  Love it that you can hook up additional headphones to one receiver!  I wish I bought this when we lived in a small condo so we don't wake up the neighbors!
p1443
aVThey are very comfortable to wear, I can walk around my house without loosing contact.  The self-tuning is worth the money you pay for these.  I do not like the volume control because you cannot tell if the volume half way or all the way to the top...  I am hearing impaired and I have to use heaphones to watch TV so I do not disturb neighbors with my very loud volume, so I probably already use these at the top volume... I do hope I will be able to hear well with them for years to come... I hope a headphone manufacturer is developping a headset that can go even louder than these...
p1444
aVWorks Flawlessly and as easy as plugging it in. Delivered early too \u2013 sound is outstanding \u2013 sounds like you are in a theater yet you can carry on a conversation \u2013 and I have about 40% hearing loss. I can finally make out what is being said on TV even over their annoying overly loud music.Have a 3800SqFt home and no dead spots inside - nor outside for that matter, and this is through thick rock walls!The battery lasts a very long time - but back-up batteries can easily be switched if necessary - and inexpensive at that.I would highly recommend this product.
p1445
aVAlready had another Sennheiser model headset for 7+ years.  My daughter liked it so much that she recently purchased a less expensive brand that quickly got returned. For Xmas she asked for a set like mine.  I decided to buy her the RS 180 and she ABSOLUTELY loves it!  She jogs on the treadmill with it and is fits comfortably on her ears, charges easily and quickly PLUS, it blocks any background noise.  Would highly recommend to buy this one.  If my old one is to brake down, which NEVER has had any problem, I would buy this model. Best Xmas present I ever bought her!!
p1446
aVI have had a number of different headphones over the past few years and these are the best headphones I've come across - PLUS they are wireless. We got them for our office (we share an office with another company with about 70 employees and they have terrible taste) and they are super easy to set up, easy to charge, and the sound quality is the best I've heard for any headphones I've owned - I've had Beats, I've had other Sennheiser HD's, I've had uncomfortable Bose noise-blockers, I've had them all.Definitely recommend for the office and for home.
p1447
aVAmazing wireless headphones ! I used cheap ones until these and was always moving my head to get a static free reception. I wanted to upgrade and what a difference ! NO STATIC at all ! Perfect sound, almost so perfect, I look around sometimes when watching a movie thinking I heard it in the house !They are extremely light weight, very agreeable to wear, you can lay down and rest your head on the couch without risking to touch the buttons.I use these only to watch TV when the kids are sleeping, and they deliver.I definitely recommend them.
p1448
aVI read a lot from others here prior to ordering this but in my opinion this is an absolutely excellent product.  It suits my needs perfectly.  I do agree with whoever said the buttons for volume, mute, and balance on the earpiece can be tricky, but this amounts to a minor inconvenience at worst.  Someone, perhaps several, posted comments to the effect of interference or noise, etc., but I do not hear this.  I have used this set of headphones for two months now and I am totally satisfied.  I say this is well worth every cent I paid.  Well done, Sennheiser!
p1449
aVI am very pleased with the RS 180 headphones from Sennheiser, the sound quality is great. They fit comfortable and snug enough not to fall off easily. The only reason I did not give it five stars was the buttons on the headset are hard to locate and individualy operate unless you take them off. A strong suggestion I would also make to Sennheiser, for people like me who hate commercials, would be a handy mute button. As far as the main issue of sound quality and comfort I am very pleased and would recommend them {with a friendly warning about the buttons}.
p1450
aVReally good sound and comfortable, but range is mediocre.  It may be due to the wireless network in my house (which others seem to have identified as a source of interference) so I don't know whether to blame Sennheiser or not - in case it's helpful to anyone, I've got an Asus RT-N66u and I'm able to get maybe 20-25 ft of range, through two walls.  This isn't any better than the RS 120 that I previously owned, and in some ways is worse, as the sound cuts out completely when the headphones are out of range (vs. the RS 120's analog signals, which didn't).
p1451
aVWhen a person starts to have hearing issues, they don't hear certain tones / frequencies well.  I know this as my husband had to turn up the tv to understand the sound.  It made it uncomfortable for me to sit in the same room for watching tv.  This headphone system has made it so we can all sit together again.  If I want to be in the same room and work on my paperwork without the distraction at all, we turn the tv all the way down and he can enjoy the show!  Now I just need another set  so I can roam the house while listening so I don't miss anything.
p1452
aVThese are The BEST headphones EVER.I have hearing loss in one ear and it's amazing how much of the movie I miss by not hearing all the converstaion.It was liking walking out of the optomitrist with my first pair of contacts. A whole new world.I haver rewatched movies (with my husband sleeping by my side) and now can't believe I'd missed so much of a movie that I thought I had heard!I rewatched Sherlock Holmes and it was Amazing to hear what I'd missed!Love them!
p1453
aVI upgraded  to these for my husband from the 120.  Probably the 170 would have worked just as well, but I was hoping my husband could hear me comment on what we were watching because they are open and the 170 are closed, but he still has to take off the headphone to hear me.  The 120 headphones stopped charging is the reason the the change.  So far my husband which is hard of hearing likes them but the small on button on the headphones are a small problem and he has to remember to turn them on at the base unit.  Other than that, they work fine.
p1454
aVThe sound quality is great.  I replaced the Sennheiser 120's and am very happy with it.  As with other reviews, the range is not going to be 300 ft, but it works well with in my 2 story house.  The only problem I have is when I walk around a center room fireplace or a wall which I know contains pipes.  The metal in the chimney or the pipes will block the reception.  This is a brief interruption as I walk past but noticeable.  That being said, I am still very happy with the headphones.  They are leaps and bounds better than their analog cousins.
p1455
aVI expected better for the price. The sound is good, but the volume range is limited. Both upper and lower. The controls could be a lot better. The buttons on the headset are very small and not designed well for by-feel operation, and they can be easily pressed by accident if you want to rest your head on something. The on/off controls for the base unit and headset need to be held for at least one second to work. Why, I don't know. You should be able to just press it and go. I also don't find them to be as comfortable to wear as was represented.
p1456
aVThese earphones are very good, especially for their price. While they are not cheap, they are an excellent start point for someone looking for good base and sound detail. My only complaint is that the range of the transmitter seems a bit limited. However I do have multiple wireless networked devices in my apartment. There are also six other wireless networks in my building. But in the same large room as my multimedia equipment the RS 180 work flawlessly. These earphones are getting older, but they are still around at great discounts.
p1457
aVSo far I love these things. They are comfy, and i haven't really had an issue with the volume buttons like everyone else. You know there are 3 buttons so I just know the way left one does one direction of volume. Pretty simpleSometimes takes a few seconds to connect, and only experienced an echo situation once, but otherwise the sound has been great. Playing video games with them has been pretty sweet too. Feels like im in the game. Just make sure no one sneaks up behind you, cant hear a thing when you're in these things.
p1458
aVI have put these phones to good use, such as listening to loud music and movies late at night, without bothering the others sleeping down the hall. The open backs do allow for someone next to you to hear a somewhat muted program and for you to hear conversation nearby. The fidelity is very good, however.  Another drawback, at least for my 75 foot rancher house, is that the range is limited to 50 feet or so, where it cuts out. 300 feet seems like a dream.  Still, it is a high quality product, albeit with less than hoped for utility.
p1459
aVI like every thing about the headphones except the controls are very difficult to use without removing the headphones to see where the buttons are located.  I've  been using a less expensive devise that need new foam "ear buds" often, and the headphones themselves had to be replaced after just a year or so.  I find it much more practical to spend a little more and have a product that performs better and is made to last a long time.  I would recommend this product to anyone having trouble hearing a TV set at normal volume levels.
p1460
aVThe Sennheiser headphones have worked flawlessly from the beginning.  The sound quality is superb and the comfortable  ear pieces are large enough to cover my hearing aids as well.  I no longer miss any dialogue if the voices are low and the speakers speak quietly. No longer do I have to increase the volume to hear my programs to the point where my wife, who watches a separate TV downstairs,, is disturbed.The Sennheiser Headphones are all I had hoped for, and more.  They have been the answer to all my TV viewing problems.
p1461
aVI have avoided wireless headphones due to previous disappointment many years ago...I shouldn't have waited so long!!!  These are the most accurate perfectly balanced headphones I've ever heard!One feature that I love is the open air cup. Typical enclosed cups create that strange feeling of isolation...these cup your ears but the cup isn't sealed...although could be issue for others in room - music is easily heard....they even come with rechargeable batteries - just place set on sending unit to charge!AWESOME!!!
p1462
aVI'm pleased and surprised at the quality of this wireless headset. Currently using on my computer with an Asus Xonar ST sound card. I plan to eventually move it to the TV for late night viewing (Will probably purchase a second set). Good range, bass is clean and tight; not overwhelming. Mids are rich with clean highs.Zero hiss which shocked me for a wireless headset. Can't tell the difference vs a wired set in that regard. Overall I'm kind of blown away at the sound quality when you consider this is a wireless headset.
p1463
aVI am a professional musician and have an obsession with finding good earphones.  I spend so much time at the computer, I wanted wireless earphones what were high fidelity.  Very hard to find.  Blue tooth sounds terrible to me.  I run my iMac audio out through a high end DAC and from the DAC into the Sennheiser....and it's just awesome!!  Very 3D, great detail, and the headphones are very light weight and I forget they are on....great product!
p1464
aVBought this to replace a couple of supermarket wireless headphones (costs around AUD$35 each pairs).They headphones were "shipito" and arrived in Brisbane Australia sound and safe two weeks after ordering. USPS all the way, no drama. 2 headphones and 1 base station costed around AUD$430 including forward shipping cost, a saving of around AUD$150 plus shipping. Great deal and thank you Amazon.The 7 seconds sync when powering up to activate the second headpohne is easy to do and is documented in the user guide.
p1465
aVSound is great, comfort is EXTRAORDINARY.I could wear these wireless headphone for the entire day without taking them off.In comparison to the bose noise cancelling that everyone brags about, these are WAY more comfortable and the sound is plenty for the average listener.Not to mention, the price is also very good for what you are getting.In the $200 - $400 price range I would choose these every time. Unless you want to jump up to $500 and more, get these headphones.
p1466
aVGeneral feedback: Overall, I would not recommend this product.Sound quality:  Good / No staticTransmission distance: Poor - Sound cuts in and out 20 feet awayBattery Life: Standard to poor"Up to 4 compatible Sennheiser KLEER headphones can be paired with the same transmitter...": Not easily.  Extremely finicky at best.Headset: Not too heavy, but VERY warm on your ears.Headset control buttons: Poor design.  Not easy to discern which button is which when headset is on your head.
p1467
aVafter trying wireless headphones years ago..and returning them after realizing that the tech was years away from having the quality to rival wired models.. the wait is over. WOW. these headphones are awesome..absolutely no hiss..AT ALL!  and very good quality sound Kleer tech is awesome!.. great for both TV and music. You WILL hear things you you were unable to before. simple set up and operation ..seamless. nice to feel like you are getting your money's worth, especially at this price. wholeheartedly recommend!
p1468
aVI love these to listen to movies, tv shows, podcasts at night without bothering my wife's sleep. They are comfortable and sound quite good. They do not have quite the level of refinement that my HD600's have but those are much more expensive headphones without the wireless capability. I don't think most people would notice the difference.Even though our house is loaded with devices that use RF, I have no problems with interference in either direction between these phones and my other electronics.
p1469
aVThe best wireless headphones I have ever bought. Period! The sound is awesome, the bass is good, the range is awesome (walked around my 2500 sf home and not one crackle or hiss :-), It really drowned out the next door hooligans with their cheap surround sound system. I guess some people think louder is better than softer, cleaner sound, Oh well. If your are considering headphones these are to be considered!!! I have used all kinds of equip. and these are hands down the best. Expensive but good!
p1470
aVWorks great, allows elderly parent to hear TV without disturbing others.  Light and convenient.Aesthics gave way to function with control buttons but we just turn it on and off as a rule.  Tactile feel of buttons is essentially nonexistant so fine tuning of volume and balance is difficult.  But once it is set there is little reason to be  making adjustments.Never had any battery problems.  Recharge quicklyTransmitter/recharging stand is excellent, looks good and works great.
p1471
aVThe issues arise in pressing a button on the stand, then pressing a button on the headphones. All the buttons (5 each) on the headphones are to close together an adult finger will press 2 or 3 at a time. You have to take them off to set the sound level and other adjustments put back on and then remove to adjust again. Until you get the sound right.  But once they are set the are good to go unless you accidentally push one of the 5 buttons on the headphone. So design is a one, sound is a 10.
p1472
aVI bought these to allow me to watch TV while my family sleeps in the morning. They work as advertised and the sound clarity is amazing.  I find myself more immersed into movies than before; because of this I am considering another home theatre upgrade. The range and signal reception is great and they work throughout my home. I do notice my ears get warm while wearing them, but that seems normal with over the ear headphones. I would absolutely purchase again. Worth every penny!
p1473
aVThis gets used for 3 hours every day, day after day, month after month. I have owned it now for 8 months. The sound quality is better than excellent. The comfort level is amazing and the range is very good. It has never failed to perform and I would highly recommend this. It was worth every dollar it costs.Update June 2012: I figure I have used these now in excess of 1,000 hours. This product is amazing! I couldn't be happier. Worth every penny. Highly recommended.Update December 2015: 5,000 hours later these perform as good as the day first hooked them up. It pays to buy quality merchandise!
p1474
aVI've been using this headphone system to watch movies late at night for the last month and a half. It connects 100% of the time perfectly and the sound is great. Truly great. I tried walking outside and through the garden out to the road and it dropped out from time to time, but that's >50' through a number of walls etc.I was really looking for a 5.1 system but also wanted it to be simple and reliable so went with this model. I don't regret it for a second.
p1475
aVI really like these headphones! I have a room just off the living room and also hear the noise of passing cars from a busy roadway so I need to have the volume up to hear the tv shows I am watching. With these headphones, I hear the great audio of my shows without the other distraction of noises from the living room nor the busy roadway! Also, the design of the headphones is such that they are lightweight and "breathe " so I can wear them for long periods of time.
p1476
aVExcellent!! Really comfortable and that's REALLY important. Sound quality is great and that is REALLY important. I got these for tv.  A while back i did a lot of research and bought some headphones for their sound stage Q701. I was surprised that these have a better soundstage.  If you're looking for comfortable good sounding wireless headphones this is them. I have a box of inexpensive headphones with broken wires. You can buy cheaper but you won't be happy:)
p1477
aVWorks as advertised. Flawless. Sound quality is excellent. (Far better than my previous Analog Sennheiser 120's).  We have a High ceiling in a wood floored room that is acoustically "hot".  Dialogue sounds "muddled" on our Samsun Sound Bar and Bass.  No choice but to use Headsets.  We have 3 pair for simultaneous viewing.  (Oh and it changes the entire environment of a home not to have a TV disturbing others in the home.)  Quiet is beauty!
p1478
aVI have had these over a year.  I use them at my office for hours on end.Pros:Very comfortableGood sound qualityCuts out very rarelyBatteries last more than a full work dayCons:Idiotic button design.  It goes volume up, off, volume down, left balance, right balance.  It is hard to change volume without accidentally turning it off or throwing it off balance.Does not have the advertised range
p1479
aVSalaam Aleikum, Long live the Iranian Islamic Empire (IIA) and Iranian Republic! Baai'st ta veen, has lai 'aideen. Duraan filor ak meh dur, ebil ar, mufar een. Dava la ringg deraa, haasla eing taraam, Haastavariohn haalaaveen.The range on this is very limited.  Once going past 15 metres or so, the sound starts to get cut.  In a residence with 2 or 3 intervening walls between the transmitter and the headphones, the same problem happens!
p1480
aVVery little interference. I have a lot of wifi devices in the house and two baby monitors. Non affect these headphones. The sound is great and if you have little ones and can't crank up the surround sound like you use to  and watch movies, these help fill the void. Easy to setup, battery life is pretty good, and love the ability to store them on the top of transmitter to charge which saved a lot of space when you have a tight media cabinet.
p1481
aV.The headphones surpassed my expectations.  I wear hearing aides and I get no "feedback" when using the headphones.The audio is clear and crisp.  i had used a lower priced Sennheiser wireless headphone for the past 2 years but was having difficulty maintaining a battery charge.  The 180's are much improved and superior. Sound quality remains excellent as I walk outside to my patio or anywhere in my condo. I recommend this product.
p1482
aVI bought the RS 180 earphones to replace my Sennheiser RS 120 earphones. The RS 180 earphone sound quality and range are superb, and they overcome all of the limitations I had experienced with the 120's. I would have rated them 5-star, but the ear cups are just slightly smaller than my ears. The rim of the ear cup overlaps my ear lobes. I enjoy using them for an hour or so, but after that I have to take them off to let my earlobes rest.
p1483
aVI have always wanted to buy a pair of Sennheiser  headphones and I am extremely happy with my purchase.  These are extremely comfortable and I use these at work and I can walk all over the warehouse and I don't loose signal or get any noise.  The music is very clear and distinctive.  I have no complaints about them and would highly recommend them to anyone who wants a comfortable headphone and a very high quality and accurate sound.
p1484
aVMy third and most expensive pair of wireless headphones and my first review there of. Don't waste your money on anything else. Hands down The Best! I had the RS120, the Sony version and now these..... blown away! Amazing crisp, clear, no hiss, no drops, better then wired headphones. My only gripe is the 3.5 input, no optical or even coaxial? Love these, amazing sound quality, worth every penny! My search is finally over!
p1485
aVFor years I've been buying Sennheiser headphones. I'm not an audiophile so if you want technical stuff, I'm sure other people have posted that. I just wanted write this review because I personally rely on reviews here on amazon from regular people like me. So I just wanted to tell you that I find the headphones comfortable and with good quality. I bought this for my new TV... perfect weight on my head and great sound.
p1486
aVI have to tell you I ordered the 120's first, don't know if I received a defect unit or had end user challenges.  I decided to step up based on a recommendation from a friend and boy f boy am I glad I did!!  I ordered these plus an extra set of HDR 180 headsets, and I cant tell you how happy I am,  Can I say AMAZING!!!  Worked flawlessly, Connected flawlessly, Sounds flawless - Very Very happy I decided to upgrade.
p1487
aVI can only compare this to my other wired headphone (Audio-Technica ATH-M50X which I rated 5 stars) and the Audio-Technica sounds slightly better (crisper highs and tighter bass.)But the Sennheiser is wireless so it allows me to walk all around the house.Music can be heard by others in the room with you so your music is not private; on the flip side when a household family calls me, I can still respond to them.
p1488
aVI purchased this for my husband to help restore the peace in our household. We have tried other devices to help him to hear TV programs better, but none work as well as this one. This one works great and is well worth the money. The only negative is that it does not work if you are streaming programs (reason for 4 stars instead of 5). We can watch TV together once again and not argue about the volume - finally.
p1489
aVMost comfortable headphones I've ever worn. Ever! Other headphones get uncomfortable after maybe 30 minutes ... but I can wear these all day.Sound quality is very good.No futzing with Bluetooth -- hooray!I love the Open-Aire thing ... closed-back headphones have always made me feel like my ears were underwater.Not real portable, because the transmitter is so big.
p1490
aVGreat sound (I can finally understand what they are saying during the loud music in a movie).....It's just like you are in a movie theater and you can go to the kitchen for a snack without missing anything...The reason for only four stars is that they get a little heavy on the top of your head.... Just adjust them a little and your good for another half hour....I would buy these again....
p1491
aVGlad I selected the 180's.  Open design allows me to hear what's happening, like a phone ringing when I wear them. Balance control allows to to adjust for my weak ear. Sound quality and voice quality is better than expected, which allows me to keep the volume surprisingly low. The controls on the headset are the weakness, as there is no tactile feel to the buttons and require you to take them off to adjust
p1492
aVMy husband is very hard of hearing.  This is the second pair of the Sennheiser headphones that I've gotten him (try to have them near each tv).  They are pricey but are far superior to the cheaper brands that he's had in the past. I really like them because when he's wearing them then I can listen to the tv at a volume that I can tolerate and not have to have the sound so loud it blows my hair back!
p1493
aVThis earphones are GREAT!!! don't let the price fool you. I went through 5 sets of "TV Ears" before I broke down and bought these. EVERYTHING about these is VASTLY SUPERIOR!! Range >151' anywhere (walls not a problem); clarity = excellent; battery life >12hrs; quick charging. The only thing I find to complain about is the location and ergonomics of the volume and balance controls.
p1494
aVThe RS 180 is absolutely fantastic, the reception is good (can pretty much go into another room) and sound is just fine for my needs. Excellent for watching TV late at not to not disturb anyone or just laying in bed jamming to tunes. These headphones are also extremely comfortable. I was initially weary of wearing cup headphones, but these are perfect. I can lay down and not be bothered at all!
p1495
aVThe audio quality is very good, no background noise (I had a Sony analog wireless headphone MDR-RF925R, the background noise was very annoying). When I walked around TV, no interrupt in the audio playback. The headphone is very comfortable, after wearing several hours, no pain in the ears. It is not the first time I bought the Sennheiser headphone, it always impress me, Very done Sennheiser!!!
p1496
aVI bought these over a year ago and couldn't live without them.  I have severe hearing loss and live in a condo. I never wanted to watch TV or listen to music especially late at night for fear of disturbing neighbors. No more blaring sounds and I am able to understand the words so much better. Surround sound too!  Easy to use and comfortable. They have improved my quality of life for sure!!
p1497
aVGreat fit comfort and sound.  These also don't have the loud hissing kick in like the cheaper 120 model when the show is paused.  Great for watching tv when the babies or wife are asleep.  My wife has poor hearing in one ear and she really appreciates these.  Something about wearing headphones makes it easier to pick up dialogue in movies than listening on the main sound system.
p1498
aVThese headphones are amazing.I bought the Sennheiser 110 cordless headphones and they were ok, but Nothing compared to my over the ear plug ins old headphones.I saw the Product reviews and decided to give these a try and they sound truly amazing, can get crystal clear sound in my house and some out in the back yard.Not enough hours in the day to be able to listen to them
p1499
aVI use these with my Gibson Thunderbird IV bass and a Line 6 wireless relay. Works great for practice. I can just wear my bass around the house practicing anytime, anywhere and everywhere. Without rattling the neighbors windows. Sennheiser has taken a step up with wireless headphones. Leaving  everybody else. Scratching their heads and wondering. How they will catch up.
p1500
aVThese head phones are just what I needed to keep from waking my wife while listening to TV or music when I awake early.  They have great sound and I love them.  So does my wife -- who uses them as much as I do.  The price seemed reasonable for high quality head phones.  Sennheiser makes products you can generally always be very satisfied with and this is no exception.
p1501
aVBought these for my husband who has a hard time hearing everything on the TV.  They have made a huge difference and he loves them.  We had read good reviews on this particular brand (Sennheiser) and are happy to say they lived up to expectation. Light weight, he forgets he even has them on.  Also you can walk away from TV and still continue to hear what is going on.
p1502
aVI think this was a pretty good purchase for me. I live in a loft and don't really have the issue of walls like a number of reviews I have read about this product. The only walls are at the far end of my place, in the bathroom. These headphones even worked well there. My only gripe is that I wish the headphones had more bass. Other than that, I'm perfectly content!!!
p1503
aVThese cans sound great!The only con is that you must turn on both the transmitter and the headphones separately.  I can't leave the transmitter on at bedtime and turn on the headphones later or in the morning without either getting up (not possible for me as a quadriplegic) or leaving both on all night.  OTOH, they stay charged long enough to leave on all night.
p1504
aVDecent but not top audiophile quality. I also have the Sennheiser HD 600 headphone and RS 180 is no match for it. It doesn't have the incredibly realistic bass and highs and the circumaureal perception of the HD 600. Nevertheless and RS 180 is portable and I hear it fine all over my 2000 sq ft house through walls and in the garage and back yard. So I'm keeping it.
p1505
aVI've had these for three years and they still perform FLAWLESSLY and with the same high fidelity as when I first got them. Bravo! There's not much else to tell, except that I have a fat head, big ears and the Sennheiser headphones STILL fit nicely and comfortably!I recommend this product for everyone, including all fathead, big-eared chubbas like me!
p1506
aVI've been using this product for about a week now. I find the sound quality great. I work in a factory that can be quite noisy and thought that there may be a lot of interference. However, I find the range is excellent since I  roam around a lot. Doesn't quite work through concrete block but then, I didn't expect it to. These were exactly what I was looking for
p1507
aVThis product was ordered to replace an inferior Sharper Image product for my father who has significant hearing loss.  He is unable to hear the TV without increasing the volume to an intrusive level to those around him.He is thrilled to be able to enjoy watching TV again now that he can hear it.Sound quality is excellent.Setup is simple.
p1508
aVI really don't know why I didn't purchase these some time ago.  I'm going deaf and hated keeping my hearing aids in while watching TV.  Even with the aids in I was missing parts of the conversation.  Not with Sennheiser !  Clear as the proverbial bell.  They do everything they say they do.  Do yourself a favor .... and the wife ..... and get a pair.
p1509
aVGreat product. Very easy setup,just plug and play. After initial charging I took them outside to see just how far I could get reception and I got about 400'. I use them outside while mowing my lawn. Their great for watching TV or DVD's.  I would highly recommend these headphones to anyone looking for a lightweight, great sounding, quality product.
p1510
aVVery nice headphones for my wife who loves to watch The Good Wife forever.  The wireless works perfectly and does NOT interfere with our wireless internet router.  There is a bit of sound eminating from phones as they are a somewhat open design so if you need absolute silence these are not the right solution.  Otherwise I highly recommend 'em.
p1511
aVSound quality and range are great.  The user interface needs to be redesigned.  The buttons for increasing and decreasing volume are next to the on/off button and not distinguishable by touch.  Volume control should be a prominent volume wheel or knob.  On/off and mute should be prominent buttons and should not be adjacent to one another.
p1512
aVPurchased these a couple of months ago. I read the reviews (the bad ones)and decided to take a chance and I am Very Happy I did. the sound quality,The Range and everything else is Excellent. I highly recommend these headphones.They are a little pricey but worth it.
p1513
aVI use these for hours in the living room. I have a 2nd in the home office. Perfect for sharing music and movies. Sound is sweet. Rechargeable too. Some say cheap plastic. After a year of daily, hard use, I say they are just heavy enough to be strong and comfortable. You can even walk around the house and patio because they are rf.
p1514
aVSeems like a high quality product, but I have to keep taking it off to adjust balance and volume. Also, it's hard to hear others with headset on (I'm hard of hearing.)  I also get tired of wearing it for long periods and need to take it off for awhile.  I definitely feel it is helpful for the hard of hearing to hear the TV better.
p1515
aVFantastic sound. Working in an office environment, the reception is fantastic anywhere on the floor. Exceptional sound even at a low volume. People can come up and talk to me and I can still hear them completely while I enjoy my music or an occasional talk show. I highly recommend this set of phones to anyone that enjoys quality.
p1516
aVMy husband is hard of hearing so these were the perfect gift for him. Maybe it was more for me so I don't have to listen to ear-bleeding TV volume! He had it hooked up in no time and was using them the same night. I'm sorry I can't attest to the sound quality but if the fact that he uses them all the time is any indication...
p1517
aVThe sound quality of these headsets is excellent although you may not accept this as  a sterling review then you read the next positive.  I can also now hear dialog when a film has a loud background music or noise.  Music quality is excellent.  The RF capability means I can listen to my sound system in any room in the house.
p1518
aVI purchased the HDR180 with two headsets. The sound quality is great, but with only one charging station,keeping both headsets charged can become a problem. It would be really nice if Sennheiser made a "charging only" station to accomodate the second headset. It would also provide a home for the headset when its'not in use.
p1519
aVThis are great headphones.  They are comfortable and the sound is incredible for wireless.  The cost is a little steep in my opinion and the rest of the reviews are right.  I would give this 5 stars, but the volume adjust button is very awkwardly placed on this unit.  You really need to take them off to adjust the volume.
p1520
aVThese are overall great headphones. I use them mostly for watching TV and movies. Very comfortable. I can wear them for the majority of a day with no discomfort. Buttons on the side of the can are very convenient. Excellent quality. I would give them 5 stars if not for the price. I think they are just a little overpriced.
p1521
aVI bought this Sennheiser RS 180 Wireless Headphone System for my husbands Christmas present.It has the sound of surround sound.They have the clearest sound with no back ground noise.I highly recommend them.I also bought an extra set of Sennheiser HDR 180 for myself that works off the same transmitter.The sound is great.
p1522
aVI am impressed with sound quality. I have another set of headphones that are wireless that are heavy and can only be used in the room that the transmitter is in. The RS180  digital wireless headphones can be used though out the house. The sound is super and recommend this model to anyone that enjoys good quality sound.
p1523
aVOh my gosh I love these!  My son-in-law bought a cheaper pair of wireless headphones, and the quality of sound is no where near what these have!  They fit comfortably on my noggin' and do not pinch my glasses to my head like some headphones do.  I recommend if you want comfortable, great sounding wireless headphones!
p1524
aVAfter several iterations of similar models before now perhaps we are experiencing near perfection...however the buttons on the right could include a per-button LED with changing colors indicating status [last button pushed] instead of the separate simply flashing LED which just blinks.  Nice work if you can get it.
p1525
aVThe headphone in itself is fine, but we are upset that it is not comparable with our other Sennheiser RS 180 headphones and we can't recharge the older headphones on this new charger ! The design looks the same and it is misleading, in my opinion.You should not fix what ain't broke !!Ilse Pilati.
p1526
aVthis is a great wireless headphone system, the only thing i would change, would be to have a button on the headphones that turns on the transceiver. like on ps3 and ps4, you just have to press a button on the remote to turn on the consoles. other than that, they work and sound great, and they're comfortable too.
p1527
aVMy title says it all. On some other headphones you have to adjust them to get the signal, with these it is automatic. The only flaw I find is that the buttons to adjust the volume etc are small and very close to each other so when watching tv in bed with the lights out it is very hard to press the right buttons.
p1528
aVI absolutely love these headphones, I use to watch TV at night and not wake my Significant other. My biggest complaint is I have to turn on the power on the base of the headphones as well as on the headphones itself, seems rather redundant. The headphones are comfortable and don't wake him sleeping next to me!
p1529
aVI agree with all of the positive reviews.  My only complaint is that the volume controls are impossible to use while wearing the headset.  At a minimum, the up and & down volume controls should be easily discernable to touch.  When that happens I will happily give this otherwise wonderful headset five stars.
p1530
aVPros: I enjoyed the RS 180 a lot after connecting it to my Blu-Ray player. Comfortable and great sound qualityCons: It takes a lot of use to be able to adjust the volume without having to take the set off of your head and it is notvery obvious how to have them work for TV broadcasts, also
p1531
aVGood+ sound qualityBest reception anywhere in the house - tried many headphones, no other headphone get's close to the RS180 - Excellent.Very comfortable - Excellent-Good (recharged) battery time.Used by anyone in my family, including my 4 yrs son, teen dougher and son and myself.
p1532
aVExcellent sound quality. I put these headphones on when I don't want to disturb others in the house. Comfortable to wear, excellent sound quality. Somewhat pricey. I haven't compared to less expensive ones, so I can't really say if the extra cost is worth it. I bought them on a friend's rec. No regrets.
p1533
aVExcellent!  Crystal clear sound and comfortable to wear.  I can also still hear a phone ring while wearing them even though the awesome sound you hear from these immerses you totally into the program or music you are listening to.  Best purchase I've made for equipment in a long time.  Long over due.
p1534
aVReceived these headphones as a Christmas gift, although I did tell people what to get.  My research told me these phones had the best sound for the money and the research paid off.  They are outstanding, sharp and clear.  They are also comfortable and light to wear.  I use them for movies and music.
p1535
aVThis would have gotten five stars,with the exception that the user's manual was missing from the packaging. Also, the CD which may have been the missing manual could not be read by my Samsung Blue Ray player.  By accident I found the missing manual on Sennheiser's website. Sloppy quality control.
p1536
aVLove these yes I can watch  my cnbc in bed without waking the wife,in the morning to get my  pre market news  futures ect .Movies sound fantastic much better then the tv itself  all this while the wife sleeps. Wow it was frustrating watching tv in bed prior to this purchase  Great choice for me.
p1537
aVThis is the fourth pair I have tried and it is by far the most powerful, the clearest and the most comfortable.They won't get any better. Worth the price. I can adjust them separately because of my hearing problem without effecting other people listening in the room at normal levels.
p1538
aVI've had these for a month or more. The have a beautifully comfortable fit, a high quality sound that reaches out to the end of my yard and everywhere in my house. BUT here are the things that would prevent me from buying them again or from recommending them: 1) The settup is different from other wireless headphones I've purchased. This would be OK if the instructions were clear about this. But I didn't find them so. 2) The size of the buttons and their labeling are so small that anyone over 40 will have serious issues about using them. 3) When I use the earphones to watch TV while my wife is using the regular TV speakers I get both sounds but at slightly different moments in time. This makes it impossible for me to use them in this way. Since I have hearing issues and is why I buy earphones, I really can't use them for one purpose that is very important to me. 4) Every time you take the earphones from the charging cradle you have to synch the earphones to the cradle. This is an annoyance. The Sony MDR-RF925R wireless earphones which I bought from Radio Shack several years ago for $99 have none of these issues and I will probably go back to using them instead of these $199 earphones.Also, the signal seems to interfere with my wireless home network system if I don't have them placed properly.Finally, even though I let them charge for a week before using them, I only got 1.5 hours the first time I used them. They are getting better as I let them fully discharge and then charge up again each time. NOTE: I hve been charging and allowing the phones to completely discharge for a week now and I'm getting 8-10 hours listening time. I'm still far from the 24 hours they claim however.The sound is great, as is the range.
p1539
aVI love these headphones as far as the sound quality goes and the comfort- they are rated at 300 feet- not even close- but they are good and easy to set up.  But if I go upstairs they will drop quite a bit and it is no where close to 300 feet from the transmitter. But I would buy them again.
p1540
aVWow these are wonderful for sound quality! I agree the buttons are placed poorly on the right ear, however the quality of sound and comfort on your head make up for it. I would definantly buy again. The open ear design is what makes them sound so good compared to their competitors designs.
p1541
aVBought them to replace SONY MDR-RF925, what an amazing difference. No more tilting my head to get rid of static. Better sound quality than being plugged in. Easy on and off. very comfortable fit. Premium price for the digital wireless, but worth it if you want to get rid of the RF static
p1542
aVGood headphones. Wish they could have did a better job on button placement. It is impossible to adjust without taking off head and looking. Very easy to shut them off if you do anything while on your head. My husband is hard of hearing and he likes these even though they are hard to use.
p1543
aVNo customer service phone number listed on the warranty paper work or instruction manual.  After researching the phone number on the internet the technical department helped me with pairing my second headset with the first headset and the wireless transmitter, in a professionally manner.
p1544
aVThis sennheiser wireless  earphones are great. They have quite a long range and the clarity of the music is superb. Probably better than my Bose quiet comfort 15. Battery last for aprox 5 hours of continuous use. The only disappointment is that the do not have optic fiber digital input.
p1545
aVThese are great wireless headphones. The last set of music headphones I bought years ago, Koss, can't hold a candle to these phones. The range is great and also true high fidelity. I operate them with my Bose system turned off on my Sony big screen and I am amazed at their performance.
p1546
aVI bought a sony mdr-rf985r which was very good but I needed another headphone so I  went with the RS 180 and I have no regrets as I don't know how they could be made to function any better than the Sennheiser RS 180 Digital. I have a hearing problem but no more when I use this product.
p1547
aVComfortable and great stereo sound. Volume and R/L adjustments. I can use in other rooms as well as outside patio. Enjoy the game without bothering  others. Late night programs, movies are enjoyed without waking you-know-who. My first pair of wireless phones and they are great! AAA+++
p1548
aVI was completely satisfied with Sennheiser wireless headphone system. But I had the problem of being disconnected from the internet whenever I used with other wifi system running, like Sony PS3. I wish I have a solution for this problem and I would definitely get Sennheiser headphones
p1549
aVI don't use the headset - it's for my husband.  So far it is saving my hearing (loud TV) and probably my marriage.  I highly recommend for the comfort of the hearing impaired.  My husband used to get very frustrated when watching TV even turned up loud which only distorted the sound.
p1550
aVThese ear phones are great. They are comfortable and sound is very clear and I can hear very well at low volume. The only thing I would improve on is the stand should turn on automatically when you lift the phones off the charger stand (need to turn it ON by pressing the button).
p1551
aVI've tried RCA, Auvio, and AR wireless headphones. I was looking at the Senn 120s when I saw this model. At last! A wireless headphone that works well! The sound quality is great. Very comfortable to wear and I can walk all over my little house and still have great sound. I
p1552
aVThese headphones are very good. The only problem was with the volume on the phones. I actually had to glue a little something on the ON/OFF button, so I can find the up and down volume while the headphones were on my head. After that they are much better to deal with....
p1553
aVThese things work as advertised. Nice sound, fit and feel on my head. Best wireless phones I ever owned and easy to operate. Just press the activator buttons on the stand and earcup. Batteries recharge great!
p1554
aVThis was the second pair purchased. I have used the first set for a trouble free year , sound quality is near perfect without hiss or unwanted noise. Batteries stay charged for 20+ hours. This recently purchased pair was a gift, I am sure they will enjoy them as I have.
p1555
aVWow, I love this headphone system. I use it every night after the wife goes to bed. Sound quality is so good sometimes I have to take them off momentarily because I think I hear something in the room I'm watching TV in but its just the headphones sound is so realistic.
p1556
aVI just hooked the up...WOW....3 minutes and I'm in stereo heaven. This is the best investment I've made in a long time. I can now watch an R movie in full stereo surround sound while my granddaughter sleeps 3 feet away! The sound quality is OFF THE CHAIN!!! 10 STARS!!
p1557
aVthe reviews were not accurate about others able to hear when you are using them. You might have to crank them up to "deaf" level for that. The headphone controls are not easy to feel,  but in time I think I'll get the "feel".Good quality !
p1558
aVThe sound quality is incredible!! Voices are clear and sounds- even someone flicking a lighter- are all very "crisp." There sometimes is a low humming sound - but it's not terrible. Without the humming sound, this product would be a 5. I highly recommend it!!
p1559
aVGreat wireless headphones. After a late night gig pop these babies on and rock on. I have a 1800 square feet house and the only drop out is clear in the back make a few sharp turns. Of course the Sennheiser quality sound, very easy to pair up, and quite comfortable.
p1560
aVSounds as good as a decent wired headphone which is saying a lot for wireless. Excellent bass, without being overdone and stupid. Plenty of mid and upper range detail. Full bodied soundstage. The range is awesome, allowing me to roam 100' away with no perceptible loss of quality or volume. Try that with your $30 blew-teeth 'phone! Sennheiser quality hardware + Kleer tech = kickass product. Of course, it isn't cheap, but well worth every centavo. Pairs up easily, unlike blue-teeth junk that drops out and causes baldness due to ripping your gd hair out, and having feelings of wanting to punch the liars who told you how great blew-teeth was. RS 180 is extremely comfy and soft. I can wear it for 2 hours without ears getting too warm, plenty for a music binge or a movie. Then, take them off for a few minutes, let your ears air-out, and your good to go for another 2 hours. The open-back design helps with this. I love cranking Godzilla volume up to hear every menacing, scary shriek of the monsters, every primal-scream of the T-Rex in Jurassic Park, without having the police break down my door and tase me for disturbing the peace. And no, I'm not destroying my eardums, you can easily modulate the RS 180 to provide crystal-clear details of movie dialogue, or streaming audio, without causing your ear canals to run red with blood. Step up and pay the money, this product is an investment and will give you years of quality service, if your personal audio needs warrant it. Build quality is great, without using metal that would increase weight on your melon.
p1561
aVThey sound good enough for the price, but whenever I have them on all wirelessly connected devices in the house will occasionally lose connection until I turn the headphones off for a few seconds. Hardly what I would consider acceptable for such a high-end product.
p1562
aVI have had this wireless headphone for a while now.  They produce a great sound and are comfortable.  Only complaint is the difficulty of adjusting the volume, while wearing, with the little buttons.  It is doable, but not easy or intuitive. I would buy it again.
p1563
aVThis product works just like it says it does. Just make sure you re charge the batteries because they will crackle a lot before the warning and at times the volume on a movie will go up and down. It is easy to have up to 4 headsets going at once. Worth the price.
p1564
aVIf two or more people want to listen to two TV's and are in close relation to each other, then this product will be a lifesaver. I bought it for my Mom, who likes a higher volume and show's that don't always match my esthetic. Very good quality. Very good value.
p1565
aVIt is everything that we were looking for.  My husband is getting hard of hearing and he thoroughly enjoys the surround sound experience he gets when wearing the headset. I can enjoy watching TV without having to have the surround sound system up to full volume
p1566
aVI have only used them one time and only for a brief time watching TV programming . They are as advertised , clear , full sound ,and comfortable . I can give you more detailed information later after listening to music or watching a film or sporting event .
p1567
aVThese are the best headphones I've ever used. I can actually hear the TV and the separate volume control is ideal. The only thing I miss is a mute button for the headphones rather than turning them off and on whenever there is a commercial. Great product.
p1568
aVExcellent headphones with individual ear piece volume control and balance control.  The controls are small and very hard to distinguish while wearing the headphones...needs some tactile attachments or something to help distinguish up-down volume control.
p1569
aVI use this headphone at night all the time.  Its comfortable, has perfect reception from my television, and gives a long range reception.  I purchased two of them to listen to music on my laptop and for my television, and the sound quality is excellent.
p1570
aVIt is as I expected. A headphone that works wonderfully while being wireless, it is not as good as sennheiser high end wires headphones but that is to be expected. I enjoy it tremendously as I can listen to music while reading anywere in my apartment.
p1571
aVWe can be in the same room together again!  No more golf claps or hardwood sneaker squeaks for me!  Yay!Sound quality is excellent and the sound (er, noise) doesn't "leak".  Range is great too!I would definitely recommend!Jen
p1572
aV* Very comfortable* Sound quality is great* Range is very good* Battery life is very goodThe only con I have found is the button layout.  Power and volume buttons are grouped together and somewhat difficult to manipulate.
p1573
aVThe unit didn't work and there was no technical support available from Amazon or Sennheiser.The Sennheiser web site wanted all questions Emailed to them. There was no phone number displayed.This fact was confirmed by the Amazon Support lady who tried to help meWhen you're trying to get a unit set up or trouble shoot it Email is not the answer.I would suggest that Amazon review their Policy with regard to Sennheiser Sales and Support Services
p1574
aVBest thing since I installed my HDTV. I can hear sounds very clearly even though I have a sound bar attached to the TV. Only drawback is trying to use the volume controls on the earpiece. Could be slightly larger. Otherwise a good piece of equipment.
p1575
aVI didn't really know anything about these headphones. There are very few wireless on line to choose from. They are just wonderful. I wish I could afford to buy a couple of more right now. They are worth every dollar. I will buy more in the future,
p1576
aVAwesome sound, really rockin' bass, and keeps my wife happy because she can hear her music in the same room Only reason it wasn't 5 stars is that the commercial volume control doesn't work consistently. I find I have to adjust it once in a while.
p1577
aVMy husband and I enjoy the Senneiser RS 180 digital.  He has walked all over the house and backyard to see if it remain clear and true to sound.  It passes with flying colors and we can now sit in the same room and enjoy television comfortably.
p1578
aVWrote a review for the additional pair I bought of these, Love them overall, pairing could be slightly more user friendly perhaps with an additional button on the base just for simplicity when its dark and you just put some children down to bed.
p1579
aVMy only criticism is that of my own lack of cleverness in being so non-techno savvy.  Sennheiser has doubtless covered the one question of "how to" that I have.  All I need to do is put the instruction cd in to play and solve my problem!
p1580
aVBought these for my wife to listen to her audio books. She can roam the entire house and on the porches with no loss of signal. She says the quality of sound and the fit of the headphones are great. She can wear them all day without discomfort.
p1581
aVWhat a GIANT waste of money !!!I'm an owner of RS 120 and RS 220 and now I've decided to get RS 180 for my house.  After receiving them I was stunned as how cheaply these headphones are made. Plastic band which goes over the head is flimsier than $20 headphones you can buy at Target. Plastic components of the head band are not screwed or glued together, they are just holding to each other with small plastic notches which immediately snapped as i as putting headphones on.Comparing to RS 130 and RS 220, for some reason ear caps do not go completely over the ear, they are little smaller which makes these headphones on ear. Sound has decent bass but dull compared to RS 220, definitely is missing thigh and mid frequencies.I'll be returning this junk shortly, originally these headphones are $300+ but I got them on sale for $199, well to tell you the truth, they don't worth than $50 to me. I would rather spend extra 100$ and get another pair of RS 220 than use these headphones. It's a shame how Sennheiser could produce such a lame product
p1582
aVWe tried the Sony because it was a lot cheaper, but unfortunately the unit ischeap. Not with the Sennheiser, the soundIs just awesome and its ready to go right out of the box. If you are looking for a wireless headphone this is the one.
p1583
aVthe sound is great buts when you trap the headphone you feel its cheap made.if you don't bother for feeling that your headset is cheap and the only thing that matter you is the sound quality than i totally recommending you to buy it.
p1584
aVLightweight and comfortable.  They sound great and have worked perfectly so far.  The only negatives I can think of are the high price and no optical audio input.  But the headphone system works so well, I still have to give it five stars.
p1585
aVThis headphone is definitely worth the price. No background hissing or other noise. Extremely clear dialogue. Doesn't fade away when I am moving around. I had an analogue set for many years and marvel at this digital performance.
p1586
aVUsed daily for 6-8 hours each day for several years now, still on the original batteries (!) and love them just as much as on the first day.  HIGHLY recommend.  The ear muffs are still in like-new condition, they wear VERY well.
p1587
aVThe only problem I have found with the headphones is the volume and balance controls are difficult to operate while on your head.The range and lack of interference  problems are great,everything you want in cordless headphones.
p1588
aVI've had these for a while now. First off: I will use this until it reasonably breaks because I need wireless 'phones. That said, this product in no way matches any decent set of cans at the outrageous price listed. My Grado SR-80s and lowly Sennheiser HD-203s have more presence, bass, and stereo staging than this product. The 203s, while congested, feel a welcome respite to this expensive Jazz-loving junk. Second: One would think such costly cans would be built sturdier. Oh no! The center point on the band is quite weak and likely won't be able to charge the in-muff batteries within 6 months (The center point being an exposed tri-band which sits on top of your head). After a few days, I could already see how daily use will break and split this flimsy thing. Third: the button positions are terrible. Why is the "down" volume half the size of the "up", then squeeze Up,Power,Down together so tight and indistinguishable I have to take the set off my head to make sure I don't turn off the cans when I only want to turn down the volume? Fourth: have I mentioned a complete lack of bass and no sense of presence? This may be good for lazy viewing YouTube vids while multi-tasking, but these are nothing near audiophile quality, and I am a bit cheesed at the reviewers who gave this high marks.
p1589
aVSennheiser RS 180 is tops in the headphone market. Recommended by a friend with hearing issues, I purchased mine thru Amazon. I am very pleased as I can leave the listening area and wander thru the house without interruptions.
p1590
aVWas a little skeptical spending this much for a wireless headset when there are many models which are less expensive.  This product is worth every penny.  The sound is phenomenal and the design is great.  Kudos to Sennheiser.
p1591
aVI finally found wireless headphones with the fidelity to rehearse and record with.  They're also very comfortable.  That's what I wanted.  That's what I got.  If something happened to them--I'd buy the exact same pair asap.
p1592
aVWe wear them at night so we don't keep the kids awake.The kids wear them during the day so they don't bother us with their games or movies.Great quality; much better than the Sony IR model I tried and returned.
p1593
aVThe head phone set is easy to use, comfortable and its response is accommodating. Construction is well made; ear pads are soft and over all easy in its operation. I like the extra-long chords and its double plug usability.
p1594
aVthese headphones have an amazing sound, the bass is clean every sound is crisp there is no buzz or hiss that you get from other wireless headphones, sound quality is better than my other sennheiser headphones with a wire !
p1595
aVThese headphones are great for anyone whose hearing differs from other listeners.  The user in our house can leave the room and still hear the TV programs because these are radio frequency headphones.  The only way to go.
p1596
aVWe are very happy with this product--streamlined looks, easy to set up, excelllent sound for voices and music.  Very good product for those with hearing issues.  Glad we bought it.  Amazon price was the lowest we found.
p1597
aVThese earphones were reviewed and rated very well when I was researching which to buy, and they have not  disappointed. Beautiful natural ultra high fidelity sound, ease of use. I recommend them with no reservations.
p1598
aVWorks better than expected. I did like the adjustment feature better on your older system because I could change volume/shut it off/ raise-lower volume without removing from my head,which doesn't work with this one.
p1599
aVExcellent.  good quality sound - decent range - no issues so far with quality.  they work so well I bought another set for the TV - so I can watch allowing the rest of the family can enjoy the living room area too.
p1600
aVGood audio quality.  A bit small for my (big) head. Ended up returning because of small but unacceptable time lag between TV image and voice.  Not sure if there is a better choice out there for quiet TV listening.
p1601
aVLet me start off by saying that I am not a guru of sound quality. I can tell you that these headphones sit comfortably on the head, and have a high sound quality, but did leave me a bit underwhelmed in the maximum volume. All things considered, a good pair of headphones. However there is a reason that this is a 2 star review. Because while they might be a perfectly good pair of headphones, I discovered too late that they broadcast over a 2.4 GHz frequency. For those of you unfamiliar with wireless networks, that's the same frequency most networks use, meaning when I used the headphones I would experience a slow or spotty connection at best, or be outright disconnected at worst. Now, if you don't use a wireless network, or you have a 5 GHz WiFi connection, then I can recommend these headphones. But if you're like me, I'd say find a pair that connects via Bluetooth, or just stick to wired ones.
p1602
aVIt was great...when it worked. I had to replace it once. The replacement failed withing a couple of months. Now it is out of warranty and I cannot replace the failed replacement. So a waste of money.  Avoid.
p1603
aVOther than the controls being so close together as stated in other posts, this is a great set of ears . Comfortable ,great reception without interference and good separation. Can't go wrong on this purchase.
p1604
aVThe sound from these headphones is even better than their previous designs.  Improved clarity and an improved low end are a real treat.  They are every comfortable and sometimes I forget that I have them on.
p1605
aVI sometimes have a hard time hearing dialogue on the TV but now it is no problem.  I can even walk around the house and listen to a program with no signal loss or interference.Highly recommend.
p1606
aVProduct had strong reviews so I purchased.  Sound quality excellent!  Extremely comfortable.  I use continuously now as their sound is so much better than my 60" TV.  I would definitely purchase again!
p1607
aVThese headsets are extremely better than my previous wireless set.  I can walk around the house and garage without any interference.  The clarity of voices is amazing.  You feel like a part of the show!
p1608
aVI bought these for my wife, as she has a hearing problem. Now we can watch a movie or TV and don't have to have the volume cranked so loud. She finds them comfortable, and has told me she loves them.
p1609
aVI had a Sennheiser for a few years prior to purchasing this one that I considered to be very good.  This one is better fitting and in my opinion better sound.  I use it primarily to listen to the TV.
p1610
aVA bit on the expensive side but the sound quality and the wireless capabilities (large range) is worth it.I would recommend. I have have used this with a flat screen tv, a tablet and a desktop
p1611
aVAn awesome upgrade from the ones I had before. NO hissing or other noise. I can walk around the house or outside and still get clear perfect sound quality. Wished I would have upgraded much sooner..
p1612
aVGreat Charging Stand Design.Great Quality sound. By far the best of any wireless I have owned and I have owned many.One small flaw: the buttons on the ear cup are a bit hard to operate.
p1613
aVThe Sennheiser RS 180 Wireless Headphone System was everything I expected. Sharp, clear and works well from the padio. Only have had them for one month and so far I would recommend them to anyone.
p1614
aVAmazing....all I can say.  Surround sound is another experience...this is something completely different and much better!  I would highly recommend - very comfortable too!  Charge lasts all day!
p1615
aVThe only negative about the product that I have is that it will not hook up to a light signal without an adapter. Everything else about it is first class and I have no problem recommending it.
p1616
aVGreat sound with a Blu-Ray source. The plush velour headphone pads get damp after a while, so I prefer my Sennheiser RS 140 system for everyday use (radio, audiobooks, streaming video, etc.)
p1617
aVsound works really well for my spouse who is hard of hearing.  The one downside is that you have to switch them on and off in two places-- the base AND the headphones-- a little complicated.
p1618
aVMy 10 yr. Old senn. Earphones died. They were 5 stars. New model is NOT as good. Controls are digital and phones must be removed to adjust. Also there is always a low hum in the background.
p1619
aVI have bought this for myself, my father, my sister, and three of my father's friends have had me buy a set for them - we have tried others, but this is far and away the best we have found.
p1620
aVStarted researching Beats headphone.  But research led me to Sennheiser.  Very light no fatigue from wearing for hours.  Sound awesome at pricing much less than Beats.  I would buy again.
p1621
aVGot them for my husband who is slightly deaf in one ear.  he really likes them and they sound great.  It allows him to control his own volume, and leave the external tv volume low for me.
p1622
aVThese are fine headphones and do the job for which I got them (to use when my wife is working or sleeping.)  They are not too heavy, nor do they hurt my ears.  They deliver good sound.
p1623
aVThis was a XMas gift to a COUBLE,  They both love it and use it. Their home is small and this keeps music and volume  and TV manageable. I have been thanked on at least 4 occasions
p1624
aVThese worked great for about a year but now they lose connection with the base frequently. Sometimes we can't get it to reconnect until another day. Great sound ... when they work!
p1625
aVI uses my RS 180 everyday. they are by far the best wireless headphones i have ever owned. quality is great and the valor ear cups let my ears breath. You will not be disappointed!
p1626
aVLike these a lot.  The only thing that I'd change would be to the control buttons.  I'd like them to be more distinct, and, I'd like the volume control to allow quieter operation.
p1627
aVI drive a school bus so I need to get to sleep early. My wife likes to watch TV late so using the headset allows me to get to sleep without her having to watch TV in another room.
p1628
aVHusband says this are wonderful.  He can walk from TV room to other rooms and still hear what's going on the TV.  I love it too cuz I don't have it hear his very loud TV programs.
p1629
aVThe sound quality is great. The bass is clear and life like. I was talked into spending a little more money on this model than the next one down. I am very happy with my choice.
p1630
aVThis was for my husband when he watches TV and people are talking in the kitchen and he is in the family room.  He likes it but occasionally the ear pads cause his ears to itch.
p1631
aVGreat sounding headphones best on the market and easy to set up.  After a lot of research and trials  I am very happy that decided to go with the Sennheiser 180 no regrets here.
p1632
aVSeparate volume control for each ear is a real help for me.  I can even go upstairs and continue to hear my program.  Great sound and easy to set up.  Plug it in and your good.
p1633
aVThis product works well and was easy to set up my mom enjoys it and my dad doesn't have to listen to her tv programs in the other room!  Always great when a product works well!
p1634
aVThey arrived in timely fashion. They were easily initiated. They are suppose to allow my wife to watch TV in our bedroom while I am trying to go to sleep. That is a success.
p1635
aVThe headphones work very well. They are slightly heavier than wired hedphones due to the battery in each ear piece. They tend to feel warm if worn for any length of time.
p1636
aVThis is a great product.  Comfortable,great audio, especially the bass.  Set up was a snap. All in all, this product was exactly as advertised.  A little pricey, however.
p1637
aVI have had quite a few headphone systems before but none that were as good as this one.  It's easy to adjust  and raise or lower the sound  Excellent sound quality
p1638
aVI recently purchased The Sennheiser RS180 wireless headphones.  I was really looking forward to great sounding and noise cancelling headpones (my husband snores).  I've tried two previous brands including Sony.  I read the reviews and decided to purchase these. I was very very disappointed.  The sound was not as great as I had hoped. (Although I did like the bass, but thought it could have been better.  The treble could have been less.) There is no noise cancellation.  Out of all the previous headphones (at much cheaper prices) that I had tried, these were the worst.  One of the worst features are the volume control buttons.  They are really a pain. I had to keep taking them off to see what button I was pushing. I would also get a "tin can" sound. As for the comfort, after an hour, my ears became a little sore.  For the expense of these headphones, in my opinion, they are not worth it....sorry to say.
p1639
aVI bought this headphones for our TV. The RS 170 was reported with a delay between the headphone and the TV sound so I decided to go with the RS 180. In fact I couldn't recognize any time delay in the sound.The sound in general is OK as well as the comfort wearing the headphones there is nothing to complain about.I gave 3 stars because the price/quality relation seems to be significant imbalanced. All parts are made by cheapest plastic parts and the first impression is that this piece will not last forever. The value is max. half of what the Sennheiser thinks what is the value of this plastic box. There is another complain about the power management, if you pick up the headphone from the charging position you have to switch on the headphones as well as the transmitter station, thats really a poor design and from my point of view at least a auto on function a must at this price level.
p1640
aVThese were a bit pricey for my budget, but you get what you pay for and these are excellent.  I would buy these again and any other product this company offers.
p1641
aVI bought these for my husband for Christmas and he loves the headphones.  The only thing he was not happy with was where the controls are located on the ear.
p1642
aVBought for friend and he loves them. Very clear. Only has trouble with volum control.  Was use to TV Ears but this is no comparable he said.  Good purchase.
p1643
aVThese are perfect for listening to TV while others in the house need quiet, plus I can hear the other person talk to me with the open design which I like.
p1644
aVThis is my first purchase of stereophonic headphones, and I am extremely pleased by them.  Their fidelity is extraordinary, and I was pleasantly surprised to hear how well they reproduce the deep bass notes of an orchestra.  I have experienced no hiss at all with them.  I am extremely pleased with their wireless feature, which is what made them attractive to me in the first place.  I can walk throughout my two story house and in my back yard with no drop in coverage.  The only criticism I have is probably a feature designed to protect my hearing - the dynamic range of volume seems damped to me.  In listening to music on a good pair of loudspeakers, one can go from a pianissimo to a fortissimo with striking clarity.  Somehow, listening to such a transition on the headphones is more subdued.
p1645
aVI have used the Sony wireless headphones for 4-5 years now. Finally they broke down and I wanted to replace them. Bought these expensive Sennheiser headphones ( they are almost 4 times the price of Sony wireless headphones). The quality of sound is slightly better. There is much less noise disturbance (crackling sound that Sony head phones have). Even when you get close to the microwave, the headphone do not experience any disturbance.I like the headphones, but seem way too expensive for what they do. Perhaps a Bluetooth headphone would have been a better option... For now, I will keep using these.
p1646
aVI bought the RS180 for my husband for Christmas. He is a true audiophile with at least 10,000 CD's. He likes his music loud. So, I say when he's listening to Mahler instead of Miles Davis, it's time for the headphones!!! Needless to say, not just any headphones will do!!! Plus, my husband is the Mensa type who wears a size 8 hat! Not only were the RS180 headphones comfortable, the sound quality was rated as excellent. Also, the range was great--even outside on the deck. It was definitely the gift that keeps on giving! Oh, and set up was very easy! I highly recommend! Thanks Sennheiser!
p1647
aVThe sound is amazing, second to none really, but configuring the second headphone to work simultaneously with the one that came with the system seems impossible at first. The whole process is a bit cumbersome. I watched it on YouTube, read the manual and had a hard time.Enjoy the great sound, but if you buy a second headphone, then good luck with the initial configuration. The good news once you connect the additional headphone once, every time you turn it on again it is the same procedure as the original one.All in all I recommend it.
p1648
aVI purchased this headset for my father, who is one of the pickiest people I know.  He has been dealing with hearing loss for several years and has been watching television with the on screen text.After quite a bit of research, I purchased the Sennheiser RS180 for his birthday.  He was telling me today how happy he is and that this headset is excellent!!  That kind of praise of a product is very rare.I really appreciate the feedback provided by other users that helped me to decide on buying this headset!!
p1649
aVI bought these headphones specifically to use with my electronic drum kit. I have a set of wired Sennheiser that I use now, but the cord gives me grief.Although the sound and comfort on the phones is great, there is a very small noticeable delay in the transmission of the sound reaching the headphones from when you strike the drum pad.This makes it impossible to play the drums with these headphones.I am sad to say that I will have to return them.
p1650
aVI just recently purchased 2 of these headphones. Their quality is excellent.My only complaint is the range. Don't believe you can go 320 ft away. It cut off on me very much sooner, less than 50 ft at times, sometimes closer. Digital signals are very clean but need a lot more power. If you need range don't buy digital. If you want quality, buy these.  Warning: I have been unable to replace the ear pads. They will wear out.
p1651
aVThese seem much lighter than the RS170s they are replacing. I primarily use them to watch movies while running on the treadmill. The sound is awesome, especially when run through a Turtle Beach Surround Sound decoder.The fit is great, and running is no problem while wearing them.So far no complaints other than the obviously silly volume controls others have already mentioned.
p1652
aVI bought these to replace some OLD worn out Sony Headphones ... for just a little bit more $$$, these are fantastic !!!I NEVER hesitate to buy "RECERTIFIED" items ... most are brand new and were simply pulled off the line for Q.C. testing ... there is not a single mark or fingerprint on these !!!Great job, AMAZON
p1653
aVAm very pleased with the sound quality, and with the way the voice is balanced against the background music or sound.  Get no interference from other electrical devices in the house, and get reception throughout the house.  Only negative is I wish it were easier to adjust the volume with the headsets in place on my head.
p1654
aVOh my goodness....I gave this to my hubby as a Christmas gift since his hearing is not good....it was a gift to me as well....I am enjoying the quiet!!!  So handy when he can't sleep in the middle of the night and wants to watch a movie...no complaints on this buy at all!!!
p1655
aVExcellt sound quality, far above my surround sound system that allows you to hear every detail. Comfortable head set, controls are a bit tricky to use with head set on but it's duable once you get the hang of it. A bit pricy but worht every penny. Good line of sight range.
p1656
aVSUMMARY: Want audio with no perceivable hiss? Buy these. A much better headphone system than the RS120s, with comparable range -- and worth the price difference.DETAIL: I bought the RS180s to replace the RS120 headphones that died (no longer producing audio) some time ago. Rather than trying to fix the 120s, I figured it was a great excuse to upgrade. CONTROLS: After checking prior reviews, I was concerned about the difficulty with the volume, balance, and power buttons that others had expressed. I found this to be a non-issue -- indeed, the lower profile precludes accidental volume or balance changes while wearing the headphones in bed or a wingback chair(this was a problem with the RS120 for me). Once you know the layout of the buttons, it is fairly easy to figure out how to adjust the phones from tactile feel alone (there's a gap separating the volume/mute/power button group from the balance pair). Early on, I did inadvertently adjust the balance and thought there was a problem with the unit. This was quickly remedied by reducing the volume to minum, bumping it up one level, which would bring audio to one side or the other, and then using the balance control to bring up the other side. No problems since. AUDIO QUALITY: No background hiss (unlike the RS120, where hiss was noticeable, but not objectionable, at lower listening levels). Great audio frequency response, with deep, crisp bass and clean highs, providing a much better audio experience than the speakers on my high-def TV. ADUIO VOLUME: Volume is provided in discrete steps. THe lowest setting above mute is perfect for listening in quiet environments. The highest setting provides plenty of volume in all but the noisiest environments (while vacuuming, I wouldn't mind a bit more dBs, but still usable) RANGE: My old pair of 120s would produce white noise when the phones dropped out of range, while the RS180 just go quiet, and reactivate when signal is reacquired. Range is reduced somewhat by things such as steel garage doors, metal cabinets, large mirrors, etc, but didn't appear to be any worse than the RS120. The RS180s would work just fine within our single-story, 2200 sq ft home, and outdoors to approx. 20 ft (if you want extended range outdoors, you should ensure that your transmitter is not at the opposite end of the house). SYNCING: I didn't experience the difficulties that some others reported with syncing the RS180 phones to the base unit. The key is press and release the sync button on the base unit first, then the headphones. After a short lag, they'll sync up.CONCLUSION: These phones are so good that I'm considering a second set for my wife to wear ;o). If these ever crap out, I'll be buying a replacement set
p1657
aVPair successfully, but only play less than one minutes music and stopped response. Every time re-pair, same happened.  have to return it but find return window closed. How can I get support service ?
p1658
aVI bought these headphones after hearing such rave reviews about their performance. I guess after owning such expensive audio equipment over the years my ears are a bit more fine tuned. Opening the package I immediately had high hopes due to their beautiful appearance and design. Turning them on however was a different story. First off, volume is not as loud as I would have hoped. I like my music loud and clear and these headphones are not capable of that. There was no thunderous bass, no clarity in vocals, music just seemed flat. I was so dissapointed w/ my music experience I didn't even try them w/ my flat screen. As much as I hate sending things back these are definately being returned. In no way shape or form are these worth the price tag, wireless or not. By the way, I cannot recommend enough my new headphones: Audio-Technica ATH-M50s/LE w/ digiZOID ZO 2 - UNBELIEVABLE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
p1659
aVDoes not transment very far. The buttons for controll are hard to use when you are using them. I have to unplug and plug back in every timeI use them. I would like to send back.
p1660
aVToo expensive for its quality. I bought these headphones naively expecting an upgrade over my panasonic RPDJS400K 20 dollar wired headphones. I was half wrong. These do not sound as good as i was expecting from all the reviews ive seen. They're not bad per say but it's roughly the same sound quality as my old pair of headphones. It was a huge disappointment considering the amount I paid for these things. You're paying for brand alone here.However not all is bad: I did say I was half wrong. These things are extremely comfortable and convenient. When nature calls I could turn on a playlist of heavy metal and take a grand adventure on my toilet with no audio distortion or lag. (However, my bathroom isnt far. The signal doesnt pass through walls very well) The battery on it is great as well, 24 hours of usage. If youre one of those types that play MMOs literally all day and still need access to audio while you slowly waddle to your fridge for your mountain dew and bag of doritos then this pair of headphones would be great for you.For a normal guy that wants to listen to great sounding audio? No, but you should already know that.Ultimately a waste of money, despite the convenience and comfort. I doubt the wireless technology would be expensive enough to warrant this pricetag. It should be 80 bucks at the most
p1661
aVPros:Great soundGood enough rangeEasy set upCons:Interferes with 2.4GHz routerVery hot after short timePoor buttons on phonesReview:I returned these headphones after trying them out for a week. They're really convenient to have and produce very good sound. I've found myself wanting them a couple times since I returned them. However, after wearing them for very short periods of time, my head became intolerably hot. The ear pads are comfortable to the touch, but they aren't leather-like material, more of a cloth. Very hot, very fast. That alone had me thinking I should return them, but the kicker was when they interfered with my wireless router. I'm not sure why this happened with the KLEER technology. The phones tried changing channels (which causes a clicking noise that gets really annoying if it has to continuously change channels) but it never reached a compatible one; when it stopped, the signal was still jammed. Perhaps this would work better if there was the option for manually selecting the operating frequency. Overall I'm glad I returned them, but I believe these would make a great pair of headphones for someone with better luck with their frequencies who needs to keep their ears warm.
p1662
aVGreat set - worth the price.  Better than the Sony - my Sony volume control went out right in the range where I use it the most.  The buttons on the headsets are awful - tiny -- and I'm a female with small fingers - they're almost impossible to locate when wearing, and by then you could lose your hearing!  Looking for 2nd headset with better buttons for the 180 base, but no luck.  Here is what the Sennheiser techsupport emailed:  "The RS 180 is not compatible with the RS 175/185. They use different transmission signals. You would need a new system in order to be able to use the HDR 175/185 (headset)."  So I've just ordered another pair of the 180 headphones.  Tried some self-stick vinyl cabinet bumpers cut to size for the two volume controls, but the adhesive doesn't hold for long.  They were also a bit too thick for such a small button footprint.  Once I find a good piece of rubber or vinyl to use, I'll try some super glue.  Welcome any info from those who have solved the flat volume button problem.
p1663
aVNot worth the price.I purchased based on reviews, however, I was misled.  The sound, when in range is great, but starts to cut out once I hit about 25' from transmitter, with little in the way of obstructions. Lack of connectivity is an issue as well.  I have found just one mini-plug isn't enough for such an expensive headset.They also end up making my ears very warm if I wear them a while.Good noise cancelingAHH Another CON:  Headset Switches!  ARRGGGHHHH  very annoying!! VOL+/PWr/vol-  are even closer together on the headset than you actually see on your little mobile screen you may be reading from right now.  They are in that order too, right next to each other. and then balance buttons are also aligned along the same 'row' in ever shrinking size - makes it just about impossible to control anything other than to turn it off & on while still wearing them, and that's after you get used to the controls.  The PWR button being the only one with tactile distinction, other than the button sizing.
p1664
aVThey only worked first time. Controls are a nightmare to use.  All of the buttons are located in one stylish slash on the headphone, so tightly clumped together and progressing from small, to tiny.  There's no way you can have the headphones on and adjust balance as the buttons are at the small end of the slash, much smaller than a finger tip.  The on/off button is located between the volume control buttons and is almost impossible to not hit while trying to adjust volume resulting in turning off headphones while trying to adjust volume. I was not completely sold on the sound they were supposed to produce either.  I have a pair of Sennheiser TR140's, which I love and use daily.  I bought a big screen digital TV (which doesn't produce the best sound) for my great room and needed assistance to hear programming and thought these headphones, based on my prior experience w/Sennheiser headphones would be a great choice.  WRONG!!
p1665
aVEasy to set up, BUT... The phones sound like what a good sounding $150 pair of phones would sound like.  I brought a $300 pair of Sennheiser phones back in 1993, and sound was light and roomy, like listening to speakers in a large room, but inside your head.  And of course with full 20-20,000Hz HiFi audio range.  The RS 180 has a very nice audio range, with smoothness, BUT that "large room inside-your-head" elusion that I enjoyed from the previous Sennheiser w/ cord headphones I had isn't there.  Although the wireless "KLEER" transmitting of these (RS 180) works very well.  That's where half the value of these headphone are...in the wireless transmitter.  I'll trade in the convenience of these cordless phones for a little loss in "large sounding in-my-head"sound.
p1666
aVThe range of these headphones just did not perform well enough for me to enjoy them. The range is very small, and although they say it has a range of 40', it really seemed more like 15' to me. I could not walk into another room and keep reception with these headphones on. I previously had RF headphones made by Sennheiser for almost 10 years and they worked excellent until the ear cuffs wore off (and even after). But these just didn't do it for me as I wanted to listen to music in my kitchen, which worked fine on my previous set, and was disappointed when I could not even get reception in the bathroom down the hall. I returned this product and selected one from a competitor that works slightly better.
p1667
aVControls are hard to use as they are flush with the body of the headphones. You have to take the headphones off everytime you want to adjust the sound.  Also you have to turn the transmitter on each time you use the headphones.  The older models were much better.  I found two HD130's on EBay and bought them.  Much better than the new ones.
p1668
aVLike many others prior, I too have found that the RS130's are just as good in many ways.  The range of the 180's are ok if you are with in 30 feet.  They don't penetrate walls very well nor if other electronics are being used they can cause interference.  The sound quality is good and comfort is as well.  The buttons for raising volume are obscure and become very difficult to find, which is the volume and the on/off button.  They placed the on/off between the raise in volume and the lowering of volume.  What were they thinking?  My recommendation is save yourself a bunch of money and purchase the RS130.  Either way both are very good for what they do.
p1669
aVI love these, the sound is fabulous,I bought these Like new and the price was great compared to what the new model is running now at $399.00. They were easy to hook up and I charged them for the require time that was instructed. The range is pretty good and the sound is crisp and clear.I would certainly buy more like new products again, I saved a ton of money for a product that already has a great name and great quality products. This model has been discontinued and they have a newer model out now. Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphones (Discontinued By Manufacturer)
p1670
aVThe product was delivered with a manufacturer defect on the headset. Contacted manufacture and they have a process that seems to require sending product back before they will do anything. Product is difficult to put together. It has 38 pages to the manual telling you what you need to do. I set it up to listen to TV ( Replacing another system that worked but the ear phones were very uncomfortable). The system is not working and I have notified manufacturer but so far they have not gotten back to me. I am getting ready, if I don't hear anything in the next two days, to send it back.
p1671
aVI wanted wireless headphones so that I could listen to my aged collection of records (I guess they're called vinyl now) without disturbing my family.  They have done much more than that.  I'm hearing things on the recordings that I never heard with speakers and they were not cheap speakers.  The headphones fit my small head, but are also comfortable for my husband.  The signal is strong all over the house and I've not had any interference or drop offs. They easily hooked up to my Nakamichi tuner/amp via the headphone jack.  I highly recommend these Sennheisers.
p1672
aVI am an audiophile and classical music nut, at least for the last 55 years.I have had tons of earphones/headphones in my history. I am now retired and a Kindle devotee. Occasionally I stay up all night reading, and wanted music in the background. I had not used headphones for years.I had used Stax and Koss electrostatic, Grado, ESS, Sony, AKG, and many others in the past.I figured I would get up to current technology and try the Sennheiser.Sorry.........They sucked!I may have gotten a dud, but I was not thrilled. The fidelity was very poor.I was amazed, I had thought the manufacturer was very solid.I returned them to amazon(super company) and got my money back.I eventually purchased Etymotic ER-4S earphones(directly from the manufacturer).They were the best I have ever encountered.Too bad about the Sennheisers.
p1673
aVAll I can is - Wow!After ordering and very quickly returning two pair of Sony MDR-RF4000K wireless headphones, these RS 180's are fabulous.  The clarity and dynamic range is vastly superior to the previous experience.  It sounds like Sennheiser nailed it.  This may be the perfect example of "You get what you pay for", but I have a feeling even the lesser expensive Sennheiser wireless models are superior.
p1674
aVHello. I received this item a few days ago. This was a present for my boyfriend but when he opened the box the item was broken. It is working but broken. :s. Please let me know what is your guarantee or what options I have. .. I need to have some other options, this item is supposed to be great and good quality, but having a broken item is not good. Thanks
p1675
aVThe sound quality is good, and the charging station is nice. However, the battery stopped charging after a few weeks of use. The ear cups were also not deep enough for me so the tip of my ears would rest on the hard plastic inside, and get sore after a few hours. The buttons are usable but a normal switch and volume slider would have been much better.
p1676
aVGot the RS 180 for my Birthday. I am VERY disappointed. I have spent hours trying to make the device work on my Samsung LED Smart TV. And I can get nothing -- no sound at all. I have an older Sennheiser system; it is wearing out but still works. So, I thought an upgrade would work. It does not. Sad to report: absolute junk!
p1677
aVI have read some of the reviews on this product and I really believe this is a good value for money product. The build quality is great and the sound quality is even better. The best part is that u r not deaf when u put the headphones on. U can still hear the door or the phone. I would highly recommend it.
p1678
aVThese are expensive to say the least, but their performance is far superior to my old Sennheiser RS45 wireless headphones. I did pick up some hum when trying to use them along side the old RS45s (which operate at a different frequency), but that's not a problem many users will encounter.
p1679
aVThe base unit was missing on/off switch so I had to unplug power and plug it back for unit to work. Called tech support to discover missing switch. Did not expect this lack of quality control in product priced in this range. Returned for refund.
p1680
aVI have bought and enjoyed the 120 and 140 series of Sennheiser headphones and essentially wore them out.  I was excited to learn about the new RS 180 system (despite the higher costs) and ordered with great excitement.On arrival- I NOTED THAT THE CONTROLS WERE MORE COMPLEX BUT HOPEFUL THAT THEY WOULD GIVE BETTER SERVICE- IN SHORT, THE SOUND QUALITY WAS GREAT BUT I WAS MARKEDLY DISSAPPOINTED TO FIND THAT THE USEFUL RANGE WAS VERY MUCH REDUCED OVER THE EARLY SERIES!!!WILL NEED TO EXPLORE MORE RANGE IN FUTURE SHOPPING!!!TKS RGBORT1938
p1681
aVI bought these thinking I'd be able to be highly mobile in switching wireless headphones between lots of devices: my PC, my iPad, my piano, my guitar, etc.  All in different rooms most of the time.  Use with the TV was less of an issue for me.They're great wireless headphones for use with a single device.  But using them on multiple devices means either (a) bringing the device to the transmitter base (not convenient if you're wanting to plug them into, say, a 3 foot wide piano) or (b) lugging the transmitter base to where the device is (hardly convenient when you have different types of devices all over the house).So, beware of this if you're planning on using them with multiple devices.  Keeping them in a single room - say, your office or a music room - would work well.  Relatively simple to keep it situated where you can just plug different devices in and out.  But if you're a multi-device, multi-room user like me, you may want to consider just buying maybe three sets of high-end wired headphones, which you could get for the same price as these.Apart from that, the sound quality is very good, and they're pretty comfortable, although slightly bulky.  Set up was simple.I'd give them five stars for single-device, single-room use, but have to knock it down to three stars due to my scenario.  I doubt I'm the only one with this multi-faceted need.  I guess I was expecting that there would be some form of mini transmitter (like a USB stick-sized device) that you would plug into whatever device you were using and THAT is what would transmit data back to the receiver base, then to the headphones.  Maybe there is actually some separate RF device that can transmit the source device signal back to a wireless receiver on the base?
p1682
aVYou will be hard pressed to find ANY negative reviews on these... but beware that does not tell the whole story...Im sure like many others who are considering these Ive read so much good about them I was expecting premier Sennheiser sound and now wirelessly! Right? Wrong...Ill admit this is my first pair of wireless cans so I suppose they sound good for wireless? Problem is that all the reviews Ive been reading say they compete with wired cans any day... I think what people meant was they have clear enough signal that they could be considered wireless NOT that they actually compete sound quality wise with wired cans.Dont get me wrong they sound pretty good, but again I was expecting to be blown away with that high end Sennheiser sound I love, but instead these really hurt my ears! They just are not as well balanced as my other Sennheiser's, the RS180's are very bright, the higher mids and highs are just too predominant. The lows im very disappointed with, it is clean and snappy but simply will not reproduce low tones as they should, they are rated 18 Hz - 21,000 Hz and can barley reproduce anything below 55-60Hz. With these im constantly finding myself going for the EQ to take some of the edge of the mids and highs but then my sound is just left somewhat hollow with no lows mid or highs... Just a poor balance it would seem.Now there are a few areas that shine with these... but overall they lack depth and richness of sound and have almost a tinny quality. It seems IMO that Sennheiser's focus was to pair these well with Video and Home Theater setups and for that they do sound great. However, if its for music I wouldn't recommend these, I personally would prefer my HD203's over these for everyday music listening, and they cost me 1/10 the price of the RS180's!I still cant figure out why all the ranting and raving about finally a pair of wireless audiophile headphones from so many other reviewers...? Are the only people buying these the Hearing impaired or something lol?  These are on par (SQ wise) with 50-100$  wired Sennheiser's, and thats the truth I wish someone would have told me before purchasing.Oh, a few thing I forget to add. Yes the volume and balance buttons are very difficult to use while on your head. They are rather comfortable. Also, I saw one other review about them clipping easily and I would confirm this as well. I did run several frequency tracks and first thing I noticed is the clipping at low levels, again much lower than my other Sennheiser's so for those of you hoping to rock out loud with these, you can forget about it!Final thoughts: I wouldn't be disappointed with these if they were selling for $150 but to spend $300 on cans that cant deliver on sound especially when they are Sennheiser's is a real disappointment. I understand that $ needs to go into the wireless technology but im sure Sennheiser's can do much better sound for this price even though they are wireless, hopefully they will with their next model.
p1683
aVI bought these more expensive Sennheisers because I really wanted to have noise-free wireless sound. But there is still significant noise with these headphones and I feel very let down. By now, such technology should be almost noise-free. I can lessen the effect by lowering the volume on my amplifier, but then I'm limited by the volume on the headset itself.As a result, it is now largely an ornament in my lounge that hardly gets used.
p1684
aVI use these to watch video or listen to music when everyone else in the house is trying to sleep or study.  The controls for volumes and balance require you to take them off, turn on a light and then start over.  Ridiculous.  I will say however, that they sound beautiful, as you would expect from the sound engineers who, unfortunately, have never met an ergonomics engineer in their lives.
p1685
aVI'm sure the headphones were fine. They appeared to be very high quality, but I never used them because it became apparent that they were not what I needed.What really impressed me was the return of the product to Amazon! The transaction was simple, painless, and I was notified of every step along the way. I'm a fan.
p1686
aVThis thing does not work - after many attempts and with different systems; it was past return date and wasted nearly 200 dollars.  Bought additional cables and other items to make it work still a failure; Amazon should take this item back and give me credit for future purchase to retain a loyal customer.  Very disappointing.
p1687
aVThese headphones sound amazing and have great range! Packaging is pretty nice and well thought out. They even come with Eneloop rechargeable batteries! Setup was pretty easy, though I wish it came with a few more options for input and not just a single stereo in. The ear cups are quite comfy, but I would prefer them to be just a tad larger since I have Will Smith ears =/.Now for complaints:As a few reviews have already mentioned, the power button on the headphones is stuck right in the middle of the volume up and volume down buttons. Why? Also, the station and headphones do not shut off automatically if there is no sound feed. Another annoyance is that you have to power off the headphones prior to placing them on the station for charging. I believe it should be smart enough to detect that the headphones are "docked" and automatically shut off the station and headphones and then begin charging. What it does is it continues to play and not charge. Why would I be listening to the headphones if they are not on my head but on the station? O_oSo 4 stars for my minor nitpicking which do not get in the way of the sound quality you'll experience.
p1688
aVSound quality is great, but loses signal after 50 ft and constantly changes Freq (breaking up the music with each switch) When a brick wall is between trans and receiver. My 10 year old $90 Advents have better reception. I returned this product. The Amazon return process was excellent.
p1689
aVThese headphones have superior sound even compared to hardwired headphones I have used.  There are two major faults with the headphones as follows:1.  If your receiver does not have analog (RCA Red & White) out puts and if your speakers turn off when you plug into the headphone jack, you can not use this product and listen to your speakers at the same time, with out a $50 Digital to Analog Decoder.  The Digital Decoder connects to either a fiber optic cable or a digital (RCA normally black).2. The headphone circuitry has a delay so you will hear an echo between the headphones and speakers.  Makes them useless if you want to lesson to your entertainment system and have your speakers on.These headphones are an open format which means you can hear whats going on in the room, i.e., people talking etc.  You would be better off getting the ones that do not have an open format so you don't hear the echo.
p1690
aVFIT IS COMFORTABLE , SOUND IS GOOD. I WOULD RECOMMEND TO A FRIEND. ONLY DISLIKE IS THE LOCATION OF THE CONTROL BUTTONS BUT EASILY GOT USED TO IT.TRANSMISSION RANGE COVERS ENTIRE HOME WITHOUT DISTORTION. VERY SATISFIED.
p1691
aVThey dropout and buzz. I paired them many times, but that did not help. One time they buzzed very loud, I threw them off and they broke. Update, I sent them back and got new pair that are very good.  If I got this pair the first time I would have given them 5 stars.
p1692
aVSennheiser RS 180 so good headphonesme like 80's pop for this was my timein music and still is.But the musicsounds better then ever before when ihave my new Sennheiser on my head/NisseSweden...
p1693
aVI am generally a big fan of Sennheiser headphones and own another pair which works flawlessly and sounds great. The RS 180 did not deliver what I expected. The sound was very low, even when I adjusted the volume to the highest level. Headphone had a clipping sound and did not deliver the over all fidelity I was expecting. I don't know if this was a defective item, or if they all sound like that. I'm returning this back to Amazon.
p1694
aVI spent a lot of time researching TV assisted hearing devices, and landed on these Sennheiser RS 180 Digital Wireless Headphones. The reviews were mostly good, and managed to answer all my questions. Now that I have them, I'm not very happy. They hurt my ears after only 1/2 to 1 hour. The control buttons on the phones are so small with no noticeable difference in them. If you need to change the volume or mute them, you have to take them off and look at the buttons. The sound quality is really very good, but almost too much noise in my ears to be active with any conversation going on around me in the room. For some this might be the best reason for the phones. For me, I want to be able to watch TV and be part of the conversation in the room when necessary. Bottom line is that they hurt, and you can't control them without taking them completely off. If I wasn't past the time period to return, I would do so. I like to give things I buy a good chance before deciding to return (when necessary(. Several times I've been beyond the return period before deciding they really aren't working for me. :(
p1695
aVI've never used wireless headphones before, so perhaps my expectations were too high and unfair, but these are the worst sounding pair of headphones I've ever put on my head. Even a cheap pair of earbuds sound better.  There's lots of signal noise and muffled tones as compared to even a basic set of wired headphones. If these are supposedly some of the best wireless headphones on the market, I can only imagine how terrible cheaper wireless headphones sound.The worked find for me and they were very comfortable, but from all the marketing speak I wasn't expecting to give up so much sound quality versus wired headphones. I'll have to go back to being tethered, I guess the tech just isn't there yet.
p1696
aVThe headphones are good, but not worth what I paid. They seem a little flimsy.  I dont't like the volume control buttons because I have to take off the phones to turn the volume up or down.I cannot tell if the headphone power is on or off. there is an on button on the headphones and on the transmitter tower.  The light on the headphones is on (flickers on/off)no matter how may times I press the on/off button. The sound is great and no hiss or interference.I also have the least expensive Sennheiser wireless phones, but they keep falling off my head!  If I had to choose, I'd get another brand of less expensive cordless phones.
p1697
aVFor the price, it seemed no different than a $69 headphone. Also the control buttons for volume, channel and on/off are so small it is hard to find them let alone use them
p1698
aVEVEN THOUGH THE NEW YORK SALES CONCERN THAT TOLD ME THEY WERE OUT OF STOCK (WERE NINE WHEN I HIT THE BUY BUTTON) FIGURE THAT ONE OUT...BUT JUST AS WELL, SENNHEISER WAS RAMPING UP A "NEWER" SERIES OF THESE GREAT WIRELESS HEADPHONES..THAT CAN GO UP TO 300+ FEET WITHOUT LOSS OF SIGNAL...(TRULY AMAZING FOLKS!!)..AND THE NEW PRICE IS 25 PC LESS, SO THEY DID ME A FAVOR AND SEND ME DOWN THE ROAD...WORKED OUT BETTER IN THE LONG RUN FOR SURE!!...TKS, CHARLIE R., LAS VEGAS, NV..
p1699
aVI do not understand this product. The company offers a system and a unit. That implies that one transmitter will power two headphones. I bought two headphone and one is useless! Why is that? If the second unit is offered for sale, what is its purpose. I purchased mine so that I and my young lady could enjoy a show together. I need an explanation as soon as possible. Thank you!JULY 15, 2014: I AM MORE FRUSTRATED WITH, FIRST, THE ADVICE AND COMMENTS FROM USERS WHO BELIEVE THAT THIS SYSTEM IS SIMPLE TO SET UP! NO! I HAVE BEEN TRYING FOR DAYS TO HOLD BUTTONS DOWN FOR SEVEN + SECONDS, HAVE ONE SPEAKER WORK EXCELLENTLY AND THE OTHER: ABSOLUTELY DEAD! DEAD!I WANT THIS SYSTEM TO WORK OR I WANT TO RETURN, AND FORGET ABOUT THIS HORROR. I TAKE TECH SERIOUSLY AND USUALLY  FIND THAT PROBLEMS CAN BE SOLVED WITH WORK. BUT THIS!TO HAVE A FEW PEOPLE SAY THAT IT IS SIMPLE WHILE OTHERS ARE HAVING PROBLEMS PROVES NOTHING ABOUT THIS SYSTEM EXCEPT THAT IT IS VARIABLE. THAT VARIABILITY MAKES IT UNDEPENDABLE.I WILL TRY TO "PAIR" THE PAIR FOR A TWO DAYS MORE THEN PACK THE ENTIRE PACKAGES UP AND RETURN THEM. THIS IS NOT A GAME AND CERTAINLY NOT FUNNY. BY THE WAY. SOMETIMES, AFTER TRYING TO SYNCH THE PHONES BOTH DO NOT WORK! GO FIGURE!!!
p1700
aVBought this and used it every other day. Sound quality was excellent and simple to setup. The charging light never worked after initial charge, but because the battery life is rated for so long I just figured 30 minutes per day for about 15 days didn't drain it that much. It stopped working totally the day after the Amazon return window expired. This is a lot of money to pay for 7 1/2 hours of use.23 July 2010 Update: Sent it back to Sennheiser on 13 July for SERVICE WARRANTY. Received an E-mail today that it was covered under 2 year warranty (i.e. no charge). However, it is listed as back ordered and the projected ship date is 1 Sep 2010. Makes me wonder if my 2 year warranty will be extended the 8 weeks I don't have it or if my warranty is ticking away...7 Feb 2011 Update: I received a refurbished one back in in Sep 2010. I continued to use it 30 minutes every other day. Now it's broke again! Same problem as back in July 2010, the battery charger stoped working. I could run it on regular batteries, but I'm going to send it back again. I hope it is not another 8 weeks to get another refurbished one back.
p1701
aVI have to give it a one, because I don't seam to have a clue  how to hook them up to my TV\u2026so, they are virtually useless to me.  I will have to spend another $100 or more to hire a Geek to come to the house and hook them up for me.  #$@&!  I'm sure they are fabulous\u2026I am just ignorant!
p1702
aVPrice was kinda  high, way above cheaper wireless phones, annoying problem is electric plug providing electricity to the transmitter, which is convertible to other country types. Prongs not making solid contact and must be played with to make contacts.
p1703
aVVery cheaply made. I returned it after opening the box. Very disappointed considering the price and the reputation of Sennheiser. I opted for the more expensive Sony HDR-Hw700DS. Newer technology and beautifully made. What a difference.
p1704
aVNot a bad product overall, but the sound quality is just average. It does have good range, but will produce static every now and again. For the price I say find something else. This is to expensive for the average quality.
p1705
aVThese were advertised for hearing impaired. Quality is geat but I expected something that I could increase the volumn, not just decrease it. That is a big letdown. I felt this product has misleading advertizing.
p1706
aVThese headphones are horrible, from reading all of the reviews I had assumed that they would be much better than my $69 Sennheiser whatever number they are 65 or something, while in fact, my cheap ones are hundred times better. The sound is muddy, The controls are totally impossible to operate unless you remove the headphones from your head in which case you have no idea as to what settings you have put in. The headband adjustment has no particular lock on it, so when you adjust it. If you put too much pressure on it, it will just change to a different size. From the description, it was supposed to improve voice quality, particularly for television watching, this is a total lie. I switched back and forth between them on the same program and these were so bassey that it was annoying. I have no idea whatsoever how all their other headphones are I bought this one because many people said that they liked it better than the new work 185's, I can only imagine what they sound like. Needless to say, if there were any chance of actually finding a headphone RF better than my cheapies, "which by the way, our excellent compared to this crap." Don't let me know because I don't think I would try any of the high-end Sennheiser's again. Got them this morning and they are on their way back already. Some people seem to refer to a few weeks to break them in, I have never heard of this it may be true, but I can't be bothered, and cannot imagine that things would improve sufficiently no matter how long I played them. Maybe this is why the manufacturer discontinued them because these were a piece o junk
p1707
aVThe use range is not very good considering the price, I have a pair of head phones from radio shack that cost less than $60, that have a far greater range, other than that, they're not bad
p1708
aVVery high quality headphones with excellent design is so cute that you do not want to let them out of hand delivery as always on top. Thank you Amazon for your service and customer care.
p1709
aVThe sound bleeding is really bad on these. You can listen to the TV without even wearing them. Plastic feels cheap, and my left earphone was blown out and I barely used the thing.
p1710
aVThe sound is very good; but unfortunately I sent it back because it gave me a headache. It may be just me as others using the product told me they do not have the same issue.
p1711
aVI purchased these headphones about 11 months ago. I have only used them approximately a dozen times. I was meticulous about taking good care of them and have always been gentle with them. After about nine months, the foam ear piece on the left side fell off. I tried putting it back in place, but it kept falling off. Every time I use them now I have to hold the left side to my head. This was a ridiculous waste of $209. When I checked into the possibility of getting the headphones repaired or replaced, I was informed that the warranty period was only 30 days. I can see why they wouldn't want to warrant this product for more than 30 days. I would never purchase Sennheiser headphones again and I would highly recommend that anyone considering this product, also be certain to purchase an extended warranty. You'll probably need it. Ready the fine print!
p1712
aVI don't like them at allsound quality is not as goog as should beI had 3 old sennheiser wired head sets for last 10 yearsThis is worthest experience I hadSound like death head phone. I coun't hear any live music such as high, mid, lowIt is worth than PS3 headset
p1713
aVThe Sennheiser RS 180 Wireless Headphones sounded great for one time, after that I could not get them to connect to the base. I wish I  had never purchased this item. I actually got depressed trying over and over to to connect them. Even if they some how would connect today I would not want them in my life period.When I want to listen to music I do not want to wait to see if i can get a connection. Be on notice that you will have to try to get these headphones to connect to the base every time you use them! Good luck.
p1714
aVEdited after more than a year of use:First I experienced an annoying buzzing, but I just needed to turn down the headphone's own volume and turn up the volume from the amplifier and the buzzing went away. After that I've been really happy with the headphones, the sound quality is great, batteries last long, and they're quite comfortable to wear even long times. The buttons on the side are really crappy, but luckily you don't really need to touch them often.
p1715
aV(This purchase was made on another Amazon account in the same household \u2013 one unit for that person and one as a gift to me.  I am the one who dealt with the products so I am writing the review under my own Amazon account.)I was really looking forward to this product.  We have been using TV Ears in the house to avoid problems with 2 TVs in 2 rooms & competing volume levels.  They have not held up well, so we were looking for something to replace them.  I was concerned about the price (about $330 at the original time of investigation).  Then they were down by over $100, so we decided to chance it.  (There were some really negative reviews but there were also more really positive ones.  With the price reduction and Amazon's return policy, we decided to risk it.)I was curious how Amazon was to go accomplish their "guaranteed delivery by 8:00 pm" on a SUNDAY, particularly when the tracking indicated USPS.  The box landed by 9:00 am Sunday!The Amazon packaging was quite nicely done.  We have received other Amazon packages with boxes way larger than the item and lots of empty space for the item to slide around.  This one was very nicely and neatly done.  The Sennheiser retail packaging was also very nicely done.  (They can rival Apple in clean simplicity.)  The horrid clear plastic container actually opens up (the sides snap together) so you don't have to injure yourself trying to cut it open.Sadly, that's the last of the good points about this order.The headphones are an extremely cheap, shiny, fragile-looking plastic.  There are many grades of plastic and this is the super disposable-looking kind.  For an item that lists for over $300 (Nearly $400 on the Sennheiser site), I was shocked.  I've seen items in Target/Walmart that sell for under $50 that look more sturdy.  Everything about them looked cheap.  But, we had heard so much about Sennheiser quality that we decided to at least give them a try to see if the sound was worthwhile.  (At least we got them on \u201csale\u201d.)I couldn't tell you because we never could get a sound out of either unit.First, let me say that I find it odd that there were a couple of little booklets included in the packaging.  However, the owner's manual was actually a pdf file on a CD.  How they can call that a "manual" is beyond me.  I don't understand why they would choose to print all their legal disclaimers in little booklets (in about 10 languages) but the "instructions" were on a CD.  I don't know about you, but my computer is at the opposite end of the house from my TVs & stereos.  I'm not going to waste a bunch of paper and ink printing their "manual" or try to read a page, run to the other end of the house & hope I remember what it said & then keep running back & forth through the house.  (We ended up copying the file to a PlayBook to be able to have it in the same room.  Their documentation also points you to their web page for instructions.  I should not have to have Internet access to assemble a purchased product.  Also, the link provided to a YouTube video for setup - no longer available.  And customer service is 8-5 ET - we live on the opposite coast.  Not helpful.)And. . .  Another bad design point \u2013 if you look at the quicky picture-only setup, you might miss exactly how to insert the batteries.  The first one I attempted was a disaster.  There's a little clear plastic tab that says \u201ctwist\u201d but the first one I tried, that had gone down into the cup and was not protruding, so I couldn't see that the cover twisted off \u2013 I was trying to pry it off.  After it was open, I could see how it went together and found the clear plastic \u201cnote\u201d and much later found the CD \u201cinstructions\u201d.  (Maybe I'm old, but I still think a simple printed instruction manual in WORDS (preferably ENGLISH) with the occasional well-done diagram is really quite effective.)Got the batteries charging first.  Hours later, we finally found the CD and saw that it claimed you need to charge them for 16 hours, initially.  That seems a bit much.  That's when we also saw that the instructions said that the top light (orange) on the tower goes out when the battery is fully charged.  It went out quite quickly.  I assumed that perhaps the batteries had come mostly charged.  I let the units charge some 24 hours in all and the lights stayed out (with the exception of one that spontaneously came on for 2-5 minutes several hours in, without being touched, and then went off and stayed off).  At two different points (about 7 hours in and again at about the 24 hour mark) the batteries were checked on a volt-ohm meter.  They were about 1.4 volts both times (never exceeded that).After many hours of charging, one unit was hooked up to a Sony TV (headphone jack) and tested.  The battery had already been confirmed at about 1.4 volts - enough charge that it should at least be able to verify basic functionality.  Nothing.  Consulted the "manual" and all the appropriate lights were doing the appropriate things.  It says the unit already comes paired, so that shouldn't be an issue.  Tried the headphone jack as well as component cables to both TV and DVR.  Never got ANY sound of any kind - no hiss or power hum, even.  Also tried both settings (switch on the back for 0 dB [stereo/MP3] or -8 dB [TV/DVR]) Gave up on that unit (thinking we'd look for the setup video the next day).  Tried the other unit in another room.  This time I tried it directly into a stereo headphone jack, thinking we weren't doing the TV correctly.  Still nothing.  Tried numerous times and numerous configurations and never got a sound of any kind.  Well, the manual claims that if you reach the extremes in volume (+/-), it will beep to let you know you are at the max/min.  It did beep at some point on the up volume, but never on the down volume.  More attempts were made the following day (after the 16 hour initial charge period, not that that seemed to matter).  Nothing.  Only the beep that I'd reached max volume, but never for the min. . .By the time we had an opportunity (afternoon) to try calling Sennheiser (hadn't gotten an email response), they were closed.  (I'm tired of being penalized for living on the \u201cwrong\u201d coast.)I looked back over the reviews and saw many problems and decided that I was just going to return them.  It appears we got 2 defective units.  How odd.  And, the price had gone down another $20 or so in the 3 days since we placed the order.  That makes me wonder.  Unloading bad inventory?So, there were many things I did not particularly like - cheap plastic, flimsy build, (lack of) ease of use...  Lack of adequate support.  The headphones didn't really fit well for circumaural headphones, either.  They didn't seat - they were almost like sloppy on-ear units.  (I can't use in-ear style units [I put the TV Ears to my temples \u2013 hardly ideal] and I've never had much luck with on-ear \u2013 the angles are never right or something.  I much prefer over ear headphones that completely seal to the skull & don't touch the ears.)Everything about them was cheap.  Had they worked well, I may have considered overlooking some of the other things, but it was just a supremely disappointing experience.  Maybe I could've gotten them working, if I could get tech support, but I'm pretty good with electronics and I'm not going to accept that much hassle & super cheap material/workmanship for that price, even if we had finally gotten great sound.  I honestly wouldn't expect them to hold up to a year of regular use.  The TV Ears were way less expensive and, while not great, were built better (but not good) and at least worked.  (Well, for at least a year or two.)Everything I'd read seemed to imply that Sennheiser was a quality name in headphones.  If this is quality, I think I'm doomed.  Does this mean one has to spent over $500 to get headphones that actually produce sound?  Very disappointing.
p1716
aVMy decision to buy these headphones were based on a very detailed review for the bose headphones. This guy had a review that was very long, covered every aspect about them, and made it all sound very convincing. Instead of the bose headphones, he said I should get the Sennheiser RS 180. It was a little less expensive after all, so I got them. I thought the wireless thing was a cool selling feature, but the sound quality could have been a little better. Then after about a week, I couldn't get them to work anymore, so I returned them.Lesson learned: Stick with what you wanted in the first place- sound qualityand don't listen to the reviews that have TOO MUCH INFORMATION
p1717
aVRECEIVED HEADPHONES FRIDAY AUG.7TH AND RETURNED ON AUGUST 8TH. DEFECTIVE AUDIO CABLE AND/OR TRANSMITTER WAS RESPONSIBLE FOR SOUND ONLY ON THE LEFT SIDE OF THE HEADPHONES. THE RIGHT SIDE WAS COMPLETELY DEAD. CHECKED ALL CONNECTIONS AND OTHER OTHER AREAS AS PER THE INSTRUCTIONS FOR TROUBLE SHOOTING ON SENNHEISER WEBSITE. WITH A COST OF $294.94 WITH TAX, I THOUGHT THAT THE QUALITY AND DURABILITY WOULD HAVE BEEN MUCH BETTER.
p1718
aVi cannot truly rate your product because the following items were not delivered with the headphone.Multi-country chargerDetachable audio cableRCA cable3.5/6.3mm adapter2 AAA NIMH rechargeable batteriesCable dresserCable binderInstructional manualsI trust you will send the appropriate parts so I can use the headphone system.Sincerely,Arnethia
p1719
aVI ordered this wireless headphone system based on reviews on Amazon.  Normally, I buy only Sony products and this replaces an older Sony top-of-the-line system that features digital surround sound as well as analog audio.  It has given me great service and wonderful audio, but now the volume control (potentiometer to geeks) has been infiltated by microscopic dust and produces scratchiness and popping noise when it's touched.  But, to the point...it DOES have an optical audio cable input directly from a compatible optical audio output of my 52 inch Samsung flat panel.Imsgine my surprise when this one arrived and I learned it connects to your device via an old analog RCA cable plug cord with a 1/8 mini-plug on the other end to connect to your Sennheiser.In this day and age of digital electronics, that is shocking-and uncceptable, and especially for Sennheiser, an old but venerated German audio electronics company which still makes the standard light-weight hi-fidelity wired headset for many radio station DJ's.So, Amazon makes it easy to return but it's aggravating to deal with the return transit delay.  Maybe I should have done more due diligence but I never imagined a pricey wireless headphone system would be offered without an audio optical headset.  Shame since I never connected it up to determine it's quality as this optical issue is a show-stopper for me.PLEASE NOTE:  My low rating, to be fair, is only because of this optical Toslink audio oversight, making it incompatible with my TV, and does not evaluate the sound quality, range, or functions of the Sennheiser system.Now, I will buy the Sony MDR-6500 as originally considered.  But, I will check with the manufacturer to avoid being snake-bitten again.
p1720
aVi read all the reviews before purchasing.  I dont care what anyone says..... they hiss and hiss and hiss.  I use for TV viewing.  I purchased a pair of Bose.  Super clean sound.  I returned the product.
p1721
a.